New York, session 2025-2026, S3000.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. a) The several amounts specified in this chapter for state 2 operations, or so much thereof as shall be sufficient to accomplish the 3 purposes designated by the appropriations, are hereby appropriated and 4 authorized to be paid as hereinafter provided, to the respective public 5 officers and for the several purposes specified. 6 b) Where applicable, appropriations made by this chapter for expendi- 7 tures from federal grants for state operations may be allocated for 8 spending from federal grants for any grant period beginning, during, or 9 prior to, the state fiscal year beginning on April 1, 2025. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD12550-10-5 2 12550-10-5 1 c) The several amounts named herein, or so much thereof as shall be 2 sufficient to accomplish the purpose designated, being the undisbursed 3 and/or unexpended balances of the prior year's appropriations, are here- 4 by reappropriated from the same funds and made available for the same 5 purposes as the prior year's appropriations, unless herein amended, for 6 the fiscal year beginning April 1, 2025. Certain reappropriations in 7 this chapter are shown using abbreviated text, with three leader dots 8 (an ellipsis) followed by three spaces (... ) used to indicate where 9 existing law that is being continued is not shown. However, unless a 10 change is clearly indicated by the use of brackets [ ] for deletions and 11 underscores for additions, the purposes, amounts, funding source and all 12 other aspects pertinent to each item of appropriation shall be as last 13 appropriated. 14 For the purpose of complying with the state finance law, the year, 15 chapter and section of the last act reappropriating a former original 16 appropriation or any part thereof is, unless otherwise indicated, chap- 17 ter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024. 18 d) No moneys appropriated by this chapter shall be available for 19 payment until a certificate of approval has been issued by the director 20 of the budget, who shall file such certificate with the department of 21 audit and control, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and 22 the chairperson of the assembly ways and means committee. 23 e) Notwithstanding any provision contained herein or any other law to 24 the contrary, if, on a cash basis of accounting, a general fund imbal- 25 ance has or is expected to occur in fiscal year 2025-26, the budget 26 director is hereby authorized to withhold all or some of the amounts 27 appropriated herein, including amounts that are to be paid on specific 28 dates prescribed in law or regulation. Prior to withholding any amounts, 29 the director shall consider whether other means are available for accom- 30 plishing the purposes of this provision. Provided further, the director 31 shall consider the impact of any such amounts to be withheld. To the 32 extent the state is obligated to make payment to any individual or enti- 33 ty pursuant to any appropriation contained herein, such obligation shall 34 be reduced commensurate with such payments withheld by the director of 35 the budget. 36 The following types of appropriations shall be exempt from such with- 37 holds pursuant to this provision: (a) public assistance payments for 38 families and individuals and payments for eligible aged, blind and disa- 39 bled persons related to supplemental social security; (b) any reductions 40 that would violate federal law; (c) payments of debt service and related 41 expenses for which the state is constitutionally obligated to pay debt 42 service or is contractually obligated to pay debt service, subject to an 43 appropriation, including where the state has a contingent contractual 44 obligation; and (d) payments the state is obligated to make pursuant to 45 court orders or judgments. 46 For purposes of this provision, a general fund imbalance shall occur 47 if any state fiscal year 2025-26 quarterly financial plan update 48 required by subdivision 4 of section 23 of the state finance law 49 reflects, or if at any point during the final quarter of state fiscal 50 year 2025-26 the budget director projects, that estimated general fund 51 receipts and/or estimated general fund disbursements have or will vary 52 from the estimates included in the state fiscal year 2025-26 enacted 53 budget financial plan required by sections 22 and 23 of the state 54 finance law results in a cumulative budget imbalance of $2,000,000,000 55 or more. Provided however, that such $2,000,000,000 must be calculated 56 without considering any payments withheld in accordance with this 3 12550-10-5 1 provision or any depletion of the state fiscal year 2025-26 transaction 2 risk reserve accounting mechanism. 3 "Estimated general fund receipts" shall mean general fund tax 4 receipts, after payment of debt service and miscellaneous receipts esti- 5 mated by the budget director to be received during state fiscal year 6 2025-26. 7 "Estimated general funds disbursements" shall mean general funds 8 disbursements, including transfers, estimated by the budget director to 9 be made during state fiscal year 2025-26. 10 No later than ten business days following the issuance of any state 11 fiscal year 2025-26 quarterly financial plan update that includes a 12 determination, and/or the date in the final quarter of the state fiscal 13 year 2025-26 upon which the budget director determines, that a general 14 fund imbalance exists, the budget director shall provide notification of 15 payments that will be withheld pursuant to this provision to the presi- 16 dent pro tempore of the senate and the speaker of the assembly. 17 Provided, however, the aggregate amount of payments withheld pursuant to 18 this provision shall at no point be in an amount greater than the deter- 19 mined cumulative general fund imbalance. Provided further however, 20 before any payments may be withheld pursuant to this provision, the 21 budget director shall first deplete the $2,000,000,000 transaction risk 22 reserve accounting mechanism to resolve the determined general fund 23 imbalance, as practicable. Such notification will also identify any 24 other means the budget director intends to use to resolve any portion of 25 the general fund imbalance, including but not limited to the aforemen- 26 tioned depletion of the transaction risk reserve and/or any other 27 resources. 28 Following such budget director notification, the legislature shall 29 have ten business days to prepare and adopt by concurrent resolution its 30 own withhold plan which conforms with the requirements of this 31 provision, and which achieves the same aggregate of payment withholds as 32 the budget director's withhold plan. If after ten business days follow- 33 ing the budget director's notification the legislature fails to prepare 34 and adopt its own withhold plan, or if the budget director determines 35 that the withhold plan prepared and adopted by the legislature does not 36 conform with the requirements of this provision, the withholds identi- 37 fied in the budget director's withhold plan will immediately take 38 effect. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision contained herein or any other 40 provision of law to the contrary, any payments withheld pursuant to this 41 section may be paid in full or in part if a subsequent general fund 42 surplus materializes in state fiscal year 2025-26. 43 f) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for purposes 44 of any appropriation made by this chapter which authorizes spending in 45 an amount net of refunds, rebates, reimbursements, credits, repayments, 46 and/or disallowances, "refunds" shall mean funds received to the state 47 resulting from the overpayment of monies, "rebates" shall mean funds 48 received to the state resulting from a return of a full or partial 49 amount previously paid, as for goods or services, serving as a 50 reduction, discount or rebate to the original payment amount, 51 "reimbursements" shall mean funds received to the state as repayment in 52 an equivalent amount for goods or services, including but not limited to 53 personal service costs, incurred by the state in the first instance 54 being provided to a third party for their benefit and partially or in 55 full financed by such third party, "credit" shall mean monies made 56 available to the state that reduce the amount owed to a third party, 4 12550-10-5 1 including but not limited to billing errors, rebates, and prior overpay- 2 ments, "repayment" shall mean the return of monies as pay back for 3 expenses incurred, and "disallowance" shall mean monies made available 4 to the state that were not allowed or accepted officially by the 5 intended recipient, based on a determination the payment is not accepta- 6 ble and/or valid. When the office of the state comptroller receives any 7 such refunds, rebates, reimbursements, credits, repayments, and/or 8 disallowances, he or she shall credit the refunded, rebated, reimbursed, 9 credited, repaid, and disallowed amount back to the original appropri- 10 ation and reduce expenditures in the year which such credit is received 11 regardless of the timing of the initial expenditure. 12 g) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon enact- 13 ment of this chapter of the laws of 2025 containing the state operations 14 budget bill for the state fiscal year 2025-2026, all appropriations and 15 reappropriations, contained in chapter 50 of the laws of 2024, which 16 would otherwise lapse by operation of law on March 31, 2026 are hereby 17 repealed. 18 h) The appropriations contained in this chapter shall be available for 19 the fiscal year beginning on April 1, 2025. 5 12550-10-5 ADIRONDACK PARK AGENCY STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 8,200,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 8,200,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ........................................8,200,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 administration program. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 17 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 18 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 19 appropriation for the budget division 20 program of the division of the budget, are 21 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully 23 stated (81001). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 6,500,000 25 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 100,000 26 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 121,000 27 Travel (54000) .................................... 51,000 28 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 603,000 29 Equipment (56000) ................................ 825,000 30 -------------- 6 12550-10-5 OFFICE FOR THE AGING STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 2,714,400 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 13,558,000 27,968,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 250,000 0 6 Enterprise Funds ................... 100,000 0 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 16,622,400 27,968,000 9 ================ ================ 10 SCHEDULE 11 ADMINISTRATION AND GRANTS MANAGEMENT PROGRAM ................ 16,622,400 12 -------------- 13 General Fund 14 State Purposes Account - 10050 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 administration and grants management 17 program (10310). 18 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,580,000 19 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 42,000 20 Travel (54000) .................................... 30,100 21 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 54,100 22 Equipment (56000) .................................. 8,200 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal ................... 2,714,400 25 -------------- 26 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 27 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 28 FHHS State Operations Account - 25177 29 For programs provided under the titles of 30 the federal older Americans act and other 31 health and human services programs 32 (10311). 33 Personal service (50000) ....................... 9,416,000 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,549,000 35 -------------- 36 Program account subtotal .................. 11,965,000 37 -------------- 38 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 39 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 40 Office for the Aging Federal Grants Account - 25300 7 12550-10-5 OFFICE FOR THE AGING STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 provision of aging services programs 3 (10877). 4 Personal service (50000) ......................... 960,000 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 240,000 6 -------------- 7 Program account subtotal ................... 1,200,000 8 -------------- 9 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 10 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 11 Senior Community Service Employment Account - 25444 12 For the senior community service employment 13 program provided under title V of the 14 federal older Americans act (10314). 15 Personal service (50000) ......................... 343,000 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ....................... 50,000 17 -------------- 18 Program account subtotal ..................... 393,000 19 -------------- 20 Special Revenue Funds - Other 21 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 22 Aging Grants and Bequest Account - 20196 23 For services and expenses of the state 24 office for the aging (10310). 25 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 26 Travel (54000) .................................... 50,000 27 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 150,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal ..................... 250,000 30 -------------- 31 Enterprise Funds 32 Agencies Enterprise Fund 33 Aging Enterprises Account - 50303 34 For services and expenses related to video 35 and other media (10310). 36 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 100,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ..................... 100,000 39 -------------- 8 12550-10-5 OFFICE FOR THE AGING STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION AND GRANTS MANAGEMENT PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 4 FHHS State Operations Account - 25177 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For programs provided under the titles of the federal older Americans 7 act and other health and human services programs (10311). 8 Personal service (50000) ... 9,416,000 .............. (re. $9,416,000) 9 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,549,000 ........... (re. $2,549,000) 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 11 For programs provided under the titles of the federal older Americans 12 act and other health and human services programs (10311). 13 Personal service (50000) ... 6,422,000 .............. (re. $6,422,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,739,000 ........... (re. $1,739,000) 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 16 For programs provided under the titles of the federal older Americans 17 act and other health and human services programs (10311). 18 Personal service (50000) ... 6,422,000 .............. (re. $5,891,000) 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,739,000 ........... (re. $1,419,000) 20 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 21 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 22 Senior Community Service Employment Account - 25444 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 24 For the senior community service employment program provided under 25 title V of the federal older Americans act (10314). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 343,000 .................. (re. $343,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 50,000 ................. (re. $50,000) 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 29 For the senior community service employment program provided under 30 title V of the federal older Americans act (10314). 31 Personal service (50000) ... 343,000 ................... (re. $89,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 50,000 ................. (re. $50,000) 9 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 79,296,000 39,943,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 70,057,000 194,727,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 27,016,000 77,192,000 6 Enterprise Funds ................... 30,923,000 28,229,000 7 Fiduciary Funds .................... 1,867,000 0 8 ---------------- ---------------- 9 All Funds ........................ 209,159,000 340,091,000 10 ================ ================ 11 SCHEDULE 12 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 14,456,000 13 -------------- 14 General Fund 15 State Purposes Account - 10050 16 For services and expenses related to the 17 administration program. 18 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 19 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 20 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 21 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 22 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 23 appropriation for the budget division 24 program of the division of the budget, are 25 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 26 part of this appropriation as if fully 27 stated (81001). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 10,400,000 29 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 62,000 30 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 46,000 31 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 301,000 32 Travel (54000) ................................... 399,000 33 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,186,000 34 Equipment (56000) ................................. 62,000 35 -------------- 36 AGRICULTURAL BUSINESS SERVICES PROGRAM ..................... 121,222,000 37 -------------- 38 General Fund 39 State Purposes Account - 10050 40 For services and expenses related to the 41 agricultural business services program. 10 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 2 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 3 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 4 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 5 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 6 appropriation for the budget division 7 program of the division of the budget, are 8 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully 10 stated (10901). 11 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 25,000,000 12 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 610,000 13 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 62,000 14 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 650,000 15 Travel (54000) ................................... 195,000 16 Contractual services (51000) .................. 15,177,000 17 Equipment (56000) ................................. 19,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal .................. 41,713,000 20 -------------- 21 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 22 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 23 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25021 24 For services and expenses related to federal 25 food and nutrition services including 26 suballocation to other state departments 27 and agencies. Notwithstanding section 51 28 of the state finance law and any other 29 provision of law to the contrary, the 30 funds appropriated herein may be increased 31 or decreased by transfer between state 32 operations and aid to localities and 33 from/to appropriations for any prior or 34 subsequent grant period within the same 35 federal fund/program to accomplish the 36 intent of this appropriation, as long as 37 such corresponding prior/subsequent grant 38 periods within such appropriations have 39 been reappropriated as necessary (10911). 40 Personal service (50000) ......................... 763,000 41 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 44,972,000 42 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 477,000 43 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 1,291,000 44 -------------- 45 Program account subtotal .................. 47,503,000 46 -------------- 47 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 11 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 2 Miscellaneous Federal Operating Grants Account - 25006 3 For services and expenses related to federal 4 operating grants including suballocation 5 to other state departments and agencies. 6 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 7 finance law and any other provision of law 8 to the contrary, the funds appropriated 9 herein may be increased or decreased by 10 transfer from/to appropriations for any 11 prior or subsequent grant period within 12 the same federal fund/program and between 13 state operations and aid to localities to 14 accomplish the intent of this appropri- 15 ation, as long as such corresponding 16 prior/subsequent grant periods within such 17 appropriations have been reappropriated as 18 necessary (10912). 19 Personal service (50000) ....................... 1,635,000 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 9,550,000 21 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,023,000 22 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 1,793,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal .................. 14,001,000 25 -------------- 26 Special Revenue Funds - Other 27 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 28 Miscellaneous Gifts Account - 20105 29 For services and expenses related to the 30 agricultural business services program 31 (10901). 32 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 500,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 38 Animal Population Control Account - 22118 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 40 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 41 et is hereby authorized to transfer up to 42 $1,000,000 to local assistance for the 43 purpose of providing funding to a not for 44 profit entity chosen to administer a state 45 animal population control program pursuant 12 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 to section 117-a of the agriculture and 2 markets law, and for the purpose of 3 providing funding to the city of New York 4 equal to the amount of spay/neuter reven- 5 ues remitted to this account from such 6 city, as determined by the commissioner of 7 agriculture and markets (10901). 8 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,000,000 9 -------------- 10 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 11 -------------- 12 Special Revenue Funds - Other 13 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 14 Pet Dealer License Account - 22137 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 agricultural business services program 17 (10901). 18 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 55,000 19 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 10,000 20 Travel (54000) .................................... 12,000 21 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 12,000 22 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 33,000 23 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 3,000 24 -------------- 25 Program account subtotal ..................... 125,000 26 -------------- 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 29 Animal Shelter Regulation Account - 30 For services and expenses related to the 31 regulation of animal shelters. 32 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,010,000 33 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 360,000 34 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 75,000 35 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 667,000 36 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 32,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ................... 2,144,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other 41 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 42 Plant Industry Account - 22029 13 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses including liabil- 2 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 3 (10901). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 886,000 5 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 8,000 6 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 6,000 7 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 145,000 8 Travel (54000) .................................... 70,000 9 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 322,000 10 Equipment (56000) .................................. 6,000 11 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 507,000 12 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 29,000 13 -------------- 14 Program account subtotal ................... 1,979,000 15 -------------- 16 Special Revenue Funds - Other 17 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 18 Public Service Account - 22011 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 20 to the contrary, direct and indirect 21 expenses relating to the department of 22 agriculture and markets' participation in 23 general ratemaking proceedings pursuant to 24 section 65 of the public service law or 25 certification proceedings or permits 26 issued pursuant to articles 7, 8, or 10 of 27 the public service law, shall be deemed 28 expenses of the department of public 29 service within the meaning of section 18-a 30 of the public service law (10901). 31 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 262,000 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 5,000 33 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 34 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 5,000 35 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 164,000 36 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 3,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ..................... 449,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other 41 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 42 Special Agricultural Inspecting and Marketing Account - 43 21955 44 For services and expenses related to the 45 agricultural business services program 46 (10901). 14 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,128,000 2 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 74,000 3 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 15,000 4 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,404,000 5 Travel (54000) ................................... 339,000 6 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,449,000 7 Equipment (56000) ................................ 878,000 8 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 821,000 9 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 43,000 10 -------------- 11 Program account subtotal ................... 9,151,000 12 -------------- 13 Special Revenue Funds - Other 14 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 15 Agricultural and Farmland Viability Protection Account - 16 22265 17 For services and expenses related to agri- 18 cultural and farmland protection activ- 19 ities pursuant to article 25-AAA of the 20 agriculture and markets law (10901). 21 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 413,000 22 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 14,000 23 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 2,000 24 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 14,000 25 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 26 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 55,000 27 Equipment (56000) .................................. 1,000 28 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 273,000 29 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 13,000 30 -------------- 31 Program account subtotal ..................... 790,000 32 -------------- 33 Fiduciary Funds 34 Agriculture Producers' Security Fund 35 Agriculture Producers' Security Fund Account - 66001 36 For services and expenses of the agriculture 37 producers' security fund account pursuant 38 to article 20 of the agriculture and 39 markets law. Notwithstanding any other 40 provision of law to the contrary, this 41 appropriation may be used to support the 42 expenses of administering this fund up to 43 the amount of the actual costs incurred 44 for such purpose (10901). 45 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 116,000 46 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 10,000 15 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 2 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 133,000 3 Travel (54000) .................................... 26,000 4 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 77,000 5 Equipment (56000) ................................. 80,000 6 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 54,000 7 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 4,000 8 -------------- 9 Program account subtotal ..................... 501,000 10 -------------- 11 Fiduciary Funds 12 Milk Producers' Security Fund 13 Milk Producers' Security Fund Account - 66051 14 For services and expenses of the milk 15 producers' security fund account pursuant 16 to section 258-b of the agriculture and 17 markets law. Notwithstanding any other 18 provision of law to the contrary, this 19 appropriation may be used to support the 20 expenses of administering this fund up to 21 the amount of the actual costs incurred 22 for such purpose (10901). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 272,000 24 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 55,000 25 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 4,000 26 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 877,000 27 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 146,000 28 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 12,000 29 -------------- 30 Program account subtotal ................... 1,366,000 31 -------------- 32 CONSUMER FOOD SERVICES PROGRAM .............................. 42,558,000 33 -------------- 34 General Fund 35 State Purposes Account - 10050 36 For services and expenses related to the 37 consumer food services program. 38 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 39 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 40 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 41 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 42 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 43 appropriation for the budget division 44 program of the division of the budget, are 45 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 16 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 part of this appropriation as if fully 2 stated (10910). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 18,142,000 4 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 302,000 5 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 563,000 6 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 539,000 7 Travel (54000) ................................... 240,000 8 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,335,000 9 Equipment (56000) .................................. 6,000 10 -------------- 11 Program account subtotal .................. 23,127,000 12 -------------- 13 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 14 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 15 Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25125 16 For services and expenses related to federal 17 health and human services including subal- 18 location to other state departments and 19 agencies. Notwithstanding section 51 of 20 the state finance law and any other 21 provision of law to the contrary, the 22 funds appropriated herein may be increased 23 or decreased by transfer from/to appropri- 24 ations for any prior or subsequent grant 25 period within the same federal 26 fund/program and between state operations 27 and aid to localities to accomplish the 28 intent of this appropriation, as long as 29 such corresponding prior/subsequent grant 30 periods within such appropriations have 31 been reappropriated as necessary (10910). 32 Personal service (50000) ....................... 1,372,000 33 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 750,000 34 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 860,000 35 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 518,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ................... 3,500,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 40 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 41 Food Monitoring Program Account - 25006 42 For services and expenses related to food 43 testing including suballocation to other 44 state departments and agencies, including 45 but not limited to pesticide residue moni- 46 toring and microbiological data 17 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 collection. Notwithstanding section 51 of 2 the state finance law and any other 3 provision of law to the contrary, the 4 funds appropriated herein may be increased 5 or decreased by transfer from/to appropri- 6 ations for any prior or subsequent grant 7 period within the same federal 8 fund/program and between state operations 9 and aid to localities to accomplish the 10 intent of this appropriation, as long as 11 such corresponding prior/subsequent grant 12 periods within such appropriations have 13 been reappropriated as necessary (11488). 14 Personal service (50000) ....................... 2,375,000 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,021,000 16 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 606,000 17 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 51,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ................... 5,053,000 20 -------------- 21 Special Revenue Funds - Other 22 Clean Air Fund 23 Consumer Food - Mobile Source Account - 21452 24 For services and expenses related to the 25 consumer food services program (10910). 26 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,224,000 27 -------------- 28 Program account subtotal ................... 1,224,000 29 -------------- 30 Special Revenue Funds - Other 31 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 32 Farm Products Inspection Account - 21948 33 For services and expenses related to the 34 consumer food services program (10910). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 981,000 36 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,127,000 37 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 131,000 38 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 72,000 39 Travel (54000) ................................... 221,000 40 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 345,000 41 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,412,000 42 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 73,000 43 -------------- 44 Program account subtotal ................... 4,362,000 45 -------------- 18 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 3 Motor Fuel Quality Account - 22149 4 For services and expenses related to the 5 consumer food services program. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 7 the director of the budget is hereby 8 authorized to transfer up to $150,000 of 9 this appropriation to capital projects for 10 motor fuel quality equipment (10910). 11 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,857,000 12 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 6,000 13 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 5,000 14 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 148,000 15 Travel (54000) .................................... 82,000 16 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,222,000 17 Equipment (56000) ................................. 97,000 18 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,160,000 19 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 63,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal ................... 4,640,000 22 -------------- 23 Special Revenue Funds - Other 24 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 25 Weights and Measures Account - 22150 26 For services and expenses related to the 27 consumer food services program (10910). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 230,000 29 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 12,000 30 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 31 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 27,000 32 Travel (54000) .................................... 35,000 33 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 98,000 34 Equipment (56000) ................................. 74,000 35 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 158,000 36 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 8,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ..................... 652,000 39 -------------- 40 STATE FAIR PROGRAM .......................................... 30,923,000 41 -------------- 42 Enterprise Funds 43 State Exposition Special Account 44 State Fair Account - 50051 19 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 state fair program. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 4 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 6 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 7 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 8 appropriation for the budget division 9 program of the division of the budget, are 10 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully 12 stated. Notwithstanding any provision of 13 law to the contrary, the director of the 14 budget is authorized to transfer up to 15 $320,000 to local assistance for services 16 and expenses of the CCE of Cayuga County 17 for the operation of the milk bar at the 18 state fairgrounds. 19 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 20 contrary, moneys hereby appropriated shall 21 be available to the program net of 22 refunds, rebates, reimbursements, credits 23 and deductions taken by contractors for 24 fees associated with operating the state 25 fairground facilities (10904). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 8,825,000 27 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 4,600,000 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 481,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 3,467,000 30 Travel (54000) ................................... 320,000 31 Contractual services (51000) .................. 13,180,000 32 Equipment (56000) ................................. 50,000 33 -------------- 20 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 2 General Fund 3 State Purposes Account - 10050 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For services and expenses related to the administration program. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 7 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 8 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 9 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 10 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 12 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 9,900,000 ..... (re. $5,873,000) 13 Temporary service (50200) ... 62,000 ................... (re. $36,000) 14 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 46,000 ....... (re. $43,000) 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 186,000 ............ (re. $186,000) 16 Travel (54000) ... 247,000 ............................ (re. $241,000) 17 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,974,000 ............ (re. $955,000) 18 Equipment (56000) ... 38,000 ........................... (re. $38,000) 19 AGRICULTURAL BUSINESS SERVICES PROGRAM 20 General Fund 21 State Purposes Account - 10050 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 23 For services and expenses related to the agricultural business 24 services program. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 26 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 27 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 28 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 29 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 30 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (10901). 31 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 19,935,000 .... (re. $9,793,000) 32 Temporary service (50200) ... 610,000 ................. (re. $268,000) 33 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 650,000 ............ (re. $611,000) 34 Travel (54000) ... 195,000 ............................ (re. $156,000) 35 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,552,000 .......... (re. $2,537,000) 36 Equipment (56000) ... 19,000 ........................... (re. $19,000) 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 38 For services, expenses and grants, including but not limited to 39 marketing, advertising, and retail operations to promote local agri- 40 tourism and New York produced food and beverage goods and products, 41 including but not limited to up to $125,000 for the city of Geneva, 42 and up to $200,000 for the Thousand Islands bridge authority, 43 provided that moneys hereby appropriated shall be available to the 44 program net of refunds, rebates, credits, and deductions taken by 45 contractors for fees associated with marketing advertising, and 46 retail operations to promote local agritourism and New York produced 21 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 food and beverage goods and products. All or a portion of this 2 appropriation may be suballocated to any department, agency, or 3 public authority (11419). 4 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,125,000 ............ (re. $472,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 50, 6 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 7 For services, expenses and grants, including but not limited to 8 marketing, advertising, and retail operations to promote local agri- 9 tourism and New York produced food and beverage goods and products, 10 including but not limited to up to $125,000 for the city of Geneva, 11 and up to $150,000 for the Thousand Islands bridge authority, 12 provided that moneys hereby appropriated shall be available to the 13 program net of refunds, rebates, reimbursements and credits. All or 14 a portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to any depart- 15 ment, agency, or public authority (11419). 16 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,125,000 ............ (re. $266,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 1991: 18 Amount available for payment to the milk producers security fund 19 consistent with and for the purposes set forth in paragraph (b) of 20 subdivision 11 of section 258-b of the agriculture and markets law 21 (10901) ... 6,500,000 ............................. (re. $6,250,000) 22 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 23 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 24 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25021 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 For services and expenses related to federal food and nutrition 27 services including suballocation to other state departments and 28 agencies. Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and 29 any other provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated 30 herein may be increased or decreased by transfer between state oper- 31 ations and aid to localities and from/to appropriations for any 32 prior or subsequent grant period within the same federal 33 fund/program to accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long 34 as such corresponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such 35 appropriations have been reappropriated as necessary (10911). 36 Personal service (50000) ... 763,000 .................. (re. $763,000) 37 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 44,972,000 ......... (re. $44,972,000) 38 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 477,000 ................... (re. $477,000) 39 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,291,000 ................ (re. $1,291,000) 40 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 41 For services and expenses related to federal food and nutrition 42 services including suballocation to other state departments and 43 agencies. Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and 44 any other provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated 45 herein may be increased or decreased by transfer between state oper- 46 ations and aid to localities and from/to appropriations for any 47 prior or subsequent grant period within the same federal 22 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 fund/program to accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long 2 as such corresponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such 3 appropriations have been reappropriated as necessary (10911). 4 Personal service (50000) ... 763,000 .................. (re. $200,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 44,972,000 ......... (re. $40,884,000) 6 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 477,000 ................... (re. $200,000) 7 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,291,000 .................. (re. $200,000) 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 9 For services and expenses related to federal food and nutrition 10 services including suballocation to other state departments and 11 agencies. Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and 12 any other provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated 13 herein may be increased or decreased by transfer between state oper- 14 ations and aid to localities and from/to appropriations for any 15 prior or subsequent grant period within the same federal 16 fund/program to accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long 17 as such corresponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such 18 appropriations have been reappropriated as necessary (10911). 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 44,972,000 ......... (re. $35,954,000) 20 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 477,000 .................... (re. $39,000) 21 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,291,000 .................. (re. $167,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 23 For services and expenses related to federal food and nutrition 24 services including suballocation to other state departments and 25 agencies. Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and 26 any other provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated 27 herein may be increased or decreased by transfer between state oper- 28 ations and aid to localities and from/to appropriations for any 29 prior or subsequent grant period within the same federal 30 fund/program to accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long 31 as such corresponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such 32 appropriations have been reappropriated as necessary (10911). 33 Personal service (50000) ... 762,000 .................. (re. $566,000) 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,275,000 ........... (re. $4,647,000) 35 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 476,000 ................... (re. $350,000) 36 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,290,000 .................. (re. $273,000) 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 38 For services and expenses related to federal food and nutrition 39 services including suballocation to other state departments and 40 agencies. Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and 41 any other provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated 42 herein may be increased or decreased by transfer between state oper- 43 ations and aid to localities and from/to appropriations for any 44 prior or subsequent grant period within the same federal 45 fund/program to accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long 46 as such corresponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such 47 appropriations have been reappropriated as necessary (10911). 48 Personal service (50000) ... 762,000 .................. (re. $137,000) 49 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,275,000 ........... (re. $1,667,000) 23 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 476,000 ................... (re. $105,000) 2 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,290,000 ................ (re. $1,039,000) 3 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 4 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 5 Miscellaneous Federal Operating Grants Account - 25006 6 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 7 For services and expenses related to federal operating grants includ- 8 ing suballocation to other state departments and agencies. 9 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 10 provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated herein may 11 be increased or decreased by transfer from/to appropriations for any 12 prior or subsequent grant period within the same federal 13 fund/program and between state operations and aid to localities to 14 accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long as such corre- 15 sponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such appropriations 16 have been reappropriated as necessary (10912). 17 Personal service (50000) ... 1,635,000 .............. (re. $1,580,000) 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 9,550,000 ........... (re. $9,312,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,023,000 ................. (re. $988,000) 20 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,793,000 ................ (re. $1,790,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 22 For services and expenses related to federal operating grants includ- 23 ing suballocation to other state departments and agencies. 24 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 25 provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated herein may 26 be increased or decreased by transfer from/to appropriations for any 27 prior or subsequent grant period within the same federal 28 fund/program and between state operations and aid to localities to 29 accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long as such corre- 30 sponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such appropriations 31 have been reappropriated as necessary (10912). 32 Personal service (50000) ... 1,635,000 ................ (re. $662,000) 33 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 9,550,000 ........... (re. $7,920,000) 34 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,023,000 ................. (re. $397,000) 35 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,793,000 ................ (re. $1,708,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 37 For services and expenses related to federal operating grants includ- 38 ing suballocation to other state departments and agencies. 39 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 40 provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated herein may 41 be increased or decreased by transfer from/to appropriations for any 42 prior or subsequent grant period within the same federal 43 fund/program and between state operations and aid to localities to 44 accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long as such corre- 45 sponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such appropriations 46 have been reappropriated as necessary (10912). 47 Personal service (50000) ... 1,635,000 ................ (re. $415,000) 48 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 9,550,000 ........... (re. $5,073,000) 24 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,023,000 ................. (re. $285,000) 2 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,793,000 .................. (re. $995,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 4 For services and expenses related to federal operating grants includ- 5 ing suballocation to other state departments and agencies. 6 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 7 provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated herein may 8 be increased or decreased by transfer from/to appropriations for any 9 prior or subsequent grant period within the same federal 10 fund/program and between state operations and aid to localities to 11 accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long as such corre- 12 sponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such appropriations 13 have been reappropriated as necessary (10912). 14 Personal service (50000) ... 1,135,000 ................ (re. $648,000) 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 9,550,000 ........... (re. $2,115,000) 16 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 709,000 ................... (re. $673,000) 17 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,722,000 ................ (re. $1,456,000) 18 Special Revenue Funds - Other 19 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 20 Miscellaneous Gifts Account - 20105 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 22 For services and expenses related to the agricultural business 23 services program (10901). 24 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $500,000) 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 26 For services and expenses related to the agricultural business 27 services program (10901). 28 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $500,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 30 For services and expenses related to the agricultural business 31 services program (10901). 32 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $500,000) 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 34 For services and expenses related to the agricultural business 35 services program (10901). 36 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $500,000) 37 Special Revenue Funds - Other 38 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 39 Animal Population Control Account - 22118 40 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the direc- 42 tor of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer up to $1,000,000 43 to local assistance for the purpose of providing funding to a not 44 for profit entity chosen to administer a state animal population 25 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 control program pursuant to section 117-a of the agriculture and 2 markets law, and for the purpose of providing funding to the city of 3 New York equal to the amount of spay/neuter revenues remitted to 4 this account from such city, as determined by the commissioner of 5 agriculture and markets (10901). 6 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 ............ (re. $783,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 8 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the direc- 9 tor of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer up to $1,000,000 10 to local assistance for the purpose of providing funding to a not 11 for profit entity chosen to administer a state animal population 12 control program pursuant to section 117-a of the agriculture and 13 markets law, and for the purpose of providing funding to the city of 14 New York equal to the amount of spay/neuter revenues remitted to 15 this account from such city, as determined by the commissioner of 16 agriculture and markets (10901). 17 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 ............ (re. $345,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the direc- 20 tor of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer up to $1,000,000 21 to local assistance for the purpose of providing funding to a not 22 for profit entity chosen to administer a state animal population 23 control program pursuant to section 117-a of the agriculture and 24 markets law, and for the purpose of providing funding to the city of 25 New York equal to the amount of spay/neuter revenues remitted to 26 this account from such city, as determined by the commissioner of 27 agriculture and markets (10901). 28 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 ............ (re. $567,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the direc- 31 tor of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer up to $1,000,000 32 to local assistance for the purpose of providing funding to a not 33 for profit entity chosen to administer a state animal population 34 control program pursuant to section 117-a of the agriculture and 35 markets law, and for the purpose of providing funding to the city of 36 New York equal to the amount of spay/neuter revenues remitted to 37 this account from such city, as determined by the commissioner of 38 agriculture and markets (10901). 39 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 ............ (re. $723,000) 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other 41 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 42 Pet Dealer License Account - 22137 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 44 For services and expenses related to the agricultural business 45 services program (10901). 46 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 55,000 ........... (re. $55,000) 47 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 10,000 .............. (re. $10,000) 26 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 .............................. (re. $12,000) 2 Contractual services (51000) ... 12,000 ................ (re. $12,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 33,000 ..................... (re. $33,000) 4 Indirect costs (58800) ... 3,000 ........................ (re. $3,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 6 For services and expenses related to the agricultural business 7 services program (10901). 8 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 52,000 ........... (re. $11,000) 9 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 10,000 .............. (re. $10,000) 10 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 .............................. (re. $12,000) 11 Contractual services (51000) ... 12,000 ................ (re. $12,000) 12 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 33,000 ...................... (re. $6,000) 13 Indirect costs (58800) ... 3,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 15 For services and expenses related to the agricultural business 16 services program (10901). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 52,000 ............ (re. $2,000) 18 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 10,000 .............. (re. $10,000) 19 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 .............................. (re. $12,000) 20 Contractual services (51000) ... 12,000 ................ (re. $12,000) 21 Indirect costs (58800) ... 3,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 23 For services and expenses related to the agricultural business 24 services program (10901). 25 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 10,000 .............. (re. $10,000) 26 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 .............................. (re. $12,000) 27 Contractual services (51000) ... 12,000 ................ (re. $12,000) 28 Special Revenue Funds - Other 29 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 30 Plant Industry Account - 22029 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 32 For services and expenses including liabilities incurred prior to 33 April 1, 2024 (10901). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 886,000 ......... (re. $851,000) 35 Temporary service (50200) ... 8,000 ..................... (re. $8,000) 36 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 6,000 ......... (re. $6,000) 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 145,000 ............ (re. $145,000) 38 Travel (54000) ... 70,000 .............................. (re. $70,000) 39 Contractual services (51000) ... 322,000 .............. (re. $322,000) 40 Equipment (56000) ... 6,000 ............................. (re. $6,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 507,000 ................... (re. $484,000) 42 Indirect costs (58800) ... 29,000 ...................... (re. $28,000) 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 44 For services and expenses including liabilities incurred prior to 45 April 1, 2023 (10901). 46 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 846,000 ......... (re. $799,000) 27 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Temporary service (50200) ... 8,000 ..................... (re. $8,000) 2 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 6,000 ......... (re. $6,000) 3 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 145,000 ............ (re. $145,000) 4 Travel (54000) ... 70,000 .............................. (re. $70,000) 5 Contractual services (51000) ... 322,000 .............. (re. $321,000) 6 Equipment (56000) ... 6,000 ............................. (re. $6,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 507,000 ................... (re. $475,000) 8 Indirect costs (58800) ... 29,000 ...................... (re. $28,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 10 For services and expenses including liabilities incurred prior to 11 April 1, 2022 (10901). 12 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 846,000 ......... (re. $798,000) 13 Temporary service (50200) ... 8,000 ..................... (re. $8,000) 14 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 6,000 ......... (re. $6,000) 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 145,000 ............ (re. $145,000) 16 Travel (54000) ... 70,000 .............................. (re. $70,000) 17 Contractual services (51000) ... 322,000 .............. (re. $322,000) 18 Equipment (56000) ... 6,000 ............................. (re. $6,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 507,000 ................... (re. $476,000) 20 Indirect costs (58800) ... 29,000 ...................... (re. $28,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 22 For services and expenses including liabilities incurred prior to 23 April 1, 2021 (10901). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 792,000 ......... (re. $786,000) 25 Temporary service (50200) ... 7,000 ..................... (re. $7,000) 26 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 6,000 ......... (re. $6,000) 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 145,000 ............ (re. $145,000) 28 Travel (54000) ... 70,000 .............................. (re. $70,000) 29 Contractual services (51000) ... 322,000 .............. (re. $320,000) 30 Equipment (56000) ... 6,000 ............................. (re. $6,000) 31 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 486,000 ................... (re. $482,000) 32 Indirect costs (58800) ... 28,000 ...................... (re. $28,000) 33 Special Revenue Funds - Other 34 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 35 Special Agricultural Inspecting and Marketing Account - 21955 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 37 For services and expenses related to the agricultural business 38 services program (10901). 39 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,128,000 ....... (re. $704,000) 40 Temporary service (50200) ... 74,000 ................... (re. $74,000) 41 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 15,000 ....... (re. $15,000) 42 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,404,000 ........ (re. $1,400,000) 43 Travel (54000) ... 339,000 ............................ (re. $334,000) 44 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,449,000 .......... (re. $4,424,000) 45 Equipment (56000) ... 878,000 ......................... (re. $778,000) 46 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 821,000 ................... (re. $549,000) 47 Indirect costs (58800) ... 43,000 ...................... (re. $18,000) 28 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 2 For services and expenses related to the agricultural business 3 services program (10901). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,079,000 ....... (re. $672,000) 5 Temporary service (50200) ... 74,000 ................... (re. $74,000) 6 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 15,000 ....... (re. $15,000) 7 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,404,000 ........ (re. $1,399,000) 8 Travel (54000) ... 339,000 ............................ (re. $339,000) 9 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,449,000 .......... (re. $4,439,000) 10 Equipment (56000) ... 878,000 ......................... (re. $778,000) 11 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 821,000 ................... (re. $561,000) 12 Indirect costs (58800) ... 43,000 ...................... (re. $19,000) 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 14 For services and expenses related to the agricultural business 15 services program (10901). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,079,000 ....... (re. $679,000) 17 Temporary service (50200) ... 74,000 ................... (re. $74,000) 18 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 15,000 ....... (re. $15,000) 19 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,404,000 ........ (re. $1,399,000) 20 Travel (54000) ... 339,000 ............................ (re. $334,000) 21 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,449,000 .......... (re. $4,444,000) 22 Equipment (56000) ... 878,000 ......................... (re. $778,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 821,000 ................... (re. $566,000) 24 Indirect costs (58800) ... 43,000 ...................... (re. $19,000) 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 26 For services and expenses related to the agricultural business 27 services program (10901). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,010,000 ....... (re. $432,000) 29 Temporary service (50200) ... 72,000 ................... (re. $72,000) 30 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 15,000 ....... (re. $15,000) 31 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,404,000 ........ (re. $1,396,000) 32 Travel (54000) ... 339,000 ............................ (re. $332,000) 33 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,449,000 .......... (re. $4,448,000) 34 Equipment (56000) ... 878,000 ......................... (re. $720,000) 35 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 788,000 ................... (re. $474,000) 36 Indirect costs (58800) ... 41,000 ...................... (re. $25,000) 37 Special Revenue Funds - Other 38 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 39 Agricultural and Farmland Viability Protection Account - 22265 40 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 41 For services and expenses related to agricultural and farmland 42 protection activities pursuant to article 25-AAA of the agriculture 43 and markets law. 44 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 413,000 ......... (re. $413,000) 45 Temporary Service (50200) ... 14,000 ................... (re. $14,000) 46 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 2,000 ......... (re. $2,000) 47 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 14,000 .............. (re. $14,000) 48 Travel (54000) ... 5,000 ................................ (re. $5,000) 29 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Equipment (56000) ... 1,000 ............................. (re. $1,000) 2 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 273,000 ................... (re. $273,000) 3 Indirect costs (58800) ... 13,000 ...................... (re. $13,000) 4 CONSUMER FOOD SERVICES PROGRAM 5 General Fund 6 State Purposes Account - 10050 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 8 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 9 program. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 11 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 12 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 13 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 14 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 15 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (10910). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 15,317,000 .... (re. $6,936,000) 17 Temporary service (50200) ... 302,000 ................. (re. $302,000) 18 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 563,000 ..... (re. $526,000) 19 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 539,000 ............ (re. $268,000) 20 Travel (54000) ... 240,000 ............................ (re. $107,000) 21 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,335,000 .......... (re. $3,005,000) 22 Equipment (56000) ... 6,000 ............................. (re. $6,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 50, 24 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 25 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 26 program. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 28 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 29 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2018-19 state fiscal year state 30 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 31 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 32 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (10910). 33 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,885,000 .......... (re. $1,049,000) 34 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 35 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 36 Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25125 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 38 For services and expenses related to federal health and human services 39 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies. 40 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 41 provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated herein may 42 be increased or decreased by transfer from/to appropriations for any 43 prior or subsequent grant period within the same federal 44 fund/program and between state operations and aid to localities to 45 accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long as such corre- 30 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 sponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such appropriations 2 have been reappropriated as necessary (10910). 3 Personal service (50000) ... 1,372,000 .............. (re. $1,075,000) 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 750,000 ............... (re. $601,000) 5 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 860,000 ................... (re. $669,000) 6 Indirect costs (58850) ... 518,000 .................... (re. $457,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 8 For services and expenses related to federal health and human services 9 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies. 10 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 11 provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated herein may 12 be increased or decreased by transfer from/to appropriations for any 13 prior or subsequent grant period within the same federal 14 fund/program and between state operations and aid to localities to 15 accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long as such corre- 16 sponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such appropriations 17 have been reappropriated as necessary (10910). 18 Personal service (50000) ... 1,372,000 ................ (re. $653,000) 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 750,000 ............... (re. $212,000) 20 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 860,000 ................... (re. $459,000) 21 Indirect costs (58850) ... 518,000 .................... (re. $283,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 23 For services and expenses related to federal health and human services 24 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies. 25 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 26 provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated herein may 27 be increased or decreased by transfer from/to appropriations for any 28 prior or subsequent grant period within the same federal 29 fund/program and between state operations and aid to localities to 30 accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long as such corre- 31 sponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such appropriations 32 have been reappropriated as necessary (10910). 33 Personal service (50000) ... 1,372,000 ................ (re. $149,000) 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 750,000 ............... (re. $101,000) 35 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 860,000 ................... (re. $173,000) 36 Indirect costs (58850) ... 518,000 .................... (re. $382,000) 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 38 For services and expenses related to federal health and human services 39 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies. 40 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 41 provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated herein may 42 be increased or decreased by transfer from/to appropriations for any 43 prior or subsequent grant period within the same federal fund/ 44 program and between state operations and aid to localities to accom- 45 plish the intent of this appropriation, as long as such correspond- 46 ing prior/subsequent grant periods within such appropriations have 47 been reappropriated as necessary (10910). 48 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 750,000 ............... (re. $135,000) 49 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 700,000 .................... (re. $38,000) 31 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Indirect costs (58850) ... 428,000 .................... (re. $144,000) 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 4 Food Monitoring Program Account - 25006 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to food testing including suballo- 7 cation to other state departments and agencies, including but not 8 limited to pesticide residue monitoring and microbiological data 9 collection. Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and 10 any other provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated 11 herein may be increased or decreased by transfer from/to appropri- 12 ations for any prior or subsequent grant period within the same 13 federal fund/program and between state operations and aid to locali- 14 ties to accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long as such 15 corresponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such appropri- 16 ations have been reappropriated as necessary (11488). 17 Personal service (50000) ... 2,375,000 .............. (re. $2,375,000) 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,021,000 ........... (re. $2,021,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 606,000 ................... (re. $606,000) 20 Indirect costs (58850) ... 51,000 ...................... (re. $51,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 22 For services and expenses related to food testing including suballo- 23 cation to other state departments and agencies, including but not 24 limited to pesticide residue monitoring and microbiological data 25 collection. Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and 26 any other provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated 27 herein may be increased or decreased by transfer from/to appropri- 28 ations for any prior or subsequent grant period within the same 29 federal fund/program and between state operations and aid to locali- 30 ties to accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long as such 31 corresponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such appropri- 32 ations have been reappropriated as necessary (11488). 33 Personal service (50000) ... 2,375,000 .............. (re. $2,375,000) 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,021,000 ........... (re. $1,666,000) 35 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 606,000 ................... (re. $606,000) 36 Indirect costs (58850) ... 51,000 ...................... (re. $51,000) 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 38 For services and expenses related to food testing including suballo- 39 cation to other state departments and agencies, including but not 40 limited to pesticide residue monitoring and microbiological data 41 collection. Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and 42 any other provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated 43 herein may be increased or decreased by transfer from/to appropri- 44 ations for any prior or subsequent grant period within the same 45 federal fund/program and between state operations and aid to locali- 46 ties to accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long as such 47 corresponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such appropri- 48 ations have been reappropriated as necessary (11488). 32 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ... 2,375,000 .............. (re. $1,667,000) 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,021,000 ........... (re. $1,248,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 606,000 ................... (re. $150,000) 4 Indirect costs (58850) ... 51,000 ....................... (re. $1,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 6 For services and expenses related to food testing including suballo- 7 cation to other state departments and agencies, including but not 8 limited to pesticide residue monitoring and microbiological data 9 collection. Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and 10 any other provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated 11 herein may be increased or decreased by transfer from/to appropri- 12 ations for any prior or subsequent grant period within the same 13 federal fund/program and between state operations and aid to locali- 14 ties to accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long as such 15 corresponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such appropri- 16 ations have been reappropriated as necessary (11488). 17 Personal service (50000) ... 2,375,000 .............. (re. $1,162,000) 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,021,000 ........... (re. $1,650,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 606,000 ................... (re. $154,000) 20 Indirect costs (58850) ... 51,000 ...................... (re. $11,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 22 For services and expenses related to food testing including suballo- 23 cation to other state departments and agencies, including but not 24 limited to pesticide residue monitoring and microbiological data 25 collection. Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and 26 any other provision of law to the contrary, the funds appropriated 27 herein may be increased or decreased by transfer from/to appropri- 28 ations for any prior or subsequent grant period within the same 29 federal fund/program and between state operations and aid to locali- 30 ties to accomplish the intent of this appropriation, as long as such 31 corresponding prior/subsequent grant periods within such appropri- 32 ations have been reappropriated as necessary (11488). 33 Personal service (50000) ... 2,375,000 .............. (re. $1,691,000) 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,021,000 ........... (re. $1,591,000) 35 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 606,000 ................... (re. $133,000) 36 Indirect costs (58850) ... 51,000 ...................... (re. $39,000) 37 Special Revenue Funds - Other 38 Clean Air Fund 39 Consumer Food - Mobile Source Account - 21452 40 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 41 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 42 program (10910). 43 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,224,000 .......... (re. $1,224,000) 44 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 45 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 46 program (10910). 47 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,224,000 ............ (re. $953,000) 33 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 2 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 3 program (10910). 4 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,224,000 ............ (re. $953,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 6 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 7 program (10910). 8 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,224,000 ............ (re. $953,000) 9 Special Revenue Funds - Other 10 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 11 Farm Products Inspection Account - 21948 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 13 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 14 program (10910). 15 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 981,000 ......... (re. $645,000) 16 Temporary service (50200) ... 1,127,000 ............. (re. $1,100,000) 17 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 131,000 ..... (re. $122,000) 18 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 72,000 .............. (re. $70,000) 19 Travel (54000) ... 221,000 ............................ (re. $214,000) 20 Contractual services (51000) ... 345,000 .............. (re. $341,000) 21 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,412,000 ............... (re. $1,371,000) 22 Indirect costs (58800) ... 73,000 ...................... (re. $73,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 24 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 25 program (10910). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 943,000 ......... (re. $564,000) 27 Temporary service (50200) ... 1,127,000 ............. (re. $1,067,000) 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 131,000 ..... (re. $121,000) 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 72,000 .............. (re. $68,000) 30 Travel (54000) ... 221,000 ............................ (re. $169,000) 31 Contractual services (51000) ... 345,000 .............. (re. $318,000) 32 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,412,000 ............... (re. $1,377,000) 33 Indirect costs (58800) ... 73,000 ...................... (re. $73,000) 34 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 35 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 36 program (10910). 37 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 899,000 ......... (re. $371,000) 38 Temporary service (50200) ... 1,127,000 ............. (re. $1,070,000) 39 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 131,000 ..... (re. $119,000) 40 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 72,000 .............. (re. $68,000) 41 Travel (54000) ... 221,000 ............................ (re. $141,000) 42 Contractual services (51000) ... 345,000 .............. (re. $305,000) 43 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,404,000 ............... (re. $1,354,000) 44 Indirect costs (58800) ... 73,000 ...................... (re. $73,000) 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 34 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 2 program (10910). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 842,000 ......... (re. $178,000) 4 Temporary service (50200) ... 1,105,000 ............. (re. $1,019,000) 5 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 128,000 ..... (re. $113,000) 6 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 72,000 .............. (re. $68,000) 7 Travel (54000) ... 221,000 ............................ (re. $176,000) 8 Contractual services (51000) ... 345,000 .............. (re. $263,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,348,000 ............... (re. $1,261,000) 10 Indirect costs (58800) ... 70,000 ...................... (re. $70,000) 11 Special Revenue Funds - Other 12 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 13 Motor Fuel Quality Account - 22149 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 15 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 16 program. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget 18 is hereby authorized to transfer up to $150,000 of this appropri- 19 ation to capital projects for motor fuel quality equipment (10910). 20 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,857,000 ..... (re. $1,332,000) 21 Temporary service (50200) ... 6,000 ..................... (re. $6,000) 22 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 5,000 ......... (re. $5,000) 23 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 148,000 ............ (re. $146,000) 24 Travel (54000) ... 82,000 .............................. (re. $70,000) 25 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,222,000 .......... (re. $1,222,000) 26 Equipment (56000) ... 97,000 ........................... (re. $97,000) 27 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,160,000 ................. (re. $822,000) 28 Indirect costs (58800) ... 63,000 ...................... (re. $49,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 30 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 31 program. 32 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget 33 is hereby authorized to transfer up to $150,000 of this appropri- 34 ation to capital projects for motor fuel quality equipment (10910). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,785,000 ....... (re. $766,000) 36 Temporary service (50200) ... 6,000 ..................... (re. $6,000) 37 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 5,000 ......... (re. $5,000) 38 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 148,000 ............ (re. $114,000) 39 Travel (54000) ... 82,000 .............................. (re. $49,000) 40 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,222,000 .......... (re. $1,165,000) 41 Equipment (56000) ... 97,000 ........................... (re. $32,000) 42 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,160,000 ................. (re. $485,000) 43 Indirect costs (58800) ... 63,000 ...................... (re. $33,000) 44 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 45 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 46 program. 35 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget 2 is hereby authorized to transfer up to $150,000 of this appropri- 3 ation to capital projects for motor fuel quality equipment (10910). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,785,000 ....... (re. $573,000) 5 Temporary service (50200) ... 6,000 ..................... (re. $6,000) 6 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 5,000 ......... (re. $5,000) 7 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 148,000 ............ (re. $131,000) 8 Travel (54000) ... 82,000 .............................. (re. $62,000) 9 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,222,000 .......... (re. $1,049,000) 10 Equipment (56000) ... 97,000 ........................... (re. $97,000) 11 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,160,000 ................. (re. $383,000) 12 Indirect costs (58800) ... 63,000 ...................... (re. $26,000) 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 14 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 15 program. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget 17 is hereby authorized to transfer up to $150,000 of this appropri- 18 ation to capital projects for motor fuel quality equipment (10910). 19 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,671,000 ....... (re. $553,000) 20 Temporary service (50200) ... 6,000 ..................... (re. $2,000) 21 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 148,000 ............ (re. $131,000) 22 Travel (54000) ... 82,000 .............................. (re. $70,000) 23 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,222,000 ............. (re. $46,000) 24 Equipment (56000) ... 97,000 ........................... (re. $37,000) 25 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,114,000 ................. (re. $352,000) 26 Indirect costs (58800) ... 61,000 ...................... (re. $31,000) 27 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 28 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 29 program. 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget 31 is hereby authorized to transfer up to $150,000 of this appropri- 32 ation to capital projects for motor fuel quality equipment (10910). 33 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,740,000 ....... (re. $536,000) 34 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 148,000 ............ (re. $143,000) 35 Travel (54000) ... 82,000 .............................. (re. $82,000) 36 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,222,000 ............ (re. $165,000) 37 Equipment (56000) ... 97,000 ........................... (re. $97,000) 38 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,114,000 ................. (re. $380,000) 39 Indirect costs (58800) ... 61,000 ...................... (re. $28,000) 40 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 41 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 42 program. 43 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget 44 is hereby authorized to transfer up to $150,000 of this appropri- 45 ation to capital projects for motor fuel quality equipment (10910). 46 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,222,000 ............ (re. $252,000) 47 Special Revenue Funds - Other 48 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 36 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Weights and Measures Account - 22150 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 3 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 4 program (10910). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 230,000 ......... (re. $179,000) 6 Temporary service (50200) ... 12,000 ................... (re. $12,000) 7 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ....... (re. $10,000) 8 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 27,000 .............. (re. $24,000) 9 Travel (54000) ... 35,000 .............................. (re. $19,000) 10 Contractual services (51000) ... 98,000 ................ (re. $93,000) 11 Equipment (56000) ... 74,000 ........................... (re. $74,000) 12 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 158,000 ................... (re. $124,000) 13 Indirect costs (58800) ... 8,000 ........................ (re. $7,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 15 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 16 program (10910). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 221,000 .......... (re. $48,000) 18 Temporary service (50200) ... 12,000 ................... (re. $12,000) 19 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ....... (re. $10,000) 20 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 27,000 .............. (re. $24,000) 21 Travel (54000) 35,000 .................................. (re. $14,000) 22 Contractual services (51000) ... 98,000 ................ (re. $86,000) 23 Equipment (56000) ... 74,000 ........................... (re. $74,000) 24 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 158,000 .................... (re. $44,000) 25 Indirect costs (58800) ... 8,000 ........................ (re. $3,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 27 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 28 program (10910). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 221,000 .......... (re. $37,000) 30 Temporary service (50200) ... 12,000 ................... (re. $12,000) 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ....... (re. $10,000) 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 27,000 .............. (re. $12,000) 33 Travel (54000) ... 35,000 .............................. (re. $25,000) 34 Contractual services (51000) ... 98,000 ................ (re. $85,000) 35 Equipment (56000) ... 74,000 ........................... (re. $74,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 158,000 .................... (re. $40,000) 37 Indirect costs (58800) ... 8,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 39 For services and expenses related to the consumer food services 40 program (10910). 41 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 207,000 .......... (re. $20,000) 42 Temporary service (50200) ... 12,000 ................... (re. $12,000) 43 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ....... (re. $10,000) 44 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 27,000 ............... (re. $4,000) 45 Travel (54000) ... 35,000 .............................. (re. $28,000) 46 Contractual services (51000) ... 98,000 ................ (re. $87,000) 47 Equipment (56000) ... 74,000 ........................... (re. $74,000) 48 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 152,000 .................... (re. $30,000) 37 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Indirect costs (58800) ... 8,000 ........................ (re. $3,000) 2 STATE FAIR PROGRAM 3 Enterprise Funds 4 State Exposition Special Account 5 State Fair Account - 50051 6 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 7 For services and expenses related to the state fair program. 8 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 9 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 10 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 11 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 12 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 13 part of this appropriation as if fully stated. Notwithstanding any 14 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget is 15 authorized to transfer up to $320,000 to local assistance for 16 services and expenses of the CCE of Cayuga County for the operation 17 of the milk bar at the state fairgrounds. 18 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, moneys hereby 19 appropriated shall be available to the program net of refunds, 20 rebates, reimbursements, credits and deductions taken by contractors 21 for fees associated with operating the state fairground facilities 22 (10904). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 7,225,000 ..... (re. $5,874,000) 24 Temporary service (50200) ... 4,600,000 ............. (re. $2,691,000) 25 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 481,000 ..... (re. $226,000) 26 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 3,467,000 ........ (re. $2,669,000) 27 Travel (54000) ... 320,000 ............................ (re. $319,000) 28 Contractual services (51000) ... 13,180,000 ......... (re. $5,521,000) 29 Equipment (56000) ... 50,000 ........................... (re. $50,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 31 For services and expenses related to the state fair program. 32 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 33 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 34 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 35 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 36 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 37 part of this appropriation as if fully stated. Notwithstanding any 38 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget is 39 authorized to transfer up to $320,000 to local assistance for 40 services and expenses of the CCE of Cayuga County for the operation 41 of the milk bar at the state fairgrounds. 42 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, moneys hereby 43 appropriated shall be available to the program net of refunds, 44 rebates, reimbursements, credits and deductions taken by contractors 45 for fees associated with operating the state fairground facilities 46 (10904). 47 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 7,128,000 ..... (re. $5,148,000) 48 Temporary service (50200) ... 4,600,000 ............. (re. $2,474,000) 38 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 481,000 ..... (re. $170,000) 2 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 3,467,000 .......... (re. $999,000) 3 Travel (54000) ... 320,000 ............................ (re. $148,000) 4 Contractual services (51000) ... 13,180,000 ......... (re. $1,894,000) 5 Equipment (56000) ... 50,000 ........................... (re. $46,000) 39 12550-10-5 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 21,432,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 68,131,000 55,383,000 5 ---------------- ---------------- 6 All Funds ........................ 89,563,000 55,383,000 7 ================ ================ 8 SCHEDULE 9 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ....................................... 5,415,000 10 -------------- 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 administration program. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 16 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 17 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 18 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 19 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 20 appropriation for the budget division 21 program of the division of the budget, are 22 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully 24 stated (81001). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,531,000 26 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 5,000 27 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 176,000 29 Travel (54000) .................................... 27,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,614,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................. 52,000 32 -------------- 33 CANNABIS MANAGEMENT PROGRAM ................................. 68,131,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Other 36 New York State Cannabis Revenue Fund 37 New York State Cannabis Revenue Account - 24800 38 For services and expenses of the office of 39 cannabis management, created pursuant to 40 chapter 92 of the laws of 2021, including 41 but not limited to, costs incurred to 42 expand and enhance drug recognition expert 40 12550-10-5 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 training programs and technologies 2 utilized in the process of maintaining 3 road safety and costs incurred for 4 advanced roadside impaired driving 5 enforcement training. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 7 the money hereby appropriated may be 8 increased or decreased by interchange, 9 transfer or suballocation between these 10 appropriated amounts and appropriations of 11 any department, agency or public authority 12 for expenditures incurred in the operation 13 of this program with the approval of the 14 director of the budget, who shall file 15 such approval with the department of audit 16 and control and copies thereof with the 17 chairman of the senate finance committee 18 and the chairman of the assembly ways and 19 means committee. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 21 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 23 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 24 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 25 appropriation for the budget division 26 program of the division of the budget, are 27 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully 29 stated (11509). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 21,872,000 31 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 7,523,000 32 Travel (54000) .................................... 60,000 33 Contractual services (51000) ................... 8,532,000 34 Equipment (56000) .............................. 2,423,000 35 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 14,241,000 36 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 510,000 37 -------------- 38 Total amount available ...................... 55,161,000 39 -------------- 40 For services and expenses of Cornell univer- 41 sity, including but not limited to, work- 42 force development and education for the 43 hemp industry, including the extraction of 44 cannabidiol; and the research and develop- 45 ment for the growth of hemp and varietal 46 development. 47 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 48 the money hereby appropriated may be 49 increased or decreased by interchange, 50 transfer or suballocation between these 41 12550-10-5 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 appropriated amounts and appropriations of 2 any department, agency or public authority 3 for expenditures incurred in the operation 4 of this program with the approval of the 5 director of the budget, who shall file 6 such approval with the department of audit 7 and control and copies thereof with the 8 chairman of the senate finance committee 9 and the chairman of the assembly ways and 10 means committee. 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 12 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 13 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 14 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 15 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 16 appropriation for the budget division 17 program of the division of the budget, are 18 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 19 part of this appropriation as if fully 20 stated (11511). 21 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,000,000 22 -------------- 23 Program account subtotal .................. 56,161,000 24 -------------- 25 Special Revenue Funds - Other 26 Medical Cannabis Fund 27 Medical Cannabis Health Operations and Oversight Account 28 - 23755 29 For services and expenses related to chapter 30 90 of the laws of 2014, establishing the 31 medical marihuana program. 32 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 33 the money hereby appropriated may be 34 increased or decreased by interchange, 35 transfer or suballocation between these 36 appropriated amounts and appropriations of 37 any department, agency or public authority 38 for expenditures incurred in the operation 39 of this program with the approval of the 40 director of the budget, who shall file 41 such approval with the department of audit 42 and control and copies thereof with the 43 chairman of the senate finance committee 44 and the chairman of the assembly ways and 45 means committee. 46 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 47 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 48 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 49 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 42 12550-10-5 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 2 appropriation for the budget division 3 program of the division of the budget, are 4 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 5 part of this appropriation as if fully 6 stated (11510). 7 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,542,000 8 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 102,000 9 Travel (54000) .................................... 31,000 10 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,277,000 11 Equipment (56000) ................................ 171,000 12 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,780,000 13 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 67,000 14 -------------- 15 Program account subtotal .................. 11,970,000 16 -------------- 17 COMPLIANCE PROGRAM ........................................... 7,644,000 18 -------------- 19 General Fund 20 State Purposes Account - 10050 21 For services and expenses related to the 22 compliance program. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 24 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 25 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 26 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 27 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 28 appropriation for the budget division 29 program of the division of the budget, are 30 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 31 part of this appropriation as if fully 32 stated (11504). 33 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 5,784,000 34 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 800,000 35 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 15,000 36 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 108,000 37 Travel (54000) .................................... 32,000 38 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 732,000 39 Equipment (56000) ................................ 173,000 40 -------------- 41 LICENSING AND WHOLESALER SERVICES PROGRAM .................... 8,373,000 42 -------------- 43 General Fund 44 State Purposes Account - 10050 43 12550-10-5 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 licensing and wholesaler services program. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 4 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 6 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 7 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 8 appropriation for the budget division 9 program of the division of the budget, are 10 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully 12 stated (11505). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 6,189,000 14 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 151,000 15 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 50,000 16 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 60,000 17 Travel (54000) .................................... 20,000 18 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,848,000 19 Equipment (56000) ................................. 55,000 20 -------------- 44 12550-10-5 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 CANNABIS MANAGEMENT PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Other 3 New York State Cannabis Revenue Fund 4 New York State Cannabis Revenue Account - 24800 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses of Cornell university, including but not 7 limited to, work-force development and education for the hemp indus- 8 try, including the extraction of cannabidiol; and the research and 9 development for the growth of hemp and varietal development. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 11 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, transfer or 12 suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations 13 of any department, agency or public authority for expenditures 14 incurred in the operation of this program with the approval of the 15 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 16 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 17 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 18 ways and means committee. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 20 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 21 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 22 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 23 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (11511). 25 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 .......... (re. $1,000,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 27 For services and expenses of the office of cannabis management, 28 created pursuant to chapter 92 of the laws of 2021, including but 29 not limited to, costs incurred to expand and enhance drug recogni- 30 tion expert training programs and technologies utilized in the proc- 31 ess of maintaining road safety and costs incurred for advanced road- 32 side impaired driving enforcement training. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 34 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, transfer or 35 suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations 36 of any department, agency or public authority for expenditures 37 incurred in the operation of this program with the approval of the 38 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 39 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 40 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 41 ways and means committee. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 43 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 44 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 45 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 46 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 47 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (11509). 48 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 18,322,000 .... (re. $4,754,000) 49 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 7,523,000 .......... (re. $341,000) 45 12550-10-5 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ... 8,532,000 .......... (re. $4,978,000) 2 Equipment (56000) ... 2,423,000 ..................... (re. $1,317,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 11,879,000 .............. (re. $2,897,000) 4 Indirect costs (58800) ... 510,000 .................... (re. $144,000) 5 For services and expenses of Cornell university, including but not 6 limited to, work-force development and education for the hemp indus- 7 try, including the extraction of cannabidiol; and the research and 8 development for the growth of hemp and varietal development. 9 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 10 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, transfer or 11 suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations 12 of any department, agency or public authority for expenditures 13 incurred in the operation of this program with the approval of the 14 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 15 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 16 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 17 ways and means committee. 18 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 19 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 20 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 21 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 22 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (11511). 24 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 .......... (re. $1,000,000) 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 26 For services and expenses of the office of cannabis management, 27 created pursuant to chapter 92 of the laws of 2021, including but 28 not limited to, costs incurred to expand and enhance drug recogni- 29 tion expert training programs and technologies utilized in the proc- 30 ess of maintaining road safety and costs incurred for advanced road- 31 side impaired driving enforcement training. 32 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 33 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, transfer or 34 suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations 35 of any department, agency or public authority for expenditures 36 incurred in the operation of this program with the approval of the 37 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 38 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 39 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 40 ways and means committee. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 42 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 43 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 44 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 45 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 46 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (11509). 47 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 9,072,000 ....... (re. $216,000) 48 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 7,523,000 .......... (re. $682,000) 49 Contractual services (51000) ... 8,532,000 ............ (re. $719,000) 50 Equipment (56000) ... 1,995,000 ..................... (re. $1,284,000) 51 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 5,779,000 ................... (re. $8,000) 46 12550-10-5 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Indirect costs (58800) ... 288,000 ...................... (re. $8,000) 2 For services and expenses of Cornell university, including but not 3 limited to, workforce development and education for the hemp indus- 4 try, including the extraction of cannabidiol; and the research and 5 development for the growth of hemp and varietal development. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 7 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, transfer or 8 suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations 9 of any department, agency or public authority for expenditures 10 incurred in the operation of this program with the approval of the 11 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 12 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 13 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 14 ways and means committee. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 16 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 17 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 18 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 19 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 20 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (11511). 21 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 .......... (re. $1,000,000) 22 Special Revenue Funds - Other 23 Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account 24 New York State Cannabis Revenue Fund Account - 24800 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 26 For services and expenses of Cornell university, including but not 27 limited to, workforce development and education for the hemp indus- 28 try, including the extraction of cannabidiol; and the research and 29 development for the growth of hemp and varietal development. 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 31 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, transfer or 32 suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations 33 of any department, agency or public authority for expenditures 34 incurred in the operation of this program with the approval of the 35 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 36 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 37 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 38 ways and means committee. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 40 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 41 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 42 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 43 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (11511). 45 Contractual services ... 1,000,000 .................... (re. $383,000) 46 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 50, 47 section 1, of the laws of 2022: 48 For services and expenses of the office of cannabis management, 49 created pursuant to chapter 92 of the laws of 2021, including but 47 12550-10-5 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 not limited to, costs incurred to expand and enhance drug recogni- 2 tion expert training programs and technologies utilized in the proc- 3 ess of maintaining road safety and costs incurred for advanced road- 4 side impaired driving enforcement training. 5 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 6 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, transfer or 7 suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations 8 of any department, agency or public authority for expenditures 9 incurred in the operation of this program with the approval of the 10 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 11 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 12 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 13 ways and means committee. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 15 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 17 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 18 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 19 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (11509). 20 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 9,072,000 ..... (re. $7,192,000) 21 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 7,523,000 .......... (re. $465,000) 22 Travel (54000) ... 60,000 .............................. (re. $19,000) 23 Contractual services (51000) ... 8,532,000 ............ (re. $968,000) 24 Equipment (56000) ... 1,995,000 ..................... (re. $1,950,000) 25 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 5,779,000 ............... (re. $4,597,000) 26 Indirect costs (58800) ... 288,000 .................... (re. $233,000) 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 Medical Cannabis Fund 29 Medical Cannabis Health Operations and Oversight Account - 23755 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 31 For services and expenses related to chapter 90 of the laws of 2014, 32 establishing the medical marihuana program. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 34 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, transfer or 35 suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations 36 of any department, agency or public authority for expenditures 37 incurred in the operation of this program with the approval of the 38 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 39 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 40 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 41 ways and means committee. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 43 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 44 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 45 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 46 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 47 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (11510). 48 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,410,000 ..... (re. $3,136,000) 49 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 102,000 ............ (re. $101,000) 50 Travel (54000) ... 31,000 .............................. (re. $27,000) 48 12550-10-5 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,277,000 .......... (re. $2,570,000) 2 Equipment (56000) ... 171,000 ......................... (re. $155,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,693,000 ............... (re. $1,870,000) 4 Indirect costs (58800) ... 67,000 ...................... (re. $33,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 6 For services and expenses related to chapter 90 of the laws of 2014, 7 establishing the medical marihuana program. 8 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 9 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, transfer or 10 suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations 11 of any department, agency or public authority for expenditures 12 incurred in the operation of this program with the approval of the 13 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 14 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 15 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 16 ways and means committee. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 18 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 19 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 20 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 21 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (11510). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,410,000 ..... (re. $3,262,000) 24 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 102,000 ............. (re. $93,000) 25 Travel (54000) ... 31,000 .............................. (re. $29,000) 26 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,277,000 .......... (re. $1,741,000) 27 Equipment (56000) ... 171,000 ......................... (re. $171,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,693,000 ............... (re. $1,958,000) 29 Indirect costs (58800) ... 67,000 ...................... (re. $32,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 31 For services and expenses related to chapter 90 of the laws of 2014, 32 establishing the medical marihuana program. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 34 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, transfer or 35 suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations 36 of any department, agency or public authority for expenditures 37 incurred in the operation of this program with the approval of the 38 director of the budget, who shall file such approval with the 39 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 40 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 41 ways and means committee. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 43 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 44 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 45 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 46 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 47 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (11510). 48 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,410,000 ..... (re. $1,881,000) 49 Travel (54000) ... 31,000 ............................... (re. $6,000) 50 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,277,000 .......... (re. $1,114,000) 49 12550-10-5 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Equipment (56000) ... 171,000 ......................... (re. $116,000) 2 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,693,000 ................. (re. $933,000) 50 12550-10-5 COUNCIL ON THE ARTS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 7,583,000 1,500,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 400,000 1,350,000 5 ---------------- ---------------- 6 All Funds ........................ 7,983,000 2,850,000 7 ================ ================ 8 SCHEDULE 9 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ....................................... 7,983,000 10 -------------- 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 administration program. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 16 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 17 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 18 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 19 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 20 appropriation for the budget division 21 program of the division of the budget, are 22 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully 24 stated (81001). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,028,000 26 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 53,000 28 Travel (54000) ................................... 189,000 29 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,758,000 30 Equipment (56000) ................................. 54,000 31 -------------- 32 Program account subtotal ................... 6,083,000 33 -------------- 34 For services and expenses of the State of 35 the Arts Fellowship Program. 36 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule 37 or regulation to the contrary, a portion 38 of this appropriation may be suballocated, 39 interchanged, transferred or otherwise 40 made available to any state department, 41 agency, or public authority for the 42 purposes stated herein (12133). 51 12550-10-5 COUNCIL ON THE ARTS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 500,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 4 -------------- 5 For services and expenses of the Cultivating 6 Havens for the Arts through Regional 7 Murals (CHARM) NY program. 8 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule 9 or regulation to the contrary, a portion 10 of this appropriation may be suballocated, 11 interchanged, transferred or otherwise 12 made available to any state department, 13 agency, or public authority for the 14 purposes stated herein (12134). 15 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,000,000 16 -------------- 17 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 20 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 21 Council on the Arts Account - 25376 22 For administration of programs funded from 23 the national endowment for the arts feder- 24 al grant award (81001). 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 400,000 26 -------------- 27 Program account subtotal ..................... 400,000 28 -------------- 52 12550-10-5 COUNCIL ON THE ARTS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 2 General Fund 3 State Purposes Account - 10050 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For services and expenses of the State of the Arts Fellowship Program. 6 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the 7 contrary, a portion of this appropriation may be suballocated, 8 interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available to any state 9 department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated 10 herein (12133). 11 Contractual Services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $500,000) 12 General Fund 13 [Local Assistance Account - 10000] 14 State Purposes Account - 10050 15 The appropriation made by chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as 16 transferred in accordance with state finance law, is hereby amended 17 and reappropriated to read: 18 For services and expenses of the Cultivating Havens for the Arts 19 through Regional Murals (CHARM) NY program. 20 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the 21 contrary, a portion of this appropriation may be suballocated, 22 interchanged, transferred or otherwise made available to any state 23 department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stated 24 herein (12134). 25 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 .......... (re. $1,000,000) 26 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 27 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 28 Council on the Arts Account - 25376 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 30 For administration of programs funded from the national endowment for 31 the arts federal grant award (81001). 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 400,000 ............... (re. $400,000) 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 34 For administration of programs funded from the national endowment for 35 the arts federal grant award (81001). 36 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 400,000 ............... (re. $400,000) 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 38 For administration of programs funded from the national endowment for 39 the arts federal grant award (81001). 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 400,000 ............... (re. $400,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 42 For administration of programs funded from the national endowment for 43 the arts federal grant award (81001). 53 12550-10-5 COUNCIL ON THE ARTS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 100,000 ............... (re. $100,000) 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 3 For administration of programs funded from the national endowment for 4 the arts federal grant award (81001). 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 100,000 ................ (re. $50,000) 54 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AUDIT AND CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 179,662,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 30,706,000 0 5 Internal Service Funds ............. 103,117,000 0 6 Fiduciary Funds .................... 290,230,000 0 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 603,715,000 0 9 ================ ================ 10 SCHEDULE 11 AUDIT AND CONTROL PROGRAM .................................. 179,781,000 12 -------------- 13 General Fund 14 State Purposes Account - 10050 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 audit and control program. 17 A portion of this appropriation must be used 18 for services and expenses related to the 19 achieving a better life experience 20 program. The total amount used for such 21 purpose must be at least $394,000. 22 A portion of this appropriation must be used 23 to conduct audits of preschool special 24 education programs as required by chapter 25 545 of the laws of 2013. The total amount 26 used for such purpose must be at least 27 $2,000,000 higher than the amount dedi- 28 cated to this purpose during the 2013-14 29 fiscal year. 30 Up to $780,000 of this appropriation shall 31 be made available for homeless shelter 32 audits. 33 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 34 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 35 changed or transferred without limit to 36 any other appropriation in any other 37 program or fund within the department of 38 audit and control, with the approval of 39 the director of the budget (12714). 40 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 146,054,000 41 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,608,000 42 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 259,000 43 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 3,891,000 55 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AUDIT AND CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Travel (54000) ................................. 1,474,000 2 Contractual services (51000) .................. 24,508,000 3 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,868,000 4 -------------- 5 Program account subtotal ................. 179,662,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Other 8 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 9 Grants Account - 20100 10 For services and expenses related to the 11 state and local accountability program. 12 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 13 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 14 changed or transferred without limit to 15 any other appropriation in any other 16 program or fund within the department of 17 audit and control, with the approval of 18 the director of the budget (12714). 19 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 119,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal ..................... 119,000 22 -------------- 23 CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICE PROGRAM ............................ 91,917,000 24 -------------- 25 Internal Service Funds 26 Audit and Control Revolving Account 27 CIO Information Technology Centralized Services Account 28 - 55252 29 For services and expenses related to the 30 chief information office program. 31 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 32 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 33 changed or transferred without limit to 34 any other appropriation in any other 35 program or fund within the department of 36 audit and control, with the approval of 37 the director of the budget (12716). 38 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 18,183,000 39 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 77,000 40 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 76,000 41 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 565,000 42 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 43 Contractual services (51000) .................. 55,887,000 44 Equipment (56000) .............................. 4,343,000 56 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AUDIT AND CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 12,280,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 501,000 3 -------------- 4 COLLEGE CHOICE TUITION SAVINGS PROGRAM ....................... 1,558,000 5 -------------- 6 Fiduciary Funds 7 College Savings Trust Fund 8 College Savings Account - 22022 9 For services and expenses related to the 10 college choice tuition savings program. 11 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 12 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 13 changed or transferred without limit to 14 any other appropriation in any other 15 program or fund within the department of 16 audit and control or the Higher Education 17 Services Corporation, with the approval of 18 the director of the budget (80471). 19 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 681,000 20 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 21 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 22 Travel (54000) .................................... 16,000 23 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 382,000 24 Equipment (56000) .................................. 1,000 25 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 457,000 26 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 19,000 27 -------------- 28 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION PROGRAM .................................. 3,617,000 29 -------------- 30 Internal Service Funds 31 Audit and Control Revolving Account 32 Executive Direction Internal Audit Account - 55251 33 For services and expenses related to the 34 executive direction program. 35 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 36 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 37 changed or transferred without limit to 38 any other appropriation in any other 39 program or fund within the department of 40 audit and control, with the approval of 41 the director of the budget (81031). 42 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,067,000 43 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 5,000 44 Travel (54000) ..................................... 6,000 57 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AUDIT AND CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 96,000 2 Equipment (56000) .................................. 7,000 3 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,379,000 4 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 57,000 5 -------------- 6 NEW YORK ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AND SPILL COMPENSATION 7 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ..................................... 1,341,000 8 -------------- 9 Special Revenue Funds - Other 10 Environmental Protection and Oil Spill Compensation Fund 11 Department of Audit and Control Account - 21201 12 For services and expenses related to the New 13 York environmental protection and spill 14 compensation administration program. 15 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 16 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 17 changed or transferred without limit to 18 any other appropriation in any other 19 program or fund within the department of 20 audit and control, with the approval of 21 the director of the budget (12718). 22 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 730,000 23 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 26,000 24 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 2,000 25 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 5,000 26 Travel (54000) ..................................... 3,000 27 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 28 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 502,000 29 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 23,000 30 -------------- 31 OFFICE OF THE STATE DEPUTY COMPTROLLER FOR NEW YORK CITY ..... 5,543,000 32 -------------- 33 Special Revenue Funds - Other 34 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 35 Financial Oversight Account - 22039 36 For services and expenses related to the 37 office of the state deputy comptroller for 38 New York city. 39 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 40 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 41 changed or transferred without limit to 42 any other appropriation in any other 43 program or fund within the department of 44 audit and control, with the approval of 45 the director of the budget (12719). 58 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AUDIT AND CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,842,000 2 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 15,000 3 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 4 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 31,000 5 Travel (54000) ..................................... 4,000 6 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 690,000 7 Equipment (56000) ................................. 20,000 8 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,851,000 9 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 89,000 10 -------------- 11 RETIREMENT SERVICES PROGRAM ................................ 288,672,000 12 -------------- 13 Fiduciary Funds 14 Common Retirement Fund 15 Common Retirement Fund Account - 65000 16 For services and expenses related to the 17 retirement services program (12721). 18 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 105,051,000 19 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 397,000 20 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 3,413,000 21 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 3,065,000 22 Travel (54000) ................................... 406,000 23 Contractual services (51000) .................. 97,238,000 24 Equipment (56000) .............................. 3,324,000 25 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 72,758,000 26 Indirect costs (58800) ......................... 3,020,000 27 -------------- 28 STATE AND LOCAL ACCOUNTABILITY PROGRAM ....................... 4,185,000 29 -------------- 30 Internal Service Funds 31 Audit and Control Revolving Account 32 Executive Direction Internal Audit Account - 55251 33 For services and expenses related to the 34 state and local accountability program. 35 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 36 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 37 changed or transferred without limit to 38 any other appropriation in any other 39 program or fund within the department of 40 audit and control, with the approval of 41 the director of the budget (12720). 42 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,407,000 43 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 1,000 44 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 99,000 59 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AUDIT AND CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,612,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 66,000 3 -------------- 4 STATE OPERATIONS PROGRAM .................................... 27,101,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Child Performers Protection Fund 8 Child Performers Protection Account - 20401 9 For services and expenses related to the 10 state operations program. 11 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 12 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 13 changed or transferred without limit to 14 any other appropriation in any other 15 program or fund within the department of 16 audit and control, with the approval of 17 the director of the budget. 18 Notwithstanding any other law to the contra- 19 ry, for accounting services provided in 20 connection with the administration of the 21 child performer's holding fund created 22 pursuant to section 99-k of the state 23 finance law (81003). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 79,000 25 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 1,000 26 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 53,000 27 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 3,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal ..................... 136,000 30 -------------- 31 Special Revenue Funds - Other 32 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 33 Abandoned Property Audit Account - 21985 34 For services and expenses related to the 35 state operations program. 36 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 37 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 38 changed or transferred without limit to 39 any other appropriation in any other 40 program or fund within the department of 41 audit and control, with the approval of 42 the director of the budget (81003). 43 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 16,115,000 44 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 32,000 45 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 208,000 60 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF AUDIT AND CONTROL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 840,000 2 Travel (54000) ................................... 170,000 3 Contractual services (51000) ................... 6,172,000 4 Equipment (56000) ................................. 30,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal .................. 23,567,000 7 -------------- 8 Internal Service Funds 9 Agencies Internal Service Fund 10 Banking Services Account - 55057 11 For services and expenses related to the 12 state operations program. 13 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 14 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 15 changed or transferred without limit to 16 any other appropriation in any other 17 program or fund within the department of 18 audit and control, with the approval of 19 the director of the budget (81003). 20 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 190,000 21 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 910,000 22 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,010,000 23 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 124,000 24 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 6,000 25 -------------- 26 Program account subtotal ................... 3,240,000 27 -------------- 28 Internal Service Funds 29 Agencies Internal Service Fund 30 Statewide Training Account - 55068 31 For services and expenses related to the 32 state operations program. 33 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 34 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 35 changed or transferred without limit to 36 any other appropriation in any other 37 program or fund within the department of 38 audit and control, with the approval of 39 the director of the budget (81003). 40 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 93,000 41 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 62,000 42 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 3,000 43 -------------- 44 Program account subtotal ..................... 158,000 45 -------------- 61 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF THE BUDGET STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 38,871,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 10,283,000 0 5 Internal Service Funds ............. 1,925,000 0 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 51,079,000 0 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 BUDGET DIVISION PROGRAM ..................................... 49,579,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses of the budget 15 division program. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, and subject to the condi- 18 tions set forth herein, for the purpose of 19 planning, developing and/or implementing 20 the consolidation of procurement, real 21 estate and facility management, fleet 22 management, business and financial 23 services, administrative services, payroll 24 administration, time and attendance, bene- 25 fits administration and other transaction- 26 al human resources functions, contract 27 management, and grants management, the 28 amounts appropriated for state operations 29 may be (i) interchanged, (ii) transferred 30 from this state operations appropriation 31 within this agency to the office of gener- 32 al services, and/or (iii) suballocated to 33 the office of general services with the 34 approval of the director of the budget who 35 shall file such approval with the depart- 36 ment of audit and control and copies ther- 37 eof with the chairman of the senate 38 finance committee and the chairman of the 39 assembly ways and means committee. With 40 respect only to such interchanges, trans- 41 fers and suballocations for the purpose of 42 planning, developing and/or implementing 43 the consolidation of procurement, real 44 estate and facility management, fleet 45 management, business and financial 46 services, administrative services, payroll 62 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF THE BUDGET STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 administration, time and attendance, bene- 2 fits administration and other transaction- 3 al human resources functions, contract 4 management, and grants management that 5 exceed any interchange, transfer or subal- 6 location authorized under any other 7 provision of law, the amounts inter- 8 changed, transferred or suballocated may 9 only be used for state operations and 10 fringe benefits purposes. The foregoing 11 interchange, transfer and suballocation 12 authority is defined as the "OGS Inter- 13 change and Transfer Authority." 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, and subject to the condi- 16 tions set forth herein, for the purpose of 17 planning, developing and/or implementing 18 measures to reduce and eliminate duplica- 19 tive, outdated, and inefficient informa- 20 tion technology infrastructure and proc- 21 esses to achieve better, cost-effective, 22 information technology services for state 23 agencies, the amounts appropriated for 24 state operations may be (i) interchanged, 25 (ii) transferred from this state oper- 26 ations appropriation within this agency to 27 any other state operations appropriations 28 of any state department or agency, and/or 29 (iii) suballocated to any state department 30 or agency with the approval of the direc- 31 tor of the budget who shall file such 32 approval with the department of audit and 33 control and copies thereof with the chair- 34 man of the senate finance committee and 35 the chairman of the assembly ways and 36 means committee. With respect only to such 37 interchanges, transfers and suballocations 38 for the purpose of planning, developing 39 and/or implementing the transformation of 40 information technology services that 41 exceed any interchange, transfer or subal- 42 location authorized under any other 43 provision of law, the amounts inter- 44 changed, transferred or suballocated may 45 only be used for state operations and 46 fringe benefits purposes. The foregoing 47 interchange, transfer and suballocation 48 authority is defined as the "IT Inter- 49 change and Transfer Authority" (13603). 50 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 30,391,000 51 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 450,000 63 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF THE BUDGET STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 180,000 2 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 180,000 3 Travel (54000) ................................... 167,000 4 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,839,000 5 Equipment (56000) ................................ 270,000 6 -------------- 7 Total amount available ...................... 35,477,000 8 -------------- 9 For services and expenses related to member- 10 ship dues in various organizations 11 (13609). 12 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 274,000 13 For additional services and expenses related 14 to membership dues in various organiza- 15 tions (13610). 16 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 620,000 17 -------------- 18 Total amount available ......................... 894,000 19 -------------- 20 For services and expenses related to grants 21 management, administration and management 22 of federal funds, data analytics and stra- 23 tegy, performance management and procure- 24 ment. Funds herein appropriated may be 25 suballocated, subject to the approval of 26 the director of the budget, to any state 27 department, agency or public benefit 28 corporation (13600). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 900,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 100,000 31 -------------- 32 Total amount available ....................... 1,000,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal .................. 37,371,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 38 Revenue Arrearage Account - 22024 39 For services and expenses related to enter- 40 prise, administrative, intergovernmental, 41 and technological services including those 42 associated with the collection and maximi- 43 zation of overdue non-tax revenues owed to 44 the state, including liabilities incurred 64 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF THE BUDGET STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 in prior years. Funds herein appropriated 2 may be suballocated, subject to the 3 approval of the director of the budget, to 4 any state department, agency or public 5 benefit corporation. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 7 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 8 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 9 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 10 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 11 appropriation for the budget division 12 program of the division of the budget, are 13 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 14 part of this appropriation as if fully 15 stated (13603). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,155,000 17 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 18 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 54,000 19 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,857,000 20 Equipment (56000) ................................. 50,000 21 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,410,000 22 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 114,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal ................... 7,650,000 25 -------------- 26 Special Revenue Funds - Other 27 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 28 Systems and Technology Account - 22162 29 For services and expenses for the modifica- 30 tion of statewide personnel, accounting, 31 financial management, budgeting and 32 related information systems to accommodate 33 the unique management and information 34 needs of the division of the budget, 35 including liabilities incurred in prior 36 years. Funds herein appropriated may be 37 suballocated, subject to the approval of 38 the director of the budget, to any state 39 department, agency or public benefit 40 corporation. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 42 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 43 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 44 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 45 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 46 appropriation for the budget division 47 program of the division of the budget, are 48 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 65 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF THE BUDGET STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 part of this appropriation as if fully 2 stated (13603). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,584,000 4 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 20,000 5 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 47,000 6 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 160,000 7 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 587,000 8 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 85,000 9 -------------- 10 Program account subtotal ................... 2,483,000 11 -------------- 12 Special Revenue Funds - Other 13 Not-For-Profit Short-Term Revolving Loan Fund 14 Not-For-Profit Loan Account - 20651 15 For the purpose of making loans from the 16 not-for-profit short-term revolving loan 17 fund to eligible not-for-profit organiza- 18 tions (13603). 19 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 150,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal ..................... 150,000 22 -------------- 23 Internal Service Funds 24 Agencies Internal Service Fund 25 Federal Single Audit Account - 55053 26 For services and expenses associated with 27 the conduct of the annual independent 28 audit of federal programs as required by 29 the federal single audit act of 1984 30 (13603). 31 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,925,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal ................... 1,925,000 34 -------------- 35 CASH MANAGEMENT IMPROVEMENT ACT PROGRAM ...................... 1,500,000 36 -------------- 37 General Fund 38 State Purposes Account - 10050 39 For services and expenses related to cash 40 management activities of the state and the 41 federal cash management improvement act of 42 1990, including required payment of inter- 66 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF THE BUDGET STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 est to the federal government and includ- 2 ing liabilities incurred in prior years. 3 Funds herein appropriated may be suballo- 4 cated, subject to the approval of the 5 director of the budget, to any state 6 department, agency or public benefit 7 corporation (13608). 8 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,500,000 9 -------------- 67 12550-10-5 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 Enterprise Funds ................... 3,720,530,400 54,198,000 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 3,720,530,400 54,198,000 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 SENIOR COLLEGES .......................................... 1,567,558,400 9 -------------- 10 Enterprise Funds 11 CUNY Senior College Operating Fund 12 CUNY Senior College Operating Account - 60851 13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 14 to the contrary, for the purpose of para- 15 graph a of subdivision 14 of section 6206 16 of the education law, the separate amounts 17 appropriated herein for senior colleges 18 and central administration shall be deemed 19 to be amounts appropriated to senior 20 colleges and amounts appropriated to indi- 21 vidual senior colleges shall be deemed to 22 be amounts appropriated for programs or 23 purposes. 24 Provided further, that a portion of the 25 funds appropriated herein shall be used to 26 implement a plan to improve educator 27 effectiveness by: 28 (1) increasing admissions requirements for 29 all city university teacher preparation 30 programs; and 31 (2) upgrading the curriculum and require- 32 ments for these programs, which includes 33 increasing opportunities for in-school 34 experience to better prepare aspiring 35 teachers to enter the classroom upon grad- 36 uation (15475). 37 For services and expenses for Baruch college . 147,728,300 38 For services and expenses for Brooklyn 39 college .................................... 161,178,300 40 For services and expenses for city college ... 157,455,700 41 For services and expenses for the CUNY 42 School of Medicine .......................... 27,833,900 43 For additional services and expenses for the 44 CUNY School of Medicine ...................... 4,000,000 68 12550-10-5 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses for Hunter college . 183,673,200 2 For services and expenses for John Jay 3 college .................................... 104,505,000 4 For services and expenses for Lehman college . 105,122,900 5 For services and expenses for William E. 6 Macaulay honors college ........................ 318,200 7 For services and expenses for Medgar Evers 8 college ..................................... 61,061,700 9 For services and expenses for New York city 10 college of technology ...................... 104,154,800 11 For services and expenses for Queens 12 college, including the John D. Calandra 13 Italian American Institute ................. 166,937,500 14 For services and expenses for the college of 15 Staten Island .............................. 110,790,300 16 For services and expenses for York college .... 62,706,900 17 For services and expenses for the graduate 18 school and university center ............... 128,218,500 19 For services and expenses for the school of 20 professional studies ......................... 2,837,000 21 For services and expenses of the school of 22 labor and urban studies ...................... 3,683,300 23 For additional services and expenses of the 24 school of labor and urban studies ............ 4,500,000 25 For services and expenses for the graduate 26 school of journalism ......................... 7,685,500 27 For services and expenses of CUNY law school .. 17,812,600 28 For services and expenses of the CUNY law 29 school W. Haywood Burns Chair in Human and 30 Civil Rights ................................... 350,000 31 For services and expenses of the CUNY gradu- 32 ate school of public health and policy ....... 5,004,800 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal ............... 1,567,558,400 35 -------------- 36 INITIATIVES AND MANAGEMENT ................................. 475,308,200 37 -------------- 38 Enterprise Funds 39 CUNY Senior College Operating Fund 40 CUNY Senior College Operating Account - 60851 41 For services and expenses of central admin- 42 istration and shared service centers, 43 provided however, $12,000,000 of this 44 appropriation shall be made available for 45 services and expenses of senior colleges 46 to be distributed according to a plan 47 approved by the city university board of 48 trustees, a portion of which may be used 49 to support new classroom faculty. 69 12550-10-5 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Provided further, $4,000,000 of the appro- 2 priation shall be made available for 3 services and expenses of expanding open 4 educational resources at the city univer- 5 sity of New York senior and community 6 colleges targeting high-enrollment courses 7 including general education courses with 8 the highest cost-savings potential for 9 students (15484) ............................ 52,300,300 10 For services and expenses for information 11 services and library/technology systems 12 (15485) ..................................... 12,166,900 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 expansion of nursing programs. A portion 15 of the funds herein appropriated may be 16 transferred to the general fund-local 17 assistance account of the city university 18 of New York to accomplish the purposes of 19 this appropriation, in accordance with a 20 plan approved by the director of the budg- 21 et (15532) ................................... 2,000,000 22 For additional services and expenses related 23 to the expansion of nursing programs. A 24 portion of the funds herein appropriated 25 may be transferred to the general fund-lo- 26 cal assistance account of the city univer- 27 sity of New York to accomplish the 28 purposes of this appropriation, in accord- 29 ance with a plan approved by the director 30 of the budget ................................ 1,000,000 31 For services and expenses of senior colleges 32 to be distributed in accordance with 33 general fund operating support pursuant to 34 paragraph (f) of subdivision 7 of section 35 6206 of the education law (15435) ........... 55,541,000 36 For services and expenses of new full-time 37 faculty at senior colleges and community 38 colleges (15436) ............................ 53,000,000 39 For services and expenses of the Center for 40 Byzantine and Modern Greek Studies at 41 Queens College ................................. 300,000 42 For additional operating assistance at 43 senior colleges, provided that such funds 44 shall be allocated pursuant to a plan 45 approved by the director of the budget 46 (15448) .................................... 265,000,000 47 For further additional operating assistance 48 at senior colleges; provided that such 49 funds shall be allocated pursuant to a 50 plan approved by the director of the budg- 51 et .......................................... 34,000,000 52 -------------- 70 12550-10-5 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 SEARCH FOR EDUCATION, ELEVATION AND KNOWLEDGE (SEEK) 2 PROGRAMS .................................................. 39,309,500 3 -------------- 4 Enterprise Funds 5 CUNY Senior College Operating Fund 6 CUNY Senior College Operating Account - 60851 7 For services and expenses to expand opportu- 8 nities in institutions of higher learning 9 for the educationally and economically 10 disadvantaged in accordance with section 11 6452 of the education law, for SEEK 12 programs on senior college campuses, 13 including $1,000,000 which shall be 14 utilized to increase employment opportu- 15 nities for SEEK students and meet the 16 matching requirements of the federal 17 college work study program for SEEK 18 students (15421) ............................ 37,053,500 19 For additional services and expenses of the 20 SEEK program ................................. 2,256,000 21 -------------- 22 UNIVERSITY OPERATIONS .................................... 1,194,796,300 23 -------------- 24 Enterprise Funds 25 CUNY Senior College Operating Fund 26 CUNY Senior College Operating Account - 60851 27 For services and expenses of building 28 rentals (15487) ............................. 52,842,400 29 For services and expenses for utilities 30 costs (15488) ............................... 78,627,900 31 For expenses of fringe benefits including 32 social security payments (15489) ......... 1,063,326,000 33 -------------- 34 UNIVERSITY PROGRAMS ......................................... 64,358,000 35 -------------- 36 Enterprise Funds 37 CUNY Senior College Operating Fund 38 CUNY Senior College Operating Account - 60851 39 For services and expenses, not to exceed 65 40 percent of total services and expenses, 41 related to the operation of child care 42 centers at the senior colleges for the 43 benefit of city university senior college 71 12550-10-5 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 students, to be available for expenditure 2 upon submission to the director of the 3 budget of satisfactory evidence of the 4 required matching funds (15491) .............. 1,430,000 5 For services and expenses of providing 6 student services, including advising and 7 counseling, athletics, career services, 8 health services, international student 9 services, veterans' support, and student 10 activities and leadership development 11 (15492) ...................................... 1,700,000 12 For the payment of city university supple- 13 mental tuition assistance to certain cate- 14 gories of full-time students of senior 15 colleges of the city university who are 16 residents of the state of New York (15533) ... 1,060,000 17 For services and expenses of matching 18 student financial aid (15534) ................ 1,444,000 19 For services and expenses of existing 20 language immersion programs (15493) .......... 1,070,000 21 For services and expenses of PSC awards 22 (15535) ...................................... 3,309,000 23 For payment of tuition reimbursement (15494) ... 9,000,000 24 For services and expenses of CUNY LEADS 25 (15540) ...................................... 1,815,000 26 For services and expenses of the CUNY pipe- 27 line program at the graduate center 28 (15405) ........................................ 250,000 29 For services and expenses of increasing 30 mental health services (15428) ............... 1,000,000 31 For additional services and expenses of 32 increasing mental health services ............ 1,000,000 33 For services and expenses of Medgar Evers 34 programmatic initiatives (15429) ................ 20,000 35 For services and expenses of Lehman College 36 ACE Learning Center (15430) .................... 835,000 37 For services and expenses of the First 38 Impressions Youth Legal Collaborative 39 Initiative pursuant to a plan developed in 40 consultation with the office of court 41 administration and approved by the direc- 42 tor of the budget (15439) .................... 1,000,000 43 For services and expenses of the accelerate, 44 complete, engage (ACE) and accelerated 45 study in associate programs (ASAP) 46 programs, provided that such funds shall 47 be allocated pursuant to a plan approved 48 by the director of the budget, provided 49 further that a portion of the funds herein 50 appropriated may be transferred to the 51 general fund-local assistance account of 52 the city university of New York to make 72 12550-10-5 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 payments to community colleges to accom- 2 plish the purposes of this appropriation ..... 8,000,000 3 For services and expenses of artificial 4 intelligence initiatives, provided that 5 such funds shall be allocated pursuant to 6 a plan approved by the director of the 7 budget ....................................... 5,000,000 8 For services and expenses of the CUNY Black 9 Male Initiative .............................. 1,175,000 10 For services and expenses of the CUNY Gradu- 11 ate School of Public Health and Health 12 Policy - Sexual and Reproductive Justice 13 Hub ............................................ 500,000 14 For services and expenses for the Asian 15 American/Asian Research Institute .............. 350,000 16 For services and expenses for the CUNY-spon- 17 sored midwifery program ........................ 500,000 18 For services and expenses of the CUNY Medgar 19 Evers College Dr. John L. Flateau Chair 20 in Election Data Analysis and Research ......... 250,000 21 For services and expenses of the Du Bois 22 Bunche Center for Public Policy at Medgar 23 Evers College .................................. 750,000 24 For services and expenses of the model New 25 York State Senate session project .............. 150,000 26 For services and expenses of the CUNY Mexi- 27 can Studies Institute at Lehman college ...... 1,500,000 28 For services and expenses of the Carol 29 Robles Roman scholarship fund at John Jay 30 college ........................................ 250,000 31 For services and expenses of existing New 32 York city funded programs (15412) ........... 21,000,000 33 -------------- 34 Total gross senior college operating budget 3,341,330,400 35 ============== 36 Less: senior college tuition and fee revenue 37 offset ................................... 1,219,219,000 38 Less: central administration and university 39 wide programs offset ........................ 32,275,000 40 Less: existing New York city funded programs .. 21,000,000 41 -------------- 42 Total net operating expense, notwithstanding 43 any law, rule, or regulation to the 44 contrary, if certain city university of 45 New York property is sold during academic 46 year 2025-26, up to $60,000,000 of such 47 property sale proceeds, if available, may 48 be used to support senior college expenses 49 already accrued or to accrue during the 50 2025-26 academic year, provided further 73 12550-10-5 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 that such sale proceeds used to support 2 senior college expenses shall reduce the 3 state's net operating expense liability 4 pursuant to paragraphs 3 and 4 of subdivi- 5 sion A of section 6221 of the education 6 law in an equal amount during the 2025-26 7 academic year ............................ 2,068,836,400 8 -------------- 9 Enterprise Funds 10 CUNY Senior College Operating Fund 11 CUNY Senior College Operating Account - 60851 12 Notwithstanding paragraphs 3 and 4 of subdi- 13 vision A of section 6221 of the education 14 law, the amount appropriated herein shall 15 be made available for services and 16 expenses of senior college operations 17 during the 2024-25 academic year, provided 18 further that such appropriation shall in 19 no way increase the net operating expense 20 liability of the state (15408) ............. 192,200,000 21 -------------- 22 Enterprise Funds 23 CUNY Senior College Program Fund 24 CUNY Senior College Program Account - 23250 25 For services and expenses of activities 26 supported in whole or in part by tuition, 27 related academic fees, user fees, and 28 other charges, including dormitory oper- 29 ations at any campus, including liabil- 30 ities incurred prior to July 1, 2025 31 (15417) .................................... 187,000,000 32 -------------- 74 12550-10-5 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 INITIATIVES AND MANAGEMENT 2 Enterprise Funds 3 CUNY Senior College Operating Fund 4 CUNY Senior College Operating Account - 60851 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 6 For nonrecurring investments in transformational initiatives at senior 7 colleges and community colleges, including but not limited to 8 investments to support innovation, help meet the workforce needs of 9 the future, enhance student support services, improve academic 10 programs, increase enrollment, and modernize campus operations; 11 provided that such funds shall be allocated pursuant to a plan 12 approved by the director of the budget (15469) ..................... 13 50,000,000 ....................................... (re. $48,700,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 15 For nonrecurring strategic investments in senior colleges and communi- 16 ty colleges, including but not limited to investments to improve 17 academic programs, increase enrollment, enhance student support 18 services and modernize campus operations; provided that such funds 19 shall be allocated pursuant to a plan approved by the director of 20 the budget (15419) ... 40,000,000 ................ (re. $36,667,000) 21 UNIVERSITY PROGRAMS 22 Enterprise Funds 23 CUNY Senior College Operating Fund 24 CUNY Senior College Operating Account - 60851 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 For services and expenses of the First Impressions Youth Legal Colla- 27 borative Initiative pursuant to a plan developed in consultation 28 with the office of court administration and approved by the director 29 of the budget (15439) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000) 30 For services and expenses of science of reading microcredential 31 programs (15470) ... 1,000,000 ...................... (re. $175,000) 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 33 For services and expenses of the First Impressions Youth Legal Colla- 34 borative Initiative pursuant to a plan developed in consultation 35 with the office of court administration and approved by the director 36 of the budget (15439) ... 1,000,000 ................. (re. $980,000) 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 38 For services and expenses of the First Impressions Youth Legal Colla- 39 borative Initiative pursuant to a plan developed in consultation 40 with the office of court administration and approved by the director 41 of the budget (15439) ... 1,000,000 ................. (re. $943,000) 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 50, 43 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 75 12550-10-5 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the establishment of child care 2 centers at additional campuses and/or the expansion of existing 3 on-campus child care centers to serve additional children (15437) 4 ... 3,600,000 ..................................... (re. $2,400,000) 76 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL SERVICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 74,426,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 1,191,000 0 5 Internal Service Funds ............. 47,693,000 0 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 123,310,000 0 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 ADMINISTRATION AND INFORMATION MANAGEMENT PROGRAM ........... 12,591,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 administration and information management 16 program. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 18 the money hereby appropriated may be 19 transferred to any appropriation of the 20 department of civil service, with the 21 approval of the director of budget. 22 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 23 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 24 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 25 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 26 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 27 appropriation for the budget division 28 program of the division of the budget, are 29 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 30 part of this appropriation as if fully 31 stated (16604). 32 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 8,934,000 33 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 29,000 34 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 26,000 35 Travel (54000) .................................... 75,000 36 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 80,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ................... 9,144,000 39 -------------- 40 Internal Service Funds 41 Health Insurance Revolving Account 42 Civil Service Employee Benefits Division Administration 43 Account - 55301 77 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL SERVICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 administration and information management 3 program. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 5 the money hereby appropriated may be 6 transferred to any appropriation of the 7 department of civil service, with the 8 approval of the director of budget. 9 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 10 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 11 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 12 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 13 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 14 appropriation for the budget division 15 program of the division of the budget, are 16 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 17 part of this appropriation as if fully 18 stated (16604). 19 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,936,000 20 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 6,000 21 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 25,000 22 Travel (54000) ..................................... 3,000 23 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 7,000 24 Equipment (56000) ................................ 324,000 25 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,080,000 26 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 66,000 27 -------------- 28 Program account subtotal ................... 3,447,000 29 -------------- 30 COMMISSION OPERATIONS AND MUNICIPAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ......... 840,000 31 -------------- 32 General Fund 33 State Purposes Account - 10050 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 35 the money hereby appropriated may be 36 transferred to any appropriation of the 37 department of civil service, with the 38 approval of the director of budget. 39 For services and expenses related to the 40 commission operations and municipal 41 assistance program (16605). 42 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 833,000 43 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 7,000 44 -------------- 45 OFFICE OF DIVERSITY AND INCLUSION MANAGEMENT PROGRAM ......... 4,596,000 46 -------------- 78 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL SERVICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 General Fund 2 State Purposes Account - 10050 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 4 the money hereby appropriated may be 5 transferred to any appropriation of the 6 department of civil service, with the 7 approval of the director of budget. 8 For services and expenses related to the 9 office of diversity and inclusion manage- 10 ment, established pursuant to executive 11 order 187 (16612). 12 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,830,000 13 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 96,000 14 Travel (54000) ................................... 361,000 15 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 280,000 16 Equipment (56000) ................................. 29,000 17 -------------- 18 PERSONNEL BENEFIT SERVICES PROGRAM .......................... 33,164,000 19 -------------- 20 General Fund 21 State Purposes Account - 10050 22 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 23 the money hereby appropriated may be 24 transferred to any appropriation of the 25 department of civil service, with the 26 approval of the director of budget. 27 For services and expenses related to the 28 personnel benefit services program 29 (16606). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,632,000 31 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 123,000 32 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 15,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal ................... 1,770,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 38 Grants Account - 20100 39 For payments to the civil service department 40 from private foundations, corporations and 41 individuals (16606). 79 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL SERVICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 150,000 2 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 150,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal ..................... 300,000 5 -------------- 6 Internal Service Funds 7 Health Insurance Revolving Account 8 Health Insurance Internal Services Account - 55300 9 For services and expenses related to the 10 personnel benefit services program. 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 12 the money hereby appropriated may be 13 transferred to any appropriation of the 14 department of civil service, with the 15 approval of the director of budget. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 19 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 20 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 21 appropriation for the budget division 22 program of the division of the budget, are 23 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully 25 stated (16606). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 11,429,000 27 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 45,000 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 148,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 785,000 30 Travel (54000) ................................... 145,000 31 Contractual services (51000) ................... 8,161,000 32 Equipment (56000) ................................ 164,000 33 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 6,718,000 34 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 933,000 35 -------------- 36 Total amount available ...................... 28,528,000 37 -------------- 38 For suballocation to the department of audit 39 and control for services and expenses for 40 auditors in order to achieve savings in 41 the health insurance program (16607). 42 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,525,000 43 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 3,000 44 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 4,000 45 Travel (54000) ..................................... 3,000 46 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 1,000 80 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL SERVICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 979,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 51,000 3 -------------- 4 Total amount available ....................... 2,566,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal .................. 31,094,000 7 -------------- 8 PERSONNEL MANAGEMENT SERVICES PROGRAM ....................... 67,343,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 13 the money hereby appropriated may be 14 transferred to any appropriation of the 15 department of civil service, with the 16 approval of the director of budget. 17 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule 18 or regulation to the contrary, of the 19 amounts appropriated herein, $500,000 20 shall be made available for services and 21 expenses related to implementing efficien- 22 cies in the recruitment, testing and 23 retention of employees in up to five 24 selected agencies; provided however, (i) 25 such services shall include, but not be 26 limited to: development of computer based 27 tests, skills development, knowledge 28 transfer, succession planning activities; 29 and (ii) such funds shall be available 30 pursuant to a spending plan, subject to 31 approval by the director of the budget, 32 which shall include but not be limited to: 33 program activities, deliverables and asso- 34 ciated completion dates (16609). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 26,107,000 36 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 723,000 37 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 37,000 38 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 6,305,000 39 Travel (54000) ................................... 300,000 40 Contractual services (51000) .................. 19,653,000 41 Equipment (56000) ................................ 175,000 42 -------------- 43 Program account subtotal .................. 53,300,000 44 -------------- 45 Special Revenue Funds - Other 46 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 47 Examination and Miscellaneous Revenue Account - 22065 81 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL SERVICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 2 the money hereby appropriated may be 3 transferred to any appropriation of the 4 department of civil service, with the 5 approval of the director of budget. 6 For services and expenses related to New 7 York state personnel management services 8 provided by the department (16609). 9 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 552,000 10 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 10,000 11 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 313,000 12 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 16,000 13 -------------- 14 Program account subtotal ..................... 891,000 15 -------------- 16 Internal Service Funds 17 Agencies Internal Service Fund 18 Department of Civil Service Administration Account - 19 55055 20 For services and expenses related to section 21 11 of the civil service law. 22 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 23 the money hereby appropriated may be 24 transferred to any appropriation of the 25 department of civil service, with the 26 approval of the director of budget. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 28 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 29 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 30 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 31 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 32 appropriation for the budget division 33 program of the division of the budget, are 34 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 35 part of this appropriation as if fully 36 stated (16609). 37 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,265,000 38 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 504,000 39 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 715,000 40 Travel (54000) ................................... 259,000 41 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,542,000 42 Equipment (56000) ................................ 379,000 43 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 3,315,000 44 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 173,000 45 -------------- 46 Program account subtotal .................. 13,152,000 47 -------------- 82 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL SERVICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 TEST EVALUATION AND VALIDATION PROGRAM ....................... 4,776,000 2 -------------- 3 General Fund 4 State Purposes Account - 10050 5 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 6 the money hereby appropriated may be 7 transferred to any appropriation of the 8 department of civil service, with the 9 approval of the director of budget. 10 For services and expenses related to the 11 test evaluation and validation unit. Of 12 the funds appropriated herein, $2,500,000 13 shall support the cost to waive state 14 civil service application fees for all 15 examinations held after July 1, 2023 16 (16614). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,022,000 18 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 53,000 19 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 701,000 20 -------------- 83 12550-10-5 COMMISSION OF CORRECTION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 7,101,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 7,101,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 IMPROVEMENT OF CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES PROGRAM ............... 7,101,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 improvement of correctional facilities 14 program. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 16 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 17 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 18 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 19 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 20 appropriation for the budget division 21 program of the division of the budget, are 22 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully 24 stated (17201). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 5,334,000 26 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 279,000 27 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 21,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 72,000 29 Travel (54000) ................................... 597,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 760,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................. 38,000 32 -------------- 84 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 3,257,734,000 11,030,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 40,500,000 237,456,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 43,879,000 0 6 Enterprise Funds ................... 60,469,000 0 7 Internal Service Funds ............. 76,821,000 0 8 ---------------- ---------------- 9 All Funds ........................ 3,479,403,000 248,486,000 10 ================ ================ 11 SCHEDULE 12 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ..................................... 105,923,000 13 -------------- 14 General Fund 15 State Purposes Account - 10050 16 For services and expenses related to the 17 administration program. 18 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 19 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 20 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 21 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 22 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 23 appropriation for the budget division 24 program of the division of the budget, are 25 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 26 part of this appropriation as if fully 27 stated (81001). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 12,662,000 29 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 111,000 30 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 338,000 31 Travel (54000) ................................... 214,000 32 Contractual services (51000) .................. 23,158,000 33 Equipment (56000) ................................ 113,000 34 -------------- 35 Program account subtotal .................. 36,596,000 36 -------------- 37 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 38 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 39 Correctional Services-NIC Grants Account - 25306 40 For services and expenses incurred by the 41 department of corrections and community 42 supervision for the incarceration of ille- 43 gal aliens (17559). 85 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ...................... 34,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal .................. 34,000,000 4 -------------- 5 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 6 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 7 Substance Abuse Treatment State Prisons Account - 25408 8 For services and expenses related to 9 substance abuse treatment in state prisons 10 (17560). 11 Personal service (50000) ....................... 1,500,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal ................... 1,500,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 16 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 17 Unanticipated Federal Grants Account - 25371 18 Funds herein appropriated may be used to 19 disburse unanticipated federal grants in 20 support of various purposes and programs 21 (17561). 22 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 5,000,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal ................... 5,000,000 25 -------------- 26 Special Revenue Funds - Other 27 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 28 Capacity Contracting Account - 22016 29 For services and expenses incurred by the 30 department of corrections and community 31 supervision for the housing of incarcerat- 32 ed individuals from other jurisdictions 33 under contracts entered into under the 34 direction of the commissioner (17562). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 12,855,000 36 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 94,000 37 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 1,051,000 38 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,406,000 39 Travel (54000) .................................... 36,000 40 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,840,000 41 Equipment (56000) ................................. 91,000 42 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 7,280,000 43 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 347,000 44 -------------- 86 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Program account subtotal .................. 25,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other 4 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 5 Correctional Services Asset Forfeiture Account - 22189 6 For services and expenses related to asset 7 forfeiture (17563). 8 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 200,000 9 Equipment (56000) ................................ 900,000 10 -------------- 11 Program account subtotal ................... 1,100,000 12 -------------- 13 Enterprise Funds 14 Agencies Enterprise Fund 15 Employee Mess Correctional Services Account - 50300 16 For services and expenses related to the 17 operation of employee mess programs 18 (81001). 19 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 426,000 20 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,021,000 21 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 22 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,007,000 23 Equipment (56000) ................................. 50,000 24 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 207,000 25 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 11,000 26 -------------- 27 Program account subtotal ................... 2,727,000 28 -------------- 29 COMMUNITY SUPERVISION PROGRAM .............................. 155,022,000 30 -------------- 31 General Fund 32 State Purposes Account - 10050 33 For services and expenses related to the 34 community supervision program. 35 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 36 of law, the money hereby appropriated may 37 be used for the payment of prior year 38 liabilities and may be increased or 39 decreased by interchange with any other 40 appropriation within the department of 41 corrections and community supervision 42 general fund - state purposes account with 87 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 the approval of the director of the budg- 2 et. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 4 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 6 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 7 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 8 appropriation for the budget division 9 program of the division of the budget, are 10 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully 12 stated (17569). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 116,469,000 14 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 8,418,000 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,600,000 16 Travel (54000) ................................. 2,258,000 17 Contractual services (51000) .................. 21,497,000 18 Equipment (56000) .............................. 3,755,000 19 -------------- 20 Program account subtotal ................. 153,997,000 21 -------------- 22 Special Revenue Funds - Other 23 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 24 Parole Officers' Memorial Fund Account - 20182 25 For services and expenses of the parole 26 officers' memorial fund established pursu- 27 ant to chapter 654 of the laws of 1996 28 (17569). 29 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 300,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................. 75,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal ..................... 425,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Other 36 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 37 Offender Programming Account - 22208 38 For services and expenses of offender 39 programs awarded through grant applica- 40 tions funded by private entities (17569). 41 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 600,000 42 -------------- 43 Program account subtotal ..................... 600,000 44 -------------- 88 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 CORRECTIONAL INDUSTRIES PROGRAM ............................. 77,563,000 2 -------------- 3 Enterprise Funds 4 Agencies Enterprise Fund 5 Correctional - Recycling Fund Account - 50325 6 For services and expenses related to the 7 operation and maintenance of the correc- 8 tional recycling programs (17505). 9 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 195,000 10 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 5,000 11 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 200,000 12 Travel (54000) ..................................... 2,000 13 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 160,000 14 Equipment (56000) ................................. 60,000 15 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 113,000 16 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 7,000 17 -------------- 18 Program account subtotal ..................... 742,000 19 -------------- 20 Internal Service Funds 21 Correctional Industries Revolving Account 22 Correctional Industries Account - 55350 23 For services and expenses related to the 24 correctional industries program. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 26 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 27 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 28 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 29 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 30 appropriation for the budget division 31 program of the division of the budget, are 32 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 33 part of this appropriation as if fully 34 stated (17505). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 26,522,000 36 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 19,000 37 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 748,000 38 Supplies and materials (57000) ................ 29,082,000 39 Travel (54000) ................................... 300,000 40 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,300,000 41 Equipment (56000) .............................. 2,050,000 42 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 10,200,000 43 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 600,000 44 -------------- 45 Program account subtotal .................. 76,821,000 46 -------------- 89 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 HEALTH SERVICES PROGRAM .................................... 458,066,000 2 -------------- 3 General Fund 4 State Purposes Account - 10050 5 For services and expenses related to the 6 health services program. 7 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 8 of law, the money hereby appropriated may 9 be used for the payment of prior year 10 liabilities and may be increased or 11 decreased by interchange or transfer with 12 any other general fund appropriation with- 13 in the department of corrections and 14 community supervision with the approval of 15 the director of the budget. A portion of 16 these funds may be transferred or suballo- 17 cated to the department of health or other 18 state agencies. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 20 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 21 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 22 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 23 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 24 appropriation for the budget division 25 program of the division of the budget, are 26 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 27 part of this appropriation as if fully 28 stated (17503). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 137,898,000 30 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 7,949,000 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ......... 11,719,000 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ............... 119,827,000 33 Travel (54000) ................................... 266,000 34 Contractual services (51000) ................. 122,652,000 35 Equipment (56000) .............................. 4,755,000 36 -------------- 37 Total amount available ..................... 405,066,000 38 -------------- 39 For services and expenses or reimbursement 40 of expenses of Medication Assisted Treat- 41 ment (M.A.T) programs providing treatment 42 and services to people under the custody 43 of the department of corrections and 44 community supervision (17500). 45 Contractual services (51000) .................. 53,000,000 46 -------------- 90 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 PAROLE BOARD PROGRAM ......................................... 8,291,000 2 -------------- 3 General Fund 4 State Purposes Account - 10050 5 For services and expenses related to the 6 parole board program. 7 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 8 finance law or any other provision of law 9 to the contrary, the amounts herein appro- 10 priated shall not be decreased by inter- 11 change with any other appropriation 12 (17574). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 7,690,000 14 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 68,000 15 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 43,000 16 Travel (54000) ................................... 390,000 17 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 87,000 18 Equipment (56000) .................................. 3,000 19 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 10,000 20 -------------- 21 PROGRAM SERVICES PROGRAM ................................... 285,483,000 22 -------------- 23 General Fund 24 State Purposes Account - 10050 25 For services and expenses related to the 26 program services program. 27 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 28 of law, the money hereby appropriated may 29 be used for the payment of prior year 30 liabilities and may be increased or 31 decreased by interchange with any other 32 appropriation within the department of 33 corrections and community supervision 34 general fund - state purposes account with 35 the approval of the director of the budg- 36 et. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 38 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 39 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 40 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 41 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 42 appropriation for the budget division 43 program of the division of the budget, are 44 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 45 part of this appropriation as if fully 46 stated (17504). 91 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 182,727,000 2 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 4,575,000 3 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 1,392,000 4 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 7,459,000 5 Travel (54000) ................................... 441,000 6 Contractual services (51000) .................. 26,006,000 7 Equipment (56000) ................................ 883,000 8 -------------- 9 Program account subtotal ................. 223,483,000 10 -------------- 11 Special Revenue Funds - Other 12 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 13 Correctional Services Account - 20107 14 For services and expenses of various activ- 15 ities funded through gifts and donations 16 (17504). 17 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,000,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ................... 4,000,000 20 -------------- 21 Special Revenue Funds - Other 22 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 23 Offender Programming Account - 22208 24 For services and expenses of offender 25 programs awarded through grant applica- 26 tions funded by private entities (17504). 27 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,000,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 30 -------------- 31 Enterprise Funds 32 Correctional Services Commissary Account 33 Central Office Account - 50100 34 For services and expenses of operating self 35 sustaining facility commissaries (17504). 36 Supplies and materials (57000) ................ 55,000,000 37 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,000,000 38 -------------- 39 Program account subtotal .................. 57,000,000 40 -------------- 41 SUPERVISION OF INCARCERATED INDIVIDUALS PROGRAM .......... 2,051,425,000 42 -------------- 92 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 General Fund 2 State Purposes Account - 10050 3 For services and expenses related to the 4 supervision of incarcerated individuals 5 program. 6 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 7 of law, the money hereby appropriated may 8 be used for the payment of prior year 9 liabilities and may be increased or 10 decreased by interchange with any other 11 appropriation within the department of 12 corrections and community supervision 13 general fund - state purposes account with 14 the approval of the director of the budg- 15 et. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 19 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 20 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 21 appropriation for the budget division 22 program of the division of the budget, are 23 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully 25 stated (17502). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) .......... 1,682,924,000 27 Temporary service (50200) ..................... 14,450,000 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ........ 234,836,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ................ 28,293,000 30 Travel (54000) ................................. 6,535,000 31 Contractual services (51000) .................. 14,817,000 32 Equipment (56000) ............................. 23,393,000 33 -------------- 34 Total amount available ................... 2,005,248,000 35 -------------- 36 For services and expenses incurred by 37 providing therapeutic and rehabilitative 38 programs related to the Humane Alterna- 39 tives to Long Term (H.A.L.T) Solitary 40 Confinement Act. 41 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 42 of law, the money hereby appropriated may 43 be increased or decreased by interchange, 44 transfer or suballocation between these 45 appropriated amounts and appropriations of 46 any department or agency for expenditures 47 incurred in the operation of this program 48 with the approval of the director of the 49 budget (17516). 93 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service - regular (50100) ............ 38,794,000 2 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 427,000 3 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 6,592,000 4 Equipment (56000) ................................ 364,000 5 -------------- 6 Total amount available ...................... 46,177,000 7 -------------- 8 SUPPORT SERVICES PROGRAM ................................... 337,630,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 13 of law, the money hereby appropriated may 14 be available for services and expenses 15 including lease payments to the dormitory 16 authority, as successor to the facilities 17 development corporation pursuant to chap- 18 ter 83 of the laws of 1995, pursuant to an 19 agreement entered into between the facili- 20 ties development corporation and the 21 department of corrections and community 22 supervision for the rental of correctional 23 facilities and may be used for the payment 24 of prior year liabilities and may be 25 increased or decreased by interchange with 26 any other appropriation within the depart- 27 ment of corrections and community super- 28 vision general fund - state purposes 29 account with the approval of the director 30 of the budget. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 32 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 33 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 34 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 35 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 36 appropriation for the budget division 37 program of the division of the budget, are 38 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 39 part of this appropriation as if fully 40 stated (17501). 41 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 83,697,000 42 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 6,448,000 43 Supplies and materials (57000) ............... 171,035,000 44 Travel (54000) ................................. 1,992,000 45 Contractual services (51000) .................. 50,981,000 46 Equipment (56000) ............................. 11,629,000 47 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 94,000 48 -------------- 94 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Program account subtotal ................. 325,876,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other 4 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 5 Food Production Center Account - 22136 6 For services and expenses related to the 7 food production center (17565). 8 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 238,000 9 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,121,000 10 Travel (54000) ................................... 590,000 11 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 305,000 12 Equipment (56000) ................................ 374,000 13 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 120,000 14 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 6,000 15 -------------- 16 Program account subtotal ................... 3,754,000 17 -------------- 18 Special Revenue Funds - Other 19 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund - 339 20 Cell Phone Towers Account - 22026 21 For services and expenses related to the 22 operation of correctional facilities 23 (17051). 24 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,000,000 25 Equipment (56000) .............................. 6,000,000 26 -------------- 27 Program account subtotal ................... 8,000,000 28 -------------- 95 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 4 Correctional Services-NIC Grants Account - 25306 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses incurred by the department of corrections 7 and community supervision for the incarceration of illegal aliens 8 (17559). 9 Personal service (50000) ... 34,000,000 ............ (re. $34,000,000) 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 11 For services and expenses incurred by the department of corrections 12 and community supervision for the incarceration of illegal aliens 13 (17559). 14 Personal service (50000) ... 34,000,000 ............ (re. $34,000,000) 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 16 For services and expenses incurred by the department of corrections 17 and community supervision for the incarceration of illegal aliens 18 (17559). 19 Personal service (50000) ... 34,000,000 ............ (re. $34,000,000) 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 21 For services and expenses incurred by the department of corrections 22 and community supervision for the incarceration of illegal aliens 23 (17559). 24 Personal service (50000) ... 34,000,000 ............ (re. $34,000,000) 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 26 For services and expenses incurred by the department of corrections 27 and community supervision for the incarceration of illegal aliens 28 (17559). 29 Personal service (50000) ... 34,000,000 ............ (re. $34,000,000) 30 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as 31 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 32 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 33 For services and expenses incurred by the department of corrections 34 and community supervision for the incarceration of illegal aliens 35 (17559). 36 Personal service (50000) ............................................. 37 [34,000,000] 20,094,000 .......................... (re. $20,094,000) 38 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 13,906,000 ......... (re. $13,906,000) 39 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 40 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 41 Substance Abuse Treatment State Prisons Account - 25408 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 96 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to substance abuse treatment in 2 state prisons (17560). 3 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 .............. (re. $1,500,000) 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 5 For services and expenses related to substance abuse treatment in 6 state prisons (17560). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 .............. (re. $1,500,000) 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 9 For services and expenses related to substance abuse treatment in 10 state prisons (17560). 11 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 .............. (re. $1,500,000) 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 13 For services and expenses related to substance abuse treatment in 14 state prisons (17560). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 .............. (re. $1,375,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 17 For services and expenses related to substance abuse treatment in 18 state prisons (17560). 19 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 ................ (re. $673,000) 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 21 For services and expenses related to substance abuse treatment in 22 state prisons (17560). 23 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 ................ (re. $676,000) 24 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 25 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 26 Unanticipated Federal Grants Account - 25371 27 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 28 Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder- 29 al grants in support of various purposes and programs (17561). 30 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 32 Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder- 33 al grants in support of various purposes and programs (17561). 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 36 Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder- 37 al grants in support of various purposes and programs (17561). 38 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $4,962,000) 39 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 40 Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder- 41 al grants in support of various purposes and programs (17561). 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $4,526,000) 97 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 2 Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder- 3 al grants in support of various purposes and programs (17561). 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 6 Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder- 7 al grants in support of various purposes and programs (17561). 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $1,744,000) 9 HEALTH SERVICES PROGRAM 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 13 For services and expenses or reimbursement of expenses of Medication 14 Assisted Treatment (M.A.T) programs providing treatment and services 15 to people under the custody of the department of corrections and 16 community supervision [(17515)] (17500). 17 Contractual services (51000) ... 11,000,000 ........ (re. $11,000,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 19 For Services and expenses related to the purchase of a sonogram 20 machine for Bedford Hills Correctional Facility (17517) ............ 21 30,000 ............................................... (re. $30,000) 98 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 63,181,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 23,296,000 124,514,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 43,420,000 0 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 129,897,000 124,514,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 13,981,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 administration program. 16 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 17 of law, the money hereby appropriated may 18 be available for program expenses, includ- 19 ing the payment of liabilities incurred 20 prior to April 1, 2025 or hereafter to 21 accrue, and may be increased or decreased 22 by interchange with any other appropri- 23 ation within the division of criminal 24 justice services general fund - state 25 purposes account with the approval of the 26 director of the budget. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 28 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 29 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 30 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 31 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 32 appropriation for the budget division 33 program of the division of the budget, are 34 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 35 part of this appropriation as if fully 36 stated (81001). 37 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 10,769,000 38 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 4,000 39 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 500,000 40 Travel (54000) .................................... 77,000 41 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,000,000 42 Equipment (56000) ................................ 631,000 43 -------------- 99 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 CRIME PREVENTION AND REDUCTION STRATEGIES PROGRAM .......... 115,916,000 2 -------------- 3 General Fund 4 State Purposes Account - 10050 5 For services and expenses related to the 6 crime prevention and reduction strategies 7 program. 8 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 9 of law, the money hereby appropriated may 10 be available for program expenses, includ- 11 ing the payment of liabilities incurred 12 prior to April 1, 2025 or hereafter to 13 accrue, and may be increased or decreased 14 by interchange with any other appropri- 15 ation within the division of criminal 16 justice services general fund - state 17 purposes account with the approval of the 18 director of the budget. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 20 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 21 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 22 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 23 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 24 appropriation for the budget division 25 program of the division of the budget, are 26 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 27 part of this appropriation as if fully 28 stated (20235). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 35,974,000 30 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 15,000 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 69,000 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 740,000 33 Travel (54000) ................................... 500,000 34 Contractual services (51000) ................... 8,598,000 35 Equipment (56000) ................................ 304,000 36 -------------- 37 Total amount available .................... 46,200,000 38 -------------- 39 For services and expenses related to the 40 office of gun violence prevention. 41 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 42 of law, the money hereby appropriated may 43 be available for program expenses, includ- 44 ing the payment of liabilities incurred 45 prior to April 1, 2025 or hereafter to 46 accrue, and may be increased or decreased 47 by interchange with any other appropri- 48 ation within the division of criminal 100 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 justice services general fund - state 2 purposes account or suballocated to the 3 department of health with the approval of 4 the director of the budget. 5 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 255,000 6 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 2,000 7 Travel (54000) ..................................... 4,000 8 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,739,000 9 -------------- 10 Total amount available ....................... 3,000,000 11 -------------- 12 Program account subtotal .................. 49,200,000 13 -------------- 14 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 15 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 16 Crime Identification and Technology Account - 25475 17 For services and expenses related to crime 18 identification technologies, pursuant to 19 an expenditure plan developed by the 20 commissioner of the division of criminal 21 justice services. A portion of these funds 22 may be transferred to aid to localities 23 and may be suballocated to other state 24 agencies (20204). 25 Personal service (50000) ....................... 2,029,000 26 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 6,000,000 27 Fringe benefits (60090) ............................ 4,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal ................... 8,033,000 30 -------------- 31 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 32 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 33 DCJS Miscellaneous Discretionary Account - 25470 34 Funds herein appropriated may be used to 35 disburse unanticipated federal grants in 36 support of state and local programs to 37 prevent crime, support law enforcement, 38 improve the administration of justice, and 39 assist victims. A portion of these funds 40 may be transferred to aid to localities 41 and may be suballocated to other state 42 agencies (20202). 101 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ....................... 1,015,000 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 6,500,000 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,067,000 4 -------------- 5 Program account subtotal ................... 8,582,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 8 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 9 Edward Byrne Memorial Grant Account - 25540 10 For services and expenses related to the 11 federal Edward Byrne memorial justice 12 assistance formula program. A portion of 13 these funds may be transferred to aid to 14 localities and/or suballocated to other 15 state agencies (20209). 16 Personal service (50000) ....................... 3,995,000 17 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 126,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ................... 4,121,000 20 -------------- 21 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 22 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 23 Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Formula 24 Account - 25436 25 For services and expenses associated with 26 the juvenile justice and delinquency 27 prevention formula account in accordance 28 with a distribution plan determined by the 29 juvenile justice advisory group and 30 affirmed by the commissioner of the divi- 31 sion of criminal justice services. A 32 portion of these funds may be transferred 33 to aid to localities and may be suballo- 34 cated to other state agencies (20213). 35 Personal service (50000) ......................... 635,000 36 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 325,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ..................... 960,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 41 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 42 Violence Against Women Account - 25477 43 For services and expenses related to the 44 federal violence against women program 102 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 pursuant to an expenditure plan developed 2 by the commissioner of the division of 3 criminal justice services. A portion of 4 these funds may be transferred to aid to 5 localities and may be suballocated to 6 other state agencies (20216). 7 Personal service (50000) ......................... 854,000 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 746,000 9 -------------- 10 Program account subtotal ................... 1,600,000 11 -------------- 12 Special Revenue Funds - Other 13 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 14 Grants Account - 20197 15 For services and expenses associated with 16 gifts, grants and bequests to the division 17 of criminal justice services (20235). 18 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 100,000 19 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 400,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 22 -------------- 23 Special Revenue Funds - Other 24 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 25 Missing Children's Clearinghouse Account - 20192 26 For services and expenses associated with 27 grants, gifts and bequests to the division 28 of criminal justice services for missing 29 children (20235). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 301,000 31 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 100,000 32 Travel (54000) .................................... 50,000 33 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 510,000 34 Equipment (56000) ................................ 290,000 35 Fringe benefits (60000) ............................ 1,000 36 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 1,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ................... 1,253,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other 41 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 42 CJS - Conference and Signs Account - 22190 103 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 crime prevention and reduction strategies 3 program (20235). 4 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 100,000 5 Travel (54000) ................................... 100,000 6 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 100,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal ..................... 300,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 12 Equitable Sharing-DCJS Justice Account - 22236 13 For moneys to the division of criminal 14 justice services for the justice depart- 15 ment federal equitable sharing agreement 16 to be used for law enforcement purposes 17 distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by 18 the division of criminal justice services 19 and approved by the division of budget. A 20 portion of these funds may be transferred 21 to aid to localities and may be suballo- 22 cated to other state agencies (20235). 23 Contractual services (51000) ................... 8,000,000 24 -------------- 25 Program account subtotal ................... 8,000,000 26 -------------- 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 29 Equitable Sharing-DCJS Treasury Account - 22237 30 For moneys to the division of criminal 31 justice services for the treasury depart- 32 ment federal equitable sharing agreement 33 to be used for law enforcement purposes 34 distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by 35 the division of criminal justice services 36 and approved by the division of budget. A 37 portion of these funds may be transferred 38 to aid to localities and may be suballo- 39 cated to other state agencies (20235). 40 Contractual services (51000) ................... 8,000,000 41 -------------- 42 Program account subtotal ................... 8,000,000 43 -------------- 44 Special Revenue Funds - Other 45 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 104 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fingerprint Identification and Technology Account - 2 21950 3 For services and expenses associated with 4 the development of technology solutions 5 that advance the detection and prevention 6 of crime, according to a plan developed by 7 the commissioner of the division of crimi- 8 nal justice services and approved by the 9 director of the budget. Amounts may be 10 transferred to aid to localities or subal- 11 located to other state agencies. A portion 12 of these funds may be suballocated to 13 other state agencies. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 17 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 18 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 19 appropriation for the budget division 20 program of the division of the budget, are 21 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully 23 stated (20235). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 400,000 25 Contractual services (51000) .................. 24,600,000 26 -------------- 27 Program account subtotal .................. 25,000,000 28 -------------- 29 Special Revenue Funds - Other 30 State Police Motor Vehicle Law Enforcement and Motor 31 Vehicle Theft and Insurance Fraud Prevention Fund 32 Motor Vehicle Theft and Insurance Fraud Account - 22801 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 34 for services and expenses associated with 35 local anti-auto theft programs (20235). 36 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 222,000 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 2,000 38 Travel (54000) .................................... 33,000 39 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 2,000 40 Equipment (56000) .................................. 2,000 41 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 95,000 42 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 11,000 43 -------------- 44 Program account subtotal ..................... 367,000 45 -------------- 105 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 CRIME PREVENTION AND REDUCTION STRATEGIES PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 4 Crime Identification and Technology Account - 25475 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to crime identification technolo- 7 gies, pursuant to an expenditure plan developed by the commissioner 8 of the division of criminal justice services. A portion of these 9 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 10 cated to other state agencies (20204). 11 Personal service (50000) ... 2,029,000 .............. (re. $2,029,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,000,000 ........... (re. $6,000,000) 13 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 4,000 ....................... (re. $4,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 15 For services and expenses related to crime identification technolo- 16 gies, pursuant to an expenditure plan developed by the commissioner 17 of the division of criminal justice services. A portion of these 18 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 19 cated to other state agencies (20204). 20 Personal service (50000) ... 2,000,000 .............. (re. $2,000,000) 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,000,000 ........... (re. $5,221,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,000 ....................... (re. $1,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 24 For services and expenses related to crime identification technolo- 25 gies, pursuant to an expenditure plan developed by the commissioner 26 of the division of criminal justice services. A portion of these 27 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 28 cated to other state agencies (20204). 29 Personal service (50000) ... 2,000,000 .............. (re. $1,988,000) 30 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,000,000 ........... (re. $4,390,000) 31 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,000 ....................... (re. $1,000) 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 33 For services and expenses related to crime identification technolo- 34 gies, pursuant to an expenditure plan developed by the commissioner 35 of the division of criminal justice services. A portion of these 36 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 37 cated to other state agencies (20204). 38 Personal service (50000) ... 2,000,000 .............. (re. $1,446,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,000,000 ........... (re. $3,040,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,000 ....................... (re. $1,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 42 For services and expenses related to crime identification technolo- 43 gies, pursuant to an expenditure plan developed by the commissioner 44 of the division of criminal justice services. A portion of these 45 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 46 cated to other state agencies (20204). 106 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ... 2,000,000 .............. (re. $1,940,000) 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,000,000 ........... (re. $5,397,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,000 ....................... (re. $1,000) 4 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as 5 amended by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, and as 6 supplemented by a transfer in accordance with state finance law, is 7 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 8 For services and expenses related to crime identification technolo- 9 gies, pursuant to an expenditure plan developed by the commissioner 10 of the division of criminal justice services. A portion of these 11 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 12 cated to other state agencies (20204). 13 Personal service (50000) ... 2,000,000 .............. (re. $1,211,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) .......................................... 15 [6,000,000] 5,982,000 ............................. (re. $2,661,000) 16 Fringe Benefits (60090) ... 375,000 ................... (re. $104,000) 17 Indirect costs (58850) ... 18,000 ....................... (re. $1,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 50, 19 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 20 For services and expenses related to crime identification technolo- 21 gies, pursuant to an expenditure plan developed by the commissioner 22 of the division of criminal justice services. A portion of these 23 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 24 cated to other state agencies (20204). 25 Personal service (50000) ... 2,000,000 .............. (re. $1,214,000) 26 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,567,000 ........... (re. $1,177,000) 27 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 433,000 ..................... (re. $7,000) 28 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 29 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 30 DCJS Miscellaneous Discretionary Account - 25470 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 32 Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder- 33 al grants in support of state and local programs to prevent crime, 34 support law enforcement, improve the administration of justice, and 35 assist victims. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid 36 to localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies 37 (20202). 38 Personal service (50000) ... 1,015,000 .............. (re. $1,015,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,067,000 ............... (re. $1,067,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 42 Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder- 43 al grants in support of state and local programs to prevent crime, 44 support law enforcement, improve the administration of justice, and 45 assist victims. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid 46 to localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies 47 (20202). 107 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ... 1,000,000 .............. (re. $1,000,000) 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $4,979,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000) 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 5 Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder- 6 al grants in support of state and local programs to prevent crime, 7 support law enforcement, improve the administration of justice, and 8 assist victims. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid 9 to localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies 10 (20202). 11 Personal service (50000) ... 1,000,000 .............. (re. $1,000,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 13 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 15 Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder- 16 al grants in support of state and local programs to prevent crime, 17 support law enforcement, improve the administration of justice, and 18 assist victims. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid 19 to localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies 20 (20202). 21 Personal service (50000) ... 1,000,000 .............. (re. $1,000,000) 22 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $4,868,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 25 Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder- 26 al grants in support of state and local programs to prevent crime, 27 support law enforcement, improve the administration of justice, and 28 assist victims. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid 29 to localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies 30 (20202). 31 Personal service (50000) ... 1,000,000 ................ (re. $974,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $4,976,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000) 34 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 35 Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder- 36 al grants in support of state and local programs to prevent crime, 37 support law enforcement, improve the administration of justice, and 38 assist victims. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid 39 to localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies 40 (20202). 41 Personal service (50000) ... 1,000,000 .............. (re. $1,000,000) 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $4,798,000) 43 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000) 44 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 45 Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder- 46 al grants in support of state and local programs to prevent crime, 47 support law enforcement, improve the administration of justice, and 108 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 assist victims. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid 2 to localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies 3 (20202). 4 Personal service (50000) ... 1,000,000 ................ (re. $438,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $4,791,000) 6 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 8 Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder- 9 al grants in support of state and local programs to prevent crime, 10 support law enforcement, improve the administration of justice, and 11 assist victims. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid 12 to localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies 13 (20202). 14 Personal service (50000) ... 1,000,000 ................ (re. $999,000) 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $1,365,000) 16 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000) 17 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 18 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 19 Edward Byrne Memorial Grant Account - 25540 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 For services and expenses related to the federal Edward Byrne memorial 22 justice assistance formula program. A portion of these funds may be 23 transferred to aid to localities and/or suballocated to other state 24 agencies (20209). 25 Personal service (50000) ... 3,995,000 .............. (re. $3,995,000) 26 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 126,000 ............... (re. $126,000) 27 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 28 For services and expenses related to the federal Edward Byrne memorial 29 justice assistance formula program. A portion of these funds may be 30 transferred to aid to localities and/or suballocated to other state 31 agencies (20209). 32 Personal service (50000) ... 3,939,000 .............. (re. $3,019,000) 33 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 126,000 ............... (re. $126,000) 34 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 35 For services and expenses related to the federal Edward Byrne memorial 36 justice assistance formula program. A portion of these funds may be 37 transferred to aid to localities and/or suballocated to other state 38 agencies (20209). 39 Personal service (50000) ... 3,900,000 .............. (re. $3,290,000) 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 100,000 ............... (re. $100,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 42 For services and expenses related to the federal Edward Byrne memorial 43 justice assistance formula program. A portion of these funds may be 44 transferred to aid to localities and/or suballocated to other state 45 agencies (20209). 46 Personal service (50000) ... 3,900,000 .............. (re. $3,900,000) 109 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 100,000 ............... (re. $100,000) 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 3 For services and expenses related to the federal Edward Byrne memorial 4 justice assistance formula program. A portion of these funds may be 5 transferred to aid to localities and/or suballocated to other state 6 agencies (20209). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 3,900,000 .............. (re. $2,950,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 100,000 ............... (re. $100,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 10 For services and expenses related to the federal Edward Byrne memorial 11 justice assistance formula program. Funds appropriated herein shall 12 be expended pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of 13 criminal justice services and approved by the director of the budg- 14 et. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities 15 and/or suballocated to other state agencies (20209). 16 Personal service (50000) ... 3,900,000 .............. (re. $2,208,000) 17 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 100,000 ............... (re. $100,000) 18 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, 19 and as supplemented by a transfer in accordance with state finance 20 law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 21 For services and expenses related to the federal Edward Byrne memorial 22 justice assistance formula program. Funds appropriated herein shall 23 be expended pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of 24 criminal justice services and approved by the director of the budg- 25 et. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities 26 and/or suballocated to other state agencies (20209). 27 Personal service (50000) ... [3,900,000] 3,867,000 .... (re. $356,000) 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 100,000 ............... (re. $100,000) 29 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $2,000) 30 Indirect costs (58850) ... 16,000 ....................... (re. $2,000) 31 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 32 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 33 Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Formula Account - 25436 34 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 35 For services and expenses associated with the juvenile justice and 36 delinquency prevention formula account in accordance with a distrib- 37 ution plan determined by the juvenile justice advisory group and 38 affirmed by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice 39 services. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to 40 localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20213). 41 Personal service (50000) ... 635,000 .................. (re. $635,000) 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 325,000 ............... (re. $325,000) 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 44 For services and expenses associated with the juvenile justice and 45 delinquency prevention formula account in accordance with a distrib- 46 ution plan determined by the juvenile justice advisory group and 110 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 affirmed by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice 2 services. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to 3 localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20213). 4 Personal service (50000) ... 625,000 .................. (re. $625,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 325,000 ............... (re. $325,000) 6 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 7 For services and expenses associated with the juvenile justice and 8 delinquency prevention formula account in accordance with a distrib- 9 ution plan determined by the juvenile justice advisory group and 10 affirmed by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice 11 services. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to 12 localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20213). 13 Personal service (50000) ... 625,000 .................. (re. $625,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 325,000 ............... (re. $325,000) 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 16 For services and expenses associated with the juvenile justice and 17 delinquency prevention formula account in accordance with a distrib- 18 ution plan determined by the juvenile justice advisory group and 19 affirmed by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice 20 services. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to 21 localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20213). 22 Personal service (50000) ... 625,000 .................. (re. $625,000) 23 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 325,000 ............... (re. $325,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 25 For services and expenses associated with the juvenile justice and 26 delinquency prevention formula account in accordance with a distrib- 27 ution plan determined by the juvenile justice advisory group and 28 affirmed by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice 29 services. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to 30 localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20213). 31 Personal service (50000) ... 625,000 .................. (re. $450,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 325,000 ............... (re. $301,000) 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 34 For services and expenses associated with the juvenile justice and 35 delinquency prevention formula account in accordance with a distrib- 36 ution plan determined by the juvenile justice advisory group and 37 affirmed by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice 38 services. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to 39 localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20213). 40 Personal service (50000) ... 625,000 .................. (re. $199,000) 41 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 325,000 ............... (re. $279,000) 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 43 For services and expenses associated with the juvenile justice and 44 delinquency prevention formula account in accordance with a distrib- 45 ution plan determined by the juvenile justice advisory group and 46 affirmed by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice 111 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 services. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to 2 localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20213). 3 Personal service (50000) ... 625,000 .................. (re. $150,000) 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 325,000 ............... (re. $325,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 6 For services and expenses associated with the juvenile justice and 7 delinquency prevention formula account in accordance with a distrib- 8 ution plan determined by the juvenile justice advisory group and 9 affirmed by the commissioner of the division of criminal justice 10 services. A portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to 11 localities and may be suballocated to other state agencies (20213). 12 Personal service (50000) ... 625,000 .................. (re. $443,000) 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 325,000 ............... (re. $256,000) 14 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 15 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 16 Violence Against Women Account - 25477 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 18 For services and expenses related to the federal violence against 19 women program pursuant to an expenditure plan developed by the 20 commissioner of the division of criminal justice services. A portion 21 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 22 suballocated to other state agencies (20216). 23 Personal service (50000) ... 854,000 .................. (re. $854,000) 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 746,000 ............... (re. $746,000) 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 26 For services and expenses related to the federal violence against 27 women program pursuant to an expenditure plan developed by the 28 commissioner of the division of criminal justice services. A portion 29 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 30 suballocated to other state agencies (20216). 31 Personal service (50000) ... 800,000 .................. (re. $800,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 700,000 ............... (re. $700,000) 33 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, 34 and as supplemented by a transfer in accordance with state finance 35 law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 36 For services and expenses related to the federal violence against 37 women program pursuant to an expenditure plan developed by the 38 commissioner of the division of criminal justice services. A portion 39 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 40 suballocated to other state agencies (20216). 41 Personal service (50000) ... 800,000 .................. (re. $800,000) 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... [700,000] 679,000 ..... (re. $632,000) 43 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 21,000 ..................... (re. $21,000) 44 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021, 45 and as supplemented by a transfer in accordance with state finance 46 law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 112 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the federal violence against 2 women program pursuant to an expenditure plan developed by the 3 commissioner of the division of criminal justice services. A portion 4 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 5 suballocated to other state agencies (20216). 6 Personal service (50000) ... 800,000 .................. (re. $412,000) 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... [700,000] 668,000 ..... (re. $460,000) 8 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 32,000 ..................... (re. $32,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 50, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2022: 11 For services and expenses related to the federal violence against 12 women program pursuant to an expenditure plan developed by the 13 commissioner of the division of criminal justice services. A portion 14 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 15 suballocated to other state agencies (20216). 16 Personal service (50000) ... 800,000 ................... (re. $81,000) 17 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 667,000 ............... (re. $434,000) 18 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 33,000 ...................... (re. $3,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 50, 20 section 1, of the laws of 2022: 21 For services and expenses related to the federal violence against 22 women program pursuant to an expenditure plan developed by the 23 commissioner of the division of criminal justice services. A portion 24 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 25 suballocated to other state agencies (20216). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 800,000 ................... (re. $35,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 673,000 ............... (re. $419,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 27,000 ...................... (re. $3,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 50, 30 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 31 For services and expenses related to the federal violence against 32 women program pursuant to an expenditure plan developed by the 33 commissioner of the division of criminal justice services. A portion 34 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 35 suballocated to other state agencies (20216). 36 Personal service (50000) ... 800,000 ................... (re. $41,000) 37 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 670,000 ............... (re. $249,000) 38 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 30,000 ...................... (re. $1,000) 113 12550-10-5 COUNCIL ON DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 1,500,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 4,750,000 6,663,000 5 Enterprise Funds ................... 10,000 0 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 6,260,000 6,663,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PLANNING PROGRAM .................. 6,260,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 developmental disabilities planning 16 program for implementation of the 17 2022-2026 state plan which may include 18 agency administrative costs of implement- 19 ing such plan (21100). 20 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,500,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ................... 1,500,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 25 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 26 DD Planning Council Account - 25143 27 For services and expenses related to the 28 provision of services to individuals with 29 developmental disabilities under the 30 provisions of the federal developmental 31 disabilities bill of rights act of nine- 32 teen hundred seventy-five (21100). 33 Personal service (50000) ......................... 100,000 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 4,576,000 35 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................... 60,000 36 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 14,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ................... 4,750,000 39 -------------- 40 Enterprise Funds 41 Agencies Enterprise Fund 114 12550-10-5 COUNCIL ON DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 DDPC Publications Account - 50324 2 For services and expenses incurred by the 3 council on developmental disabilities 4 related to producing, reproducing, 5 distributing, and mailing printed, 6 recorded and electronic media (21100). 7 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 10,000 8 -------------- 9 Program account subtotal ...................... 10,000 10 -------------- 115 12550-10-5 COUNCIL ON DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PLANNING PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 4 DD Planning Council Account - 25143 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to the provision of services to 7 individuals with developmental disabilities under the provisions of 8 the federal developmental disabilities bill of rights act of nine- 9 teen hundred seventy-five (21100). 10 Personal service (50000) ... 1,300,000 ................ (re. $805,000) 11 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,568,000 ........... (re. $2,414,000) 12 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 838,000 ................... (re. $746,000) 13 Indirect costs (58850) ... 44,000 ...................... (re. $25,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 50, 15 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 16 For services and expenses related to the provision of services to 17 individuals with developmental disabilities under the provisions of 18 the federal developmental disabilities bill of rights act of nine- 19 teen hundred seventy-five (21100). 20 Personal service (50000) ... 1,300,000 ................ (re. $295,000) 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,568,000 ........... (re. $1,279,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 838,000 ................... (re. $166,000) 23 Indirect costs (58850) ... 44,000 ....................... (re. $5,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 50, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 For services and expenses related to the provision of services to 27 individuals with developmental disabilities under the provisions of 28 the federal developmental disabilities bill of rights act of nine- 29 teen hundred seventy-five (21100). 30 Personal service (50000) ... 1,300,000 ................. (re. $22,000) 31 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,555,000 ............. (re. $195,000) 32 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 830,000 .................... (re. $12,000) 33 Indirect costs (58850) ... 65,000 ....................... (re. $1,000) 34 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 50, 35 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 36 For services and expenses related to the provision of services to 37 individuals with developmental disabilities under the provisions of 38 the federal developmental disabilities bill of rights act of nine- 39 teen hundred seventy-five (21100). 40 Personal service (50000) ... 971,000 ................... (re. $52,000) 41 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,102,000 ............. (re. $633,000) 42 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 624,000 ..................... (re. $9,000) 43 Indirect costs (58850) ... 53,000 ....................... (re. $4,000) 116 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 24,141,000 38,879,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 2,000,000 22,330,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 7,599,000 7,000,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 33,740,000 68,209,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ....................................... 3,339,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 administration program. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 19 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 20 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 21 appropriation for the budget division 22 program of the division of the budget, are 23 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully 25 stated (81001). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,830,000 27 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 39,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 64,000 29 Travel (54000) .................................... 86,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,279,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................. 41,000 32 -------------- 33 CLEAN AIR PROGRAM .............................................. 403,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Other 36 Clean Air Fund 37 Clean Air Account - 21451 38 For services and expenses related to the 39 clean air program (81016). 40 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 211,000 41 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 4,000 117 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Travel (54000) .................................... 25,000 2 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 88,000 3 Equipment (56000) ................................. 12,000 4 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 59,000 5 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 4,000 6 -------------- 7 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM ................................ 21,815,000 8 -------------- 9 General Fund 10 State Purposes Account - 10050 11 For services and expenses related to the 12 economic development program. The funds 13 appropriated hereby may be suballocated or 14 transferred to any department, agency, or 15 public authority (81018). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 13,288,000 17 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 6,000 18 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 176,000 19 Travel (54000) ................................... 136,000 20 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,000,000 21 Equipment (56000) ................................. 59,000 22 -------------- 23 Total amount available .................... 15,665,000 24 -------------- 25 For services and expenses of a procurement 26 contract newsletter pursuant to article 27 4-C of the economic development law. 28 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 29 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 30 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 31 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 32 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 33 appropriation for the budget division 34 program of the division of the budget, are 35 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 36 part of this appropriation as if fully 37 stated (21602). 38 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 150,000 39 -------------- 40 Program account subtotal .................. 15,815,000 41 -------------- 42 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 43 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 44 Federal Miscellaneous Grants Account - 25340 118 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 economic development program (81018). 3 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,000,000 4 -------------- 5 Program account subtotal ................... 2,000,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Other 8 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 9 Entertainment Diversity Job Training Development Account 10 - 22247 11 For services and expenses related to the 12 empire state entertainment diversity job 13 training development fund, up to 14 $4,000,000 of the funds appropriated may 15 be suballocated or transferred to any 16 department, agency or public authority, 17 including the New York state urban devel- 18 opment corporation d/b/a empire state 19 development to allocate grants for job 20 creation and training programs that 21 support efforts to recruit, hire, promote, 22 retain, develop and train a diverse and 23 inclusive workforce as production company 24 employees in the motion picture and tele- 25 vision industry within the state (81018). 26 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,000,000 27 -------------- 28 Program account subtotal ................... 4,000,000 29 -------------- 30 MARKETING AND ADVERTISING PROGRAM ............................ 8,183,000 31 -------------- 32 General Fund 33 State Purposes Account - 10050 34 For services and expenses related to the 35 marketing and advertising program (21401). 36 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,092,000 37 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 7,000 38 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 52,000 39 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 10,000 40 Travel (54000) .................................... 15,000 41 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 305,000 42 Equipment (56000) .................................. 6,000 43 -------------- 44 Total amount available ..................... 2,487,000 45 -------------- 119 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of tourism market- 2 ing. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 3 provision of law, all or a portion of this 4 appropriation may, subject to the approval 5 of the director of the budget, be trans- 6 ferred to the general fund, local assist- 7 ance account, for a local tourism 8 promotion matching grants program pursuant 9 to article 5-A of the economic development 10 law. 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 12 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 13 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 14 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 15 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 16 appropriation for the budget division 17 program of the division of the budget, are 18 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 19 part of this appropriation as if fully 20 stated (21417). 21 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 655,000 22 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,190,000 23 Equipment (56000) ................................ 655,000 24 -------------- 25 Total amount available ....................... 2,500,000 26 -------------- 27 Program account subtotal ................... 4,987,000 28 -------------- 29 Special Revenue Funds - Other 30 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 31 Commerce Economic Development Assistance Account - 22042 32 For services and expenses related to the 33 marketing and advertising program. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 35 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 36 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 37 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 38 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 39 appropriation for the budget division 40 program of the division of the budget, are 41 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 42 part of this appropriation as if fully 43 stated (21401). 44 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 92,000 45 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 3,000 46 Travel (54000) ..................................... 3,000 47 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,057,000 48 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 38,000 120 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 3,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal ................... 3,196,000 4 -------------- 121 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM 2 General Fund 3 State Purposes Account - 10050 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For services and expenses related to the economic development program. 6 The funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to 7 any department, agency, or public authority (81018). 8 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 12,904,000 .... (re. $8,032,000) 9 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 6,000 ......... (re. $4,000) 10 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 176,000 ............ (re. $144,000) 11 Travel (54000) ... 136,000 ............................. (re. $94,000) 12 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,000,000 .......... (re. $1,860,000) 13 Equipment (56000) ... 59,000 ........................... (re. $31,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 15 For services and expenses related to the economic development program. 16 The funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to 17 any department, agency, or public authority (81018). 18 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 12,528,000 .... (re. $2,891,000) 19 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 6,000 ......... (re. $6,000) 20 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 176,000 ............ (re. $126,000) 21 Travel (54000) ... 136,000 ............................. (re. $39,000) 22 Contractual services (51000) ... 7,008,000 .......... (re. $6,457,000) 23 Equipment (56000) ... 59,000 ........................... (re. $43,000) 24 For services and expenses of a procurement contract newsletter pursu- 25 ant to article 4-C of the economic development law. 26 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 27 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 28 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 29 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 30 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 31 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (21602). 32 Contractual services (51000) ... 150,000 .............. (re. $150,000) 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 34 For services and expenses related to the economic development program. 35 The funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred to 36 any department, agency, or public authority (81018). 37 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 12,360,000 ...... (re. $758,000) 38 Contractual services (51000) ... 11,088,000 ......... (re. $1,866,000) 39 For services and expenses of a procurement contract newsletter pursu- 40 ant to article 4-C of the economic development law. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 42 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 43 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 44 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 45 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 46 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (21602). 47 Contractual services (51000) ... 150,000 .............. (re. $150,000) 122 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 2 For services and expenses for programs and activities to promote 3 international trade (21411). 4 Contractual services (51000) ... 700,000 .............. (re. $700,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 6 For services and expenses for programs and activities to promote 7 international trade (21411). 8 Contractual services (51000) ... 700,000 .............. (re. $692,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 10 For services and expenses for programs and activities to promote 11 international trade (21411). 12 Contractual services (51000) ... 700,000 .............. (re. $127,000) 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 50, 14 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 15 For services and expenses related to the economic development program 16 (81018). 17 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,701,000 ............ (re. $716,000) 18 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 19 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 20 Federal Miscellaneous Grants Account - 25340 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 22 For services and expenses related to the economic development program 23 (81018). 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $2,000,000) 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 26 For services and expenses related to the economic development program 27 (81018). 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $2,000,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 30 For services and expenses related to the economic development program 31 (81018). 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $2,000,000) 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 34 For services and expenses related to the economic development program 35 (81018). 36 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $1,426,000) 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 38 For services and expenses related to the economic development program 39 (81018). 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $2,000,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 123 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the economic development program 2 (81018). 3 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $2,000,000) 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 50, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 6 For services and expenses related to the economic development program 7 (81018). 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $2,000,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 50, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 11 For services and expenses related to the economic development program 12 (81018). 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $2,000,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 50, 15 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 16 For services and expenses related to the economic development program 17 (81018). 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $1,503,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 50, 20 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 21 For services and expenses related to the economic development program 22 (81018). 23 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $1,081,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 50, 25 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 26 For services and expenses related to the economic development program 27 (81018). 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $2,000,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 50, 30 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 31 For services and expenses related to the economic development program 32 (81018). 33 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $2,000,000) 34 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 50, 35 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 36 For services and expenses related to the economic development program. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 38 Interchange and Transfer Authority, the IT Interchange and Transfer 39 Authority, and the Call Center Interchange and Transfer Authority as 40 defined in the 2012-13 state fiscal year state operations appropri- 41 ation for the budget division program of the division of the budget, 42 are deemed fully incorporated herein and a part of this appropri- 43 ation as if fully stated (81018). 44 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ............. (re. $264,000) 124 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 50, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 3 For services and expenses related to the economic development program 4 (81018). 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 .............. (re. $56,000) 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 8 Entertainment Diversity Job Training Development Account - 22247 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 10 For services and expenses related to the empire state entertainment 11 diversity job training development fund, up to $4,000,000 of the 12 funds appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to any depart- 13 ment, agency or public authority, including the New York state urban 14 development corporation d/b/a empire state development to allocate 15 grants for job creation and training programs that support efforts 16 to recruit, hire, promote, retain, develop and train a diverse and 17 inclusive workforce as production company employees in the motion 18 picture and television industry within the state (81018). 19 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,000,000 .......... (re. $4,000,000) 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 21 For services and expenses related to the empire state entertainment 22 diversity job training development fund, up to $2,000,000 of the 23 funds appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to any depart- 24 ment, agency or public authority, including the New York state urban 25 development corporation d/b/a empire state development to allocate 26 grants for job creation and training programs that support efforts 27 to recruit, hire, promote, retain, develop and train a diverse and 28 inclusive workforce as production company employees in the motion 29 picture and television industry within the state (81018). 30 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,000,000 .......... (re. $2,000,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 32 For services and expenses related to the empire state entertainment 33 diversity job training development fund, up to $2,000,000 of the 34 funds appropriated may be suballocated or transferred to any depart- 35 ment, agency or public authority, including the New York state urban 36 development corporation d/b/a empire state development to allocate 37 grants for job creation and training programs that support efforts 38 to recruit, hire, promote, retain, develop and train a diverse and 39 inclusive workforce as production company employees in the motion 40 picture and television industry within the state (81018). 41 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,000,000 .......... (re. $1,000,000) 42 MARKETING AND ADVERTISING PROGRAM 43 General Fund 44 State Purposes Account - 10050 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 125 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of tourism marketing. Notwithstanding any 2 inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of this appropri- 3 ation may, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, be 4 transferred to the general fund, local assistance account, for a 5 local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to article 6 5-A of the economic development law. 7 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 8 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 9 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 10 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 11 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (21417). 13 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 655,000 ............ (re. $652,000) 14 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,190,000 .......... (re. $1,018,000) 15 Equipment (56000) ... 655,000 ......................... (re. $531,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 17 For services and expenses of tourism marketing. Notwithstanding any 18 inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of this appropri- 19 ation may, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, be 20 transferred to the general fund, local assistance account, for a 21 local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to article 22 5-A of the economic development law. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 24 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 25 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 26 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 27 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (21417). 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 655,000 ............ (re. $646,000) 30 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,190,000 ............ (re. $783,000) 31 Equipment (56000) ... 655,000 ......................... (re. $416,000) 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 33 For services and expenses of tourism marketing. Notwithstanding any 34 inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of this appropri- 35 ation may, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, be 36 transferred to the general fund, local assistance account, for a 37 local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to article 38 5-A of the economic development law. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 40 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 41 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 42 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 43 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (21417). 45 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 655,000 ............ (re. $652,000) 46 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,190,000 ............ (re. $697,000) 47 Equipment (56000) ... 655,000 ......................... (re. $417,000) 48 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 126 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of tourism marketing. Notwithstanding any 2 inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of this appropri- 3 ation may, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, be 4 transferred to the general fund, local assistance account, for a 5 local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to article 6 5-A of the economic development law. 7 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 8 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 9 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 10 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 11 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (21417). 13 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 655,000 ............ (re. $651,000) 14 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,190,000 ............ (re. $874,000) 15 Equipment (56000) ... 655,000 ......................... (re. $558,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 17 For services and expenses of tourism marketing. Notwithstanding any 18 inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of this appropri- 19 ation may, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, be 20 transferred to the general fund, local assistance account, for a 21 local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to article 22 5-A of the economic development law. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 24 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 25 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 26 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 27 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (21417). 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 655,000 ............ (re. $647,000) 30 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,190,000 .......... (re. $1,009,000) 31 Equipment (56000) ... 655,000 ......................... (re. $622,000) 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 33 For services and expenses of tourism marketing. Notwithstanding any 34 inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of this appropri- 35 ation may, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, be 36 transferred to the general fund, local assistance account, for a 37 local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to article 38 5-A of the economic development law. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 40 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 41 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2019-20 state fiscal year state 42 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 43 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (21417). 45 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 655,000 ............ (re. $655,000) 46 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,190,000 ............ (re. $656,000) 47 Equipment (56000) ... 655,000 ......................... (re. $614,000) 48 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 127 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of tourism marketing. Notwithstanding any 2 inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of this appropri- 3 ation may, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, be 4 transferred to the general fund, local assistance account, for a 5 local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to article 6 5-A of the economic development law. 7 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 8 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 9 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2018-19 state fiscal year state 10 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 11 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (21417). 13 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 655,000 ............ (re. $653,000) 14 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,190,000 ............ (re. $441,000) 15 Equipment (56000) ... 655,000 ......................... (re. $607,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 17 For services and expenses of tourism marketing. Notwithstanding any 18 inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of this appropri- 19 ation may, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, be 20 transferred to the general fund, local assistance account, for a 21 local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to article 22 5-A of the economic development law. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 24 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 25 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2017-18 state fiscal year state 26 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 27 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (21417). 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 655,000 ............. (re. $46,000) 30 Equipment (56000) ... 655,000 ......................... (re. $137,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 32 For services and expenses of tourism marketing. Notwithstanding any 33 inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of this appropri- 34 ation may, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, be 35 transferred to the general fund, local assistance account, for a 36 local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to article 37 5-A of the economic development law. 38 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 39 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 40 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2016-17 state fiscal year state 41 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 42 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 43 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (21417). 44 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,190,000 .............. (re. $4,000) 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 46 For services and expenses of tourism marketing. Notwithstanding any 47 inconsistent provision of law, all or a portion of this appropri- 48 ation may, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, be 49 transferred to the general fund, local assistance account, for a 128 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 local tourism promotion matching grants program pursuant to article 2 5-A of the economic development law. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 4 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 5 fer Authority as defined in the 2014-15 state fiscal year state 6 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 7 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 8 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (21417). 9 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 655,000 .............. (re. $7,000) 129 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule, net of 2 disallowances, refunds, reimbursements and credits: 3 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 4 General Fund ....................... 84,549,000 28,687,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 400,129,520 910,341,000 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 185,558,000 26,019,000 7 Internal Service Funds ............. 35,071,000 0 8 ---------------- ---------------- 9 All Funds ........................ 705,307,520 965,047,000 10 ================ ================ 11 SCHEDULE 12 ADULT CAREER AND CONTINUING EDUCATION SERVICES PROGRAM ..... 161,285,520 13 -------------- 14 General Fund 15 State Purposes Account - 10050 16 For services and expenses related to the 17 administration of the high school equiv- 18 alency diploma exam (21852). 19 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 669,000 20 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 53,000 21 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 33,000 22 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 23 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,587,000 24 Equipment (56000) ................................. 21,000 25 -------------- 26 Program account subtotal ................... 4,368,000 27 -------------- 28 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 29 Federal Education Fund 30 Federal Department of Education Account - 25210 31 For the administration of grants for specif- 32 ic programs including, but not limited to, 33 vocational rehabilitation and supported 34 employment. 35 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 36 of law, a portion of this appropriation 37 may be suballocated to other state depart- 38 ments and agencies, subject to the 39 approval of the director of the budget, as 40 needed to accomplish the intent of this 41 appropriation (21713). 130 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ...................... 65,362,000 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 15,398,000 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ....................... 33,655,000 4 Indirect costs (58850) ........................ 17,609,000 5 -------------- 6 Total amount available ..................... 132,024,000 7 -------------- 8 For the administration of grants for specif- 9 ic programs including, but not limited to, 10 independent living centers. 11 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 12 of law, a portion of this appropriation 13 may be suballocated to other state depart- 14 ments and agencies, subject to the 15 approval of the director of the budget, as 16 needed to accomplish the intent of this 17 appropriation (21856). 18 Personal service (50000) ......................... 300,000 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 500,000 20 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 161,520 21 Indirect costs (58850) ............................. 9,000 22 -------------- 23 Total amount available ......................... 970,520 24 -------------- 25 For the administration of grants for specif- 26 ic programs including, but not limited to, 27 in service training. 28 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 29 of law, a portion of this appropriation 30 may be suballocated to other state depart- 31 ments and agencies, subject to the 32 approval of the director of the budget, as 33 needed to accomplish the intent of this 34 appropriation (21859). 35 Personal service (50000) ......................... 120,000 36 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 428,040 37 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................... 60,972 38 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 32,988 39 -------------- 40 Total amount available ......................... 642,000 41 -------------- 42 For the administration of grants for specif- 43 ic programs including, but not limited to, 44 the workforce investment act. 45 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 46 of law, a portion of this appropriation 47 may be suballocated to other state depart- 131 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 ments and agencies, subject to the 2 approval of the director of the budget, as 3 needed to accomplish the intent of this 4 appropriation (21734). 5 Personal service (50000) ....................... 2,801,000 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 3,253,023 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,434,524 8 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 754,453 9 -------------- 10 Total amount available ....................... 8,243,000 11 -------------- 12 Program account subtotal ................. 141,879,520 13 -------------- 14 Special Revenue Funds - Other 15 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 16 High School Equivalency Account - 21979 17 Notwithstanding section 97-hhh of the state 18 finance law or any other provision of law 19 to the contrary, funds appropriated herein 20 shall be available for services and 21 expenses related to the administration of 22 the high school equivalency diploma exam 23 (21852). 24 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 3,000 25 Travel (54000) ..................................... 3,000 26 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 949,000 27 -------------- 28 Program account subtotal ..................... 955,000 29 -------------- 30 Special Revenue Funds - Other 31 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 32 VESID Social Security Account - 22001 33 For expenses of contractual services for the 34 rehabilitation of social security disabil- 35 ity beneficiaries (21852). 36 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,243,000 37 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 35,000 38 Travel (54000) ..................................... 2,000 39 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 263,000 40 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,834,000 41 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 623,000 42 -------------- 43 Program account subtotal ................... 8,000,000 44 -------------- 132 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Tuition Reimbursement Fund 3 Tuition Reimbursement Account - 20451 4 For reimbursement of tuition payments made 5 by or on behalf of students at proprietary 6 institutions registered or licensed pursu- 7 ant to section 5001 of the education law, 8 including liabilities incurred prior to 9 April 1, 2025 (21852). 10 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 200,000 11 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,309,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal ................... 1,509,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other 16 Tuition Reimbursement Fund 17 Vocational School Supervision Account - 20452 18 For services and expenses for the super- 19 vision of institutions registered pursuant 20 to section 5001 of the education law, and 21 for services and expenses of supervisory 22 programs and payment of associated indi- 23 rect costs and general state charges 24 (21852). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,895,000 26 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 8,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 12,000 28 Travel (54000) .................................... 40,000 29 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,165,000 30 Equipment (56000) ................................. 12,000 31 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,221,000 32 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 64,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal ................... 4,417,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Vocational Rehabilitation Fund 38 Vocational Rehabilitation Account - 23051 39 For services and expenses of the special 40 workers' compensation program (21852). 41 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 2,000 42 Travel (54000) ..................................... 4,000 133 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 146,000 2 Equipment (56000) .................................. 5,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal ..................... 157,000 5 -------------- 6 CULTURAL EDUCATION PROGRAM .................................. 79,788,000 7 -------------- 8 General Fund 9 State Purposes Account - 10050 10 For services and expenses related to conser- 11 vation and preservation of library materi- 12 als and the talking book and braille 13 library (21711). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 451,000 15 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 21,000 16 Travel (54000) ..................................... 2,000 17 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 522,000 18 Equipment (56000) .................................. 4,000 19 -------------- 20 Total amount available ....................... 1,000,000 21 -------------- 22 For services and expenses of the summer 23 school of the arts. Notwithstanding any 24 inconsistent provision of law, a portion 25 of this appropriation may be suballocated 26 to other state departments and agencies, 27 as needed, to accomplish the intent of 28 this appropriation (21711). 29 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,200,000 30 -------------- 31 For services and expenses of the New York 32 online virtual electronic library (NOVEL- 33 ny) (57008). 34 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,000,000 35 -------------- 36 For services and expenses of implementation 37 of the unmarked burial site protection act 38 (57009). 39 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 275,000 40 -------------- 41 Program account subtotal ................... 5,475,000 42 -------------- 134 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 2 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 3 Federal Operating Grants Account - 25456 4 For administration of federal grants pursu- 5 ant to various federal laws including 6 funds from the national endowment of 7 humanities, the institute of museum and 8 library services, the United States 9 geological survey, the United States 10 department of energy, and the United 11 States department of the interior. 12 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 13 of law, a portion of this appropriation 14 may be suballocated to other state depart- 15 ments and agencies or transferred to any 16 other federal fund, subject to the 17 approval of the director of the budget, as 18 needed to accomplish the intent of this 19 appropriation (21739). 20 Personal service (50000) ....................... 3,169,000 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,995,000 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,103,000 23 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 512,000 24 -------------- 25 Total amount available ....................... 7,779,000 26 -------------- 27 For the administration of federal grants 28 pursuant to various federal laws including 29 the library services technology act 30 (LSTA). 31 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 32 of law, a portion of this appropriation 33 may be suballocated to other state depart- 34 ments and agencies, subject to the 35 approval of the director of the budget, as 36 needed to accomplish the intent of this 37 appropriation (21851). 38 Personal service (50000) ....................... 3,843,000 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,250,000 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 2,278,000 41 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 723,000 42 -------------- 43 Total amount available ....................... 8,094,000 44 -------------- 45 Program account subtotal .................. 15,873,000 46 -------------- 47 Special Revenue Funds - Other 135 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 2 Cultural Education Account - 22063 3 For services and expenses of the office of 4 cultural education, including but not 5 limited to the state museum, state 6 library, and state archives. Notwith- 7 standing any inconsistent provision of 8 law, a portion of this appropriation may 9 be suballocated to other state departments 10 and agencies, as needed to accomplish the 11 intent of this appropriation (21711). 12 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 15,087,000 13 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,009,000 14 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 303,000 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,333,000 16 Travel (54000) ................................... 298,000 17 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,319,000 18 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,854,000 19 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 8,191,000 20 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 699,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal .................. 34,093,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Other 25 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 26 Education Archives Account - 22077 27 For services and expenses of the state 28 archives (21711). 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 171,000 30 Travel (54000) ..................................... 9,000 31 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 13,000 32 Equipment (56000) ................................. 64,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal ..................... 257,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 38 Education Library Account - 21968 39 For services and expenses of the state 40 library (21711). 41 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 66,000 42 Travel (54000) .................................... 28,000 136 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 600,000 2 Equipment (56000) ................................. 35,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal ..................... 729,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 8 Education Museum Account - 21924 9 For services and expenses of the state muse- 10 um (21711). 11 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 665,000 12 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 100,000 13 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 245,000 14 Travel (54000) ................................... 109,000 15 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,074,000 16 Equipment (56000) ................................ 738,000 17 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 375,000 18 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 24,000 19 -------------- 20 Program account subtotal ................... 3,330,000 21 -------------- 22 Special Revenue Funds - Other 23 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 24 Summer School of Arts Account - 21929 25 For services and expenses of the summer 26 school of the arts. Notwithstanding any 27 inconsistent provision of law, a portion 28 of this appropriation may be suballocated 29 to other state departments and agencies, 30 as needed, to accomplish the intent of 31 this appropriation (21711). 32 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 160,000 33 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 60,000 34 Travel (54000) .................................... 45,000 35 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,181,500 36 Equipment (56000) ................................. 15,000 37 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 15,500 38 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 4,000 39 -------------- 40 Program account subtotal ................... 1,481,000 41 -------------- 42 Special Revenue Funds - Other 43 NYS Archives Partnership Trust Fund 44 NYS Archives Partnership Trust Account - 20351 137 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of the archives 2 partnership trust (21711). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 511,000 4 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 13,000 5 Travel (54000) .................................... 22,000 6 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 151,000 7 Equipment (56000) ................................. 13,000 8 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 230,000 9 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 27,000 10 -------------- 11 Program account subtotal ..................... 967,000 12 -------------- 13 Special Revenue Funds - Other 14 New York State Local Government Records Management 15 Improvement Fund 16 Local Government Records Management Account - 20501 17 For payment of necessary and reasonable 18 expenses incurred by the commissioner of 19 education in carrying out the advisory 20 services required in subdivision 1 of 21 section 57.23 of the arts and cultural 22 affairs law and to implement sections 23 57.21, 57.35 and 57.37 of the arts and 24 cultural affairs law (21845). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,314,000 26 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 117,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 49,000 28 Travel (54000) ................................... 169,000 29 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 425,000 30 Equipment (56000) ................................ 114,000 31 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,104,000 32 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 132,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal ................... 4,424,000 35 -------------- 36 Internal Service Funds 37 Agencies Internal Service Fund 38 Archives Records Management Account - 55052 39 For services and expenses of archives 40 records management (21711). 41 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,192,000 42 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 22,000 43 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 40,000 44 Travel (54000) ..................................... 7,000 45 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 247,000 138 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Equipment (56000) ................................ 101,000 2 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 597,000 3 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 56,000 4 -------------- 5 Program account subtotal ................... 2,262,000 6 -------------- 7 Internal Service Funds 8 Agencies Internal Service Fund 9 Cultural Resource Survey Account - 55058 10 For services and expenses related to 11 cultural resource surveys (21711). 12 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,350,000 13 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,170,000 14 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 400,000 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 139,000 16 Travel (54000) ................................... 454,000 17 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,729,000 18 Equipment (56000) ................................ 139,000 19 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,326,000 20 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 190,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal .................. 10,897,000 23 -------------- 24 OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND THE PROFESSIONS PROGRAM ...... 87,509,000 25 -------------- 26 General Fund 27 State Purposes Account - 10050 28 For services and expenses of the office of 29 higher education and the professions 30 program, including up to $5,700,000 for 31 services and expenses related to tenured 32 teacher hearings pursuant to sections 33 3020-a and 3020-b of the education law 34 (21710). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,097,000 36 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 18,000 37 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 38 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 52,000 39 Travel (54000) ................................... 152,000 40 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,619,000 41 Equipment (56000) ................................. 52,000 42 -------------- 43 For services and expenses of staff in the 44 Office of College and University Evalu- 139 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 ation to support the development and 2 implementation of a new state-level 3 program review process for registered 4 educator preparation programs. 5 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 234,000 6 -------------- 7 Program account subtotal ................... 9,225,000 8 -------------- 9 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 10 Federal Education Fund 11 Federal Department of Education Account - 25210 12 For administration of federal grants pursu- 13 ant to various federal laws including the 14 Carl D. Perkins vocational and applied 15 technology education act (VTEA). 16 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 17 of law, a portion of this appropriation 18 may be suballocated to other state depart- 19 ments and agencies, subject to the 20 approval of the director of the budget, as 21 needed to accomplish the intent of this 22 appropriation (21710). 23 Personal service (50000) ......................... 288,000 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ....................... 50,000 25 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 128,000 26 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 56,000 27 -------------- 28 Total amount available ......................... 522,000 29 -------------- 30 For administration of federal grants pursu- 31 ant to various federal laws including, but 32 not limited to, title II supporting effec- 33 tive instruction. Provided further that, 34 notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 35 of law, the commissioner of education 36 shall provide to the director of the budg- 37 et, the chairperson of the senate finance 38 committee and the chairperson of the 39 assembly ways and means committee copies 40 of any spending plans and/or budgets 41 submitted to the federal government with 42 respect to the use of any funds appropri- 43 ated by the federal government including 44 state grants administered by the depart- 45 ment. 46 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 47 of law, a portion of this appropriation 140 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 may be suballocated to other state depart- 2 ments and agencies, subject to the 3 approval of the director of the budget, as 4 needed to accomplish the intent of this 5 appropriation (23419). 6 Personal service (50000) ......................... 731,000 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) ....................... 78,000 8 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 286,000 9 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 176,000 10 -------------- 11 Total amount available ....................... 1,271,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal ................... 1,793,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 16 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 17 Federal Operating Grants Account - 25456 18 For administration of federal grants pursu- 19 ant to various federal laws including the 20 national community service act and the 21 transition to teaching program (21710). 22 Personal service (50000) ......................... 387,000 23 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 549,000 24 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 156,000 25 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 89,000 26 -------------- 27 Program account subtotal ................... 1,181,000 28 -------------- 29 Special Revenue Funds - Other 30 Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account 31 Interstate Reciprocity for Post-secondary Distance 32 Education Account - 23800 33 For services and expenses related to the 34 office of higher education and the 35 professions program (21710). 36 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 466,000 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 5,000 38 Travel (54000) .................................... 21,500 39 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 444,500 40 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 299,000 41 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 17,000 42 -------------- 43 Program account subtotal ................... 1,253,000 44 -------------- 141 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 3 Institutional Accreditation Account - 22235 4 For services and expenses of institutional 5 accreditation activities (21710). 6 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 290,000 7 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 10,000 8 Travel (54000) .................................... 35,000 9 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 11,000 10 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 171,000 11 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 53,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal ..................... 570,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other 16 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 17 Office of Professions Account - 22051 18 For services and expenses related to licen- 19 sure and disciplining programs for the 20 professions, and foreign and out-of-state 21 medical school evaluations. 22 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule 23 or regulation to the contrary, upon 24 approval of the director of the budget, a 25 portion of this appropriation may be 26 suballocated, interchanged, transferred or 27 otherwise made available to the department 28 of health for the services and expenses of 29 administering such program (21710). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 29,362,000 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 200,000 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 700,000 33 Travel (54000) ................................... 300,000 34 Contractual services (51000) .................. 11,695,000 35 Equipment (56000) ................................ 100,000 36 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 18,560,000 37 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 842,000 38 -------------- 39 Program account subtotal .................. 61,759,000 40 -------------- 41 Special Revenue Funds - Other 42 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 43 Teacher Certification Program Account - 21969 44 For services and expenses related to the 45 administration of the teacher certif- 142 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 ication program, including up to 2 $2,250,000 for the fourth year of a TEACH 3 system modernization project in order to 4 reduce processing times upon completion of 5 such project by at least 50 percent and 6 thereby achieve the following processing 7 times for certain pathways to certif- 8 ication: no more than four weeks for 9 state-approved teacher preparation 10 programs, no more than six weeks for 11 applicants through reciprocity, no more 12 than eight weeks for individual evaluation 13 of credentials, and no more than eight 14 weeks for certificate progression (21710). 15 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,768,000 16 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 282,000 17 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 140,000 18 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 71,000 19 Travel (54000) .................................... 71,000 20 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,199,000 21 Equipment (56000) ................................. 71,000 22 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,690,000 23 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 213,000 24 -------------- 25 Program account subtotal .................. 11,505,000 26 -------------- 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 29 Teacher Education Accreditation Account - 22166 30 For services and expenses of teacher educa- 31 tion accreditation activities, pursuant to 32 section 212-c of the education law 33 (21710). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 50,000 35 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 22,000 36 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 2,000 37 Travel (54000) .................................... 40,000 38 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 73,000 39 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 26,000 40 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 10,000 41 -------------- 42 Program account subtotal ..................... 223,000 43 -------------- 44 OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES PROGRAM ....................... 64,196,000 45 -------------- 46 General Fund 143 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 State Purposes Account - 10050 2 For services and expenses related to the 3 office of management services program 4 (21744). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 10,624,000 6 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 114,000 7 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 114,000 8 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 187,000 9 Travel (54000) .................................... 95,000 10 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,950,000 11 Equipment (56000) ................................ 656,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal .................. 14,740,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other 16 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 17 Grants Account - 20115 18 For services and expenses related to the 19 administration of funds paid to the educa- 20 tion department from private foundations, 21 corporations and individuals and from 22 public or private funds received as 23 payment in lieu of honorarium for services 24 rendered by employees which are related to 25 such employees' official duties or respon- 26 sibilities. Provided further that, 27 notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 28 of law, funds appropriated herein may be 29 transferred to any other combined expenda- 30 ble trust fund, subject to the approval of 31 the director of the budget, as needed to 32 accomplish the intent of this appropri- 33 ation (21744). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 284,000 35 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 40,000 36 Travel (54000) ................................... 234,000 37 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,663,000 38 Equipment (56000) ................................ 141,000 39 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 124,000 40 -------------- 41 Program account subtotal ................... 2,486,000 42 -------------- 43 Special Revenue Funds - Other 44 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 45 Indirect Cost Recovery Account - 21978 144 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 administration of special revenue funds - 3 other and internal service funds and for 4 services provided to other state agencies, 5 governmental bodies and other entities 6 (21744). 7 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 12,672,000 8 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 224,000 9 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 447,000 10 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,070,000 11 Travel (54000) ................................... 123,000 12 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,962,000 13 Equipment (56000) ................................ 491,000 14 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 7,034,000 15 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 35,000 16 -------------- 17 Program account subtotal .................. 25,058,000 18 -------------- 19 Internal Service Funds 20 Agencies Internal Service Fund 21 Automation and Printing Chargeback Account - 55060 22 For services and expenses associated with 23 centralized electronic data processing and 24 printing (21744). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 10,644,000 26 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 175,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,505,000 28 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,832,000 29 Equipment (56000) ................................ 348,000 30 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 5,391,000 31 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 17,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal .................. 21,912,000 34 -------------- 35 OFFICE OF PREKINDERGARTEN THROUGH GRADE TWELVE EDUCATION 36 PROGRAM .................................................. 290,294,000 37 -------------- 38 General Fund 39 State Purposes Account - 10050 40 For services and expenses of the office of 41 prekindergarten through grade twelve 42 education program, including but not 43 limited to accountability activities 44 including but not limited to the develop- 45 ment of a school performance management 145 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 system that will streamline school 2 district reporting and increase fiscal and 3 programmatic transparency and accountabil- 4 ity, provided further that expenditures 5 for accountability activities shall be 6 pursuant to a plan developed by the 7 commissioner of education and approved by 8 the director of the budget (21700). 9 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 21,653,000 10 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 2,129,000 11 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 127,000 12 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 83,000 13 Travel (54000) ................................... 113,000 14 Contractual services (51000) .................. 10,292,000 15 Equipment (56000) ................................ 207,000 16 -------------- 17 Total amount available ...................... 34,604,000 18 -------------- 19 For the purpose of carrying out the 20 provisions of subdivision 51-a of section 21 305 of the education law and in order to 22 create and print more forms of state 23 standardized assessments in order to elim- 24 inate stand-alone multiple choice field 25 tests and release a significant amount of 26 test questions pursuant to a plan prepared 27 by the commissioner of education and 28 approved by the director of the budget 29 (55915). 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 8,400,000 31 -------------- 32 For services and expenses of the office of 33 family and community engagement (55928). 34 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 835,000 35 -------------- 36 For services and expenses of the state 37 office of religious and independent 38 schools (55929). 39 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,502,000 40 -------------- 41 For services and expenses of a fiscal 42 consultant for the Rochester City School 43 District. Such fiscal consultant shall be 146 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 appointed by, and serve at the pleasure 2 of, the Commissioner of Education (23378). 3 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 150,000 4 -------------- 5 For services and expenses of updates to the 6 New York State English as a second 7 language achievement test. 8 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,000,000 9 -------------- 10 For services and expenses to support the 11 development and implementation of the 12 translation of grades 3-8 English language 13 arts and math state assessments and the 14 regents examinations (23315). 15 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 500,000 16 -------------- 17 For services and expenses to create and 18 distribute educational materials and 19 resources focused on Indigenous cultures 20 and histories. 21 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 500,000 22 -------------- 23 For services and expenses of staff to 24 support the needs of students with dysle- 25 xia and dysgraphia. 26 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 250,000 27 -------------- 28 Program account subtotal .................. 50,741,000 29 -------------- 30 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 31 Federal Education Fund 32 Federal Department of Education Account - 25210 33 For the administration of grants for specif- 34 ic programs including, but not limited to, 35 grants for purposes under title I of the 36 elementary and secondary education act. 37 Provided further that, notwithstanding any 38 inconsistent provision of law, the commis- 39 sioner of education shall provide to the 40 director of the budget, the chairperson of 147 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 the senate finance committee and the 2 chairperson of the assembly ways and means 3 committee copies of any spending plans 4 and/or budgets submitted to the federal 5 government with respect to the use of any 6 funds appropriated by the federal govern- 7 ment including state grants administered 8 by the department. 9 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 10 of law, a portion of this appropriation 11 may be suballocated to other state depart- 12 ments and agencies, subject to the 13 approval of the director of the budget, as 14 needed to accomplish the intent of this 15 appropriation (23443). 16 Personal service (50000) ...................... 22,709,000 17 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 12,300,000 18 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 9,765,000 19 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 5,031,000 20 -------------- 21 Total amount available ...................... 49,805,000 22 -------------- 23 For the administration of grants for specif- 24 ic programs including, but not limited to, 25 supporting effective instruction pursuant 26 to title II of the elementary and second- 27 ary education act provided, however, that 28 a portion of the funds appropriated herein 29 shall be used to implement a plan to 30 improve educator effectiveness by (1) 31 requiring longer, more intensive and high 32 quality student-teaching experience in a 33 school setting as a prerequisite for 34 certification as a teacher and (2) creat- 35 ing standards for a teacher and principal 36 bar exam certification program that would 37 include a common set of professionally 38 rigorous assessments to ensure the best 39 prepared educators are entering the public 40 school system. Provided further that, 41 notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 42 of law, the commissioner of education 43 shall provide to the director of the budg- 44 et, the chairperson of the senate finance 45 committee and the chairperson of the 46 assembly ways and means committee copies 47 of any spending plans and/or budgets 48 submitted to the federal government with 49 respect to the use of any funds appropri- 50 ated by the federal government including 148 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 state grants administered by the depart- 2 ment. 3 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 4 of law, a portion of this appropriation 5 may be suballocated to other state depart- 6 ments and agencies, subject to the 7 approval of the director of the budget, as 8 needed to accomplish the intent of this 9 appropriation (23418). 10 Personal service (50000) ....................... 5,452,000 11 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 6,300,000 12 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,944,000 13 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 1,238,000 14 -------------- 15 Total amount available ...................... 14,934,000 16 -------------- 17 For the administration of grants for specif- 18 ic programs including, but not limited to, 19 the English language acquisition program 20 pursuant to title III of the elementary 21 and secondary education act. Provided 22 further that, notwithstanding any incon- 23 sistent provision of law, the commissioner 24 of education shall provide to the director 25 of the budget, the chairperson of the 26 senate finance committee and the chair- 27 person of the assembly ways and means 28 committee copies of any spending plans 29 and/or budgets submitted to the federal 30 government with respect to the use of any 31 funds appropriated by the federal govern- 32 ment including state grants administered 33 by the department. 34 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 35 of law, a portion of this appropriation 36 may be suballocated to other state depart- 37 ments and agencies, subject to the 38 approval of the director of the budget, as 39 needed to accomplish the intent of this 40 appropriation (23417). 41 Personal service (50000) ....................... 3,084,000 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,000,000 43 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,255,000 44 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 807,000 45 -------------- 46 Total amount available ....................... 7,146,000 47 -------------- 149 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For the administration of grants for specif- 2 ic programs including, but not limited to, 3 21st century community learning centers 4 and student support and academic enrich- 5 ment pursuant to title IV of the elementa- 6 ry and secondary education act. Provided 7 further that, notwithstanding any incon- 8 sistent provision of law, the commissioner 9 of education shall provide to the director 10 of the budget, the chairperson of the 11 senate finance committee and the chair- 12 person of the assembly ways and means 13 committee copies of any spending plans 14 and/or budgets submitted to the federal 15 government with respect to the use of any 16 funds appropriated by the federal govern- 17 ment including state grants administered 18 by the department. 19 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 20 of law, a portion of this appropriation 21 may be suballocated to other state depart- 22 ments and agencies, subject to the 23 approval of the director of the budget, as 24 needed to accomplish the intent of this 25 appropriation (23416). 26 Personal service (50000) ....................... 5,640,000 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 7,147,000 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 3,851,000 29 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 1,196,000 30 -------------- 31 Total amount available ...................... 17,834,000 32 -------------- 33 For the administration of grants for specif- 34 ic programs including, but not limited to, 35 public charter schools pursuant to title 36 IV of the elementary and secondary educa- 37 tion act. Provided further that, notwith- 38 standing any inconsistent provision of 39 law, the commissioner of education shall 40 provide to the director of the budget, the 41 chairperson of the senate finance commit- 42 tee and the chairperson of the assembly 43 ways and means committee copies of any 44 spending plans and/or budgets submitted to 45 the federal government with respect to the 46 use of any funds appropriated by the 47 federal government including state grants 48 administered by the department. 49 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 50 of law, a portion of this appropriation 150 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 may be suballocated to other state depart- 2 ments and agencies, subject to the 3 approval of the director of the budget, as 4 needed to accomplish the intent of this 5 appropriation (23415). 6 Personal service (50000) ....................... 1,551,000 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,870,000 8 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 543,000 9 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 325,000 10 -------------- 11 Total amount available ....................... 4,289,000 12 -------------- 13 For the administration of grants for specif- 14 ic programs including, but not limited to, 15 improving academic achievement, pursuant 16 to title I of the elementary and secondary 17 education act, and the rural education 18 initiative pursuant to title V of the 19 elementary and secondary education act. 20 Provided further that, notwithstanding any 21 inconsistent provision of law, the commis- 22 sioner of education shall provide to the 23 director of the budget, the chairperson of 24 the senate finance committee and the 25 chairperson of the assembly ways and means 26 committee copies of any spending plans 27 and/or budgets submitted to the federal 28 government with respect to the use of any 29 funds appropriated by the federal govern- 30 ment including state grants administered 31 by the department. 32 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 33 of law, a portion of this appropriation 34 may be suballocated to other state depart- 35 ments and agencies, subject to the 36 approval of the director of the budget, as 37 needed to accomplish the intent of this 38 appropriation (23414). 39 Personal service (50000) ....................... 8,015,000 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 13,500,000 41 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 4,164,000 42 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 1,380,000 43 -------------- 44 Total amount available ...................... 27,059,000 45 -------------- 46 For the administration of grants for specif- 47 ic programs including, but not limited to, 48 homeless education pursuant to title VII 151 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 of the McKinney-Vento homeless assistance 2 act. 3 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 4 of law, a portion of this appropriation 5 may be suballocated to other state depart- 6 ments and agencies, subject to the 7 approval of the director of the budget, as 8 needed to accomplish the intent of this 9 appropriation (23413). 10 Personal service (50000) ......................... 600,000 11 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 900,000 12 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 380,000 13 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 120,000 14 -------------- 15 Total amount available ....................... 2,000,000 16 -------------- 17 For the administration of grants for specif- 18 ic programs including, but not limited to, 19 the Carl D. Perkins vocational and applied 20 technology education act (VTEA). 21 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 22 of law, a portion of this appropriation 23 may be suballocated to other state depart- 24 ments and agencies, subject to the 25 approval of the director of the budget, as 26 needed to accomplish the intent of this 27 appropriation (23477). 28 Personal service (50000) ....................... 5,094,000 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 4,000,000 30 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 2,061,000 31 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 1,008,000 32 -------------- 33 Total amount available ...................... 12,163,000 34 -------------- 35 For the administration of various grants. 36 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 37 of law, a portion of this appropriation 38 may be suballocated to other state depart- 39 ments and agencies, subject to the 40 approval of the director of the budget, as 41 needed to accomplish the intent of this 42 appropriation (21809). 43 Personal service (50000) ....................... 3,000,000 44 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 4,589,000 45 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,500,000 46 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 750,000 47 -------------- 152 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Total amount available ....................... 9,839,000 2 -------------- 3 For services and expenses for school-age 4 children and preschool-age children pursu- 5 ant to the individuals with disabilities 6 education act of 1991. Notwithstanding any 7 inconsistent provision of law, a portion 8 of this appropriation may be suballocated 9 to other state departments and agencies, 10 as needed to accomplish the intent of this 11 appropriation (21737). 12 Personal service (50000) ...................... 23,400,000 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 18,700,000 14 Fringe benefits (60090) ....................... 12,600,000 15 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 7,000,000 16 -------------- 17 Total amount available ...................... 61,700,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ................. 206,769,000 20 -------------- 21 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 22 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 23 Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25122 24 For the administration of federal grants for 25 health education including HIV/AIDS educa- 26 tion. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 27 provision of law, a portion of this appro- 28 priation, subject to the approval of the 29 director of the budget, may be suballo- 30 cated to other state departments and agen- 31 cies, as needed to accomplish the intent 32 of this appropriation (21742). 33 Personal service (50000) ......................... 508,000 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 450,000 35 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 375,000 36 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 201,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ................... 1,534,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 41 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 42 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25026 43 For administration of programs funded 44 through the national school lunch act. 153 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 2 of law, a portion of this appropriation, 3 subject to the approval of the director of 4 the budget, may be suballocated to other 5 state departments and agencies, as needed 6 to accomplish the intent of this appropri- 7 ation (21703). 8 Personal service (50000) ....................... 9,200,000 9 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 12,500,000 10 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 5,100,000 11 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 4,300,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal .................. 31,100,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other 16 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 17 Miscellaneous United States Department of Education 18 Contracts Account - 22153 19 For services and expenses of miscellaneous 20 United States department of education 21 contracts (21700). 22 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 150,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal ..................... 150,000 25 -------------- 26 SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND PROGRAM ................................ 11,738,000 27 -------------- 28 Special Revenue Funds - Other 29 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 30 Expendable Trust Account - 20151 31 For services and expenses in fulfillment of 32 donor bequests and gifts (21828). 33 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 28,400 34 Travel (54000) ..................................... 1,000 35 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 18,600 36 Equipment (56000) .................................. 2,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other 41 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 42 Batavia School for the Blind Account - 22032 154 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 operation of the school for the blind 3 (21828). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 5,992,000 5 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 576,000 6 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 31,000 7 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 571,000 8 Travel (54000) ..................................... 7,000 9 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 815,000 10 Equipment (56000) ................................. 17,000 11 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 3,499,000 12 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 180,000 13 -------------- 14 Program account subtotal .................. 11,688,000 15 -------------- 16 SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF PROGRAM ................................. 10,497,000 17 -------------- 18 Special Revenue Funds - Other 19 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 20 Expendable Trust Account - 20152 21 For services and expenses in fulfillment of 22 donor bequests and gifts (21829). 23 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 24 Travel (54000) ..................................... 1,000 25 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 15,000 26 Equipment (56000) .................................. 3,000 27 -------------- 28 Program account subtotal ...................... 20,000 29 -------------- 30 Special Revenue Funds - Other 31 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 32 Rome School for the Deaf Account - 22053 33 For services and expenses related to the 34 operation of the school for the deaf 35 (21829). 36 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 5,392,000 37 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 557,000 38 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 25,000 39 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 537,000 40 Travel (54000) ..................................... 8,000 41 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 583,000 42 Equipment (56000) ................................. 43,000 155 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 3,170,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 162,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal .................. 10,477,000 5 -------------- 156 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADULT CAREER AND CONTINUING EDUCATION SERVICES PROGRAM 2 General Fund 3 State Purposes Account - 10050 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For services and expenses related to the administration of the high 6 school equivalency diploma exam (21852). 7 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 669,000 .......... (re. $50,000) 8 Temporary service (50200) ... 53,000 ................... (re. $53,000) 9 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 33,000 .............. (re. $29,000) 10 Travel (54000) ... 5,000 ................................ (re. $5,000) 11 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,587,000 .......... (re. $3,587,000) 12 Equipment (56000) ... 21,000 ........................... (re. $21,000) 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 14 For services and expenses related to the administration of the high 15 school equivalency diploma exam (21852). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 662,000 ........... (re. $195,000) 17 Temporary service (50200) ... 53,000 ..................... (re. $53,000) 18 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 33,000 ................ (re. $31,000) 19 Travel (54000) ... 5,000 .................................. (re. $5,000) 20 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,587,000 ............ (re. $2,494,000) 21 Equipment (56000) ... 21,000 ............................. (re. $21,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 23 For services and expenses related to the administration of the high 24 school equivalency diploma exam (21852). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 632,000 ......... (re. $247,000) 26 Temporary service (50200) ... 53,000 ................... (re. $53,000) 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 33,000 .............. (re. $26,000) 28 Travel (54000) ... 5,000 ................................ (re. $3,000) 29 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,587,000 .......... (re. $1,108,000) 30 Equipment (56000) ... 21,000 ........................... (re. $21,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 32 For services and expenses related to the administration of the high 33 school equivalency diploma exam (21852). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 614,000 ......... (re. $178,000) 35 Temporary service (50200) ... 53,000 ................... (re. $53,000) 36 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 33,000 .............. (re. $27,000) 37 Travel (54000) ... 5,000 ................................ (re. $5,000) 38 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,480,000 .......... (re. $2,326,000) 39 Equipment (56000) ... 21,000 ........................... (re. $21,000) 40 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 41 Federal Education Fund 42 Federal Department of Education Account - 25210 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 44 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 45 not limited to, vocational rehabilitation and supported employment. 157 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 2 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 3 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 4 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21713). 5 Personal service (50000) ... 63,436,525 ............ (re. $63,436,000) 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 14,949,492 ......... (re. $14,949,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 32,661,287 ............. (re. $32,661,000) 8 Indirect costs (58850) ... 17,093,176 .............. (re. $17,093,000) 9 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 10 not limited to, independent living centers. 11 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 12 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 13 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 14 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21856). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 300,000 .................. (re. $300,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 500,000 ............... (re. $500,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 161,520 ................... (re. $161,000) 18 Indirect costs (58850) ... 9,000 ........................ (re. $9,000) 19 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 20 not limited to, in service training. 21 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 22 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 23 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 24 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21859). 25 Personal service (50000) ... 120,000 .................. (re. $120,000) 26 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 428,040 ............... (re. $428,000) 27 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 60,972 ..................... (re. $60,000) 28 Indirect costs (58850) ... 32,988 ...................... (re. $32,000) 29 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 30 not limited to, the workforce investment act. 31 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 32 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 33 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 34 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21734). 35 Personal service (50000) ... 2,801,000 .............. (re. $2,801,000) 36 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,253,023 ........... (re. $3,253,000) 37 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,434,524 ............... (re. $1,434,000) 38 Indirect costs (58850) ... 754,453 .................... (re. $754,000) 39 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 40 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 41 not limited to, vocational rehabilitation and supported employment. 42 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 43 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 44 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 45 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21713). 46 Personal service (50000) ... 61,233,525 ............ (re. $22,543,000) 47 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 14,949,492 ......... (re. $10,245,000) 48 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 31,219,287 .............. (re. $5,727,000) 49 Indirect costs (58850) ... 16,749,176 .............. (re. $10,436,000) 50 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 51 not limited to, independent living centers. 158 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 2 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 3 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 4 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21856). 5 Personal service (50000) ... 300,000 .................. (re. $300,000) 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 500,000 ............... (re. $500,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 161,520 ................... (re. $161,000) 8 Indirect costs (58850) ... 9,000 ........................ (re. $9,000) 9 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 10 not limited to, in service training. 11 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 12 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 13 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 14 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21859). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 120,000 .................. (re. $120,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 428,040 ............... (re. $428,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 60,972 ..................... (re. $60,000) 18 Indirect costs (58850) ... 32,988 ...................... (re. $32,000) 19 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 20 not limited to, the workforce investment act. 21 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 22 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 23 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 24 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21734). 25 Personal service (50000) ... 2,752,000 .............. (re. $2,482,000) 26 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,253,023 ........... (re. $1,563,000) 27 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,402,524 ............... (re. $1,231,000) 28 Indirect costs (58850) ... 750,453 .................... (re. $729,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 30 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 31 not limited to, vocational rehabilitation and supported employment. 32 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 33 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 34 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 35 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21713). 36 Personal service (50000) ... 60,384,525 ............ (re. $11,495,000) 37 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 14,949,492 .......... (re. $9,975,000) 38 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 30,672,287 .............. (re. $8,201,000) 39 Indirect costs (58850) ... 16,673,176 ................. (re. $734,000) 40 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 41 not limited to, independent living centers. 42 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 43 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 44 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 45 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21856). 46 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 500,000 ............... (re. $305,000) 47 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 161,520 ................... (re. $161,000) 48 Indirect costs (58850) ... 9,000 ........................ (re. $9,000) 49 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 50 not limited to, in service training. 159 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 2 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 3 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 4 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21859). 5 Personal service (50000) ... 120,000 .................. (re. $120,000) 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 428,040 ............... (re. $428,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 60,972 ..................... (re. $60,000) 8 Indirect costs (58850) ... 32,988 ...................... (re. $32,000) 9 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 10 not limited to, the workforce investment act. 11 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 12 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 13 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 14 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21734). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 2,719,000 .............. (re. $1,782,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,253,023 .............. (re. $62,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,381,524 ................. (re. $110,000) 18 Indirect costs (58850) ... 747,453 .................... (re. $665,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 20 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 21 not limited to, vocational rehabilitation and supported employment. 22 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 23 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 24 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 25 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21713). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 60,384,525 ............ (re. $17,040,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 14,949,492 .......... (re. $3,149,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 30,672,287 .............. (re. $3,151,000) 29 Indirect costs (58850) ... 16,673,176 ............... (re. $5,036,000) 30 Special Revenue Funds - Other 31 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 32 VESID Social Security Account - 22001 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 34 For expenses of contractual services for the rehabilitation of social 35 security disability beneficiaries (21852). 36 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,243,000 ..... (re. $4,243,000) 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 35,000 .............. (re. $35,000) 38 Travel (54000) ... 2,000 ................................ (re. $2,000) 39 Contractual services (51000) ... 263,000 .............. (re. $263,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,834,000 ............... (re. $2,834,000) 41 Indirect costs (58800) ... 623,000 .................... (re. $623,000) 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 43 For expenses of contractual services for the rehabilitation of social 44 security disability beneficiaries (21852). 45 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 3,000,000 ..... (re. $1,828,000) 46 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 35,000 .............. (re. $35,000) 47 Travel (54000) ... 2,000 ................................ (re. $2,000) 48 Contractual services (51000) ... 263,000 .............. (re. $263,000) 160 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,000,000 ............... (re. $1,215,000) 2 Indirect costs (58800) ... 584,000 .................... (re. $552,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 4 For expenses of contractual services for the rehabilitation of social 5 security disability beneficiaries (21852). 6 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 3,000,000 ....... (re. $926,000) 7 Contractual services (51000) ... 263,000 .............. (re. $263,000) 8 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,000,000 ................. (re. $611,000) 9 Indirect costs (58800) ... 584,000 .................... (re. $520,000) 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 11 For expenses of contractual services for the rehabilitation of social 12 security disability beneficiaries (21852). 13 Contractual services (51000) ... 262,659 .............. (re. $131,000) 14 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 327,866 .................... (re. $46,000) 15 Indirect costs (58800) ... 59,475 ...................... (re. $59,000) 16 CULTURAL EDUCATION PROGRAM 17 General Fund 18 State Purposes Account - 10050 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 20 For services and expenses of the summer school of the arts. Notwith- 21 standing any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this appro- 22 priation may be suballocated to other state departments and agen- 23 cies, as needed, to accomplish the intent of this appropriation 24 (21711). 25 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,200,000 .......... (re. $1,005,000) 26 For services and expenses of the New York online virtual electronic 27 library (NOVELny) (57008). 28 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,000,000 ............. (re. $44,000) 29 For services and expenses of implementation of the unmarked burial 30 site protection act (57009). 31 Contractual services (51000) ... 275,000 .............. (re. $275,000) 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 33 For services and expenses of the summer school of the arts. Notwith- 34 standing any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this appro- 35 priation may be suballocated to other state departments and agen- 36 cies, as needed, to accomplish the intent of this appropriation 37 (23392). 38 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 ............ (re. $594,000) 39 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 40 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 41 Federal Operating Grants Account - 25456 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 43 For administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal laws 44 including funds from the national endowment of humanities, the 161 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 institute of museum and library services, the United States geologi- 2 cal survey, the United States department of energy, and the United 3 States department of the interior. 4 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 5 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 6 agencies or transferred to any other federal fund, subject to the 7 approval of the director of the budget, as needed to accomplish the 8 intent of this appropriation (21739). 9 Personal service (50000) ... 3,169,000 .............. (re. $2,958,000) 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,995,000 ........... (re. $2,844,000) 11 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,103,000 ................. (re. $969,000) 12 Indirect costs (58850) ... 512,000 .................... (re. $496,000) 13 For the administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal 14 laws including the library services technology act (LSTA). 15 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 16 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 17 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 18 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21851). 19 Personal service (50000) ... 3,843,000 .............. (re. $3,843,000) 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,250,000 ........... (re. $1,250,000) 21 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,278,000 ............... (re. $2,278,000) 22 Indirect costs (58850) ... 723,000 .................... (re. $723,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 24 For administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal laws 25 including funds from the national endowment of humanities, the 26 institute of museum and library services, the United States geologi- 27 cal survey, the United States department of energy, and the United 28 States department of the interior. 29 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 30 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 31 agencies or transferred to any other federal fund, subject to the 32 approval of the director of the budget, as needed to accomplish the 33 intent of this appropriation (21739). 34 Personal service (50000) ... 3,157,000 .............. (re. $3,005,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,995,000 ........... (re. $2,885,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,095,000 ................. (re. $998,000) 37 Indirect costs (58850) ... 511,000 .................... (re. $497,000) 38 For the administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal 39 laws including the library services technology act (LSTA). 40 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 41 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 42 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 43 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21851). 44 Personal service (50000) ... 3,668,000 ................ (re. $426,000) 45 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,250,000 ............. (re. $944,000) 46 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,163,000 ................. (re. $167,000) 47 Indirect costs (58850) ... 709,000 .................... (re. $179,000) 48 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 49 For administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal laws 50 including funds from the national endowment of humanities, the 162 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 institute of museum and library services, the United States geologi- 2 cal survey, the United States department of energy, and the United 3 States department of the interior. 4 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 5 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 6 agencies or transferred to any other federal fund, subject to the 7 approval of the director of the budget, as needed to accomplish the 8 intent of this appropriation (21739). 9 Personal service (50000) ... 3,157,000 .............. (re. $2,954,000) 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,995,000 ........... (re. $2,687,000) 11 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,095,000 ................. (re. $984,000) 12 Indirect costs (58850) ... 511,000 .................... (re. $497,000) 13 For the administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal 14 laws including the library services technology act (LSTA). 15 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 16 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 17 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 18 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21851). 19 Personal service (50000) ... 3,570,000 ................. (re. $65,000) 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,250,000 ............. (re. $559,000) 21 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,100,000 ................. (re. $180,000) 22 Indirect costs (58850) ... 700,000 .................... (re. $558,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 24 For administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal laws 25 including funds from the national endowment of humanities, the 26 institute of museum and library services, the United States geologi- 27 cal survey, the United States department of energy, and the United 28 States department of the interior. 29 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 30 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 31 agencies or transferred to any other federal fund, subject to the 32 approval of the director of the budget, as needed to accomplish the 33 intent of this appropriation (21739). 34 Personal service (50000) ... 3,157,000 .............. (re. $3,013,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,995,000 ........... (re. $2,866,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,095,000 ............... (re. $1,032,000) 37 Indirect costs (58850) ... 511,000 ..................... (re. $51,000) 38 For the administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal 39 laws including: the library services technology act (LSTA). 40 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 41 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 42 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 43 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21851). 44 Personal service (50000) ... 3,570,000 ................ (re. $150,000) 45 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,250,000 .............. (re. $49,000) 46 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,100,000 ................. (re. $344,000) 47 Indirect costs (58850) ... 700,000 .................... (re. $478,000) 48 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 49 For administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal laws 50 including funds from the national endowment of humanities, the 163 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 institute of museum and library services, the United States geologi- 2 cal survey, the United States department of energy, and the United 3 States department of the interior. 4 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 5 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 6 agencies or transferred to any other federal fund, subject to the 7 approval of the director of the budget, as needed to accomplish the 8 intent of this appropriation (21739). 9 Personal service (50000) ... 3,157,000 .............. (re. $3,059,000) 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,995,000 ........... (re. $2,603,000) 11 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,095,000 ............... (re. $1,038,000) 12 Indirect costs (58850) ... 511,000 .................... (re. $504,000) 13 For the administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal 14 laws including: the library services technology act (LSTA). 15 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 16 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 17 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 18 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21851). 19 Personal service (50000) ... 3,570,000 ................ (re. $526,000) 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,250,000 ............. (re. $155,000) 21 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,100,000 ................. (re. $644,000) 22 Indirect costs (58850) ... 700,000 .................... (re. $402,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 24 For the administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal 25 laws including: the library services technology act (LSTA). 26 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 27 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 28 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 29 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21851). 30 Personal service (50000) ... 3,570,000 ................ (re. $705,000) 31 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,250,000 ............. (re. $361,000) 32 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,100,000 ................. (re. $455,000) 33 Indirect costs (58850) ... 700,000 .................... (re. $580,000) 34 OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION AND THE PROFESSIONS PROGRAM 35 General Fund 36 State Purposes Account - 10050 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 38 For services and expenses of the office of higher education and the 39 professions program, including up to $5,700,000 for services and 40 expenses related to tenured teacher hearings pursuant to sections 41 3020-a and 3020-b of the education law (21710). 42 Travel (54000) ... 152,000 ............................ (re. $142,000) 43 Contractual services (51000) ... 5,619,000 .......... (re. $2,604,000) 44 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 45 Federal Education Fund 46 Federal Department of Education Account - 25210 164 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 2 For administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal laws 3 including the Carl D. Perkins vocational and applied technology 4 education act (VTEA). 5 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 6 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 7 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 8 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21710). 9 Personal service (50000) ... 288,000 .................. (re. $190,000) 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 50,000 ................. (re. $50,000) 11 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 128,000 .................... (re. $66,000) 12 Indirect costs (58850) ... 56,000 ...................... (re. $48,000) 13 For administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal laws 14 including, but not limited to, title II supporting effective 15 instruction. Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent 16 provision of law, the commissioner of education shall provide to the 17 director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance 18 committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means commit- 19 tee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the 20 federal government with respect to the use of any funds appropriated 21 by the federal government including state grants administered by the 22 department. 23 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 24 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 25 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 26 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23419). 27 Personal service (50000) ... 731,000 .................. (re. $731,000) 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 78,000 ................. (re. $78,000) 29 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 286,000 ................... (re. $286,000) 30 Indirect costs (58850) ... 176,000 .................... (re. $176,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 32 For administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal laws 33 including the Carl D. Perkins vocational and applied technology 34 education act (VTEA). 35 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 36 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 37 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 38 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21710). 39 Personal service (50000) ... 275,000 ................... (re. $52,000) 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 50,000 ................. (re. $23,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 120,000 .................... (re. $15,000) 42 Indirect costs (58850) ... 55,000 ...................... (re. $15,000) 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 44 For administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal laws 45 including the Carl D. Perkins vocational and applied technology 46 education act (VTEA). 47 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 48 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 49 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 50 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21710). 165 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ... 275,000 ................... (re. $22,000) 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 50,000 ................. (re. $49,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 120,000 .................... (re. $24,000) 4 Indirect costs (58850) ... 55,000 ....................... (re. $3,000) 5 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 6 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 7 Federal Operating Grants Account - 25456 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 9 For administration of federal grants pursuant to various federal laws 10 including the national community service act and the transition to 11 teaching program (21710). 12 Personal service (50000) ... 387,000 .................. (re. $387,000) 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 549,000 ............... (re. $549,000) 14 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 156,000 ................... (re. $156,000) 15 Indirect costs (58850) ... 89,000 ...................... (re. $89,000) 16 Special Revenue Funds - Other 17 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 18 Office of Professions Account - 22051 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 20 For services and expenses related to licensure and disciplining 21 programs for the professions, and foreign and out-of-state medical 22 school evaluations (21710). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 28,757,000 .... (re. $5,937,000) 24 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 700,000 ............ (re. $571,000) 25 Travel (54000) ... 300,000 ............................ (re. $198,000) 26 Contractual services (51000) ... 10,695,000 ......... (re. $6,915,000) 27 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 ......................... (re. $100,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 18,560,000 .............. (re. $3,476,000) 29 Indirect costs (58800) ... 842,000 .................... (re. $221,000) 30 Special Revenue Funds - Other 31 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 32 Teacher Certification Program Account - 21969 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 34 For services and expenses related to the administration of the teacher 35 certification program, including up to $2,650,000 for the third year 36 of a TEACH system modernization project in order to reduce process- 37 ing times upon completion of such project by at least 50 percent and 38 thereby achieve the following processing times for certain pathways 39 to certification: no more than four weeks for state-approved teacher 40 preparation programs, no more than six weeks for applicants through 41 reciprocity, no more than eight weeks for individual evaluation of 42 credentials, and no more than eight weeks for certificate progres- 43 sion (21710). 44 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,599,000 .......... (re. $4,416,000) 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 166 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the administration of the teacher 2 certification program, including up to $1,750,000 for the second 3 year of a TEACH system modernization project in order to reduce 4 processing times upon completion of such project by at least 50 5 percent and thereby achieve the following processing times for 6 certain pathways to certification: no more than four weeks for 7 state-approved teacher preparation programs, no more than six weeks 8 for applicants through reciprocity, no more than eight weeks for 9 individual evaluation of credentials, and no more than eight weeks 10 for certificate progression (21710). 11 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,699,000 .......... (re. $2,546,000) 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 13 For services and expenses related to the administration of the teacher 14 certification program, including up to $1,350,000 for the first year 15 of a TEACH system modernization project in order to reduce process- 16 ing times upon completion of such project by at least 50 percent and 17 thereby achieve the following processing times for certain pathways 18 to certification: no more than four weeks for state-approved teacher 19 preparation programs, no more than six weeks for applicants through 20 reciprocity, no more than eight weeks for individual evaluation of 21 credentials, and no more than eight weeks for certificate progres- 22 sion (21710). 23 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,299,000 .......... (re. $2,360,000) 24 OFFICE OF MANAGEMENT SERVICES PROGRAM 25 Special Revenue Funds - Other 26 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 27 Indirect Cost Recovery Account - 21978 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 29 For services and expenses related to the administration of special 30 revenue funds - other and internal service funds and for services 31 provided to other state agencies, governmental bodies and other 32 entities (21744). 33 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,962,000 ............ (re. $967,000) 34 OFFICE OF PREKINDERGARTEN THROUGH GRADE TWELVE EDUCATION PROGRAM 35 General Fund 36 State Purposes Account - 10050 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 38 For services and expenses of the office of prekindergarten through 39 grade twelve education program, including but not limited to 40 accountability activities including but not limited to the develop- 41 ment of a school performance management system that will streamline 42 school district reporting and increase fiscal and programmatic tran- 43 sparency and accountability, provided further that expenditures for 44 accountability activities shall be pursuant to a plan developed by 167 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 the commissioner of education and approved by the director of the 2 budget (21700). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 21,653,000 .... (re. $9,725,000) 4 Temporary service (50200) ... 2,129,000 ............... (re. $243,000) 5 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 127,000 ...... (re. $33,000) 6 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 83,000 .............. (re. $83,000) 7 Travel (54000) ... 113,000 ............................ (re. $113,000) 8 Contractual services (51000) ... 10,292,000 ......... (re. $5,261,000) 9 Equipment (56000) ... 207,000 ......................... (re. $207,000) 10 For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of subdivision 51-a of 11 section 305 of the education law and in order to create and print 12 more forms of state standardized assessments in order to eliminate 13 stand-alone multiple choice field tests and release a significant 14 amount of test questions pursuant to a plan prepared by the commis- 15 sioner of education and approved by the director of the budget 16 (55915). 17 Contractual services (51000) ... 8,400,000 .......... (re. $8,400,000) 18 For services and expenses of the office of family and community 19 engagement (55928). 20 Contractual services (51000) ... 835,000 ............... (re. $35,000) 21 For services and expenses of the state office of religious and inde- 22 pendent schools (55929). 23 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,502,000 ............ (re. $197,000) 24 For services and expenses of a comprehensive study of alternative 25 tuition rate-setting methodologies for approved providers operating 26 school-age programs receiving funding under Article 81 and/or Arti- 27 cle 89 of the Education Law and providers operating approved 28 preschool special education programs under Section 4410 of the 29 Education Law, subject to a plan developed by the commissioner of 30 education and approved by the director of the budget. 31 Provided that such study shall consider stakeholder feedback and 32 include, but not be limited to, a comparative analysis of other New 33 York State agencies' rate-setting methodologies, including the rate- 34 setting methodology utilized by the Office of Children and Family 35 Services for private residential school programs; options and recom- 36 mendations for an alternative rate-setting methodology or methodol- 37 ogies; cost estimates for such alternative methodologies; and an 38 analysis of current provider tuition rates compared to tuition rates 39 that would be established under such alternative methodologies. 40 At a minimum, any recommended alternative rate-setting methodology or 41 methodologies proposed for such preschool and school-age programs 42 shall: (1) be fiscally sustainable for such programs, school 43 districts, counties, and the state; (2) substantially restrict or 44 eliminate tuition rate appeals; (3) establish predictable tuition 45 rates that are calculated based on standardized parameters and 46 criteria, including, but not limited to, defined program and staff- 47 ing models, regional costs, and minimum required enrollment levels 48 as a percentage of program operating capacities; (4) include a sche- 49 dule to phase in new tuition rates in accordance with the recom- 50 mended methodology or methodologies; and (5) ensure tuition rates 51 for all programs can be calculated no later than the beginning of 52 each school year. 168 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Adoption of any such alternative rate-setting methodologies shall be 2 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (23388). 3 Temporary service (50200) ... 740,000 ................. (re. $740,000) 4 Contractual services (51000) ... 630,000 .............. (re. $630,000) 5 For services and expenses of a fiscal consultant for the Rochester 6 City School District. Such fiscal consultant shall be appointed by, 7 and serve at the pleasure of, the Commissioner of Education (23378). 8 Contractual services (51000) ... 150,000 .............. (re. $150,000) 9 For services and expenses related to American rescue plan act grants 10 administration (57032). 11 Contractual services (51000) ... 865,000 .............. (re. $865,000) 12 For services and expenses of updates to the New York State English as 13 a second language achievement test (57033). 14 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,000,000 .......... (re. $4,000,000) 15 For services and expenses to support the development and implementa- 16 tion of the translation of grades 3-8 English language arts and math 17 state assessments and the regents examinations (23315). 18 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $500,000) 19 For services and expenses to establish a dyslexia and dysgraphia task 20 force. 21 Contractual services (51000) ... 150,000 .............. (re. $150,000) 22 For services and expenses associated with the enhancement and creation 23 of educational materials and resources for teaching about the Holo- 24 caust. 25 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $500,000) 26 For services and expenses to establish educational materials and 27 resources for teaching students about financial literacy. 28 Contractual services (51000) ... 400,000 .............. (re. $400,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 50, 30 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 31 For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of subdivision 51-a of 32 section 305 of the education law and in order to create and print 33 more forms of state standardized assessments in order to eliminate 34 stand-alone multiple choice field tests and release a significant 35 amount of test questions pursuant to a plan prepared by the commis- 36 sioner of education and approved by the director of the budget 37 (55915). 38 Contractual services (51000) ... 8,400,000 .......... (re. $2,208,000) 39 For services and expenses of the office of family and community 40 engagement (55928). 41 Contractual services (51000) ... 808,000 ................ (re. $8,000) 42 For services and expenses of the state office of religious and inde- 43 pendent schools (55929). 44 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,461,000 ............. (re. $31,000) 45 For services and expenses of a comprehensive study of alternative 46 tuition rate-setting methodologies for approved providers operating 47 school-age programs receiving funding under Article 81 and/or Arti- 48 cle 89 of the Education Law and providers operating approved 49 preschool special education programs under Section 4410 of the 50 Education Law, subject to a plan developed by the commissioner of 51 education and approved by the director of the budget. 169 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Provided that such study shall consider stakeholder feedback and 2 include, but not be limited to, a comparative analysis of other New 3 York State agencies' rate-setting methodologies, including the rate- 4 setting methodology utilized by the Office of Children and Family 5 Services for private residential school programs; options and recom- 6 mendations for an alternative rate-setting methodology or methodol- 7 ogies; cost estimates for such alternative methodologies; and an 8 analysis of current provider tuition rates compared to tuition rates 9 that would be established under such alternative methodologies. 10 At a minimum, any recommended alternative rate-setting methodology or 11 methodologies proposed for such preschool and school-age programs 12 shall: (1) be fiscally sustainable for such programs, school 13 districts, counties, and the state; (2) substantially restrict or 14 eliminate tuition rate appeals; (3) establish predictable tuition 15 rates that are calculated based on standardized parameters and 16 criteria, including, but not limited to, defined program and staff- 17 ing models, regional costs, and minimum required enrollment levels 18 as a percentage of program operating capacities; (4) include a sche- 19 dule to phase in new tuition rates in accordance with the recom- 20 mended methodology or methodologies; and (5) ensure tuition rates 21 for all programs can be calculated no later than the beginning of 22 each school year. 23 Adoption of any such alternative rate-setting methodologies shall be 24 subject to the approval of the director of the budget (23388). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 988,000 ......... (re. $697,000) 26 Travel (54000) ... 20,000 .............................. (re. $18,000) 27 Contractual services (51000) ......................................... 28 1,492,000 ......................................... (re. $1,492,000) 29 For services and expenses of a fiscal consultant for the Rochester 30 City School District (23378). 31 Contractual services (51000) ... 150,000 ............... (re. $48,000) 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 33 For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of subdivision 51-a of 34 section 305 of the education law and in order to create and print 35 more forms of state standardized assessments in order to eliminate 36 stand-alone multiple choice field tests and release a significant 37 amount of test questions pursuant to a plan prepared by the commis- 38 sioner of education and approved by the director of the budget 39 (55915). 40 Contractual services (51000) ... 8,400,000 .......... (re. $6,381,000) 41 For services and expenses of the office of family and community 42 engagement (55928). 43 Contractual services (51000) ... 800,000 .............. (re. $800,000) 44 For services and expenses of the state office of religious and inde- 45 pendent schools (55929). 46 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,457,000 ............ (re. $537,000) 47 For services and expenses of a fiscal consultant for the Rochester 48 City School District (23378). 49 Contractual services (51000) ... 150,000 ............... (re. $50,000) 50 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 170 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of the Office of Family and Community 2 Engagement (55928) ... 800,000 ...................... (re. $138,000) 3 For services and expenses of the state office of religious and inde- 4 pendent schools (55929) ... 800,000 ................... (re. $4,000) 5 For continued support of state monitors appointed by the commissioner 6 of education (55931) ... 225,000 .................... (re. $224,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 8 For services and expenses of the Office of Family and Community 9 Engagement ... 800,000 ............................... (re. $30,000) 10 For services and expenses of the state office of religious and inde- 11 pendent schools (55929) ... 800,000 ................. (re. $151,000) 12 For continued support of state monitors appointed by the commissioner 13 of education (55931) ... 225,000 .................... (re. $220,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 50, 15 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 16 For continued support of state monitors appointed by the commissioner 17 of education (55931) ... 225,000 .................... (re. $217,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 19 For continued support of state monitors appointed by the commissioner 20 of education ... 225,000 ............................ (re. $217,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 50, 22 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 23 For service and expenses of professional development for teachers and 24 principals to help improve the quality of instruction across the 25 state (55930). 26 Contractual services (51000) ... 833,000 .............. (re. $114,000) 27 Travel ... 167,000 ..................................... (re. $85,000) 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 50, 29 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 30 For additional services and expenses related to implementing section 31 3012-d of the education law, pursuant to a plan approved by the 32 director of the budget. Funds appropriated herein may be used to 33 acquire the services of experts including educators, testing 34 experts, psychometricians and economists to support the design of 35 additional state measures, the development of growth models and all 36 other aspects of the teacher and principal evaluation system (55901) 37 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 89,000 ........... (re. $89,000) 38 Travel (54000) ... 52,000 .............................. (re. $45,000) 39 Contractual services (51000) ... 574,000 .............. (re. $238,000) 40 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 29,000 .............. (re. $19,000) 41 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 42 Federal Education Fund 43 Federal Department of Education Account - 25210 44 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 171 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 2 not limited to, grants for purposes under title I of the elementary 3 and secondary education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding 4 any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of education 5 shall provide to the director of the budget, the chairperson of the 6 senate finance committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways 7 and means committee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets 8 submitted to the federal government with respect to the use of any 9 funds appropriated by the federal government including state grants 10 administered by the department. 11 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 12 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 13 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 14 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23443). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 22,709,000 ............ (re. $20,012,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,300,000 ......... (re. $10,524,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 9,765,000 ............... (re. $8,669,000) 18 Indirect costs (58850) ... 5,031,000 ................ (re. $4,842,000) 19 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 20 not limited to, supporting effective instruction pursuant to title 21 II of the elementary and secondary education act provided, however, 22 that a portion of the funds appropriated herein shall be used to 23 implement a plan to improve educator effectiveness by (1) requiring 24 longer, more intensive and high quality student-teaching experience 25 in a school setting as a prerequisite for certification as a teacher 26 and (2) creating standards for a teacher and principal bar exam 27 certification program that would include a common set of profes- 28 sionally rigorous assessments to ensure the best prepared educators 29 are entering the public school system. Provided further that, 30 notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner 31 of education shall provide to the director of the budget, the chair- 32 person of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of the 33 assembly ways and means committee copies of any spending plans 34 and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with respect to 35 the use of any funds appropriated by the federal government includ- 36 ing state grants administered by the department. 37 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 38 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 39 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 40 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23418). 41 Personal service (50000) ... 5,452,000 .............. (re. $4,429,000) 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,300,000 ........... (re. $6,224,000) 43 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,944,000 ............... (re. $1,539,000) 44 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,238,000 ................ (re. $1,188,000) 45 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 46 not limited to, the English language acquisition program pursuant to 47 title III of the elementary and secondary education act. Provided 48 further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the 49 commissioner of education shall provide to the director of the budg- 50 et, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and the chair- 51 person of the assembly ways and means committee copies of any spend- 52 ing plans and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with 172 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 respect to the use of any funds appropriated by the federal govern- 2 ment including state grants administered by the department. 3 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 4 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 5 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 6 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23417). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 3,084,000 .............. (re. $3,084,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $2,000,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,255,000 ............... (re. $1,255,000) 10 Indirect costs (58850) ... 807,000 .................... (re. $807,000) 11 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 12 not limited to, 21st century community learning centers and student 13 support and academic enrichment pursuant to title IV of the elemen- 14 tary and secondary education act. Provided further that, notwith- 15 standing any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of 16 education shall provide to the director of the budget, the chair- 17 person of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of the 18 assembly ways and means committee copies of any spending plans 19 and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with respect to 20 the use of any funds appropriated by the federal government includ- 21 ing state grants administered by the department. 22 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 23 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 24 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 25 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23416). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 5,640,000 .............. (re. $5,532,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 7,147,000 ........... (re. $7,143,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,851,000 ............... (re. $3,786,000) 29 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,196,000 ................ (re. $1,188,000) 30 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 31 not limited to, public charter schools pursuant to title IV of the 32 elementary and secondary education act. Provided further that, 33 notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner 34 of education shall provide to the director of the budget, the chair- 35 person of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of the 36 assembly ways and means committee copies of any spending plans 37 and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with respect to 38 the use of any funds appropriated by the federal government includ- 39 ing state grants administered by the department. 40 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 41 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 42 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 43 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23415). 44 Personal service (50000) ... 1,551,000 .............. (re. $1,551,000) 45 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,870,000 ........... (re. $1,870,000) 46 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 543,000 ................... (re. $543,000) 47 Indirect costs (58850) ... 325,000 .................... (re. $325,000) 48 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 49 not limited to, improving academic achievement, pursuant to title I 50 of the elementary and secondary education act, and the rural educa- 51 tion initiative pursuant to title V of the elementary and secondary 52 education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsist- 173 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ent provision of law, the commissioner of education shall provide to 2 the director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance 3 committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means commit- 4 tee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the 5 federal government with respect to the use of any funds appropriated 6 by the federal government including state grants administered by the 7 department. 8 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 9 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 10 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 11 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23414). 12 Personal service (50000) ... 8,015,000 .............. (re. $7,078,000) 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 13,500,000 ......... (re. $12,489,000) 14 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 4,164,000 ............... (re. $3,587,000) 15 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,380,000 ................ (re. $1,309,000) 16 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 17 not limited to, homeless education pursuant to title VII of the 18 McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act. 19 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 20 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 21 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 22 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23413). 23 Personal service (50000) ... 408,000 .................. (re. $342,000) 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 600,000 ............... (re. $600,000) 25 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 255,000 ................... (re. $213,000) 26 Indirect costs (58850) ... 151,000 .................... (re. $146,000) 27 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 28 not limited to, the Carl D. Perkins vocational and applied technolo- 29 gy education act (VTEA). 30 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 31 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 32 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 33 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23477). 34 Personal service (50000) ... 5,094,000 .............. (re. $4,574,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,000,000 ........... (re. $3,694,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,061,000 ............... (re. $1,731,000) 37 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,008,000 .................. (re. $967,000) 38 For the administration of various grants. 39 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 40 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 41 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 42 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21809). 43 Personal service (50000) ... 3,000,000 .............. (re. $3,000,000) 44 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,589,000 ........... (re. $4,589,000) 45 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,500,000 ............... (re. $1,500,000) 46 Indirect costs (58850) ... 750,000 .................... (re. $750,000) 47 For services and expenses for school-age children and preschool-age 48 children pursuant to the individuals with disabilities education act 49 of 1991. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a 50 portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other state 51 departments and agencies, as needed to accomplish the intent of this 52 appropriation (21737). 174 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ... 22,202,000 ............ (re. $14,847,000) 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 17,728,000 ......... (re. $17,414,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 11,976,000 .............. (re. $7,314,000) 4 Indirect costs (58850) ... 6,608,000 ................ (re. $5,950,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 6 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 7 not limited to, grants for purposes under title I of the elementary 8 and secondary education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding 9 any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of education 10 shall provide to the director of the budget, the chairperson of the 11 senate finance committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways 12 and means committee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets 13 submitted to the federal government with respect to the use of any 14 funds appropriated by the federal government including state grants 15 administered by the department. 16 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 17 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 18 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 19 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23443). 20 Personal service (50000) ... 21,709,000 ............ (re. $13,061,000) 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,300,000 ......... (re. $10,476,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 9,110,000 ............... (re. $5,486,000) 23 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,953,000 ................ (re. $4,396,000) 24 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 25 not limited to, supporting effective instruction pursuant to title 26 II of the elementary and secondary education act provided, however, 27 that a portion of the funds appropriated herein shall be used to 28 implement a plan to improve educator effectiveness by (1) requiring 29 longer, more intensive and high quality student-teaching experience 30 in a school setting as a prerequisite for certification as a teacher 31 and (2) creating standards for a teacher and principal bar exam 32 certification program that would include a common set of profes- 33 sionally rigorous assessments to ensure the best prepared educators 34 are entering the public school system. Provided further that, 35 notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner 36 of education shall provide to the director of the budget, the chair- 37 person of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of the 38 assembly ways and means committee copies of any spending plans 39 and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with respect to 40 the use of any funds appropriated by the federal government includ- 41 ing state grants administered by the department. 42 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 43 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 44 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 45 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23418). 46 Personal service (50000) ... 5,325,000 .............. (re. $2,484,000) 47 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,300,000 ........... (re. $3,982,000) 48 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,861,000 ................. (re. $476,000) 49 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,228,000 ................ (re. $1,054,000) 50 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 51 not limited to, the English language acquisition program pursuant to 175 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 title III of the elementary and secondary education act. Provided 2 further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the 3 commissioner of education shall provide to the director of the budg- 4 et, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and the chair- 5 person of the assembly ways and means committee copies of any spend- 6 ing plans and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with 7 respect to the use of any funds appropriated by the federal govern- 8 ment including state grants administered by the department. 9 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 10 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 11 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 12 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23417). 13 Personal service (50000) ... 3,027,000 .............. (re. $1,719,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ............... (re. $2,000) 15 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,218,000 ................. (re. $501,000) 16 Indirect costs (58850) ... 803,000 .................... (re. $698,000) 17 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 18 not limited to, 21st century community learning centers and student 19 support and academic enrichment pursuant to title IV of the elemen- 20 tary and secondary education act. Provided further that, notwith- 21 standing any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of 22 education shall provide to the director of the budget, the chair- 23 person of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of the 24 assembly ways and means committee copies of any spending plans 25 and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with respect to 26 the use of any funds appropriated by the federal government includ- 27 ing state grants administered by the department. 28 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 29 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 30 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 31 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23416). 32 Personal service (50000) ... 5,619,000 .............. (re. $5,388,000) 33 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 7,147,000 ............. (re. $792,000) 34 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,837,000 ............... (re. $3,387,000) 35 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,194,000 ................ (re. $1,175,000) 36 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 37 not limited to, public charter schools pursuant to title IV of the 38 elementary and secondary education act. Provided further that, 39 notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner 40 of education shall provide to the director of the budget, the chair- 41 person of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of the 42 assembly ways and means committee copies of any spending plans 43 and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with respect to 44 the use of any funds appropriated by the federal government includ- 45 ing state grants administered by the department. 46 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 47 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 48 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 49 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23415). 50 Personal service (50000) ... 1,517,000 .............. (re. $1,517,000) 51 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,870,000 ........... (re. $1,870,000) 52 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 521,000 ................... (re. $521,000) 176 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Indirect costs (58850) ... 322,000 .................... (re. $322,000) 2 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 3 not limited to, improving academic achievement, pursuant to title I 4 of the elementary and secondary education act, and the rural educa- 5 tion initiative pursuant to title V of the elementary and secondary 6 education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsist- 7 ent provision of law, the commissioner of education shall provide to 8 the director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance 9 committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means commit- 10 tee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the 11 federal government with respect to the use of any funds appropriated 12 by the federal government including state grants administered by the 13 department. 14 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 15 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 16 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 17 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23414). 18 Personal service (50000) ... 7,024,000 .............. (re. $4,307,000) 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 13,500,000 .......... (re. $5,195,000) 20 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,515,000 ............... (re. $2,394,000) 21 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,303,000 ................ (re. $1,160,000) 22 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 23 not limited to, homeless education pursuant to title VII of the 24 McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act. 25 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 26 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 27 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 28 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23413). 29 Personal service (50000) ... 400,000 .................... (re. $3,000) 30 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 600,000 ............... (re. $587,000) 31 Indirect costs (58850) ... 150,000 .................... (re. $118,000) 32 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 33 not limited to, the Carl D. Perkins vocational and applied technolo- 34 gy education act (VTEA). 35 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 36 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 37 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 38 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23477). 39 Personal service (50000) ... 5,017,000 .............. (re. $3,936,000) 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,000,000 ........... (re. $3,234,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,011,000 ............... (re. $1,396,000) 42 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,002,000 .................. (re. $905,000) 43 For the administration of various grants. 44 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 45 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 46 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 47 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21809). 48 Personal service (50000) ... 3,000,000 .............. (re. $3,000,000) 49 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,589,000 ........... (re. $4,285,000) 50 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,500,000 ............... (re. $1,500,000) 51 Indirect costs (58850) ... 750,000 .................... (re. $750,000) 177 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses for school-age children and preschool-age 2 children pursuant to the individuals with disabilities education act 3 of 1991. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a 4 portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other state 5 departments and agencies, as needed to accomplish the intent of this 6 appropriation (21737). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 20,698,000 ............. (re. $3,285,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 17,211,000 ......... (re. $11,975,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 11,066,000 .............. (re. $2,178,000) 10 Indirect costs (58850) ... 6,335,000 ................ (re. $2,847,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 12 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 13 not limited to, grants for purposes under title I of the elementary 14 and secondary education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding 15 any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of education 16 shall provide to the director of the budget, the chairperson of the 17 senate finance committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways 18 and means committee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets 19 submitted to the federal government with respect to the use of any 20 funds appropriated by the federal government including state grants 21 administered by the department. 22 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 23 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 24 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 25 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23443). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 21,610,000 ............ (re. $10,092,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,300,000 .......... (re. $8,337,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 9,046,000 ............... (re. $3,814,000) 29 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,944,000 ................ (re. $4,061,000) 30 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 31 not limited to, supporting effective instruction pursuant to title 32 II of the elementary and secondary education act provided, however, 33 that a portion of the funds appropriated herein shall be used to 34 implement a plan to improve educator effectiveness by (1) requiring 35 longer, more intensive and high quality student-teaching experience 36 in a school setting as a prerequisite for certification as a teacher 37 and (2) creating standards for a teacher and principal bar exam 38 certification program that would include a common set of profes- 39 sionally rigorous assessments to ensure the best prepared educators 40 are entering the public school system. Provided further that, 41 notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner 42 of education shall provide to the director of the budget, the chair- 43 person of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of the 44 assembly ways and means committee copies of any spending plans 45 and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with respect to 46 the use of any funds appropriated by the federal government includ- 47 ing state grants administered by the department. 48 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 49 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 50 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 51 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23418). 178 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ... 5,300,000 .............. (re. $3,896,000) 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,300,000 ........... (re. $1,778,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,845,000 ................. (re. $615,000) 4 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,225,000 .................. (re. $992,000) 5 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 6 not limited to, the English language acquisition program pursuant to 7 title III of the elementary and secondary education act. Provided 8 further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the 9 commissioner of education shall provide to the director of the budg- 10 et, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and the chair- 11 person of the assembly ways and means committee copies of any spend- 12 ing plans and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with 13 respect to the use of any funds appropriated by the federal govern- 14 ment including state grants administered by the department. 15 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 16 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 17 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 18 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23417). 19 Personal service (50000) ... 3,000,000 .............. (re. $2,104,000) 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $1,148,000) 21 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,200,000 ................. (re. $196,000) 22 Indirect costs (58850) ... 800,000 .................... (re. $686,000) 23 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 24 not limited to, 21st century community learning centers and student 25 support and academic enrichment pursuant to title IV of the elemen- 26 tary and secondary education act. Provided further that, notwith- 27 standing any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of 28 education shall provide to the director of the budget, the chair- 29 person of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of the 30 assembly ways and means committee copies of any spending plans 31 and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with respect to 32 the use of any funds appropriated by the federal government includ- 33 ing state grants administered by the department. 34 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 35 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 36 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 37 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23416). 38 Personal service (50000) ... 3,601,000 .............. (re. $2,227,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,800,000 .............. (re. $71,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,550,000 ............... (re. $2,388,000) 41 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,014,000 .................. (re. $985,000) 42 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 43 not limited to, public charter schools pursuant to title IV of the 44 elementary and secondary education act. Provided further that, 45 notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner 46 of education shall provide to the director of the budget, the chair- 47 person of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of the 48 assembly ways and means committee copies of any spending plans 49 and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with respect to 50 the use of any funds appropriated by the federal government includ- 51 ing state grants administered by the department. 179 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 2 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 3 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 4 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23415). 5 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 .............. (re. $1,500,000) 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,870,000 ........... (re. $1,870,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 510,000 ................... (re. $510,000) 8 Indirect costs (58850) ... 320,000 .................... (re. $320,000) 9 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 10 not limited to, improving academic achievement, pursuant to title I 11 of the elementary and secondary education act, and the rural educa- 12 tion initiative pursuant to title V of the elementary and secondary 13 education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsist- 14 ent provision of law, the commissioner of education shall provide to 15 the director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance 16 committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means commit- 17 tee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the 18 federal government with respect to the use of any funds appropriated 19 by the federal government including state grants administered by the 20 department. 21 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 22 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 23 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 24 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23414). 25 Personal service (50000) ... 7,000,000 .............. (re. $3,822,000) 26 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 13,500,000 .......... (re. $2,796,000) 27 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,500,000 ............... (re. $1,365,000) 28 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,300,000 ................ (re. $1,039,000) 29 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 30 not limited to, homeless education pursuant to title VII of the 31 McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act. 32 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 33 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 34 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 35 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23413). 36 Personal service (50000) ... 400,000 ................... (re. $38,000) 37 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 600,000 ............... (re. $378,000) 38 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 250,000 .................... (re. $18,000) 39 Indirect costs (58850) ... 150,000 .................... (re. $119,000) 40 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 41 not limited to, the Carl D. Perkins vocational and applied technolo- 42 gy education act (VTEA). 43 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 44 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 45 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 46 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23477). 47 Personal service (50000) ... 5,000,000 .............. (re. $3,245,000) 48 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,000,000 ........... (re. $3,250,000) 49 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,000,000 ................. (re. $877,000) 50 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,000,000 .................. (re. $851,000) 51 For the administration of various grants. Notwithstanding any incon- 52 sistent provision of law, a portion of this appropriation may be 180 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 suballocated to other state departments and agencies, subject to the 2 approval of the director of the budget, as needed to accomplish the 3 intent of this appropriation (21809). 4 Personal service (50000) ... 3,000,000 .............. (re. $3,000,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,589,000 ........... (re. $4,589,000) 6 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,500,000 ............... (re. $1,500,000) 7 Indirect costs (58850) ... 750,000 .................... (re. $750,000) 8 For services and expenses for school-age children and preschool-age 9 children pursuant to the individuals with disabilities education act 10 of 1991. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a 11 portion of this appropriation may be suballocated to other state 12 departments and agencies, as needed to accomplish the intent of this 13 appropriation (21737). 14 Personal service (50000) ... 20,502,000 ................. (re. $1,000) 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 17,211,000 .......... (re. $2,546,000) 16 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 10,940,000 ................. (re. $40,000) 17 Indirect costs (58850) ... 6,317,000 ................... (re. $39,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 19 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 20 not limited to, grants for purposes under title I of the elementary 21 and secondary education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding 22 any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of education 23 shall provide to the director of the budget, the chairperson of the 24 senate finance committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways 25 and means committee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets 26 submitted to the federal government with respect to the use of any 27 funds appropriated by the federal government including state grants 28 administered by the department. 29 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 30 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 31 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 32 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23443). 33 Personal service (50000) ... 21,610,000 ............. (re. $6,990,000) 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,300,000 .......... (re. $8,150,000) 35 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 9,046,000 ............... (re. $4,201,000) 36 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,944,000 ................ (re. $3,857,000) 37 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 38 not limited to, supporting effective instruction pursuant to title 39 II of the elementary and secondary education act provided, however, 40 that a portion of the funds appropriated herein shall be used to 41 implement a plan to improve educator effectiveness by (1) requiring 42 longer, more intensive and high quality student-teaching experience 43 in a school setting as a prerequisite for certification as a teacher 44 and (2) creating standards for a teacher and principal bar exam 45 certification program that would include a common set of profes- 46 sionally rigorous assessments to ensure the best prepared educators 47 are entering the public school system. Provided further that, 48 notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner 49 of education shall provide to the director of the budget, the chair- 50 person of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of the 51 assembly ways and means committee copies of any spending plans 181 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with respect to 2 the use of any funds appropriated by the federal government includ- 3 ing state grants administered by the department. 4 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 5 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 6 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 7 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23418). 8 Personal service (50000) ... 5,300,000 .............. (re. $2,849,000) 9 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,300,000 ........... (re. $3,779,000) 10 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,845,000 ................. (re. $787,000) 11 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,225,000 .................. (re. $994,000) 12 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 13 not limited to, English language acquisition program pursuant to 14 title III of the elementary and secondary education act. Provided 15 further that, notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the 16 commissioner of education shall provide to the director of the budg- 17 et, the chairperson of the senate finance committee and the chair- 18 person of the assembly ways and means committee copies of any spend- 19 ing plans and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with 20 respect to the use of any funds appropriated by the federal govern- 21 ment including state grants administered by the department. 22 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 23 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 24 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 25 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23417). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 3,000,000 .............. (re. $1,747,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $1,274,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,200,000 .................. (re. $65,000) 29 Indirect costs (58850) ... 800,000 .................... (re. $731,000) 30 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 31 not limited to, 21st century community learning centers and student 32 support and academic enrichment pursuant to title IV of the elemen- 33 tary and secondary education act. Provided further that, notwith- 34 standing any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of 35 education shall provide to the director of the budget, the chair- 36 person of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of the 37 assembly ways and means committee copies of any spending plans 38 and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with respect to 39 the use of any funds appropriated by the federal government includ- 40 ing state grants administered by the department. 41 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 42 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 43 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 44 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23416). 45 Personal service (50000) ... 3,601,000 .............. (re. $3,202,000) 46 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,800,000 ........... (re. $1,257,000) 47 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,550,000 ............... (re. $2,376,000) 48 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,014,000 ................ (re. $1,000,000) 49 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 50 not limited to, public charter schools pursuant to title IV of the 51 elementary and secondary education act. Provided further that, 52 notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner 182 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 of education shall provide to the director of the budget, the chair- 2 person of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of the 3 assembly ways and means committee copies of any spending plans 4 and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with respect to 5 the use of any funds appropriated by the federal government includ- 6 ing state grants administered by the department. Notwithstanding any 7 inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this appropriation may 8 be suballocated to other state departments and agencies, subject to 9 the approval of the director of the budget, as needed to accomplish 10 the intent of this appropriation (23415). 11 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 ................ (re. $437,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,870,000 ........... (re. $1,552,000) 13 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 510,000 .................... (re. $17,000) 14 Indirect costs (58850) ... 320,000 .................... (re. $223,000) 15 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 16 not limited to, improving academic achievement, pursuant to title I 17 of the elementary and secondary education act, and the rural educa- 18 tion initiative pursuant to title V of the elementary and secondary 19 education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsist- 20 ent provision of law, the commissioner of education shall provide to 21 the director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance 22 committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means commit- 23 tee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the 24 federal government with respect to the use of any funds appropriated 25 by the federal government including state grants administered by the 26 department. 27 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 28 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 29 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 30 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23414). 31 Personal service (50000) ... 7,000,000 .............. (re. $4,791,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 13,500,000 .......... (re. $3,053,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,500,000 ............... (re. $2,497,000) 34 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,300,000 ................ (re. $1,164,000) 35 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 36 not limited to, homeless education pursuant to title VII of the 37 McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act. 38 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 39 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 40 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 41 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23413). 42 Personal service (50000) ... 400,000 .................. (re. $113,000) 43 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 250,000 .................... (re. $68,000) 44 Indirect costs (58850) ... 150,000 ..................... (re. $24,000) 45 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 46 not limited to, the Carl D. Perkins vocational and applied technolo- 47 gy education act (VTEA). 48 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 49 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 50 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 51 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23477). 52 Personal service (50000) ... 5,000,000 .............. (re. $3,988,000) 183 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,000,000 ........... (re. $3,291,000) 2 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,000,000 ............... (re. $1,368,000) 3 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,000,000 .................. (re. $930,000) 4 For the administration of various grants. 5 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 6 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 7 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 8 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21809). 9 Personal service (50000) ... 3,000,000 .............. (re. $3,000,000) 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,589,000 ........... (re. $4,589,000) 11 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,500,000 ............... (re. $1,500,000) 12 Indirect costs (58850) ... 750,000 .................... (re. $750,000) 13 For services and expenses for school age children and preschool chil- 14 dren pursuant to the individuals with disabilities education act of 15 1991. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion 16 of this appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments 17 and agencies, as needed to accomplish the intent of this appropri- 18 ation (21737). 19 Personal service (50000) ... 20,502,000 ................ (re. $13,000) 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 17,211,000 ............ (re. $276,000) 21 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 10,940,000 ................ (re. $199,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 23 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 24 not limited to, grants for purposes under title I of the elementary 25 and secondary education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding 26 any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of education 27 shall provide to the director of the budget, the chairperson of the 28 senate finance committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways 29 and means committee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets 30 submitted to the federal government with respect to the use of any 31 funds appropriated by the federal government including state grants 32 administered by the department. 33 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 34 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 35 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 36 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23443). 37 Personal service (50000) ... 21,610,000 ............. (re. $1,252,000) 38 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,300,000 .......... (re. $3,000,000) 39 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 9,046,000 .................. (re. $23,000) 40 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,944,000 ................... (re. $71,000) 41 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 42 not limited to, 21st century community learning centers and student 43 support and academic enrichment pursuant to title IV of the elemen- 44 tary and secondary education act. Provided further that, notwith- 45 standing any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of 46 education shall provide to the director of the budget, the chair- 47 person of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of the 48 assembly ways and means committee copies of any spending plans 49 and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with respect to 50 the use of any funds appropriated by the federal government includ- 51 ing state grants administered by the department. 184 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 2 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 3 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 4 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23416). 5 Personal service (50000) ... 3,601,000 ................ (re. $599,000) 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,800,000 ............. (re. $202,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,550,000 ............... (re. $2,070,000) 8 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,014,000 .................. (re. $947,000) 9 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 10 not limited to, public charter schools pursuant to title IV of the 11 elementary and secondary education act. Provided further that, 12 notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner 13 of education shall provide to the director of the budget, the chair- 14 person of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of the 15 assembly ways and means committee copies of any spending plans 16 and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with respect to 17 the use of any funds appropriated by the federal government includ- 18 ing state grants administered by the department. 19 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 20 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 21 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 22 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23415). 23 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 ................ (re. $230,000) 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,870,000 ............. (re. $743,000) 25 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 510,000 .................... (re. $94,000) 26 Indirect costs (58850) ... 320,000 .................... (re. $266,000) 27 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 28 not limited to, improving academic achievement, pursuant to title I 29 of the elementary and secondary education act, and the rural educa- 30 tion initiative pursuant to title V of the elementary and secondary 31 education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding any inconsist- 32 ent provision of law, the commissioner of education shall provide to 33 the director of the budget, the chairperson of the senate finance 34 committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways and means commit- 35 tee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets submitted to the 36 federal government with respect to the use of any funds appropriated 37 by the federal government including state grants administered by the 38 department. 39 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 40 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 41 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 42 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23414). 43 Personal service (50000) ... 7,000,000 .............. (re. $5,119,000) 44 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 13,500,000 .......... (re. $2,339,000) 45 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,500,000 ............... (re. $2,472,000) 46 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,300,000 ................ (re. $1,168,000) 47 For services and expenses for school age children and preschool chil- 48 dren pursuant to the individuals with disabilities education act of 49 1991. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion 50 of this appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments 51 and agencies, as needed to accomplish the intent of this appropri- 52 ation (21737). 185 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ... 20,502,000 ............... (re. $414,000) 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 17,211,000 ............ (re. $302,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 10,940,000 ................ (re. $116,000) 4 Indirect costs (58850) ... 6,317,000 .................. (re. $116,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 6 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 7 not limited to, grants for purposes under title I of the elementary 8 and secondary education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding 9 any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of education 10 shall provide to the director of the budget, the chairperson of the 11 senate finance committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways 12 and means committee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets 13 submitted to the federal government with respect to the use of any 14 funds appropriated by the federal government including state grants 15 administered by the department. 16 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 17 appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments and 18 agencies, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, as 19 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (23443). 20 Personal service (50000) ... 21,610,000 ............. (re. $8,805,000) 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,300,000 .......... (re. $7,064,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 9,046,000 ............... (re. $3,836,000) 23 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,944,000 ................ (re. $4,453,000) 24 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 25 not limited to, public charter schools pursuant to title IV of the 26 elementary and secondary education act. Provided further that, 27 notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner 28 of education shall provide to the director of the budget, the chair- 29 person of the senate finance committee and the chairperson of the 30 assembly ways and means committee copies of any spending plans 31 and/or budgets submitted to the federal government with respect to 32 the use of any funds appropriated by the federal government includ- 33 ing state grants administered by the department. Notwithstanding any 34 inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this appropriation may 35 be suballocated to other state departments and agencies, subject to 36 the approval of the director of the budget, as needed to accomplish 37 the intent of this appropriation (23415). 38 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 ................ (re. $100,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,870,000 .............. (re. $43,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 510,000 .................... (re. $14,000) 41 Indirect costs (58850) ... 320,000 ..................... (re. $18,000) 42 For services and expenses for school age children and preschool chil- 43 dren pursuant to the individuals with disabilities education act of 44 1991. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion 45 of this appropriation may be suballocated to other state departments 46 and agencies, as needed to accomplish the intent of this appropri- 47 ation (21737). 48 Personal service (50000) ... 20,502,000 ................. (re. $2,000) 49 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 17,211,000 .......... (re. $1,615,000) 50 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 10,940,000 ................ (re. $175,000) 51 Indirect costs (58850) ... 6,317,000 ................ (re. $1,844,000) 186 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 2 For the administration of grants for specific programs including, but 3 not limited to, grants for purposes under title I of the elementary 4 and secondary education act. Provided further that, notwithstanding 5 any inconsistent provision of law, the commissioner of education 6 shall provide to the director of the budget, the chairperson of the 7 senate finance committee and the chairperson of the assembly ways 8 and means committee copies of any spending plans and/or budgets 9 submitted to the federal government with respect to the use of any 10 funds appropriated by the federal government including state grants 11 administered by the department. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 12 provision of law, a portion of this appropriation may be suballo- 13 cated to other state departments and agencies, subject to the 14 approval of the director of the budget, as needed to accomplish the 15 intent of this appropriation (23443). 16 Personal service (50000) ... 21,610,000 ............ (re. $10,450,000) 17 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,300,000 .......... (re. $6,602,000) 18 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 9,046,000 ............... (re. $5,003,000) 19 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,944,000 ................ (re. $4,547,000) 20 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 21 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 22 Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25122 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 24 For the administration of federal grants for health education includ- 25 ing HIV/AIDS education. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 26 of law, a portion of this appropriation, subject to the approval of 27 the director of the budget, may be suballocated to other state 28 departments and agencies, as needed to accomplish the intent of this 29 appropriation (21742). 30 Personal service (50000) ... 508,000 .................. (re. $508,000) 31 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 450,000 ............... (re. $450,000) 32 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 375,000 ................... (re. $375,000) 33 Indirect costs (58850) ... 201,000 .................... (re. $201,000) 34 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 35 For the administration of federal grants for health education includ- 36 ing HIV/AIDS education. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 37 of law, a portion of this appropriation, subject to the approval of 38 the director of the budget, may be suballocated to other state 39 departments and agencies, as needed to accomplish the intent of this 40 appropriation (21742). 41 Personal service (50000) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 450,000 ............... (re. $450,000) 43 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 370,000 ................... (re. $370,000) 44 Indirect costs (58850) ... 200,000 .................... (re. $200,000) 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 46 For the administration of federal grants for health education includ- 47 ing HIV/AIDS education. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 48 of law, a portion of this appropriation, subject to the approval of 187 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 the director of the budget, may be suballocated to other state 2 departments and agencies, as needed to accomplish the intent of this 3 appropriation (21742). 4 Personal service (50000) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 450,000 ............... (re. $450,000) 6 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 370,000 ................... (re. $370,000) 7 Indirect costs (58850) ... 200,000 .................... (re. $200,000) 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 9 For the administration of federal grants for health education includ- 10 ing HIV/AIDS education. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 11 of law, a portion of this appropriation, subject to the approval of 12 the director of the budget, may be suballocated to other state 13 departments and agencies, as needed to accomplish the intent of this 14 appropriation (21742). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $454,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 450,000 ............... (re. $177,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 370,000 ................... (re. $244,000) 18 Indirect costs (58850) ... 200,000 .................... (re. $186,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 20 For the administration of federal grants for health education includ- 21 ing HIV/AIDS education. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 22 of law, a portion of this appropriation, subject to the approval of 23 the director of the budget, may be suballocated to other state 24 departments and agencies, as needed to accomplish the intent of this 25 appropriation (21742). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $146,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 450,000 ............... (re. $296,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 370,000 ................... (re. $288,000) 29 Indirect costs (58850) ... 200,000 .................... (re. $187,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 31 For the administration of federal grants for health education includ- 32 ing HIV/AIDS education. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 33 of law, a portion of this appropriation, subject to the approval of 34 the director of the budget, may be suballocated to other state 35 departments and agencies, as needed to accomplish the intent of this 36 appropriation (21742). 37 Personal service (50000) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $189,000) 38 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 450,000 ............... (re. $283,000) 39 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 370,000 ................... (re. $300,000) 40 Indirect costs (58850) ... 200,000 .................... (re. $191,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 42 For the administration of federal grants for health education includ- 43 ing HIV/AIDS education. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 44 of law, a portion of this appropriation, subject to the approval of 45 the director of the budget, may be suballocated to other state 46 departments and agencies, as needed to accomplish the intent of this 47 appropriation (21742). 48 Personal service (50000) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $296,000) 188 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 370,000 ................... (re. $284,000) 2 Indirect costs (58850) ... 200,000 .................... (re. $196,000) 3 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 4 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 5 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25026 6 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 7 For administration of programs funded through the national school 8 lunch act. 9 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 10 appropriation, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 11 et, may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies, as 12 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21703). 13 Personal service (50000) ... 8,853,000 .............. (re. $8,853,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,047,000 ......... (re. $12,047,000) 15 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 4,940,000 ............... (re. $4,939,000) 16 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,079,000 ................ (re. $4,079,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 18 For administration of programs funded through the national school 19 lunch act. 20 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 21 appropriation, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 22 et, may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies, as 23 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21703). 24 Personal service (50000) ... 6,819,400 .............. (re. $1,863,000) 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 9,636,850 ........... (re. $6,950,000) 26 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,780,550 ................. (re. $319,000) 27 Indirect costs (58850) ... 3,222,300 ................ (re. $2,618,000) 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 29 For administration of programs funded through the national school 30 lunch act. 31 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 32 appropriation, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 33 et, may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies, as 34 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21703). 35 Personal service (50000) ... 6,461,000 .............. (re. $1,860,000) 36 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 9,178,000 ........... (re. $5,911,000) 37 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,579,000 ................. (re. $175,000) 38 Indirect costs (58850) ... 3,065,000 ................ (re. $2,177,000) 39 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 40 For administration of programs funded through the national school 41 lunch act. 42 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 43 appropriation, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 44 et, may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies, as 45 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21703). 46 Personal service (50000) ... 6,153,000 .............. (re. $1,581,000) 47 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 8,741,000 ........... (re. $6,046,000) 189 12550-10-5 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,408,000 ................. (re. $138,000) 2 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,919,000 .................. (re. $306,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 4 For administration of programs funded through the national school 5 lunch act. 6 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of this 7 appropriation, subject to the approval of the director of the budg- 8 et, may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies, as 9 needed to accomplish the intent of this appropriation (21703). 10 Personal service (50000) ... 5,974,000 .............. (re. $1,041,000) 11 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 8,486,000 ........... (re. $4,668,000) 12 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,308,000 ................. (re. $675,000) 13 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,834,000 ................ (re. $2,077,000) 14 Special Revenue Funds - Other 15 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 16 Miscellaneous United States Department of Education 17 Contracts Account - 22153 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 19 For services and expenses of miscellaneous United States department of 20 education contracts (21700). 21 Contractual services (51000) ... 150,000 .............. (re. $150,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 23 For services and expenses of miscellaneous United States department of 24 education contracts (21700). 25 Contractual services (51000) ... 150,000 .............. (re. $150,000) 26 SCHOOL FOR THE BLIND PROGRAM 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 29 Batavia School for the Blind Account - 22032 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 31 For services and expenses related to the operation of the school for 32 the blind (21828). 33 Contractual services (51000) ... 815,000 .............. (re. $682,000) 34 SCHOOL FOR THE DEAF PROGRAM 35 Special Revenue Funds - Other 36 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 37 Rome School for the Deaf Account - 22053 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 39 For services and expenses related to the operation of the school for 40 the deaf (21829). 41 Contractual services (51000) ... 583,000 .............. (re. $297,000) 190 12550-10-5 STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 31,888,000 1,500,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 3,400,000 22,303,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 2,125,000 887,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 37,413,000 24,690,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 ELECTION ENFORCEMENT PROGRAM ................................. 6,042,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses related to compli- 15 ance, including but not limited to over- 16 sight of campaign receipts and expendi- 17 tures, and educational efforts to increase 18 compliance. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 20 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 21 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 22 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 23 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 24 appropriation for the budget division 25 program of the division of the budget, are 26 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 27 part of this appropriation as if fully 28 stated (23514). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,942,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 428,000 31 -------------- 32 Total amount available ....................... 2,370,000 33 -------------- 34 For services and expenses related to 35 enforcement of the election law, including 36 but not limited to the investigation of 37 violations and referral for prosecution. 38 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 39 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 40 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 41 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 42 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 43 appropriation for the budget division 44 program of the division of the budget, are 191 12550-10-5 STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 2 part of this appropriation as if fully 3 stated (23515). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,971,000 5 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 576,000 6 -------------- 7 Total amount available ....................... 2,547,000 8 -------------- 9 For the purchase of software and/or the 10 development of technology related to 11 compliance and enforcement (23516). 12 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,000,000 13 -------------- 14 Special Revenue Funds - Other 15 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 16 BOE Enforcement Account - 22213 17 For services and expenses related to 18 enforcement of the election law, including 19 but not limited to the investigation of 20 violations and referral for prosecution 21 (23515). 22 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 125,000 23 -------------- 24 Total amount available ......................... 125,000 25 -------------- 26 PUBLIC CAMPAIGN FINANCE BOARD ............................... 14,548,000 27 -------------- 28 General Fund 29 State Purposes Account - 10050 30 For services and expenses related to the 31 public campaign finance board program. 32 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 33 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 34 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 35 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 36 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 37 appropriation for the budget division 38 program of the division of the budget, are 39 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 40 part of this appropriation as if fully 41 stated (23526). 192 12550-10-5 STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 8,661,000 2 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 80,000 3 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 4 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 145,000 5 Travel (54000) .................................... 29,000 6 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,370,000 7 Equipment (56000) ............................... 253,000 8 -------------- 9 REGULATION OF ELECTIONS PROGRAM ............................. 16,823,000 10 -------------- 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 regulation of elections program. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 16 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 17 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 18 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 19 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 20 appropriation for the budget division 21 program of the division of the budget, are 22 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully 24 stated (23504). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 6,469,000 26 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 80,000 27 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 150,000 29 Travel (54000) .................................... 40,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,074,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................ 100,000 32 -------------- 33 Total amount available ....................... 8,923,000 34 -------------- 35 For services and expenses related to the 36 establishment and operation of the Doctor 37 John L. Flateau New York Voting and 38 Elections Database (23530). 39 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 300,000 40 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,200,000 41 -------------- 42 Total amount available ....................... 2,500,000 43 -------------- 44 Special Revenue Funds - Other 45 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 193 12550-10-5 STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Voting Machine Examinations Account - 22099 2 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,000,000 3 -------------- 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 5 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 6 HAVA Election Security Grant Account - 25541 7 The amounts appropriated herein shall be 8 used to disburse federal grants in support 9 of improvements to the administration of 10 elections, including enhanced election 11 technology and election security improve- 12 ments. Expenditures shall be made from 13 this appropriation only pursuant to a 14 contract, or modified contract, approved 15 by a vote of the state board of elections 16 pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 3-100 17 of the election law, or, absent a 18 contract, pursuant to a vote of the state 19 board of elections for expenditure pursu- 20 ant to subdivision 4 of section 3-100 of 21 the election law (23504). 22 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 3,400,000 23 -------------- 24 Total amount available ....................... 3,400,000 25 -------------- 194 12550-10-5 STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 REGULATION OF ELECTIONS PROGRAM 2 General Fund 3 State Purposes Account - 10050 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 50, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 6 For services and expenses related to campaign finance compliance 7 training and compliance reviews, national voter registration act 8 training and compliance reviews, election technology systems oper- 9 ations and securing election systems infrastructure and operations 10 from cyber-related threats including, but not limited to the 11 creation of an election support center, development of an elections 12 cyber security support toolkit, and providing cyber risk vulnerabil- 13 ity assessments and support for local boards of elections. Funds 14 appropriated herein securing election infrastructure from cyber-re- 15 lated threats shall be distributed pursuant to a plan developed by 16 the state board of elections based on consultation with appropriate 17 state, local and federal stakeholders to ensure that the development 18 and implementation of election cyber security measures utilize and 19 leverage, to the greatest extent practicable, existing security 20 resources and expertise. The plan shall also address the use of such 21 spending as a match for associated federal grants. Expenditures 22 shall be made from this appropriation only pursuant to a contract, 23 or modified contract, approved by a vote of the state board of 24 elections pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 3-100 of the election 25 law, or, absent a contract, pursuant to a vote of the state board of 26 elections for expenditure pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 3-100 27 of the election law (23520). 28 Contractual Services (51000) ... 5,000,000 .......... (re. $1,500,000) 29 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 30 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 31 Election Assistance Commission - 25341 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 33 The amounts appropriated herein shall be used to disburse federal 34 grants intended to improve the electronic transmittal of ballots to 35 the visually impaired, military members, their families and US citi- 36 zens voting abroad. 37 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 806,000 ............... (re. $806,000) 38 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 39 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 40 HAVA Election Security Grant Account - 25541 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 42 Funds appropriated shall be used to disburse federal grants in support 43 of improvements to the administration of elections, including 44 enhanced election technology and election security improvements. 45 Expenditures shall be made from this appropriation only pursuant to 46 a contract, or modified contract, approved by a vote of the state 195 12550-10-5 STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 board of elections pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 3-100 of the 2 election law, or, absent a contract, pursuant to a vote of the state 3 board of elections for expenditure pursuant to subdivision 4 of 4 section 3-100 of the election law (23504). 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 7,000,000 ........... (re. $7,000,000) 6 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 7 Funds appropriated shall be used to disburse federal grants in support 8 of improvements to the administration of elections, including 9 enhanced election technology and election security improvements. 10 Expenditures shall be made from this appropriation only pursuant to 11 a contract, or modified contract, approved by a vote of the state 12 board of elections pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 3-100 of the 13 election law, or, absent a contract, pursuant to a vote of the state 14 board of elections for expenditure pursuant to subdivision 4 of 15 section 3-100 of the election law (23504). 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 21,839,000 .......... (re. $8,578,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 18 Funds appropriated shall be used to disburse federal grants in support 19 of improvements to the administration of elections, including 20 enhanced election technology and election security improvements. 21 Expenditures shall be made from this appropriation only pursuant to 22 a contract, or modified contract, approved by a vote of the state 23 board of elections pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 3-100 of the 24 election law, or, absent a contract, pursuant to a vote of the state 25 board of elections for expenditure pursuant to subdivision 4 of 26 section 3-100 of the election law (23504) .......................... 27 23,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,417,000) 28 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 29 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 30 Help America Vote Act Implementation Account - 25497 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 32 For services and expenses related to the implementation of federal 33 election requirements including the help America vote act of 2002 34 and the military and overseas voter empowerment act of 2009 (23508). 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,500,000 ........... (re. $2,887,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 37 For services and expenses related to the implementation of the mili- 38 tary and overseas voter empowerment act of 2009 (23508) ............ 39 6,500,000 ........................................... (re. $285,000) 40 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2009, as amended by chapter 50, 41 section 1, of the laws of 2011: 42 For HAVA related expenditures (23511) ................................ 43 6,000,000 ........................................... (re. $537,000) 44 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 45 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 196 12550-10-5 STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Help America Vote Act Implementation Account - 25496 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2005, as added by chapter 62, 3 section 1, of the laws of 2005: 4 For services and expenses related to the help America vote act of 5 2002; provided however, expenditures shall be made from this appro- 6 priation only pursuant to a contract, or modified contract, approved 7 by a vote of the state board of elections pursuant to subdivision 4 8 of section 3-100 of the election law, or, absent a contract, pursu- 9 ant to a vote of the state board of elections for expenditure pursu- 10 ant to subdivision 4 of section 3-100 of the election law. The 11 amounts hereby appropriated may be increased or decreased through 12 interchange with any other special revenue funds - federal, federal 13 operating grants fund - 290 appropriation in the board or trans- 14 ferred to any other eligible state agency for the purpose of imple- 15 menting the help America vote act of 2002, provided that any such 16 interchange or transfer shall be approved by the state board of 17 elections pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 3-100 of the election 18 law and, in addition, any such interchange or transfer shall be 19 approved by the director of the budget who shall file copies thereof 20 with the state comptroller and the chairman of the senate finance 21 and assembly ways and means committees (23508). 22 For services and expenses incurred prior to April 1, 2005 (23508) ... 23 5,000,000 ........................................... (re. $397,000) 24 For services and expenses incurred on or after April 1, 2005 (23508) 25 ... 15,000,000 ...................................... (re. $396,000) 26 Special Revenue Funds - Other 27 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 28 Help America Vote Act Matching Funds Account - 22174 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 30 For expenses including prior year liabilities related to satisfying 31 the matching fund requirements of section 253(b) (5) of the help 32 America vote act of 2002; provided however, expenditures shall be 33 made from this appropriation only pursuant to a contract, or modi- 34 fied contract, approved by a vote of the state board of elections 35 pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 3-100 of the election law, or, 36 absent a contract, pursuant to a vote of the state board of 37 elections for expenditure pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 3-100 38 of the election law (23504). 39 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 ............ (re. $775,000) 40 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 41 For expenses including prior year liabilities related to satisfying 42 the matching fund requirements of section 253(b) (5) of the help 43 America vote act of 2002; provided however, expenditures shall be 44 made from this appropriation only pursuant to a contract, or modi- 45 fied contract, approved by a vote of the state board of elections 46 pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 3-100 of the election law, or, 47 absent a contract, pursuant to a vote of the state board of 197 12550-10-5 STATE BOARD OF ELECTIONS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 elections for expenditure pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 3-100 2 of the election law (23504). 3 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 ............ (re. $112,000) 198 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF EMPLOYEE RELATIONS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 13,875,000 0 4 Internal Service Funds ............. 2,103,000 0 5 ---------------- ---------------- 6 All Funds ........................ 15,978,000 0 7 ================ ================ 8 SCHEDULE 9 CONTRACT NEGOTIATION AND ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ............. 15,978,000 10 -------------- 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 contract negotiation and administration 15 program. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 19 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 20 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 21 appropriation for the budget division 22 program of the division of the budget, are 23 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully 25 stated (23836). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 13,262,000 27 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 10,000 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 171,000 30 Travel (54000) ................................... 134,000 31 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 297,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal .................. 13,875,000 34 -------------- 35 Internal Service Funds 36 Joint Labor/Management Administration Fund 37 Joint Labor Management Administration Account - 55201 38 For services and expenses related to the 39 contract negotiation and administration 40 program. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 42 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 43 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 199 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF EMPLOYEE RELATIONS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 2 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 3 appropriation for the budget division 4 program of the division of the budget, are 5 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 6 part of this appropriation as if fully 7 stated (23836). 8 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,084,000 9 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 10,000 10 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 60,000 11 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 12 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 247,000 13 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 661,000 14 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 31,000 15 -------------- 16 Program account subtotal ................... 2,103,000 17 -------------- 200 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 275,519,000 51,292,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 110,923,000 392,325,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 259,471,000 57,096,000 6 Internal Service Funds ............. 95,000 0 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 646,008,000 500,713,000 9 ================ ================ 10 SCHEDULE 11 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 74,487,000 12 -------------- 13 General Fund 14 State Purposes Account - 10050 15 For services and expenses of the adminis- 16 tration program, including suballocation 17 to other state departments and agencies. 18 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 19 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 20 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 21 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 22 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 23 appropriation for the budget division 24 program of the division of the budget, are 25 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 26 part of this appropriation as if fully 27 stated (81001). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 36,678,000 29 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 5,373,000 30 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 1,160,000 31 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 3,300,000 32 Travel (54000) ................................. 1,589,000 33 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,490,000 34 Equipment (56000) ................................ 579,000 35 -------------- 36 Program account subtotal .................. 56,169,000 37 -------------- 38 Special Revenue Funds - Other 39 Conservation Fund 40 Conservation Fund Account - 21150 41 For services and expenses related to the 42 administration program (81001). 201 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 54,000 2 Travel (54000) .................................... 31,000 3 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 257,000 4 Equipment (56000) .................................. 4,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ..................... 346,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Other 9 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 10 ENCON Magazine Account - 21080 11 For services and expenses related to the 12 administration program. 13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 14 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 15 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 16 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 17 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 18 appropriation for the budget division 19 program of the division of the budget, are 20 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully 22 stated (81001). 23 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 225,000 24 Travel (54000) .................................... 11,000 25 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 475,000 26 Equipment (56000) ................................. 13,000 27 -------------- 28 Program account subtotal ..................... 724,000 29 -------------- 30 Special Revenue Funds - Other 31 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 32 Federal Grant Indirect Cost Recovery Account - 21065 33 For services and expenses related to the 34 administration of special revenue funds - 35 federal. 36 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 37 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 38 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 39 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 40 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 41 appropriation for the budget division 42 program of the division of the budget, are 43 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully 45 stated (81001). 202 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 9,438,000 2 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 326,000 3 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 21,000 4 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 181,000 5 Travel (54000) .................................... 13,000 6 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 772,000 7 Equipment (56000) .................................. 5,000 8 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 5,897,000 9 -------------- 10 Program account subtotal .................. 16,653,000 11 -------------- 12 Special Revenue Funds - Other 13 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 14 Miscellaneous Gifts Account - 21089 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 department of environmental conservation. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 18 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 19 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 20 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 21 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 22 appropriation for the budget division 23 program of the division of the budget, are 24 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully 26 stated (81001). 27 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 500,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 30 -------------- 31 Internal Service Funds 32 Agencies Internal Service Fund 33 Banking Services Account - 55057 34 For services and expenses related to the 35 lockbox collection of regulatory fees. 36 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 37 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 38 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 39 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 40 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 41 appropriation for the budget division 42 program of the division of the budget, are 43 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully 45 stated (81001). 203 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 95,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal ...................... 95,000 4 -------------- 5 AIR AND WATER QUALITY MANAGEMENT PROGRAM ................... 137,102,000 6 -------------- 7 General Fund 8 State Purposes Account - 10050 9 For services and expenses of the air and 10 water quality management program, includ- 11 ing suballocation to other state depart- 12 ments and agencies. 13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 14 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 15 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 16 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 17 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 18 appropriation for the budget division 19 program of the division of the budget, are 20 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully 22 stated (24779). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 23,713,000 24 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 77,000 25 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 77,000 26 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,790,000 27 Travel (54000) ................................. 1,359,000 28 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,402,000 29 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,324,000 30 -------------- 31 Program account subtotal .................. 30,742,000 32 -------------- 33 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 34 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 35 Federal Environmental Conservation Air Resources Grants 36 Account - 25334 37 For services and expenses related to air 38 resources purposes. A portion of these 39 funds may be transferred to aid to locali- 40 ties and may be suballocated to other 41 state departments and agencies (24780). 204 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ....................... 4,742,000 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,431,000 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 2,827,000 4 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 2,185,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal .................. 12,185,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 9 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 10 Federal Environmental Conservation Spills Management 11 Grant Account - 25334 12 For services and expenses related to spills 13 management purposes. A portion of these 14 funds may be transferred to aid to locali- 15 ties and may be suballocated to other 16 state departments and agencies (24782). 17 Personal service (50000) ....................... 3,695,000 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,103,000 19 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 2,202,000 20 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 2,258,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ................... 9,258,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 25 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 26 Federal Environmental Conservation Water Grants Account 27 - 25334 28 For services and expenses related to water 29 resource purposes. A portion of these 30 funds may be transferred to aid to locali- 31 ties and may be suballocated to other 32 state departments and agencies (24784). 33 Personal service (50000) ....................... 7,830,000 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 14,405,000 35 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 4,670,000 36 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 4,675,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal .................. 31,580,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other 41 Clean Air Fund 42 Mobile Source Account - 21452 43 For the direct and indirect costs of the 44 department of environmental conservation 205 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 associated with developing, implementing 2 and administering the mobile source 3 program, including suballocation to other 4 state departments and agencies. 5 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 6 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 7 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 8 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 9 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 10 appropriation for the budget division 11 program of the division of the budget, are 12 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 13 part of this appropriation as if fully 14 stated (24779). 15 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,773,000 16 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 93,000 17 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 294,000 18 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 677,000 19 Travel (54000) ................................... 193,000 20 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,823,000 21 Equipment (56000) ................................ 567,000 22 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 3,110,000 23 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 140,000 24 -------------- 25 Program account subtotal .................. 11,670,000 26 -------------- 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 Clean Air Fund 29 Operating Permit Program Account - 21451 30 For the direct and indirect costs of the 31 department of environmental conservation 32 associated with developing, implementing 33 and administering the operating permit 34 program, including suballocation to other 35 state departments and agencies. 36 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 37 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 38 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 39 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 40 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 41 appropriation for the budget division 42 program of the division of the budget, are 43 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully 45 stated (24779). 46 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,320,000 47 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 184,000 48 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 50,000 206 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 326,000 2 Travel (54000) ................................... 119,000 3 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,971,000 4 Equipment (56000) ................................ 230,000 5 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,142,000 6 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 97,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal ................... 8,439,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 12 Climate Initiative Account 13 For the eligible costs of the department of 14 environmental conservation associated with 15 developing, implementing and administering 16 climate initiatives, including suballo- 17 cation to other state departments and 18 agencies. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 20 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 21 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 22 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 23 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 24 appropriation for the budget division 25 program of the division of the budget, are 26 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 27 part of this appropriation as if fully 28 stated. 29 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,500,000 30 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 200,000 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 200,000 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 200,000 33 Travel (54000) .................................... 60,000 34 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 200,000 35 Equipment (56000) ................................. 40,000 36 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 500,000 37 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 100,000 38 -------------- 39 Program account subtotal ................... 3,000,000 40 -------------- 41 Special Revenue Funds - Other 42 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 43 Environmental Regulatory Account - 21081 44 For services and expenses related to facili- 45 ty compliance and monitoring including for 46 concentrated animal feeding operations and 47 dam safety. 207 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 2 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 3 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 4 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 5 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 6 appropriation for the budget division 7 program of the division of the budget, are 8 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully 10 stated (24779). 11 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,418,000 12 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 7,000 13 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 84,000 14 Travel (54000) .................................... 72,000 15 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 49,000 16 Equipment (56000) ................................. 86,000 17 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 859,000 18 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 39,000 19 -------------- 20 Program account subtotal ................... 2,614,000 21 -------------- 22 Special Revenue Funds - Other 23 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 24 Great Lakes Restoration Initiative Account - 21087 25 For services and expenses related to the 26 Great Lakes restoration initiative for the 27 purpose of sustainability and restoration 28 projects in the Great Lakes basin. Pursu- 29 ant to section 11 of the state finance 30 law, the department is authorized to 31 accept any monies from public corpo- 32 rations, not-for-profit corporations and 33 other non-governmental organizations for 34 purposes of Great Lakes restoration, 35 including suballocation to other state 36 departments and agencies. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 38 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 39 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 40 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 41 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 42 appropriation for the budget division 43 program of the division of the budget, are 44 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 45 part of this appropriation as if fully 46 stated (24779). 47 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,000,000 48 -------------- 208 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other 4 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 5 Hazardous Substances Bulk Storage Account - 21061 6 For services and expenses related to article 7 40 of the environmental conservation law. 8 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 9 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 10 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 11 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 12 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 13 appropriation for the budget division 14 program of the division of the budget, are 15 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 16 part of this appropriation as if fully 17 stated (24779). 18 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 89,000 19 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 15,000 20 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 21,000 21 Travel (54000) .................................... 16,000 22 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 33,000 23 Equipment (56000) .................................. 5,000 24 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 63,000 25 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 3,000 26 -------------- 27 Program account subtotal ..................... 245,000 28 -------------- 29 Special Revenue Funds - Other 30 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 31 UST Trust Recovery Account - 21083 32 For services and expenses related to the 33 spills program including suballocation to 34 other state departments and agencies. 35 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 36 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 37 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 38 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 39 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 40 appropriation for the budget division 41 program of the division of the budget, are 42 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 43 part of this appropriation as if fully 44 stated (24779). 45 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,133,000 46 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 5,000 209 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 686,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 31,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal ................... 1,855,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 8 Utility Environmental Regulation Account - 21064 9 For services and expenses related to utility 10 regulatory work. 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 12 to the contrary, direct and indirect 13 expenses relating to the department of 14 environmental conservation's participation 15 in state energy policy proceedings, or 16 certification proceedings or permits 17 issued pursuant to article 7, 8, or 10 of 18 the public service law, shall be deemed 19 expenses of the department of public 20 service within the meaning of section 18-a 21 of the public service law (24779). 22 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 300,000 23 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 202,000 24 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 11,000 25 -------------- 26 Program account subtotal ..................... 513,000 27 -------------- 28 Special Revenue Funds - Other 29 Environmental Protection and Oil Spill Compensation Fund 30 Department of Environmental Conservation Account - 21203 31 For services and expenses for cleanup and 32 removal of oil and chemical spills pursu- 33 ant to chapter 845 of the laws of 1977. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 35 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 36 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 37 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 38 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 39 appropriation for the budget division 40 program of the division of the budget, are 41 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 42 part of this appropriation as if fully 43 stated (24779). 44 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 9,766,000 45 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 167,000 46 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 309,000 210 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 635,000 2 Travel (54000) .................................... 71,000 3 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,603,000 4 Equipment (56000) ................................ 699,000 5 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 6,172,000 6 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 278,000 7 -------------- 8 Total amount available ...................... 19,700,000 9 -------------- 10 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 11 funds authorized in subparagraph (i) of 12 paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 13 186 of the navigation law related to oil 14 spill prevention and training necessary to 15 implement the oil spill prevention and 16 training provisions of subdivision 3 of 17 section 186 of the navigation law shall be 18 administered by the department of environ- 19 mental conservation. 20 For services and expenses related to petro- 21 leum spill prevention, including but not 22 limited to response or personal safety 23 equipment and supplies; identification, 24 mapping, and analysis of populations, 25 environmentally sensitive areas, and 26 resources at risk from spills of petroleum 27 and related impacts; the development, 28 implementation, and updating of contingen- 29 cy plans, including geographic response 30 plans; including personal service, nonper- 31 sonal service and fringe benefits, includ- 32 ing suballocation to other state depart- 33 ments and agencies (25750). 34 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 150,000 35 Travel (54000) ................................... 100,000 36 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 730,000 37 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,120,000 38 -------------- 39 Total amount available ....................... 2,100,000 40 -------------- 41 Program account subtotal .................. 21,800,000 42 -------------- 43 Special Revenue Funds - Other 44 New York Great Lakes Protection Fund 45 Great Lakes Protection Account - 22851 46 For services and expenses funded by the 47 Great Lakes protection fund, pursuant to 48 chapter 148 of the laws of 1990 and 211 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 section 97-ee of the state finance law, 2 including suballocation to other state 3 departments and agencies including the 4 state university of New York. 5 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 6 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 7 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 8 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 9 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 10 appropriation for the budget division 11 program of the division of the budget, are 12 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 13 part of this appropriation as if fully 14 stated (24779). 15 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 175,000 16 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 8,000 17 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 9,000 18 Travel (54000) .................................... 48,000 19 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 823,000 20 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 111,000 21 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 5,000 22 -------------- 23 Program account subtotal ................... 1,179,000 24 -------------- 25 Special Revenue Funds - Other 26 Sewage Treatment Program Management and Administration 27 Fund 28 ENCON Administration Account - 21002 29 For services and expenses for administration 30 of the water pollution control revolving 31 fund and related water quality activities 32 as permitted by law, including suballo- 33 cation to the environmental facilities 34 corporation. 35 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 36 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 37 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 38 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 39 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 40 appropriation for the budget division 41 program of the division of the budget, are 42 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 43 part of this appropriation as if fully 44 stated (24779). 45 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 577,000 46 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 30,000 47 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 32,000 212 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 366,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 17,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal ................... 1,022,000 5 -------------- 6 CLEAN WATER, CLEAN AIR, AND GREEN JOBS BOND ACT PROGRAM ..... 30,562,000 7 -------------- 8 General Fund 9 State Purposes Account - 10050 10 For services and expenses related to the 11 Clean Water, Clean Air, Green Jobs Envi- 12 ronmental Bond Act, including suballo- 13 cation to other state agencies, authori- 14 ties, and public benefit corporations. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 16 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 17 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 18 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 19 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 20 appropriation for the budget division 21 program of the division of the budget, are 22 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully 24 stated (62033). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 20,210,000 26 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 412,000 27 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 2,040,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 760,000 29 Travel (54000) .................................... 70,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,700,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................. 70,000 32 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 300,000 33 Indirect costs (58800) ......................... 3,000,000 34 -------------- 35 ENVIRONMENTAL ENFORCEMENT PROGRAM ........................... 89,103,000 36 -------------- 37 General Fund 38 State Purposes Account - 10050 39 For services and expenses of the enforcement 40 program, including suballocation to other 41 state departments and agencies. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 43 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 44 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 45 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 213 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 2 appropriation for the budget division 3 program of the division of the budget, are 4 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 5 part of this appropriation as if fully 6 stated (24793). 7 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 42,349,000 8 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 396,000 9 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 6,813,000 10 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 344,000 11 Travel (54000) .................................... 31,000 12 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 614,000 13 Equipment (56000) ................................. 34,000 14 -------------- 15 Total amount available ...................... 50,581,000 16 -------------- 17 For services and expenses of the implementa- 18 tion of the New York city watershed agree- 19 ment for activities including, but not 20 limited to enforcement, water quality 21 monitoring, technical assistance, estab- 22 lishing a master plan and zoning incentive 23 award program, providing grants to munici- 24 palities for reimbursement of planning and 25 zoning activities, and establishing a 26 watershed inspector general's office, 27 including suballocation to the departments 28 of health, state and law. Notwithstanding 29 any other provision of law to the contra- 30 ry, the director of the budget is hereby 31 authorized to transfer up to $800,000 of 32 this appropriation to local assistance to 33 the department of state for water quality 34 planning and implementation of competitive 35 grants to municipalities within the New 36 York City watershed for the purpose of 37 maintaining the filtration avoidance 38 determination issued by the United States 39 environmental protection agency. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 41 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 42 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 43 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 44 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 45 appropriation for the budget division 46 program of the division of the budget, are 47 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 48 part of this appropriation as if fully 49 stated (24794). 214 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,006,000 2 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 76,000 3 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 4,000 4 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 33,000 5 Travel (54000) .................................... 20,000 6 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 555,000 7 Equipment (56000) ................................. 10,000 8 -------------- 9 Total amount available ....................... 4,704,000 10 -------------- 11 Program account subtotal .................. 55,285,000 12 -------------- 13 Special Revenue Funds - Other 14 Conservation Fund 15 Conservation Fund Account - 21150 16 For services and expenses of the enforcement 17 program (24793). 18 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 239,000 19 Travel (54000) .................................... 11,000 20 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,469,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ................... 1,719,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Other 25 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 26 ENCON-Seized Assets Account - 21052 27 For services and expenses of the environ- 28 mental enforcement program in accordance 29 with a programmatic and financial plan to 30 be approved by the director of the budget. 31 The amounts appropriated herein may be 32 interchanged or transferred without limit 33 with any department of environmental 34 conservation asset seizure or asset 35 forfeiture special revenue account. 36 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 37 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 38 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 39 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 40 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 41 appropriation for the budget division 42 program of the division of the budget, are 43 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully 45 stated (24793). 215 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 53,000 2 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 79,000 3 Equipment (56000) ................................ 182,000 4 -------------- 5 Program account subtotal ..................... 314,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Other 8 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 9 Environmental Regulatory Account - 21081 10 For services and expenses of the environ- 11 mental enforcement program, including 12 suballocation to other state departments 13 and agencies. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 17 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 18 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 19 appropriation for the budget division 20 program of the division of the budget, are 21 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully 23 stated (24793). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 10,914,000 25 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 246,000 26 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 1,518,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,182,000 28 Travel (54000) ................................... 389,000 29 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,302,000 30 Equipment (56000) ................................ 274,000 31 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 7,279,000 32 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 328,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal .................. 24,432,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 38 Public Safety Recovery Account - 21077 39 For services and expenses related to fire 40 suppression, homeland security and other 41 public safety activities. This includes 42 access to miscellaneous special revenue 43 receipts associated with the pass-thru of 44 funds from federal agencies/departments in 45 conjunction with public safety or homeland 46 security purposes. Specifically, access to 47 funds deposited into this account from the 216 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Port Authority of New York/New Jersey, in 2 their capacity as fiduciary agency for 3 federal agencies/departments. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 5 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 6 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 7 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 8 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 9 appropriation for the budget division 10 program of the division of the budget, are 11 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully 13 stated (24793). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 50,000 15 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 50,000 16 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 24,000 17 Travel (54000) .................................... 24,000 18 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 846,000 19 Equipment (56000) ................................. 37,000 20 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 61,000 21 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 3,000 22 -------------- 23 Program account subtotal ................... 1,095,000 24 -------------- 25 Special Revenue Funds - Other 26 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 27 Utility Environmental Regulation Account - 21064 28 For services and expenses related to utility 29 regulatory work. 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 31 to the contrary, direct and indirect 32 expenses relating to the department of 33 environmental conservation's participation 34 in state energy policy proceedings, or 35 certification proceedings or permits 36 issued pursuant to article 7, 8, or 10 of 37 the public service law, shall be deemed 38 expenses of the department of public 39 service within the meaning of section 18-a 40 of the public service law (24793). 41 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 700,000 42 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 470,000 43 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 25,000 44 -------------- 45 Program account subtotal ................... 1,195,000 46 -------------- 47 Special Revenue Funds - Other 217 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 2 Waste Management and Cleanup Account - 21053 3 For services and expenses related to the 4 waste management and cleanup program 5 including suballocation to other state 6 departments and agencies. Notwithstanding 7 any other provision of law, the director 8 of the budget is hereby authorized to 9 transfer any or all of this appropriation 10 to local assistance to other state depart- 11 ments and agencies. 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 13 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 14 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 15 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 16 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 17 appropriation for the budget division 18 program of the division of the budget, are 19 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 20 part of this appropriation as if fully 21 stated (24793). 22 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,210,000 23 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 486,000 24 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 77,000 25 Travel (54000) .................................... 67,000 26 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 197,000 27 Equipment (56000) ................................. 77,000 28 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,625,000 29 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 74,000 30 -------------- 31 Program account subtotal ................... 4,813,000 32 -------------- 33 Special Revenue Funds - Other 34 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 35 Equitable Sharing-DEC Justice Account - 22231 36 For services and expenses of the environ- 37 mental enforcement program in accordance 38 with a programmatic and financial plan to 39 be approved by the director of the budget. 40 The amounts appropriated herein may be 41 interchanged or transferred without limit 42 with any department of environmental 43 conservation asset seizure or asset 44 forfeiture special revenue account. 45 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 46 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 47 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 48 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 218 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 2 appropriation for the budget division 3 program of the division of the budget, are 4 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 5 part of this appropriation as if fully 6 stated (24793). 7 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 34,000 8 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 9 Equipment (56000) ................................ 116,000 10 -------------- 11 Program account subtotal ..................... 200,000 12 -------------- 13 Special Revenue Funds - Other 14 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 15 Equitable Sharing-DEC Treasury Account - 22232 16 For services and expenses of the environ- 17 mental enforcement program in accordance 18 with a programmatic and financial plan to 19 be approved by the director of the budget. 20 The amounts appropriated herein may be 21 interchanged or transferred without limit 22 with any department of environmental 23 conservation asset seizure or asset 24 forfeiture special revenue account. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 26 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 27 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 28 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 29 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 30 appropriation for the budget division 31 program of the division of the budget, are 32 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 33 part of this appropriation as if fully 34 stated (24793). 35 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 9,000 36 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 12,000 37 Equipment (56000) ................................. 29,000 38 -------------- 39 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 40 -------------- 41 FISH, WILDLIFE AND MARINE RESOURCES PROGRAM ................ 107,851,000 42 -------------- 43 General Fund 44 State Purposes Account - 10050 219 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of the fish, wild- 2 life and marine resources program, includ- 3 ing suballocation to other state depart- 4 ments and agencies. 5 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 6 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 7 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 8 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 9 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 10 appropriation for the budget division 11 program of the division of the budget, are 12 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 13 part of this appropriation as if fully 14 stated (24717). 15 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 12,886,000 16 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 875,000 17 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 222,000 18 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,003,000 19 Travel (54000) .................................... 54,000 20 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,597,000 21 Equipment (56000) ................................. 68,000 22 -------------- 23 Total amount available ...................... 20,705,000 24 -------------- 25 For services and expenses related to the 26 natural resource damages program, includ- 27 ing suballocation to other state depart- 28 ments and agencies. 29 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 30 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 31 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 32 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 33 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 34 appropriation for the budget division 35 program of the division of the budget, are 36 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 37 part of this appropriation as if fully 38 stated (24795). 39 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 449,000 40 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 6,000 41 Travel (54000) ..................................... 7,000 42 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 2,000 43 -------------- 44 Total amount available ......................... 464,000 45 -------------- 46 Program account subtotal .................. 21,169,000 47 -------------- 48 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 220 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 2 Federal Environmental Conservation Fish, Wildlife, and 3 Marine Grants Account - 25334 4 For services and expenses related to fish 5 and wildlife purposes, including the Lake 6 Champlain sea lamprey control. A portion 7 of these funds may be transferred to aid 8 to localities and may be suballocated to 9 other state departments and agencies 10 (24717). 11 Personal service (50000) ...................... 10,260,000 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 18,626,000 13 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 6,114,000 14 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 6,121,000 15 -------------- 16 Program account subtotal .................. 41,121,000 17 -------------- 18 Special Revenue Funds - Other 19 Conservation Fund 20 Conservation Fund Account - 21150 21 For services and expenses of the fish, wild- 22 life and marine resources program, includ- 23 ing suballocation to other state depart- 24 ments and agencies (24717). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 17,261,000 26 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,964,000 27 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 415,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,566,000 29 Travel (54000) ................................... 307,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,117,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................ 407,000 32 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 11,836,000 33 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 533,000 34 -------------- 35 Total amount available ...................... 37,406,000 36 -------------- 37 For services and expenses for return a gift 38 to wildlife program projects pursuant to 39 chapter 4 of the laws of 1982 (24796). 40 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 500,000 41 -------------- 42 For services and expenses related to the 43 operation and maintenance of the depart- 221 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 ment of environmental conservation's auto- 2 mated computer license system (24797). 3 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,200,000 4 -------------- 5 For services and expenses related to the 6 federal electronic duck stamp act of 2005 7 (24798). 8 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 480,000 9 -------------- 10 Program account subtotal .................. 40,586,000 11 -------------- 12 Special Revenue Funds - Other 13 Conservation Fund 14 Guides License Account - 21153 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 fish, wildlife and marine resources 17 program (24717). 18 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 58,000 19 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 8,000 20 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 25,000 21 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 8,000 22 Equipment (56000) .................................. 7,000 23 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 40,000 24 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 2,000 25 -------------- 26 Program account subtotal ..................... 148,000 27 -------------- 28 Special Revenue Funds - Other 29 Conservation Fund 30 Marine Resources Account - 21151 31 For services and expenses related to the 32 fish, wildlife and marine resources 33 program (24717). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 500,000 35 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 380,000 36 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 48,000 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 616,000 38 Travel (54000) .................................... 45,000 39 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,614,000 40 Equipment (56000) ................................. 72,000 41 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 560,000 42 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 26,000 43 -------------- 222 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Program account subtotal ................... 3,861,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other 4 Conservation Fund 5 Venison Donation Account - 21157 6 For services and expenses related to the 7 fish, wildlife and marine resources 8 program (24717). 9 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 116,000 10 -------------- 11 Program account subtotal ..................... 116,000 12 -------------- 13 Special Revenue Funds - Other 14 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 15 Environmental Regulatory Account - 21081 16 For services and expenses related to 17 stewardship of state lands and facilities. 18 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 19 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 20 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 21 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 22 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 23 appropriation for the budget division 24 program of the division of the budget, are 25 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 26 part of this appropriation as if fully 27 stated (24717). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 357,000 29 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 7,000 30 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 34,000 31 Travel (54000) .................................... 32,000 32 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 24,000 33 Equipment (56000) ................................. 54,000 34 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 220,000 35 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 10,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ..................... 738,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Other 40 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 41 Marine and Coastal Account - 21055 42 For services and expenses related to conser- 43 vation, research, and education projects 223 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 relating to the marine and coastal 2 district of New York. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 4 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 6 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 7 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 8 appropriation for the budget division 9 program of the division of the budget, are 10 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully 12 stated (24717). 13 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 112,000 14 -------------- 15 Program account subtotal ..................... 112,000 16 -------------- 17 FOREST AND LAND RESOURCES PROGRAM ........................... 81,813,000 18 -------------- 19 General Fund 20 State Purposes Account - 10050 21 For services and expenses of the forest and 22 land resources program, including suballo- 23 cation to other state departments and 24 agencies. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 26 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 27 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 28 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 29 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 30 appropriation for the budget division 31 program of the division of the budget, are 32 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 33 part of this appropriation as if fully 34 stated (24799). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 31,732,000 36 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 731,000 37 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 3,062,000 38 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 540,000 39 Travel (54000) ................................... 149,000 40 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,913,000 41 Equipment (56000) ................................. 76,000 42 -------------- 43 Program account subtotal .................. 38,203,000 44 -------------- 45 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 46 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 224 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Federal Environmental Conservation Lands & Forest Grants 2 Account - 25334 3 For services and expenses related to the 4 federal environmental conservation lands 5 and forest grants. A portion of these 6 funds may be transferred to aid to locali- 7 ties and may be suballocated to other 8 state departments and agencies (24800). 9 Personal service (50000) ....................... 2,050,000 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 3,727,000 11 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,223,000 12 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 1,225,000 13 -------------- 14 Program account subtotal ................... 8,225,000 15 -------------- 16 Special Revenue Funds - Other 17 Conservation Fund 18 Outdoor Recreation and Trail Maintenance Account - 21158 19 For services and expenses of the forest and 20 land resources program, including trans- 21 fers to aid to localities or suballocation 22 to other state departments and agencies. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 24 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 25 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 26 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 27 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 28 appropriation for the budget division 29 program of the division of the budget, are 30 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 31 part of this appropriation as if fully 32 stated (24799). 33 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 11,000 34 -------------- 35 Program account subtotal ...................... 11,000 36 -------------- 37 Special Revenue Funds - Other 38 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 39 ENCON-Seized Assets Account - 21052 40 For services and expenses of the environ- 41 mental enforcement program in accordance 42 with a programmatic and financial plan to 43 be approved by the director of the budget. 44 The amounts appropriated herein may be 45 interchanged or transferred without limit 225 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 with any department of environmental 2 conservation asset seizure or asset 3 forfeiture special revenue account. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 5 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 6 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 7 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 8 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 9 appropriation for the budget division 10 program of the division of the budget, are 11 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully 13 stated (24799). 14 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 53,000 15 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 53,000 16 Equipment (56000) ................................ 104,000 17 -------------- 18 Program account subtotal ..................... 210,000 19 -------------- 20 Special Revenue Funds - Other 21 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 22 Environmental Regulatory Account - 21081 23 For services and expenses related to 24 stewardship of state lands and facilities. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 26 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 27 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 28 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 29 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 30 appropriation for the budget division 31 program of the division of the budget, are 32 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 33 part of this appropriation as if fully 34 stated (24799). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 421,000 36 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 7,000 37 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 56,000 38 Travel (54000) .................................... 40,000 39 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 27,000 40 Equipment (56000) ................................. 63,000 41 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 258,000 42 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 12,000 43 -------------- 44 Program account subtotal ..................... 884,000 45 -------------- 46 Special Revenue Funds - Other 47 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 226 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Mined Land Reclamation Account - 21084 2 For services and expenses related to the 3 forest and land resources program. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 5 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 6 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 7 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 8 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 9 appropriation for the budget division 10 program of the division of the budget, are 11 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully 13 stated (24799). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,162,000 15 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 83,000 16 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 23,000 17 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 155,000 18 Travel (54000) .................................... 28,000 19 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 135,000 20 Equipment (56000) ................................. 75,000 21 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,412,000 22 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 58,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal ................... 4,131,000 25 -------------- 26 Special Revenue Funds - Other 27 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 28 Natural Resources Account - 21082 29 For services and expenses of the forest and 30 land resources program, including suballo- 31 cation to other state departments and 32 agencies. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 34 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 35 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 36 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 37 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 38 appropriation for the budget division 39 program of the division of the budget, are 40 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 41 part of this appropriation as if fully 42 stated (24799). 43 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,170,000 44 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,146,000 45 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 108,000 46 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 473,000 47 Travel (54000) .................................... 87,000 227 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 690,000 2 Equipment (56000) ................................ 141,000 3 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,666,000 4 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 120,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ................... 8,601,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Other 9 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 10 Oil and Gas Account - 21054 11 For services and expenses related to the 12 forest and land resources program. 13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 14 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 15 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 16 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 17 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 18 appropriation for the budget division 19 program of the division of the budget, are 20 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully 22 stated (24799). 23 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 21,000 24 Travel (54000) .................................... 21,000 25 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 241,000 26 Equipment (56000) ................................. 11,000 27 -------------- 28 Program account subtotal ..................... 294,000 29 -------------- 30 Special Revenue Funds - Other 31 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 32 Recreation Account - 21067 33 For services and expenses related to the 34 administration and operation of the forest 35 and land resources program, including 36 transfers to aid to localities or suballo- 37 cation to other state departments and 38 agencies, providing that moneys hereby 39 appropriated shall be available to the 40 program net of refunds, rebates, 41 reimbursements and credits and deductions 42 taken by contractors for fees associated 43 with recreational and environmental 44 programs and facilities. 45 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 46 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 47 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 228 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 2 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 3 appropriation for the budget division 4 program of the division of the budget, are 5 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 6 part of this appropriation as if fully 7 stated (24799). 8 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,717,000 9 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 9,006,000 10 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 932,000 11 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 3,103,000 12 Travel (54000) ..................................... 8,000 13 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,716,000 14 Equipment (56000) ................................ 119,000 15 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,584,000 16 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 316,000 17 -------------- 18 Program account subtotal .................. 20,501,000 19 -------------- 20 Special Revenue Funds - Other 21 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 22 Public Safety Recovery Account - 21077 23 For services and expenses related to fire 24 suppression, homeland security and other 25 public safety activities. This includes 26 access to miscellaneous special revenue 27 receipts associated with the pass-thru of 28 funds from federal agencies/departments in 29 conjunction with public safety or homeland 30 security purposes. Specifically, access to 31 funds deposited into this account from the 32 Port Authority of New York/New Jersey, in 33 their capacity as fiduciary agency for 34 federal agencies/departments. 35 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 36 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 37 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 38 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 39 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 40 appropriation for the budget division 41 program of the division of the budget, are 42 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 43 part of this appropriation as if fully 44 stated (24799). 45 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 50,000 46 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 50,000 47 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 40,000 48 Travel (54000) .................................... 40,000 229 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 240,000 2 Equipment (56000) ................................. 19,000 3 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 61,000 4 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 3,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ..................... 503,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Other 9 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 10 Equitable Sharing-DEC Justice Account - 22231 11 For services and expenses of the environ- 12 mental enforcement program in accordance 13 with a programmatic and financial plan to 14 be approved by the director of the budget. 15 The amounts appropriated herein may be 16 interchanged or transferred without limit 17 with any department of environmental 18 conservation asset seizure or asset 19 forfeiture special revenue account. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 21 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 23 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 24 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 25 appropriation for the budget division 26 program of the division of the budget, are 27 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully 29 stated (24799). 30 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 31 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 32 Equipment (56000) ................................ 100,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal ..................... 200,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 38 Equitable Sharing-DEC Treasury Account - 22232 39 For services and expenses of the environ- 40 mental enforcement program in accordance 41 with a programmatic and financial plan to 42 be approved by the director of the budget. 43 The amounts appropriated herein may be 44 interchanged or transferred without limit 45 with any department of environmental 46 conservation asset seizure or asset 47 forfeiture special revenue account. 230 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 2 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 3 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 4 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 5 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 6 appropriation for the budget division 7 program of the division of the budget, are 8 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully 10 stated (24799). 11 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 13,000 12 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 12,000 13 Equipment (56000) ................................. 25,000 14 -------------- 15 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 16 -------------- 17 LAKE GEORGE PARK COMMISSION PROGRAM .......................... 2,797,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other 20 Lake George Park Trust Fund 21 Lake George Park Account - 22751 22 For services and expenses of the Lake George 23 park commission, including suballocation 24 to other state departments and agencies. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 26 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 27 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 28 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 29 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 30 appropriation for the budget division 31 program of the division of the budget, are 32 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 33 part of this appropriation as if fully 34 stated (34801). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 870,000 36 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 200,000 37 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 30,000 38 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 100,000 39 Travel (54000) .................................... 15,000 40 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 405,000 41 Equipment (56000) ................................ 292,000 42 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 500,000 43 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 35,000 44 -------------- 45 Program account subtotal ................... 2,447,000 46 -------------- 231 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 3 Lake George Invasive Species Account - 22212 4 For services and expenses of administering 5 the invasive species program (34801). 6 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 35,000 7 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 285,000 8 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 20,000 9 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 10,000 10 -------------- 11 Program account subtotal ..................... 350,000 12 -------------- 13 OPERATIONS PROGRAM .......................................... 46,989,000 14 -------------- 15 General Fund 16 State Purposes Account - 10050 17 For services and expenses of the operations 18 program, including suballocation to other 19 state departments and agencies. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 21 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 23 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 24 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 25 appropriation for the budget division 26 program of the division of the budget, are 27 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully 29 stated (81003). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 21,718,000 31 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 868,000 32 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 690,000 33 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 3,574,000 34 Travel (54000) ................................... 289,000 35 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,139,000 36 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,097,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal .................. 31,375,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other 41 Conservation Fund 42 Conservation Fund Account - 21150 43 For services and expenses of the operations 44 program (81003). 232 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 777,000 2 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 7,000 3 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,125,000 4 Travel (54000) .................................... 35,000 5 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 893,000 6 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 473,000 7 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 22,000 8 -------------- 9 Program account subtotal ................... 3,332,000 10 -------------- 11 Special Revenue Funds - Other 12 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 13 Energy Efficient Rebate Account - 21051 14 For services and expenses related to energy 15 rebate activities. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 19 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 20 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 21 appropriation for the budget division 22 program of the division of the budget, are 23 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully 25 stated (81003). 26 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 100,000 27 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 108,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal ..................... 208,000 30 -------------- 31 Special Revenue Funds - Other 32 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 33 Environmental Regulatory Account - 21081 34 For services and expenses related to 35 stewardship of state lands and facilities. 36 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 37 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 38 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 39 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 40 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 41 appropriation for the budget division 42 program of the division of the budget, are 43 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully 45 stated (81003). 233 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 221,000 2 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 6,000 3 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 74,000 4 Travel (54000) .................................... 44,000 5 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 43,000 6 Equipment (56000) ................................. 67,000 7 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 137,000 8 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 7,000 9 -------------- 10 Program account subtotal ..................... 599,000 11 -------------- 12 Special Revenue Funds - Other 13 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 14 Indirect Charges Account - 21060 15 For services and expenses of the operations 16 program. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 18 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 19 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 20 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 21 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 22 appropriation for the budget division 23 program of the division of the budget, are 24 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully 26 stated (81003). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,112,000 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 26,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 620,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,370,000 31 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,289,000 32 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 58,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal .................. 11,475,000 35 -------------- 36 SOLID AND HAZARDOUS WASTE MANAGEMENT PROGRAM ................ 75,304,000 37 -------------- 38 General Fund 39 State Purposes Account - 10050 40 For services and expenses of the solid and 41 hazardous waste management program, 42 including suballocation to other state 43 agencies. 44 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 45 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 46 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 234 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 2 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 3 appropriation for the budget division 4 program of the division of the budget, are 5 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 6 part of this appropriation as if fully 7 stated (81013). 8 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 10,643,000 9 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 552,000 10 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 164,000 11 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 102,000 12 Travel (54000) .................................... 21,000 13 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 526,000 14 Equipment (56000) .................................. 6,000 15 -------------- 16 Program account subtotal .................. 12,014,000 17 -------------- 18 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 19 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 20 Federal Environmental Conservation Solid Waste Grant 21 Account - 25334 22 For services and expenses related to solid 23 waste purposes. A portion of these funds 24 may be transferred to aid to localities 25 and may be suballocated to other state 26 departments and agencies (81013). 27 Personal service (50000) ....................... 3,788,000 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,254,000 29 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 2,258,000 30 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 1,254,000 31 -------------- 32 Program account subtotal ................... 8,554,000 33 -------------- 34 Special Revenue Funds - Other 35 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 36 Environmental Monitoring Account - 21085 37 For services and expenses for the environ- 38 mental monitoring program including subal- 39 location to other state departments and 40 agencies and including research, analysis, 41 monitoring activities, natural resource 42 damages activities, activities of the Lake 43 Champlain management conference, activ- 44 ities of the Great Lakes commission, 45 activities of the joint dredging plan for 46 the port of New York and New Jersey, and 235 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 environmental monitoring at all facilities 2 subject to the jurisdiction of the depart- 3 ment of environmental conservation. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 5 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 6 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 7 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 8 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 9 appropriation for the budget division 10 program of the division of the budget, are 11 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully 13 stated (81013). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 8,134,000 15 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 87,000 16 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,253,000 17 Travel (54000) ................................. 1,163,000 18 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,003,000 19 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,243,000 20 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 4,954,000 21 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 223,000 22 -------------- 23 Program account subtotal .................. 20,060,000 24 -------------- 25 Special Revenue Funds - Other 26 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 27 Environmental Regulatory Account - 21081 28 For services and expenses of the solid and 29 hazardous waste program including suballo- 30 cation to other state departments and 31 agencies. 32 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 33 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 34 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 35 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 36 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 37 appropriation for the budget division 38 program of the division of the budget, are 39 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 40 part of this appropriation as if fully 41 stated (81013). 42 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,629,000 43 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 335,000 44 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 17,000 45 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 504,000 46 Travel (54000) ................................... 248,000 47 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,672,000 48 Equipment (56000) ................................ 427,000 236 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,399,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 108,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal ................... 9,339,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 8 Low Level Radioactive Waste Account - 21066 9 For services and expenses of the solid and 10 hazardous waste management program. 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 12 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 13 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 14 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 15 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 16 appropriation for the budget division 17 program of the division of the budget, are 18 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 19 part of this appropriation as if fully 20 stated (81013). 21 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 919,000 22 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 44,000 23 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 16,000 24 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 70,000 25 Travel (54000) .................................... 61,000 26 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 928,000 27 Equipment (56000) ................................. 31,000 28 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 590,000 29 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 27,000 30 -------------- 31 Program account subtotal ................... 2,686,000 32 -------------- 33 Special Revenue Funds - Other 34 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 35 Waste Management and Cleanup Account - 21053 36 For services and expenses related to the 37 waste management and cleanup program 38 including suballocation to other state 39 departments and agencies. Notwithstanding 40 any other provision of law, the director 41 of the budget is hereby authorized to 42 transfer any or all of this appropriation 43 to local assistance to other state depart- 44 ments and agencies. 45 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 46 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 47 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 237 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 2 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 3 appropriation for the budget division 4 program of the division of the budget, are 5 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 6 part of this appropriation as if fully 7 stated (81013). 8 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 10,273,000 9 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 7,000 10 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 123,000 11 Travel (54000) ................................... 320,000 12 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,144,000 13 Equipment (56000) ................................ 310,000 14 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 6,195,000 15 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 279,000 16 -------------- 17 Program account subtotal .................. 22,651,000 18 -------------- 238 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Other 3 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 4 Federal Grant Indirect Cost Recovery Account - 21065 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 6 For services and expenses related to the administration of special 7 revenue funds - federal. 8 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 9 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 10 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 11 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 12 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 13 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 9,165,000 ..... (re. $1,551,000) 15 Temporary service (50200) ... 6,000 ..................... (re. $6,000) 16 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 19,000 ........ (re. $9,000) 17 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 176,000 ............ (re. $120,000) 18 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 .............................. (re. $12,000) 19 Contractual services (51000) ... 753,000 .............. (re. $753,000) 20 Equipment (56000) ... 4,000 ............................. (re. $2,000) 21 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 6,105,000 ............... (re. $5,220,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 23 For services and expenses related to the administration of special 24 revenue funds - federal (81001). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 9,382,000 ........ (re. $49,000) 26 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 32,000 .............. (re. $16,000) 27 Travel (54000) ... 8,000 ................................ (re. $8,000) 28 Contractual services (51000) ... 810,000 .............. (re. $400,000) 29 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 4,152,000 ............... (re. $3,870,000) 30 AIR AND WATER QUALITY MANAGEMENT PROGRAM 31 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 32 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 33 Federal Environmental Conservation Air Resources Grants Account - 34 25334 35 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as 36 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 37 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 38 For services and expenses related to air resources purposes. A portion 39 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 40 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24780). 41 Personal service (50000) ... 4,742,000 .............. (re. $2,668,000) 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,201,000 ........... (re. $2,201,000) 43 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,057,000 ............... (re. $1,742,000) 44 Indirect costs (58850) ... 452,000 .................... (re. $452,000) 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 239 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to air resources purposes. A portion 2 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 3 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24780). 4 Personal service (50000) ... 4,742,000 .............. (re. $1,521,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,201,000 ........... (re. $1,045,000) 6 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,057,000 ................. (re. $997,000) 7 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as 8 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 9 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 10 For services and expenses related to air resources purposes. A portion 11 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 12 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24780). 13 Personal service (50000) ... 4,742,000 ................ (re. $637,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,324,000 ........... (re. $2,283,000) 15 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,934,000 ................. (re. $330,000) 16 Indirect costs (58850) ... 12,000 ...................... (re. $12,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 18 For services and expenses related to air resources purposes. A portion 19 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 20 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24780). 21 Personal service (50000) ... 4,742,000 .............. (re. $1,103,000) 22 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,520,000 ........... (re. $1,658,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,738,000 ................. (re. $514,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 25 For services and expenses related to air resources purposes. A portion 26 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 27 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24780). 28 Personal service (50000) ... 4,742,000 ................ (re. $945,000) 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,520,000 ............. (re. $838,000) 30 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,738,000 ................. (re. $536,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 32 For services and expenses related to air resources purposes. A portion 33 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 34 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24780). 35 Personal service (50000) ... 4,742,000 ................ (re. $922,000) 36 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,366,000 ............... (re. $2,000) 37 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,892,000 ................. (re. $363,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 39 For services and expenses related to air resources purposes. A portion 40 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 41 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24780). 42 Personal service (50000) ... 4,742,000 .............. (re. $1,760,000) 43 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,294,000 ............. (re. $333,000) 44 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,964,000 ............... (re. $1,399,000) 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 240 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to air resources purposes. A portion 2 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 3 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24780). 4 Personal service (50000) ... 4,629,000 ................ (re. $301,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,594,000 ............. (re. $940,000) 6 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,777,000 ................. (re. $183,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 8 For services and expenses related to air resources purposes. A portion 9 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 10 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24780). 11 Personal service (50000) ... 4,782,000 ................ (re. $480,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,519,000 .............. (re. $30,000) 13 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,699,000 ................. (re. $350,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 15 For services and expenses related to air resources purposes. A portion 16 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 17 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24780). 18 Personal service (50000) ... 4,455,000 .................. (re. $7,000) 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,010,000 ........... (re. $1,155,000) 20 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,535,000 ................... (re. $6,000) 21 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 22 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 23 Federal Environmental Conservation Spills Management Grant Account - 24 25334 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 For services and expenses related to spills management purposes. A 27 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 28 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24782). 29 Personal service (50000) ... 3,695,000 .............. (re. $3,695,000) 30 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 924,000 ............... (re. $924,000) 31 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,381,000 ............... (re. $2,381,000) 32 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 33 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 34 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 35 For services and expenses related to spills management purposes. A 36 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 37 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24782). 38 Personal service (50000) ... 3,695,000 .............. (re. $2,609,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 924,000 ............... (re. $924,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,381,000 ............... (re. $1,688,000) 41 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,300,000 ................ (re. $1,300,000) 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 43 For services and expenses related to spills management purposes. A 44 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 45 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24782). 46 Personal service (50000) ... 3,695,000 .............. (re. $3,695,000) 241 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,020,000 ........... (re. $1,020,000) 2 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,285,000 ............... (re. $2,285,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 4 For services and expenses related to spills management purposes. A 5 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 6 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24782). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 2,295,000 .............. (re. $1,811,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,381,000 .............. (re. $81,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,324,000 ............... (re. $1,046,000) 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 11 For services and expenses related to spills management purposes. A 12 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 13 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24782). 14 Personal service (50000) ... 2,295,000 .............. (re. $1,571,000) 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,381,000 ........... (re. $2,424,000) 16 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,324,000 ................. (re. $864,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 18 For services and expenses related to spills management purposes. A 19 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 20 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24782). 21 Personal service (50000) ... 2,295,000 ................ (re. $146,000) 22 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,306,000 ........... (re. $3,306,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,399,000 .................. (re. $97,000) 24 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 25 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 26 Federal Environmental Conservation Water Grants Account - 25334 27 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as 28 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 29 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 30 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes. A 31 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 32 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24784). 33 Personal service (50000) ... 7,887,000 .............. (re. $7,635,000) 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 13,860,000 ......... (re. $13,853,000) 35 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,158,000 ............... (re. $5,003,000) 36 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,724,000 ................ (re. $2,724,000) 37 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 38 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 39 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 40 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes. A 41 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 42 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24784). 43 Personal service (50000) ... 7,333,000 .............. (re. $1,048,000) 44 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,836,000 ......... (re. $12,634,000) 45 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 4,729,000 ................. (re. $729,000) 46 Indirect costs (58850) ... 526,000 .................... (re. $526,000) 242 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as 2 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 3 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 4 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes. A 5 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 6 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24784). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 8,523,000 .............. (re. $1,597,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 11,100,000 ......... (re. $10,179,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,275,000 ................. (re. $852,000) 10 Indirect costs (58850) ... 715,000 .................... (re. $715,000) 11 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as 12 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 13 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 14 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes. A 15 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 16 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24784). 17 Personal service (50000) ... 8,654,000 .............. (re. $1,226,000) 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 11,246,000 .......... (re. $9,215,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 4,998,000 ................. (re. $520,000) 20 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 21 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as 22 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 93 of the 23 state finance law, are hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 24 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes. A 25 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 26 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24784). 27 Personal service (50000) ... 9,581,000 .............. (re. $1,721,000) 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) .......................................... 29 [9,759,000] 9,074,000 ............................. (re. $6,267,000) 30 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,558,000 ................. (re. $915,000) 31 Indirect costs (58850) ... 685,000 .................... (re. $685,000) 32 The appropriation made by chapter 54, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as 33 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 93 of the 34 state finance law, are hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 35 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes. A 36 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 37 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24784). 38 Personal service (50000) ... 9,549,000 ................ (re. $392,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) .......................................... 40 [9,327,000] 9,227,000 ............................. (re. $2,406,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,022,000 ................. (re. $533,000) 42 Indirect costs (58850) ... 100,000 .................... (re. $100,000) 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 44 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes. A 45 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 46 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24784). 47 Personal service (50000) ... 10,032,000 ............. (re. $1,534,000) 48 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 8,595,000 ........... (re. $5,906,000) 243 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,271,000 ............... (re. $1,236,000) 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 3 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes. A 4 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 5 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24784). 6 Personal service (50000) ... 10,177,000 ............... (re. $745,000) 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 8,614,000 ........... (re. $4,080,000) 8 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,107,000 ................. (re. $553,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 10 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes. A 11 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 12 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24784). 13 Personal service (50000) ... 9,630,000 .............. (re. $1,670,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 9,892,000 ........... (re. $7,413,000) 15 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,376,000 ................. (re. $937,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 17 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes. A 18 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 19 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24784). 20 Personal service (50000) ... 9,802,000 .............. (re. $3,397,000) 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 9,517,000 ........... (re. $2,457,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,579,000 ............... (re. $2,186,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 24 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes. A 25 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 26 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24784). 27 Personal service (50000) ... 10,155,000 ............... (re. $650,000) 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 9,012,000 .............. (re. $65,000) 29 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,731,000 ................. (re. $563,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 31 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes. A 32 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 33 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24784). 34 Personal service (50000) ... 10,155,000 ............. (re. $2,631,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 8,778,000 ........... (re. $5,217,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,965,000 ............... (re. $1,605,000) 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 50, 38 section 1, of the laws of 2016: 39 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes. A 40 portion of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and 41 may be suballocated to other state departments and agencies (24784). 42 Personal service (50000) ... 9,657,000 .............. (re. $2,801,000) 43 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 10,392,000 .......... (re. $8,122,000) 44 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 4,849,000 ............... (re. $1,337,000) 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 244 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes, includ- 2 ing suballocation to other state departments and agencies (24784). 3 Personal service (50000) ... 9,340,000 .............. (re. $3,432,000) 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 9,545,000 ........... (re. $4,495,000) 5 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 4,566,000 ............... (re. $1,724,000) 6 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 7 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes, includ- 8 ing suballocation to other state departments and agencies (24784). 9 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,191,000 ........... (re. $1,314,000) 10 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,738,000 ................... (re. $5,000) 11 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 12 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 13 Great Lakes Restoration Initiative Account - 25334 14 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 15 For services and expenses related to water resource purposes, includ- 16 ing suballocation to other state departments and agencies (24896) 17 ... 59,000,000 ................................... (re. $45,184,000) 18 CLEAN WATER, CLEAN AIR, AND GREEN JOBS BOND ACT PROGRAM 19 General Fund 20 State Purposes Account - 10050 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 22 For services and expenses related to the Clean Water, Clean Air, Green 23 Jobs Environmental Bond Act, including suballocation to other state 24 agencies, authorities, and public benefit corporations. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 26 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 27 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 28 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 29 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 30 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (62033). 31 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 20,210,000 ... (re. $18,953,000) 32 Temporary service (50200) ... 412,000 ................. (re. $362,000) 33 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ................................ 34 2,040,000 ......................................... (re. $2,039,000) 35 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 760,000 ............ (re. $760,000) 36 Travel (54000) ... 70,000 .............................. (re. $70,000) 37 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,700,000 .......... (re. $3,672,000) 38 Equipment (56000) ... 70,000 ........................... (re. $70,000) 39 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 300,000 ................... (re. $300,000) 40 Indirect costs (58800) ... 3,000,000 ................ (re. $3,000,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 50, 42 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 43 For services and expenses related to the Clean Water, Clean Air, Green 44 Jobs Environmental Bond Act, including suballocation to other state 45 agencies, authorities, and public benefit corporations. 245 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 2 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 3 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 4 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 5 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 6 part of this appropriation as if fully stated.(62033) 7 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 19,620,000 .... (re. $9,629,000) 8 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ................................ 9 80,000 ............................................... (re. $80,000) 10 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 230,000 ............ (re. $230,000) 11 Travel (54000) ... 70,000 .............................. (re. $70,000) 12 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,200,000 ............ (re. $686,000) 13 Indirect costs (58800) ... 2,577,000 ................ (re. $2,577,000) 14 General State Charges (60000) ... 223,000 ............. (re. $223,000) 15 ENVIRONMENTAL ENFORCEMENT PROGRAM 16 General Fund 17 State Purposes Account - 10050 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 19 For services and expenses of the implementation of the New York city 20 watershed agreement for activities including, but not limited to 21 enforcement, water quality monitoring, technical assistance, estab- 22 lishing a master plan and zoning incentive award program, providing 23 grants to municipalities for reimbursement of planning and zoning 24 activities, and establishing a watershed inspector general's office, 25 including suballocation to the departments of health, state and law. 26 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the 27 director of the budget is hereby authorized to transfer up to 28 $800,000 of this appropriation to local assistance to the department 29 of state for water quality planning and implementation of compet- 30 itive grants to municipalities within the New York City watershed 31 for the purpose of maintaining the filtration avoidance determi- 32 nation issued by the United States environmental protection agency. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 34 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 35 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 36 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 37 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 38 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (24794). 39 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,006,000 ..... (re. $2,873,000) 40 Temporary service (50200) ... 76,000 ................... (re. $76,000) 41 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 4,000 ......... (re. $4,000) 42 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 33,000 .............. (re. $33,000) 43 Travel (54000) ... 20,000 .............................. (re. $20,000) 44 Contractual services (51000) ... 555,000 .............. (re. $555,000) 45 Equipment (56000) ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000) 46 FISH, WILDLIFE AND MARINE RESOURCES PROGRAM 47 General Fund 246 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 State Purposes Account - 10050 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 3 For services and expenses related to the marketing the outdoors 4 program or any programs implemented by state agencies, departments 5 or public benefit corporations to increase sporting and outdoors 6 tourism or increase public participation in hunting, fishing and 7 other outdoor recreational activities in the state. Funds shall be 8 made available pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of 9 the department of environmental conservation in consultation with 10 the commissioners of the office of parks, recreation and historic 11 preservation and the department of economic development and approved 12 by the director of the budget. 13 Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 14 other state department, agency, or public benefit corporation, or 15 made available for transfer or deposit into any state fund, includ- 16 ing but not limited to the conservation fund to achieve this purpose 17 (25689). 18 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,500,000 .......... (re. $2,500,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 20 For services and expenses related to the marketing the outdoors 21 program or any programs implemented by state agencies, departments 22 or public benefit corporations to increase sporting and outdoors 23 tourism or increase public participation in hunting, fishing and 24 other outdoor recreational activities in the state. Funds shall be 25 made available pursuant to a plan developed by the commissioner of 26 the department of environmental conservation in consultation with 27 the commissioners of the office of parks, recreation and historic 28 preservation and the department of economic development and approved 29 by the director of the budget. 30 Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 31 other state department, agency, or public benefit corporation, or 32 made available for transfer or deposit into any state fund, includ- 33 ing but not limited to the conservation fund to achieve this purpose 34 (25689). 35 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,500,000 .......... (re. $2,500,000) 36 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 37 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 38 Federal Environmental Conservation Fish, Wildlife, and Marine Grants 39 Account - 25334 40 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as 41 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 42 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 43 For services and expenses related to fish and wildlife purposes, 44 including the Lake Champlain sea lamprey control. A portion of these 45 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 46 cated to other state departments and agencies (24717). 47 Personal service (50000) ... 9,898,000 .............. (re. $7,516,000) 48 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 18,624,000 ......... (re. $14,109,000) 247 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,478,000 ............... (re. $5,045,000) 2 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,455,000 ................ (re. $2,455,000) 3 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 4 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 5 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 6 For services and expenses related to fish and wildlife purposes, 7 including the Lake Champlain sea lamprey control. A portion of these 8 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 9 cated to other state departments and agencies (24717). 10 Personal service (50000) ... 9,898,000 ................ (re. $717,000) 11 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 11,723,000 .......... (re. $3,225,000) 12 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,379,000 ................. (re. $561,000) 13 Indirect costs (58850) ... 461,000 .................... (re. $461,000) 14 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as 15 amended by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, and as 16 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 17 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 18 For services and expenses related to fish and wildlife purposes, 19 including the Lake Champlain sea lamprey control. A portion of these 20 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 21 cated to other state departments and agencies (24717). 22 Personal service (50000) ... 9,898,000 .............. (re. $2,303,000) 23 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,190,000 .......... (re. $2,203,000) 24 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,712,000 ................. (re. $908,000) 25 Indirect costs (58850) ... 15,000 ...................... (re. $15,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 50, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 28 For services and expenses related to fish and wildlife purposes, 29 including the Lake Champlain sea lamprey control. A portion of these 30 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 31 cated to other state departments and agencies (24717). 32 Personal service (50000) ... 9,898,000 .............. (re. $2,214,000) 33 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,190,000 .......... (re. $2,639,000) 34 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,712,000 ................. (re. $978,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 36 For services and expenses related to fish and wildlife purposes, 37 including the Lake Champlain sea lamprey control. A portion of these 38 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 39 cated to other state departments and agencies (24717). 40 Personal service (50000) ... 9,898,000 ................ (re. $486,000) 41 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,390,000 .......... (re. $4,917,000) 42 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,712,000 ................. (re. $166,000) 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 44 For services and expenses related to fish and wildlife purposes, 45 including the Lake Champlain sea lamprey control. A portion of these 46 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 47 cated to other state departments and agencies (24717). 248 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ... 9,898,000 ................ (re. $872,000) 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,068,000 .......... (re. $2,691,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,034,000 ................. (re. $638,000) 4 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as 5 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 93 of the 6 state finance law, are hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 7 For services and expenses related to fish and wildlife purposes, 8 including the Lake Champlain sea lamprey control. A portion of these 9 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 10 cated to other state departments and agencies (24717). 11 Personal service (50000) ... 10,423,000 ............. (re. $2,771,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) .......................................... 13 [11,065,000] 10,865,000 ........................... (re. $3,398,000) 14 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,512,000 ................. (re. $624,000) 15 Indirect costs (58850) ... 200,000 .................... (re. $200,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 17 For services and expenses related to fish and wildlife purposes, 18 including the Lake Champlain sea lamprey control. A portion of these 19 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 20 cated to other state departments and agencies (24717). 21 Personal service (50000) ... 10,423,000 ............. (re. $1,379,000) 22 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 11,326,000 .......... (re. $3,723,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,251,000 ............... (re. $2,296,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 25 For services and expenses related to fish and wildlife purposes, 26 including the Lake Champlain sea lamprey control. A portion of these 27 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 28 cated to other state departments and agencies (24717). 29 Personal service (50000) ... 10,577,000 ............. (re. $1,425,000) 30 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 11,524,000 .......... (re. $2,073,000) 31 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,899,000 ............... (re. $1,791,000) 32 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as 33 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 93 of the 34 state finance law, are hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 35 For services and expenses related to fish and wildlife purposes, 36 including the Lake Champlain sea lamprey control. A portion of these 37 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 38 cated to other state departments and agencies (24717). 39 Personal service (50000) ... 10,657,000 ............. (re. $2,886,000) 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) .......................................... 41 [11,635,000] 11,628,000 ........................... (re. $4,223,000) 42 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,708,000 ................. (re. $834,000) 43 Indirect costs (58850) ... 7,000 ........................ (re. $7,000) 44 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 45 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 46 Federal Environmental Conservation USDA Account - 25007 249 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 50, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 3 For services and expenses related to fish and wildlife purposes, 4 including the Lake Champlain sea lamprey control. A portion of these 5 funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be suballo- 6 cated to other state departments and agencies (24717). 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 200,000 ................ (re. $66,000) 8 FOREST AND LAND RESOURCES PROGRAM 9 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 10 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 11 Federal Environmental Conservation USDA Account - 25007 12 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as 13 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 14 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 15 For services and expenses related to the federal environmental conser- 16 vation lands and forest grants. A portion of these funds may be 17 transferred to aid to localities and may be suballocated to other 18 state departments and agencies (24800). 19 Personal service (50000) ... 1,050,000 ................ (re. $773,000) 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,299,000 ........... (re. $3,299,000) 21 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 651,000 ................... (re. $553,000) 22 Indirect costs (58850) ... 312,000 .................... (re. $312,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 24 For services and expenses related to the federal environmental conser- 25 vation lands and forest grants. A portion of these funds may be 26 transferred to aid to localities and may be suballocated to other 27 state departments and agencies (24800). 28 Personal service (50000) ... 1,050,000 ................ (re. $487,000) 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,308,000 ........... (re. $1,367,000) 30 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 642,000 ................... (re. $323,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 32 For services and expenses related to the federal environmental conser- 33 vation lands and forest grants. A portion of these funds may be 34 transferred to aid to localities and may be suballocated to other 35 state departments and agencies (24800). 36 Personal service (50000) ... 1,050,000 ................. (re. $80,000) 37 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,308,000 ........... (re. $1,173,000) 38 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 642,000 .................... (re. $69,000) 39 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 40 For services and expenses related to the federal environmental conser- 41 vation lands and forest grants. A portion of these funds may be 42 transferred to aid to localities and may be suballocated to other 43 state departments and agencies (24800). 44 Personal service (50000) ... 1,050,000 ................. (re. $87,000) 45 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,308,000 ........... (re. $2,121,000) 46 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 642,000 .................... (re. $63,000) 250 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 2 For services and expenses related to the federal environmental conser- 3 vation lands and forest grants. A portion of these funds may be 4 transferred to aid to localities and may be suballocated to other 5 state departments and agencies (24800). 6 Personal service (50000) ... 1,050,000 ................. (re. $28,000) 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,292,000 ........... (re. $2,144,000) 8 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 658,000 .................... (re. $20,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 10 For services and expenses related to the federal environmental conser- 11 vation lands and forest grants. A portion of these funds may be 12 transferred to aid to localities and may be suballocated to other 13 state departments and agencies (24800). 14 Personal service (50000) ... 1,050,000 ................ (re. $366,000) 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,319,000 ........... (re. $1,177,000) 16 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 631,000 ................... (re. $255,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 18 For services and expenses related to the federal environmental conser- 19 vation lands and forest grants. A portion of these funds may be 20 transferred to aid to localities and may be suballocated to other 21 state departments and agencies (24800). 22 Personal service (50000) ... 1,030,000 ................. (re. $43,000) 23 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,394,000 ........... (re. $2,298,000) 24 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 576,000 .................... (re. $16,000) 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 26 For services and expenses related to the federal environmental conser- 27 vation lands and forest grants. A portion of these funds may be 28 transferred to aid to localities and may be suballocated to other 29 state departments and agencies (24800). 30 Personal service (50000) ... 1,000,000 ................ (re. $107,000) 31 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,430,000 ........... (re. $2,278,000) 32 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 570,000 .................... (re. $55,000) 33 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 34 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 35 Federal Environmental Conservation Forest and Land Resource Grants 36 Account - 25334 37 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as 38 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 39 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 40 For services and expenses related to the federal environmental conser- 41 vation lands and forest grants. A portion of these funds may be 42 transferred to aid to localities and may be suballocated to other 43 state departments and agencies (24800). 44 Personal service (50000) ... 2,050,000 .............. (re. $1,955,000) 45 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,607,000 ........... (re. $3,603,000) 46 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,343,000 ............... (re. $1,299,000) 47 Indirect costs (58850) ... 555,000 .................... (re. $555,000) 251 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 2 amended by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, and as 3 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 4 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 5 For services and expenses related to the federal environmental conser- 6 vation lands and forest grants. A portion of these funds may be 7 transferred to aid to localities and may be suballocated to other 8 state departments and agencies (24800). 9 Personal service (50000) ... 1,050,000 .............. (re. $1,021,000) 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,271,000 ........... (re. $1,792,000) 11 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 679,000 ................... (re. $679,000) 12 Indirect costs (58850) ... 455,000 .................... (re. $455,000) 13 LAKE GEORGE PARK COMMISSION PROGRAM 14 Special Revenue Funds - Other 15 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 16 Lake George Invasive Species Account - 22212 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 18 For services and expenses of administering the invasive species 19 program (34801). 20 Contractual services (51000) ... 285,000 .............. (re. $231,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 22 For services and expenses of administering the invasive species 23 program (34801). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 35,000 ........... (re. $35,000) 25 Contractual services (51000) ... 285,000 .............. (re. $104,000) 26 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 20,000 ..................... (re. $20,000) 27 Indirect costs (58800) ... 10,000 ...................... (re. $10,000) 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 29 For services and expenses of administering the invasive species 30 program (34801). 31 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 35,000 ........... (re. $35,000) 32 Contractual services (51000) ... 285,000 ............... (re. $84,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 20,000 ..................... (re. $20,000) 34 Indirect costs (58800) ... 10,000 ...................... (re. $10,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 36 For services and expenses of administering the invasive species 37 program (34801). 38 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 35,000 ........... (re. $35,000) 39 Contractual services (51000) ... 285,000 .............. (re. $126,000) 40 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as transferred by chapter 41 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 42 For services and expenses of administering the invasive species 43 program (34801). 44 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 35,000 ........... (re. $35,000) 45 Contractual services (51000) ... 285,000 ............... (re. $78,000) 252 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 20,000 ..................... (re. $20,000) 2 Indirect costs (58800) ... 10,000 ...................... (re. $10,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as transferred by chapter 4 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 5 For services and expenses of administering the invasive species 6 program (34801). 7 Contractual services (51000) ... 285,000 ............... (re. $38,000) 8 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 20,000 ..................... (re. $20,000) 9 Indirect costs (58800) ... 10,000 ....................... (re. $9,000) 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as transferred by chapter 11 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 12 For services and expenses of administering the invasive species 13 program (34801). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 35,000 ........... (re. $35,000) 15 Contractual services (51000) ... 285,000 .............. (re. $107,000) 16 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 20,000 ..................... (re. $20,000) 17 Indirect costs (58800) ... 10,000 ...................... (re. $10,000) 18 OPERATIONS PROGRAM 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other 20 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 21 Indirect Charges Account - 21060 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 23 For services and expenses of the operations program. 24 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 25 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 26 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 27 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 28 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 29 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81003). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,112,000 ..... (re. $1,367,000) 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 25,000 ....... (re. $25,000) 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 602,000 ............ (re. $485,000) 33 Contractual services (51000) ... 7,190,000 .......... (re. $4,742,000) 34 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,433,000 ................. (re. $939,000) 35 Indirect costs (58800) ... 77,000 ...................... (re. $57,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as amended by chapter 50, 37 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 38 For services and expenses of the operations program. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 40 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 41 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 42 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 43 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81003). 45 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,112,000 ....... (re. $741,000) 46 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 24,000 ....... (re. $24,000) 253 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 602,000 ............ (re. $370,000) 2 Contractual services (51000) ......................................... 3 7,090,000 ......................................... (re. $2,553,000) 4 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,433,000 ................. (re. $514,000) 5 Indirect costs (58800) ... 77,000 ...................... (re. $40,000) 6 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 .......................... (re. $57,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 8 For services and expenses of the operations program. 9 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 10 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 11 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 12 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 13 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 14 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81003). 15 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,632,000 ..... (re. $3,122,000) 16 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 23,000 ....... (re. $23,000) 17 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 538,000 ............ (re. $264,000) 18 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,645,000 .......... (re. $2,170,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,387,000 ................. (re. $434,000) 20 Indirect costs (58800) ... 77,000 ...................... (re. $31,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 22 For services and expenses of the operations program. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 24 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 25 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 26 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 27 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81003). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,112,000 ....... (re. $370,000) 30 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 23,000 ....... (re. $22,000) 31 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 538,000 ............ (re. $288,000) 32 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,645,000 .......... (re. $2,337,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,387,000 ................. (re. $302,000) 34 Indirect costs (58800) ... 77,000 ...................... (re. $28,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 36 For services and expenses of the operations program. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 38 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 39 fer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 40 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 41 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 42 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81003). 43 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,200,000 ....... (re. $489,000) 44 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 23,000 ....... (re. $14,000) 45 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 538,000 ............ (re. $342,000) 46 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,645,000 .......... (re. $2,301,000) 47 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,387,000 ................. (re. $324,000) 48 Indirect costs (58800) ... 77,000 ...................... (re. $29,000) 254 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 2 For services and expenses of the operations program. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 4 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 5 fer Authority as defined in the 2019-20 state fiscal year state 6 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 7 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 8 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81003). 9 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,276,000 ....... (re. $500,000) 10 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 22,000 ....... (re. $20,000) 11 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 538,000 ............ (re. $334,000) 12 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,645,000 .......... (re. $2,347,000) 13 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,532,000 ................. (re. $399,000) 14 Indirect costs (58800) ... 82,000 ...................... (re. $21,000) 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 50, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 17 For services and expenses of the operations program. 18 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 19 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 20 fer Authority as defined in the 2018-19 state fiscal year state 21 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 22 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81003). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,078,000 ....... (re. $426,000) 25 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 21,000 ....... (re. $20,000) 26 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 541,000 ............ (re. $316,000) 27 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,645,000 .......... (re. $2,728,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,342,000 ................. (re. $258,000) 29 Indirect costs (58800) ... 65,000 ....................... (re. $8,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 50, 31 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 32 For services and expenses of the operations program. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 34 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 35 fer Authority as defined in the 2017-18 state fiscal year state 36 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 37 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 38 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81003). 39 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,978,000 ........ (re. $64,000) 40 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 19,000 ....... (re. $16,000) 41 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 525,000 ............ (re. $303,000) 42 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,533,000 ............ (re. $852,000) 43 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,228,000 .................. (re. $56,000) 44 Indirect costs (58800) ... 59,000 ....................... (re. $9,000) 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 50, 46 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 47 For services and expenses of the operations program. 48 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 49 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 255 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 fer Authority as defined in the 2016-17 state fiscal year state 2 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 3 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 4 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81003). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,978,000 ....... (re. $136,000) 6 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 18,000 ....... (re. $17,000) 7 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 520,000 ............ (re. $329,000) 8 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,481,000 .......... (re. $1,832,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,161,000 .................. (re. $83,000) 10 Indirect costs (58800) ... 61,000 ...................... (re. $12,000) 11 SOLID AND HAZARDOUS WASTE MANAGEMENT PROGRAM 12 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 13 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 14 Federal Environmental Conservation Solid Waste Grant Account - 25334 15 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as 16 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 17 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 18 For services and expenses related to solid waste purposes. A portion 19 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 20 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (81013). 21 Personal service (50000) ... 3,788,000 .............. (re. $3,156,000) 22 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,070,000 ........... (re. $1,070,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,442,000 ............... (re. $2,058,000) 24 Indirect costs (58850) ... 200,000 .................... (re. $200,000) 25 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 26 supplemented by transfers in accordance with section 51 of the state 27 finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 28 For services and expenses related to solid waste purposes. A portion 29 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 30 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (81013). 31 Personal service (50000) ... 3,788,000 .............. (re. $1,649,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,070,000 ........... (re. $1,070,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,442,000 ................ (re. 1,090,000) 34 Indirect costs (58850) ... 200,000 .................... (re. $200,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 36 For services and expenses related to solid waste purposes. A portion 37 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 38 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (81013). 39 Personal service (50000) ... 3,788,000 .............. (re. $1,600,000) 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,169,000 ........... (re. $1,169,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,343,000 ................. (re. $970,000) 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 43 For services and expenses related to solid waste purposes. A portion 44 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 45 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (81013). 46 Personal service (50000) ... 3,788,000 .............. (re. $1,600,000) 256 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,325,000 ........... (re. $1,325,000) 2 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,187,000 ................. (re. $856,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 4 For services and expenses related to solid waste purposes. A portion 5 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 6 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (81013). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 3,788,000 ................ (re. $979,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,325,000 ........... (re. $1,189,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,187,000 ................. (re. $548,000) 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 11 For services and expenses related to solid waste purposes. A portion 12 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 13 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (81013). 14 Personal service (50000) ... 3,788,000 ................ (re. $623,000) 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,202,000 ........... (re. $1,202,000) 16 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,310,000 ................. (re. $416,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 18 For services and expenses related to solid waste purposes. A portion 19 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 20 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (81013). 21 Personal service (50000) ... 3,788,000 ................ (re. $258,000) 22 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,143,000 ........... (re. $1,143,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,369,000 ................. (re. $218,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 25 For services and expenses related to solid waste purposes. A portion 26 of these funds may be transferred to aid to localities and may be 27 suballocated to other state departments and agencies (81013). 28 Personal service (50000) ... 3,788,000 ................ (re. $918,000) 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,239,000 ............. (re. $739,000) 30 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,273,000 ............... (re. $1,088,000) 31 Special Revenue Funds - Other 32 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 33 S-Area Landfill Account - 21063 34 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 1996, as amended by chapter 55, 35 section 1, of the laws of 2006: 36 For services and expenses of the department of environmental conserva- 37 tion for oversight activities related to the clean up of the s-area 38 landfill originally authorized by appropriations and reappropri- 39 ations enacted prior to 1996 (24805) ... 423,400 ..... (re. $84,000) 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other 41 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 42 Waste Management and Cleanup Account - 21053 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 257 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the waste management and cleanup 2 program including suballocation to other state departments and agen- 3 cies. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of 4 the budget is hereby authorized to transfer any or all of this 5 appropriation to local assistance to other state departments and 6 agencies. 7 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 8 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 9 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 10 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 11 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81013). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 9,736,000 ..... (re. $4,500,000) 14 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 6,000 ......... (re. $6,000) 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 123,000 ............ (re. $123,000) 16 Travel (54000) ... 320,000 ............................. (re. $20,000) 17 Contractual services (51000) ... 5,144,000 ............ (re. $110,000) 18 Equipment (56000) ... 310,000 .......................... (re. $10,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 6,495,000 ............... (re. $3,052,000) 20 Indirect costs (58800) ... 293,000 .................... (re. $193,000) 258 12550-10-5 COMMISSION ON ETHICS AND LOBBYING IN GOVERNMENT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 9,160,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 9,160,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 ETHICS AND LOBBYING PROGRAM .................................. 9,160,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 ethics and lobbying program. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, $250,000 from this appro- 16 priation may be used for the payment of 17 liabilities incurred by the Joint Commis- 18 sion on Public Ethics and/or the Commis- 19 sion on Ethics and Lobbying in Government 20 prior to April 1, 2025. 21 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 22 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 23 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 24 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 25 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 26 appropriation for the budget division 27 program of the division of the budget, are 28 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 29 part of this appropriation as if fully 30 stated. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 32 to the contrary, $200,000 from this appro- 33 priation may be used to operate a phone 34 hotline and website for the public to 35 report violations of the public officers 36 law, including allegations by state 37 employees of sexual harassment (48301). 38 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 7,641,000 39 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 45,000 40 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 80,000 41 Travel (54000) .................................... 40,000 42 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,304,000 43 Equipment (56000) ................................. 50,000 44 -------------- 259 12550-10-5 EXECUTIVE CHAMBER STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 25,703,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 25,703,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 25,703,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 administration program including liabil- 14 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2025. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 16 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 17 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 18 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 19 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 20 appropriation for the budget division 21 program of the division of the budget, are 22 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully 24 stated (81001). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 19,411,000 26 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 180,000 27 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 180,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 180,000 29 Travel (54000) ................................... 450,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,122,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................ 180,000 32 -------------- 260 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 1,246,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 1,246,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ....................................... 1,246,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 administration program including the 14 payment of liabilities incurred prior to 15 April 1, 2025. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 19 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 20 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 21 appropriation for the budget division 22 program of the division of the budget, are 23 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully 25 stated (81001). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,044,000 27 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 4,000 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 3,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 9,000 30 Travel (54000) .................................... 87,000 31 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 81,000 32 Equipment (56000) ................................. 18,000 33 -------------- 261 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 299,209,000 91,570,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 216,484,000 482,770,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 48,025,000 159,485,000 6 Enterprise Funds ................... 515,000 800,000 7 Internal Service Funds ............. 24,183,000 0 8 ---------------- ---------------- 9 All Funds ........................ 588,416,000 734,625,000 10 ================ ================ 11 SCHEDULE 12 CENTRAL ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM .............................. 62,825,000 13 -------------- 14 General Fund 15 State Purposes Account - 10050 16 For services and expenses related to the 17 central administration program. 18 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 19 finance law and any other provision of law 20 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 21 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 22 er of children and family services, 23 authorize the transfer or interchange of 24 moneys appropriated herein with any other 25 state operations - general fund appropri- 26 ation within the office of children and 27 family services except where transfer or 28 interchange of appropriations is prohibit- 29 ed or otherwise restricted by law. 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 31 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 32 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 33 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 34 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 35 appropriation for the budget division 36 program of the division of the budget, are 37 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 38 part of this appropriation as if fully 39 stated. The money hereby appropriated 40 shall be available to the office net of 41 disallowances, refunds, reimbursements, 42 and credits (81001). 43 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 26,563,000 44 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 308,000 262 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 73,000 2 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 462,000 3 Travel (54000) ................................... 181,000 4 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,559,000 5 Equipment (56000) .............................. 2,510,000 6 -------------- 7 Program account subtotal .................. 34,656,000 8 -------------- 9 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 10 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 11 Head Start Grant Account - 25181 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 head start collaboration project grant 14 program (14037). 15 Personal service (50000) ......................... 229,000 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 211,000 17 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 104,000 18 Indirect costs (58850) ............................. 8,000 19 -------------- 20 Program account subtotal ..................... 552,000 21 -------------- 22 Special Revenue Funds - Other 23 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 24 Grants and Bequests Account - 20145 25 For services and expenses related to 26 research, evaluation and demonstration 27 projects, including fringe benefits 28 (81001). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 36,000 30 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 100,000 31 Travel (54000) .................................... 15,000 32 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 121,000 33 Equipment (56000) ................................. 19,000 34 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 17,000 35 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 1,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ..................... 309,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Other 40 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 41 Youth Gifts, Grants and Bequests Account - 20142 42 For services and expenses related to 43 studies, research, demonstration projects, 263 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 recreation programs and other activities 2 including payment for tuition, fees and 3 books for approved post-secondary courses 4 and vocational programs directly related 5 to current or emerging vocations, for 6 youth in office of children and family 7 services facilities (81001). 8 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 60,000 9 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,880,000 10 Equipment (56000) ................................. 60,000 11 -------------- 12 Program account subtotal ................... 3,000,000 13 -------------- 14 Special Revenue Funds - Other 15 Equipment Loan Fund for the Disabled 16 Equipment Loan Fund Account - 21351 17 For services and expenses related to the 18 implementation of an equipment loan fund 19 for the disabled pursuant to chapter 609 20 of the laws of 1985. 21 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 22 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 23 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 24 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 25 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 26 appropriation for the budget division 27 program of the division of the budget, are 28 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 29 part of this appropriation as if fully 30 stated (81001). 31 Equipment (56000) ................................ 225,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal ..................... 225,000 34 -------------- 35 Internal Service Funds 36 Agencies Internal Service Account 37 Human Services Contact Center Account - 55072 38 For payments related to the planning, devel- 39 opment and establishment of a new state- 40 wide contact center within the department 41 of taxation and finance, the office of 42 children and family services and the 43 department of labor on behalf of customer 44 state agencies. 264 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 2 to the contrary, for the purpose of plan- 3 ning, developing and/or implementing the 4 consolidation of administration, business 5 services, procurement, information tech- 6 nology and/or other functions shared among 7 agencies to improve the efficiency and 8 effectiveness of government operations, 9 the amounts appropriated herein may be (i) 10 interchanged without limit, (ii) trans- 11 ferred between any other state operations 12 appropriations within this agency or to 13 any other state operations appropriations 14 of any state department, agency or public 15 authority, and/or (iii) suballocated to 16 any state department, agency or public 17 authority with the approval of the direc- 18 tor of the budget who shall file such 19 approval with the department of audit and 20 control and copies thereof with the chair- 21 man of the senate finance committee and 22 the chairman of the assembly ways and 23 means committee (81001). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 12,167,000 25 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 720,000 26 Travel (54000) .................................... 73,000 27 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,594,000 28 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,053,000 29 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 7,123,000 30 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 353,000 31 -------------- 32 Program account subtotal .................. 24,083,000 33 -------------- 34 CHILD CARE PROGRAM .......................................... 73,354,000 35 -------------- 36 General Fund 37 State Purposes Account - 10050 38 For expenses of the coalition on child care, 39 including but not limited to the evalu- 40 ation and recommendation of potential 41 mechanisms to support sustainable child 42 care funding with solicitation of input 43 from stakeholders, including child care 44 providers, businesses, labor organiza- 45 tions, and advocacy groups (13950). 265 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 4 -------------- 5 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 6 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 7 Federal Day Care Account - 25175 8 Funds appropriated herein shall be available 9 for aid to municipalities, for services 10 and expenses related to administering 11 activities under the child care block 12 grant and for payments to the federal 13 government for expenditures made pursuant 14 to the social services law and the state 15 plan for individual and family grant 16 program under the disaster relief act of 17 1974. 18 Such funds are to be available for payment 19 of aid, services and expenses heretofore 20 accrued or hereafter to accrue to munici- 21 palities. 22 Subject to the approval of the director of 23 the budget, such funds shall be available 24 to the office net of disallowances, 25 refunds, reimbursements, and credits. 26 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 27 of law, the amount herein appropriated may 28 be transferred to any other appropriation 29 within the office of children and family 30 services and/or the office of temporary 31 and disability assistance and/or suballo- 32 cated to the office of temporary and disa- 33 bility assistance for the purpose of 34 paying local social services districts' 35 costs of the above program and may be 36 increased or decreased by interchange with 37 any other appropriation or with any other 38 item or items within the amounts appropri- 39 ated within the office of children and 40 family services general fund - local 41 assistance account or special revenue 42 funds federal / aid to localities federal 43 day care account with the approval of the 44 director of the budget who shall file such 45 approval with the department of audit and 46 control and copies thereof with the chair- 47 man of the senate finance committee and 48 the chairman of the assembly ways and 49 means committee. 266 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 2 the money hereby appropriated including 3 any funds transferred by the office of 4 temporary and disability assistance 5 special revenue funds - federal / aid to 6 localities federal health and human 7 services fund, federal temporary assist- 8 ance to needy families block grant funds 9 at the request of the local social 10 services districts and, upon approval of 11 the director of the budget, transfer of 12 federal temporary assistance for needy 13 families block grant funds made available 14 from the New York works compliance fund 15 program or otherwise specifically appro- 16 priated therefor, in combination with the 17 money appropriated in the general fund / 18 aid to localities local assistance 19 account, appropriated for the state block 20 grant for child care shall constitute the 21 state block grant for child care. Pursuant 22 to title 5-C of article 6 of the social 23 services law, the state block grant for 24 child care shall be used for child care 25 assistance and for activities to increase 26 the availability and/or quality of child 27 care programs (13950). 28 Personal service (50000) ...................... 34,000,000 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 12,354,000 30 Fringe benefits (60090) ....................... 22,000,000 31 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 4,000,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal .................. 72,354,000 34 -------------- 35 FAMILY AND CHILDREN'S SERVICES PROGRAM ..................... 127,754,000 36 -------------- 37 General Fund 38 State Purposes Account - 10050 39 For services and expenses related to the 40 family and children's services program 41 which includes providing portable cribs 42 across New York State at a cost not to 43 exceed $2,000,000. 44 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 45 finance law and any other provision of law 46 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 47 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 267 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 er of children and family services, 2 authorize the transfer or interchange of 3 moneys appropriated herein with any other 4 state operations - general fund appropri- 5 ation within the office of children and 6 family services except where transfer or 7 interchange of appropriations is prohibit- 8 ed or otherwise restricted by law. 9 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 10 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 11 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 12 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 13 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 14 appropriation for the budget division 15 program of the division of the budget, are 16 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 17 part of this appropriation as if fully 18 stated. The money hereby appropriated 19 shall be available to the office net of 20 disallowances, refunds, reimbursements, 21 and credits (13911). 22 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 40,016,000 23 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 2,448,000 24 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 635,000 25 Travel (54000) ................................... 215,000 26 Contractual services (51000) ................... 8,160,000 27 Equipment (56000) ................................. 60,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal .................. 51,534,000 30 -------------- 31 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 32 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 33 Discretionary Demonstration Account - 25103 34 For services and expenses related to admin- 35 istering federal health and human services 36 discretionary demonstration program grants 37 and grants from the national center on 38 child abuse and neglect. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 40 to the contrary, the definition of "abused 41 child" contained in section 1012 of the 42 family court act shall be deemed to 43 include any child whose parent or person 44 legally responsible for their care permits 45 or encourages such child engage in any 46 act, or commits or allows to be committed 47 against such child any offense, that would 48 render such child either a victim of "sex 268 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 trafficking" or a victim of "severe forms 2 of trafficking in persons" pursuant to 22 3 U.S.C. 7102 as enacted by P.L. 106-386, or 4 any successor federal statute. Provided 5 however, of the amounts appropriated here- 6 in, $23,000,000 shall be reserved for the 7 expenditure of additional federal funding 8 made available to recover from public 9 health emergencies (13954). 10 Personal service (50000) ....................... 6,412,000 11 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 27,254,000 12 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 2,787,000 13 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 197,000 14 -------------- 15 Program account subtotal .................. 36,650,000 16 -------------- 17 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 18 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 19 Early Childhood Development Account - 25135 20 For services and expenses related to admin- 21 istering federal health and human services 22 grants related to early childhood develop- 23 ment (13911). 24 Personal service (50000) ......................... 539,000 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 14,160,000 26 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 341,000 27 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 27,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal .................. 15,067,000 30 -------------- 31 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 32 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 33 Youth Rehabilitation Account - 25135 34 For services and expenses related to 35 studies, research, demonstration projects 36 and other activities in accordance with 37 articles 19-G and 19-H of the executive 38 law and articles 2 and 6 of the social 39 services law (14045). 40 Personal service (50000) ....................... 1,668,000 41 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 896,000 42 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 722,000 43 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 50,000 44 -------------- 269 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Program account subtotal ................... 3,336,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 4 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 5 Title IV-a, IV-b, IV-e Account - 25175 6 For services and expenses related to activ- 7 ities associated with the Federal Family 8 First Prevention Services Act (P.L. 115- 9 123). Such funds are to be available for 10 expenses heretofore accrued and hereafter 11 to accrue for liabilities associated with 12 the continued implementation of the Feder- 13 al Family First Prevention Services Act 14 (P.L. 115-123). Subject to the approval of 15 the director of the budget, such funds 16 shall be available to the office net of 17 disallowances, refunds, reimbursement, and 18 credits (15066). 19 Personal service (50000) ....................... 5,000,000 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 5,000,000 21 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 3,500,000 22 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 200,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal .................. 13,700,000 25 -------------- 26 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 27 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 28 Youth Projects Account - 25479 29 For services and expenses related to 30 studies, research, demonstration projects 31 and other activities in accordance with 32 articles 19-G and 19-H of the executive 33 law and articles 2 and 6 of the social 34 services law (13911). 35 Personal service (50000) ....................... 3,038,000 36 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,632,000 37 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,314,000 38 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 91,000 39 -------------- 40 Program account subtotal ................... 6,075,000 41 -------------- 42 Special Revenue Funds - Other 43 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 44 State Central Register Account - 22028 270 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to admin- 2 istration of the state central register 3 employment screening activities. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 5 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 6 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 7 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 8 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 9 appropriation for the budget division 10 program of the division of the budget, are 11 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully 13 stated. 14 The money hereby appropriated shall be 15 available to the office net of disallow- 16 ances, refunds, reimbursements, and cred- 17 its (13911). 18 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 149,000 19 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 20 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,133,000 21 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 95,000 22 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 5,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal ................... 1,392,000 25 -------------- 26 NEW YORK STATE COMMISSION FOR THE BLIND PROGRAM ............. 49,739,000 27 -------------- 28 General Fund 29 State Purposes Account - 10050 30 For services and expenses of service and 31 training programs for the blind, includ- 32 ing, but not limited to, state match of 33 federal funds made available under various 34 provisions of the federal vocational reha- 35 bilitation act and the federal randolph 36 sheppard act and supportive services for 37 blind children and blind elderly persons. 38 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 39 finance law and any other provision of law 40 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 41 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 42 er of children and family services, 43 authorize the transfer or interchange of 44 moneys appropriated herein with any other 45 state operations - general fund appropri- 46 ation within the office of children and 47 family services except where transfer or 271 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 interchange of appropriations is prohibit- 2 ed or otherwise restricted by law. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 4 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 6 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 7 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 8 appropriation for the budget division 9 program of the division of the budget, are 10 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully 12 stated (13953). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,535,000 14 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 12,000 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 8,000 16 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 17 Contractual services (51000) ................... 6,002,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ................... 8,562,000 20 -------------- 21 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 22 Federal Education Fund 23 OCFS Vocational Rehabilitation Payments Account - 25207 24 For services and expenses related to the New 25 York state commission for the blind. 26 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 27 to the contrary, the money hereby appro- 28 priated may be interchanged or trans- 29 ferred, without limit, to any special 30 revenue funds federal account and/or any 31 appropriation of the office of children 32 and family services, and may be increased 33 or decreased without limit by transfer 34 between these appropriated amounts and 35 appropriations (13953). 36 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 3,000,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ................... 3,000,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 41 Federal Education Fund 42 Rehabilitation Services/Basic Support Account - 25213 43 For services and expenses related to the New 44 York state commission for the blind 45 including transfer or suballocation to the 272 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 state education department. Notwithstand- 2 ing any other provision of law to the 3 contrary, the money hereby appropriated 4 may be interchanged or transferred, with- 5 out limit, to any special revenue funds 6 federal account and/or any appropriation 7 of the office of children and family 8 services, and may be increased or 9 decreased without limit by transfer 10 between these appropriated amounts and 11 appropriations. A portion of the funds 12 appropriated herein may be suballocated to 13 the dormitory authority of the state of 14 New York, in accordance with a plan 15 approved by the division of the budget, to 16 design, construct, reconstruct, rehabili- 17 tate, renovate, furnish, equip or other- 18 wise improve vending stands for the blind 19 enterprise program pursuant to an agree- 20 ment between the New York state commission 21 for the blind and the dormitory authority, 22 which may contain such other terms and 23 conditions as may be agreed upon by the 24 parties thereto, including provisions 25 related to indemnities. All contracts for 26 construction awarded by the dormitory 27 authority pursuant to this appropriation 28 shall be governed by article 8 of the 29 labor law and shall be awarded in accord- 30 ance with the authority's procurement 31 contract guidelines adopted pursuant to 32 section 2879 of the public authorities law 33 (13953). 34 Personal service (50000) ...................... 10,067,000 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 25,090,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal .................. 35,157,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Other 40 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 41 CBVH Gifts and Bequests Account - 20129 42 For services and expenses related to the New 43 York state commission for the blind 44 (13953). 273 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 5,000 2 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 20,000 3 Equipment (56000) .................................. 2,000 4 -------------- 5 Program account subtotal ...................... 27,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Other 8 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 9 CBVH-Vending Stand Account - 20119 10 For services and expenses related to the 11 vending stand program and pension plan and 12 establishing food service sites. 13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 14 to the contrary, the money hereby appro- 15 priated may be interchanged or trans- 16 ferred, without limit, to any special 17 revenue funds - other account and/or any 18 appropriation of the office of children 19 and family services, and may be increased 20 or decreased without limit by transfer 21 between these appropriated amounts and 22 appropriations. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 24 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 25 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 26 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 27 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 28 appropriation for the budget division 29 program of the division of the budget, are 30 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 31 part of this appropriation as if fully 32 stated (13953). 33 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 543,000 34 -------------- 35 Program account subtotal ..................... 543,000 36 -------------- 37 Special Revenue Funds - Other 38 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 39 CBVH-Vending Stand Account-Federal - 20126 40 For services and expenses related to the 41 vending stand program and pension plan and 42 establishing food service sites. 43 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 44 to the contrary, the money hereby appro- 45 priated may be interchanged or trans- 46 ferred, without limit, to any special 274 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 revenue funds - other account and/or any 2 appropriation of the office of children 3 and family services, and may be increased 4 or decreased without limit by transfer 5 between these appropriated amounts and 6 appropriations. 7 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 8 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 9 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 10 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 11 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 12 appropriation for the budget division 13 program of the division of the budget, are 14 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 15 part of this appropriation as if fully 16 stated (13953). 17 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 200,000 18 Travel (54000) ..................................... 4,000 19 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 796,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 22 -------------- 23 Special Revenue Funds - Other 24 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 25 CBVH-Vending Stand Account-State - 20146 26 For services and expenses related to the 27 vending stand program and pension plan and 28 establishing food service sites. 29 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 30 to the contrary, the money hereby appro- 31 priated may be interchanged or trans- 32 ferred, without limit, to any special 33 revenue funds - other account and/or any 34 appropriation of the office of children 35 and family services, and may be increased 36 or decreased without limit by transfer 37 between these appropriated amounts and 38 appropriations. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 40 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 41 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 42 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 43 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 44 appropriation for the budget division 45 program of the division of the budget, are 46 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 47 part of this appropriation as if fully 48 stated (13953). 275 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 950,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal ..................... 950,000 4 -------------- 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other 6 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 7 CBVH Highway Revenue Account - 22108 8 For services and expenses of programs that 9 support the blind. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 11 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 12 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 13 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 14 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 15 appropriation for the budget division 16 program of the division of the budget, are 17 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 18 part of this appropriation as if fully 19 stated (13953). 20 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 500,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 23 -------------- 24 SYSTEMS SUPPORT PROGRAM ..................................... 43,115,000 25 -------------- 26 General Fund 27 State Purposes Account - 10050 28 For services and expenses related to the 29 systems support program. 30 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 31 finance law and any other provision of law 32 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 33 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 34 er of children and family services, 35 authorize the transfer or interchange of 36 moneys appropriated herein with any other 37 state operations - general fund appropri- 38 ation within the office of children and 39 family services except where transfer or 40 interchange of appropriations is prohibit- 41 ed or otherwise restricted by law. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 43 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 44 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 45 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 276 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 2 appropriation for the budget division 3 program of the division of the budget, are 4 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 5 part of this appropriation as if fully 6 stated (14020). 7 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 8 Travel (54000) .................................... 23,000 9 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,400,000 10 Equipment (56000) ................................. 25,000 11 -------------- 12 Total amount available ....................... 2,498,000 13 -------------- 14 For the non-federal share of services and 15 expenses for the continued maintenance of 16 the statewide automated child welfare 17 information system; to operate the state- 18 wide automated child welfare information 19 system; and for the continued development 20 of the statewide automated child welfare 21 information system. Of the amounts appro- 22 priated herein, a portion may be available 23 for suballocation to the office of infor- 24 mation technology services for the admin- 25 istration of independent verification and 26 validation services for child welfare 27 systems operated or developed by the 28 office of children and family services. 29 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 30 contrary, funds appropriated herein shall 31 only be available upon approval of an 32 expenditure plan by the director of the 33 budget. 34 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 35 finance law and any other provision of law 36 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 37 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 38 er of children and family services, 39 authorize the transfer or interchange of 40 moneys appropriated herein with any other 41 state operations - general fund appropri- 42 ation within the office of children and 43 family services except where transfer or 44 interchange of appropriations is prohibit- 45 ed or otherwise restricted by law. 46 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 47 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 48 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 49 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 277 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 2 appropriation for the budget division 3 program of the division of the budget, are 4 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 5 part of this appropriation as if fully 6 stated (13986). 7 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 214,000 8 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 129,000 9 Travel (54000) ................................... 129,000 10 Contractual services (51000) ................... 8,706,000 11 Equipment (56000) ................................ 846,000 12 -------------- 13 Total amount available ...................... 10,024,000 14 -------------- 15 Program account subtotal .................. 12,522,000 16 -------------- 17 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 18 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 19 Connections Account - 25175 20 For services and expenses for the statewide 21 automated child welfare information system 22 including related administrative expenses 23 provided pursuant to title IV-e of the 24 federal social security act. 25 Such funds are to be available heretofore 26 accrued and hereafter to accrue for 27 liabilities associated with the continued 28 maintenance, operation, and development of 29 the statewide automated child welfare 30 information system. Subject to the 31 approval of the director of the budget, 32 such funds shall be available to the 33 office net of disallowances, refunds, 34 reimbursements, and credits (13986). 35 Personal service (50000) ......................... 500,000 36 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 29,753,000 37 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 305,000 38 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 35,000 39 -------------- 40 Program account subtotal .................. 30,593,000 41 -------------- 42 TRAINING AND DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM ............................ 59,773,000 43 -------------- 44 General Fund 45 State Purposes Account - 10050 278 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 training and development program, includ- 3 ing but not limited to, child welfare, 4 public assistance and medical assistance 5 training contracts with not-for-profit 6 agencies or other governmental entities. 7 Of the amount appropriated herein, a mini- 8 mum of $257,000 shall be used for the 9 prevention of domestic violence, of which 10 $135,000 may be used to contract with the 11 office for the prevention of domestic 12 violence to develop and implement a train- 13 ing program on the dynamics of domestic 14 violence and its relationship to child 15 abuse and neglect with particular emphasis 16 on alternatives to out-of-home placement. 17 For trainee travel reimbursement payments to 18 counties and voluntary agencies for 19 employees receiving training from the 20 office of children and family services, up 21 to the limits stated in the OCFS travel 22 guidelines. 23 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 24 finance law and any other provision of law 25 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 26 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 27 er of the office of temporary and disabil- 28 ity assistance and the commissioner of the 29 office of children and family services, 30 transfer or suballocate any of the amounts 31 appropriated herein, or made available 32 through interchange to the office of 33 temporary and disability assistance. 34 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 35 finance law and any other provision of law 36 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 37 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 38 er of children and family services, 39 authorize the transfer or interchange of 40 moneys appropriated herein with any other 41 state operations - general fund or state 42 special revenue other fund appropriation 43 within the office of children and family 44 services except where transfer or inter- 45 change of appropriations is prohibited or 46 otherwise restricted by law. 47 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 48 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 49 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 50 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 51 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 279 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 appropriation for the budget division 2 program of the division of the budget, are 3 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 4 part of this appropriation as if fully 5 stated. The money hereby appropriated 6 shall be available to the office net of 7 disallowances, refunds, reimbursements, 8 and credits (14075). 9 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 965,000 10 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 8,000 11 Contractual services (51000) .................. 10,296,000 12 Travel (54000) ................................... 274,000 13 Equipment(56000) ................................. 369,000 14 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 47,000 15 -------------- 16 Total amount available ...................... 11,959,000 17 -------------- 18 For services and expenses related to Youth 19 Research Incorporated pursuant to an 20 agreement with the office of children and 21 family services. 22 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 23 finance law and any other provision of law 24 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 25 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 26 er of children and family services, 27 authorize the transfer or interchange of 28 moneys appropriated herein with any other 29 state operations or aid to localities - 30 general fund or state special revenue 31 other fund appropriation (15016). 32 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,535,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal .................. 19,494,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 38 Multiagency Training Contract Account - 21989 39 For services and expenses related to the 40 operation of the training and development 41 program including, but not limited to, 42 personal service, fringe benefits and 43 nonpersonal service. To the extent that 44 costs incurred through payment from this 45 appropriation result from training activ- 46 ities performed on behalf of the office of 280 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 children and family services, the office 2 of temporary and disability assistance, 3 the department of health, the department 4 of labor or any other state or local agen- 5 cy, expenditures made from this appropri- 6 ation shall be reduced by any federal, 7 state, or local funding available for such 8 purpose in accordance with a cost allo- 9 cation plan submitted to the federal 10 government. No expenditure shall be made 11 from this account until an expenditure 12 plan has been approved by the director of 13 the budget. 14 For trainee travel reimbursement payments to 15 counties and voluntary agencies for 16 employees receiving training from the 17 office of children and family services, up 18 to the limits stated in the OCFS travel 19 guidelines. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 21 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 23 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 24 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 25 appropriation for the budget division 26 program of the division of the budget, are 27 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully 29 stated (13984). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,710,000 31 Contractual services (51000) .................. 18,849,000 32 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,213,000 33 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 71,000 34 -------------- 35 Total amount available ...................... 22,843,000 36 -------------- 37 For services and expenses related to Youth 38 Research Incorporated pursuant to an 39 agreement with the office of children and 40 family services. 41 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 42 finance law and any other provision of law 43 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 44 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 45 er of children and family services, 46 authorize the transfer or interchange of 47 moneys appropriated herein with any other 48 state operations or aid to localities - 281 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 general fund or state special revenue 2 other fund appropriation (15016). 3 Contractual services (51000) ................... 6,165,000 4 -------------- 5 Program account subtotal .................. 29,008,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Other 8 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 9 State Match Account - 21967 10 For services and expenses related to the 11 training and development program. Of the 12 amount appropriated herein, $1,500,000 may 13 be used only to provide state match for 14 federal training funds in accordance with 15 an agreement with social services 16 districts including, but not limited to, 17 the city of New York. Any agreement with a 18 social services district is subject to the 19 approval of the director of the budget. No 20 expenditure shall be made from this 21 account for personal service costs. No 22 expenditure shall be made from this 23 account until an expenditure plan for this 24 purpose has been approved by the director 25 of the budget. 26 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 27 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 28 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 29 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 30 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 31 appropriation for the budget division 32 program of the division of the budget, are 33 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 34 part of this appropriation as if fully 35 stated (13984). 36 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,000,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ................... 4,000,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other 41 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 42 Training, Management and Evaluation Account - 21961 43 For services and expenses related to the 44 training and development program. Of the 45 amount appropriated herein, the office 282 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 shall expend not less than $359,000 for 2 services and expenses of child abuse 3 prevention training pursuant to chapters 4 676 and 677 of the laws of 1985. No 5 expenditure shall be made from this 6 account for any purpose until an expendi- 7 ture plan has been approved by the direc- 8 tor of the budget. 9 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 10 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 11 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 12 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 13 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 14 appropriation for the budget division 15 program of the division of the budget, are 16 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 17 part of this appropriation as if fully 18 stated (13984). 19 Personal service (50100) ....................... 3,353,000 20 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 20,000 21 Travel (54000) .................................... 12,000 22 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,854,000 23 Equipment (56000) ................................. 92,000 24 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,636,000 25 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 104,000 26 -------------- 27 Program account subtotal ................... 7,071,000 28 -------------- 29 Enterprise Funds 30 Agencies Enterprise Fund 31 Training Materials Account - 50306 32 For services and expenses related to publi- 33 cation and sale of training materials. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 35 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 36 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 37 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 38 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 39 appropriation for the budget division 40 program of the division of the budget, are 41 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 42 part of this appropriation as if fully 43 stated (13984). 44 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 200,000 45 -------------- 46 Program account subtotal ..................... 200,000 47 -------------- 283 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 YOUTH FACILITIES PROGRAM ................................... 171,856,000 2 -------------- 3 General Fund 4 State Purposes Account - 10050 5 For services and expenses related to the 6 youth facilities program including the New 7 York model treatment program for youth in 8 the care of the office of children and 9 family services, in office of children and 10 family services facilities and in the 11 community. 12 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 13 finance law and any other provision of law 14 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 15 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 16 er of children and family services, 17 authorize the transfer or interchange of 18 moneys appropriated herein with any other 19 state operations - general fund appropri- 20 ation within the office of children and 21 family services except where transfer or 22 interchange of appropriations is prohibit- 23 ed or otherwise restricted by law. 24 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 25 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 26 et is authorized to waive the 50 percent 27 local share of youth facility costs 28 required under subdivision 2 of section 29 529 of the executive law, as necessary, 30 for statements of obligations issued to 31 limit the total amount owed from local 32 social services districts for services 33 provided in a calendar year to no more 34 than $55,000,000. Provided, however, that 35 for the city of New York, a waiver of any 36 reimbursement due to the state above the 37 city of New York's pro-rata share of the 38 $55,000,000 shall only be granted to the 39 extent that the director of the budget has 40 executed an agreement with the city of New 41 York that provides for a total additional 42 investment from the preceding year in 43 homeless assistance and services in the 44 amount of at least $440,000,000 for the 45 period commencing July 1, 2014 through 46 such date as shall be determined by the 47 director of the budget, of which the city 48 of New York shall directly fund 49 $220,000,000 and shall also fund the 284 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 remaining $220,000,000 with estimated 2 savings associated with the state's waiver 3 of the local share of youth facility costs 4 authorized herein, and provided that the 5 office of temporary and disability assist- 6 ance will commence its regular review and 7 audit to make sure the city of New York is 8 in compliance with all applicable state 9 and federal regulations in relation to the 10 appropriate care of the homeless, and 11 provided further that such funds shall not 12 be used to supplant any of the city of New 13 York's funds for such services, as deter- 14 mined by the director of the budget. Such 15 eligible homeless assistance and services 16 shall be limited to the city of New York's 17 costs for living in communities (LINC) 3, 18 LINC 4, and LINC 5 rental assistance 19 programs and/or any other new rental 20 assistance for the homeless program imple- 21 mented after July 1, 2014, pursuant to a 22 plan submitted by the city of New York and 23 approved by the office of temporary and 24 disability assistance and the director of 25 the budget. The city of New York shall 26 submit monthly reports to the director of 27 the budget and the office of temporary and 28 disability assistance indicating the 29 number of recipients served under each 30 program and the amount spent on each 31 program for the given month, and shall 32 submit a year-end report with cumulative 33 calendar year costs by March 31, 2026. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 35 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 36 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 37 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 38 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 39 appropriation for the budget division 40 program of the division of the budget, are 41 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 42 part of this appropriation as if fully 43 stated. 44 The money hereby appropriated shall be 45 available to the office net of disallow- 46 ances, refunds, reimbursements, and cred- 47 its (13945). 48 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 121,215,000 49 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 3,325,000 50 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 9,657,000 285 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ................ 13,081,000 2 Travel (54000) ................................... 627,000 3 Contractual services (51000) .................. 22,801,000 4 Equipment (56000) ................................ 735,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ................. 171,441,000 7 -------------- 8 Enterprise Funds 9 Youth Commissary Account 10 DFY Account - 50000 11 For services and expenses related to facili- 12 ty commissary supplies and services and 13 expenses related to facility vocational 14 business enterprises. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 16 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 17 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 18 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 19 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 20 appropriation for the budget division 21 program of the division of the budget, are 22 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully 24 stated (13945). 25 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 175,000 26 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 27 Equipment (56000) ................................. 90,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal ..................... 315,000 30 -------------- 31 Internal Service Funds 32 Youth Vocational Education Account 33 DFY Account - 55150 34 For services and expenses related to voca- 35 tional programs at office facilities. 36 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 37 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 38 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 39 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 40 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 41 appropriation for the budget division 42 program of the division of the budget, are 43 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully 45 stated (13945). 286 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 25,000 2 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 25,000 3 Equipment (56000) ................................. 50,000 4 -------------- 5 Program account subtotal ..................... 100,000 6 -------------- 287 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 CENTRAL ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 4 Head Start Grant Account - 25181 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to the head start collaboration 7 project grant program (14037). 8 Personal service (50000) ... 229,000 .................. (re. $226,000) 9 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 211,000 ............... (re. $211,000) 10 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 104,000 ................... (re. $102,000) 11 Indirect costs (58850) ... 8,000 ........................ (re. $8,000) 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 13 For services and expenses related to the head start collaboration 14 project grant program (14037). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 220,000 .................. (re. $140,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 211,000 ............... (re. $156,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 98,000 ..................... (re. $46,000) 18 Indirect costs (58850) ... 8,000 ........................ (re. $3,000) 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other 20 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 21 Grants and Bequests Account - 20145 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 23 For services and expenses related to research, evaluation and demon- 24 stration projects, including fringe benefits (81001). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 36,000 ........... (re. $36,000) 26 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 100,000 ............ (re. $100,000) 27 Travel (54000) ... 15,000 .............................. (re. $15,000) 28 Contractual services (51000) ... 121,000 .............. (re. $121,000) 29 Equipment (56000) ... 19,000 ........................... (re. $19,000) 30 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 17,000 ..................... (re. $17,000) 31 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 32 Special Revenue Funds - Other 33 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 34 OCFS Program Account - 22111 35 By chapter 53, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 36 For services and expenses related to the support of health and social 37 services programs (81001). 38 Contractual services (51000) ... 5,000,000 ............ (re. $540,000) 39 CHILD CARE PROGRAM 40 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 41 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 42 Federal Day Care Account - 25175 288 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 2 Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to munici- 3 palities, for services and expenses related to administering activ- 4 ities under the child care block grant and for payments to the 5 federal government for expenditures made pursuant to the social 6 services law and the state plan for individual and family grant 7 program under the disaster relief act of 1974. 8 Such funds are to be available for payment of aid, services and 9 expenses heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to munici- 10 palities. 11 Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds 12 shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds, 13 reimbursements, and credits. 14 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein 15 appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within 16 the office of children and family services and/or the office of 17 temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the 18 office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of 19 paying local social services districts' costs of the above program 20 and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other 21 appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts 22 appropriated within the office of children and family services 23 general fund - local assistance account or special revenue funds 24 federal / aid to localities federal day care account with the 25 approval of the director of the budget who shall file such approval 26 with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the 27 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 28 assembly ways and means committee. 29 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 30 ated including any funds transferred by the office of temporary and 31 disability assistance special revenue funds - federal / aid to 32 localities federal health and human services fund, federal temporary 33 assistance to needy families block grant funds at the request of the 34 local social services districts and, upon approval of the director 35 of the budget, transfer of federal temporary assistance for needy 36 families block grant funds made available from the New York works 37 compliance fund program or otherwise specifically appropriated 38 therefor, in combination with the money appropriated in the general 39 fund / aid to localities local assistance account, appropriated for 40 the state block grant for child care shall constitute the state 41 block grant for child care. Pursuant to title 5-C of article 6 of 42 the social services law, the state block grant for child care shall 43 be used for child care assistance and for activities to increase the 44 availability and/or quality of child care programs (13950). 45 Personal service (50000) ... 34,000,000 ............ (re. $30,502,000) 46 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,354,000 .......... (re. $8,373,000) 47 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 22,000,000 ............. (re. $19,800,000) 48 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,000,000 ................ (re. $3,747,000) 49 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 289 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to munici- 2 palities, for services and expenses related to administering activ- 3 ities under the child care block grant and for payments to the 4 federal government for expenditures made pursuant to the social 5 services law and the state plan for individual and family grant 6 program under the disaster relief act of 1974. 7 Such funds are to be available for payment of aid, services and 8 expenses heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to munici- 9 palities. 10 Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds 11 shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds, 12 reimbursements, and credits. 13 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein 14 appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within 15 the office of children and family services and/or the office of 16 temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the 17 office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of 18 paying local social services districts' costs of the above program 19 and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other 20 appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts 21 appropriated within the office of children and family services 22 general fund - local assistance account or special revenue funds 23 federal / aid to localities federal day care account with the 24 approval of the director of the budget who shall file such approval 25 with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the 26 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 27 assembly ways and means committee. 28 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 29 ated including any funds transferred by the office of temporary and 30 disability assistance special revenue funds - federal / aid to 31 localities federal health and human services fund, federal temporary 32 assistance to needy families block grant funds at the request of the 33 local social services districts and, upon approval of the director 34 of the budget, transfer of federal temporary assistance for needy 35 families block grant funds made available from the New York works 36 compliance fund program or otherwise specifically appropriated 37 therefor, in combination with the money appropriated in the general 38 fund / aid to localities local assistance account, appropriated for 39 the state block grant for child care shall constitute the state 40 block grant for child care. Pursuant to title 5-C of article 6 of 41 the social services law, the state block grant for child care shall 42 be used for child care assistance and for activities to increase the 43 availability and/or quality of child care programs (13950). 44 Personal service (50000) ... 32,000,000 ............. (re. $2,635,000) 45 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,354,000 .......... (re. $4,722,000) 46 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 19,540,000 ................ (re. $777,000) 47 Indirect costs (58850) ... 3,149,000 ................ (re. $1,346,000) 48 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 49 Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to munici- 50 palities, for services and expenses related to administering activ- 290 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ities under the child care block grant and for payments to the 2 federal government for expenditures made pursuant to the social 3 services law and the state plan for individual and family grant 4 program under the disaster relief act of 1974. 5 Such funds are to be available for payment of aid, services and 6 expenses heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to munici- 7 palities. 8 Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds 9 shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds, 10 reimbursements, and credits. 11 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein 12 appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within 13 the office of children and family services and/or the office of 14 temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the 15 office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of 16 paying local social services districts' costs of the above program 17 and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other 18 appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts 19 appropriated within the office of children and family services 20 general fund - local assistance account or special revenue funds 21 federal / aid to localities federal day care account with the 22 approval of the director of the budget who shall file such approval 23 with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the 24 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 25 assembly ways and means committee. 26 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 27 ated including any funds transferred by the office of temporary and 28 disability assistance special revenue funds - federal / aid to 29 localities federal health and human services fund, federal temporary 30 assistance to needy families block grant funds at the request of the 31 local social services districts and, upon approval of the director 32 of the budget, transfer of federal temporary assistance for needy 33 families block grant funds made available from the New York works 34 compliance fund program or otherwise specifically appropriated 35 therefor, in combination with the money appropriated in the general 36 fund / aid to localities local assistance account, appropriated for 37 the state block grant for child care shall constitute the state 38 block grant for child care. Pursuant to title 5-C of article 6 of 39 the social services law, the state block grant for child care shall 40 be used for child care assistance and for activities to increase the 41 availability and/or quality of child care programs (13950). 42 Personal service (50000) ... 31,121,000 ............ (re. $14,954,000) 43 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 13,886,000 .......... (re. $5,635,000) 44 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 19,312,000 .............. (re. $3,048,000) 45 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,142,000 .................. (re. $570,000) 46 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 47 Funds appropriated herein shall be available for aid to munici- 48 palities, for services and expenses related to administering activ- 49 ities under the child care block grant and for payments to the 50 federal government for expenditures made pursuant to the social 291 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 services law and the state plan for individual and family grant 2 program under the disaster relief act of 1974. 3 Such funds are to be available for payment of aid, services and 4 expenses heretofore accrued or hereafter to accrue to munici- 5 palities. 6 Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds 7 shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds, 8 reimbursements, and credits. 9 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the amount herein 10 appropriated may be transferred to any other appropriation within 11 the office of children and family services and/or the office of 12 temporary and disability assistance and/or suballocated to the 13 office of temporary and disability assistance for the purpose of 14 paying local social services districts' costs of the above program 15 and may be increased or decreased by interchange with any other 16 appropriation or with any other item or items within the amounts 17 appropriated within the office of children and family services 18 general fund - local assistance account or special revenue funds 19 federal / aid to localities federal day care account with the 20 approval of the director of the budget who shall file such approval 21 with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the 22 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 23 assembly ways and means committee. 24 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 25 ated including any funds transferred by the office of temporary and 26 disability assistance special revenue funds - federal / aid to 27 localities federal health and human services fund, federal temporary 28 assistance to needy families block grant funds at the request of the 29 local social services districts and, upon approval of the director 30 of the budget, transfer of federal temporary assistance for needy 31 families block grant funds made available from the New York works 32 compliance fund program or otherwise specifically appropriated 33 therefor, in combination with the money appropriated in the general 34 fund / aid to localities local assistance account, appropriated for 35 the state block grant for child care shall constitute the state 36 block grant for child care. Pursuant to title 5-C of article 6 of 37 the social services law, the state block grant for child care shall 38 be used for child care assistance and for activities to increase the 39 availability and/or quality of child care programs (13950). 40 Personal service (50000) ... 24,600,000 ............. (re. $1,094,000) 41 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 21,286,000 ......... (re. $13,030,000) 42 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 15,200,000 .............. (re. $1,148,000) 43 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,800,000 .................. (re. $291,000) 44 FAMILY AND CHILDREN'S SERVICES PROGRAM 45 General Fund 46 State Purposes Account - 10050 47 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 292 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to personal services, related 2 fringe, indirect, and non-personal service associated to extending 3 the Adult Protective Services line to accept calls for a minimum of 4 three additional hours per day. Such hours shall be from 5 pm to 8pm 5 Monday through Friday for the purpose of addressing elder abuse 6 (15259) ... 326,000 ................................. (re. $184,000) 7 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 8 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 9 Discretionary Demonstration Account - 25103 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 11 For services and expenses related to administering federal health and 12 human services discretionary demonstration program grants and grants 13 from the national center on child abuse and neglect. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the defi- 15 nition of "abused child" contained in section 1012 of the family 16 court act shall be deemed to include any child whose parent or 17 person legally responsible for their care permits or encourages such 18 child engage in any act, or commits or allows to be committed 19 against such child any offense, that would render such child either 20 a victim of "sex trafficking" or a victim of "severe forms of traf- 21 ficking in persons" pursuant to 22 U.S.C. 7102 as enacted by P.L. 22 106-386, or any successor federal statute. Provided however, of the 23 amounts appropriated herein, $23,000,000 shall be reserved for the 24 expenditure of additional federal funding made available to recover 25 from public health emergencies (13954). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 6,412,000 .............. (re. $6,395,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 27,354,000 ......... (re. $27,003,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,787,000 ............... (re. $2,776,000) 29 Indirect costs (58850) ... 97,000 ...................... (re. $96,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 31 For services and expenses related to administering federal health and 32 human services discretionary demonstration program grants and grants 33 from the national center on child abuse and neglect. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the defi- 35 nition of "abused child" contained in section 1012 of the family 36 court act shall be deemed to include any child whose parent or 37 person legally responsible for their care permits or encourages such 38 child engage in any act, or commits or allows to be committed 39 against such child any offense, that would render such child either 40 a victim of "sex trafficking" or a victim of "severe forms of traf- 41 ficking in persons" pursuant to 22 U.S.C. 7102 as enacted by P.L. 42 106-386, or any successor federal statute. Provided however, of the 43 amounts appropriated herein, $23,000,000 shall be reserved for the 44 expenditure of additional federal funding made available to recover 45 from public health emergencies (13954). 46 Personal service (50000) ... 6,387,000 .............. (re. $6,110,000) 47 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 27,354,000 ......... (re. $17,384,000) 48 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,771,000 ............... (re. $2,589,000) 293 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Indirect costs (58850) ... 97,000 ...................... (re. $80,000) 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 3 For services and expenses related to administering federal health and 4 human services discretionary demonstration program grants and grants 5 from the national center on child abuse and neglect. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the defi- 7 nition of "abused child" contained in section 1012 of the family 8 court act shall be deemed to include any child whose parent or 9 person legally responsible for their care permits or encourages such 10 child engage in any act, or commits or allows to be committed 11 against such child any offense, that would render such child either 12 a victim of "sex trafficking" or a victim of "severe forms of traf- 13 ficking in persons" pursuant to 22 U.S.C. 7102 as enacted by P.L. 14 106-386, or any successor federal statute. Provided however, of the 15 amounts appropriated herein, $23,000,000 shall be reserved for the 16 expenditure of additional federal funding made available to recover 17 from public health emergencies (13954). 18 Personal service (50000) ... 6,384,000 .............. (re. $6,047,000) 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 27,354,000 .......... (re. $3,590,000) 20 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,769,000 ............... (re. $2,557,000) 21 Indirect costs (58850) ... 97,000 ...................... (re. $77,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 23 For services and expenses related to administering federal health and 24 human services discretionary demonstration program grants and grants 25 from the national center on child abuse and neglect. 26 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the defi- 27 nition of "abused child" contained in section 1012 of the family 28 court act shall be deemed to include any child whose parent or 29 person legally responsible for their care permits or encourages such 30 child engage in any act, or commits or allows to be committed 31 against such child any offense, that would render such child either 32 a victim of "sex trafficking" or a victim of "severe forms of traf- 33 ficking in persons" pursuant to 22 U.S.C. 7102 as enacted by P.L. 34 106-386, or any successor federal statute. Provided however, of the 35 amounts appropriated herein, $23,000,000 shall be reserved for the 36 expenditure of additional federal funding made available to recover 37 from public health emergencies (13954). 38 Personal service (50000) ... 6,357,852 .............. (re. $6,236,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 27,353,866 .......... (re. $5,822,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,752,912 ............... (re. $2,247,000) 41 Indirect costs (58850) ... 94,370 ...................... (re. $48,000) 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 43 For services and expenses related to administering federal health and 44 human services discretionary demonstration program grants and grants 45 from the national center on child abuse and neglect. 46 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the defi- 47 nition of "abused child" contained in section 1012 of the family 48 court act shall be deemed to include any child whose parent or 294 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 person legally responsible for their care permits or encourages such 2 child engage in any act, or commits or allows to be committed 3 against such child any offense, that would render such child either 4 a victim of "sex trafficking" or a victim of "severe forms of traf- 5 ficking in persons" pursuant to 22 U.S.C. 7102 as enacted by P.L. 6 106-386, or any successor federal statute (13954). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 2,358,000 .............. (re. $2,157,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 10,155,000 ............ (re. $354,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,021,000 ................. (re. $936,000) 10 Indirect costs (58850) ... 25,000 ...................... (re. $15,000) 11 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 12 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 13 Early Childhood Development Account - 25135 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 15 For services and expenses related to administering federal health and 16 human services grants related to early childhood development 17 (13911). 18 Personal service (50000) ... 539,000 .................. (re. $539,000) 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 14,160,000 ......... (re. $14,160,000) 20 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 341,000 ................... (re. $341,000) 21 Indirect costs (58850) ... 27,000 ...................... (re. $27,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 23 For services and expenses related to administering federal health and 24 human services grants related to early childhood development 25 (13911). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 516,000 .................. (re. $516,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 14,160,000 ......... (re. $14,160,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 326,000 ................... (re. $326,000) 29 Indirect costs (58850) ... 27,000 ...................... (re. $27,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 31 For services and expenses related to administering federal health and 32 human services grants related to early childhood development 33 (13911). 34 Personal service (50000) ... 506,000 ................... (re. $76,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 14,160,000 .......... (re. $2,035,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 319,000 .................... (re. $43,000) 37 Indirect costs (58850) ... 27,000 ....................... (re. $1,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 39 For services and expenses related to administering federal health and 40 human services grants related to early childhood development 41 (13911). 42 Personal service (50000) ... 500,000 ................... (re. $53,000) 43 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 14,159,200 ............ (re. $736,000) 44 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 315,100 .................... (re. $31,000) 45 Indirect costs (58850) ... 25,700 ....................... (re. $7,000) 295 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 2 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 3 Title IV-a, IV-b, IV-e Account - 25175 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For services and expenses related to activities associated with the 6 Federal Family First Prevention Services Act (P.L.115-123). Such 7 funds are to be available for expenses heretofore accrued and here- 8 after to accrue for liabilities associated with the continued imple- 9 mentation of the Federal Family First Prevention Services Act (P.L. 10 115-123). Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, 11 such funds shall be available to the office net of disallowances, 12 refunds, reimbursement, and credits (15066). 13 Personal service (50000) ... 5,000,000 .............. (re. $5,000,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 15 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,500,000 ............... (re. $3,500,000) 16 Indirect costs (58850) ... 200,000 .................... (re. $200,000) 17 NEW YORK STATE COMMISSION FOR THE BLIND PROGRAM 18 General Fund 19 State Purposes Account - 10050 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 For services and expenses of service and training programs for the 22 blind, including, but not limited to, state match of federal funds 23 made available under various provisions of the federal vocational 24 rehabilitation act and the federal randolph sheppard act and 25 supportive services for blind children and blind elderly persons. 26 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 27 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 28 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 29 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 30 with any other state operations - general fund appropriation within 31 the office of children and family services except where transfer or 32 interchange of appropriations is prohibited or otherwise restricted 33 by law. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 35 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 36 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 37 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 38 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 39 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 40 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,535,000 ..... (re. $1,312,000) 41 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 12,000 ....... (re. $11,000) 42 Travel (54000) ... 5,000 ................................ (re. $2,000) 43 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,002,000 .......... (re. $5,177,000) 44 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 45 For services and expenses of service and training programs for the 46 blind, including, but not limited to, state match of federal funds 296 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 made available under various provisions of the federal vocational 2 rehabilitation act and the federal randolph sheppard act and 3 supportive services for blind children and blind elderly persons. 4 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 5 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 6 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 7 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 8 with any other state operations - general fund appropriation within 9 the office of children and family services except where transfer or 10 interchange of appropriations is prohibited or otherwise restricted 11 by law. 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 13 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 14 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 15 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 16 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 17 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 18 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,390,000 ....... (re. $284,000) 19 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 12,000 ........ (re. $9,000) 20 Travel (54000) ... 5,000 ................................ (re. $2,000) 21 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,002,000 .......... (re. $5,127,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 23 For services and expenses of service and training programs for the 24 blind, including, but not limited to, state match of federal funds 25 made available under various provisions of the federal vocational 26 rehabilitation act and the federal randolph sheppard act and 27 supportive services for blind children and blind elderly persons. 28 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 29 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 30 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 31 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 32 with any other state operations - general fund appropriation within 33 the office of children and family services except where transfer or 34 interchange of appropriations is prohibited or otherwise restricted 35 by law. 36 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 37 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 38 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 39 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 40 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 41 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 42 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,355,000 ....... (re. $294,000) 43 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 12,000 ........ (re. $9,000) 44 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,002,000 .......... (re. $5,224,000) 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 46 For services and expenses of service and training programs for the 47 blind, including, but not limited to, state match of federal funds 48 made available under various provisions of the federal vocational 297 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 rehabilitation act and the federal randolph sheppard act and 2 supportive services for blind children and blind elderly persons. 3 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 4 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 5 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 6 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 7 with any other state operations - general fund appropriation within 8 the office of children and family services except where transfer or 9 interchange of appropriations is prohibited or otherwise restricted 10 by law. 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 12 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 13 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 14 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 15 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 16 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,197,000 ....... (re. $176,000) 18 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 12,000 ........ (re. $6,000) 19 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,002,000 .......... (re. $3,444,000) 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 21 For services and expenses of service and training programs for the 22 blind, including, but not limited to, state match of federal funds 23 made available under various provisions of the federal vocational 24 rehabilitation act and the federal randolph sheppard act and 25 supportive services for blind children and blind elderly persons. 26 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 27 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 28 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 29 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 30 with any other state operations - general fund appropriation within 31 the office of children and family services except where transfer or 32 interchange of appropriations is prohibited or otherwise restricted 33 by law. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 35 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 36 fer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 37 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 38 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 39 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 40 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,197,000 ....... (re. $619,000) 41 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 12,000 ........ (re. $6,000) 42 Travel (54000) ... 5,000 ................................ (re. $1,000) 43 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,002,000 .......... (re. $4,735,000) 44 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 45 Federal Education Fund 46 OCFS Vocational Rehabilitation Payments Account - 25207 47 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 298 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the New York state commission for 2 the blind. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the money 4 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or transferred, without 5 limit, to any special revenue funds federal account and/or any 6 appropriation of the office of children and family services, and may 7 be increased or decreased without limit by transfer between these 8 appropriated amounts and appropriations (13953). 9 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,000,000 ........... (re. $3,000,000) 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 11 For services and expenses related to the New York state commission for 12 the blind. 13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the money 14 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or transferred, without 15 limit, to any special revenue funds federal account and/or any 16 appropriation of the office of children and family services, and may 17 be increased or decreased without limit by transfer between these 18 appropriated amounts and appropriations (13953). 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,000,000 ........... (re. $1,817,000) 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 21 For services and expenses related to the New York state commission for 22 the blind. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the money 24 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or transferred, without 25 limit, to any special revenue funds federal account and/or any 26 appropriation of the office of children and family services, and may 27 be increased or decreased without limit by transfer between these 28 appropriated amounts and appropriations (13953). 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,000,000 ............... (re. $6,000) 30 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 31 Federal Education Fund 32 Rehabilitation Services/Basic Support Account - 25213 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 34 For services and expenses related to the New York state commission for 35 the blind including transfer or suballocation to the state education 36 department. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 37 contrary, the money hereby appropriated may be interchanged or 38 transferred, without limit, to any special revenue funds federal 39 account and/or any appropriation of the office of children and fami- 40 ly services, and may be increased or decreased without limit by 41 transfer between these appropriated amounts and appropriations. A 42 portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to the 43 dormitory authority of the state of New York, in accordance with a 44 plan approved by the division of the budget, to design, construct, 45 reconstruct, rehabilitate, renovate, furnish, equip or otherwise 46 improve vending stands for the blind enterprise program pursuant to 47 an agreement between the New York state commission for the blind and 299 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 the dormitory authority, which may contain such other terms and 2 conditions as may be agreed upon by the parties thereto, including 3 provisions related to indemnities. All contracts for construction 4 awarded by the dormitory authority pursuant to this appropriation 5 shall be governed by article 8 of the labor law and shall be awarded 6 in accordance with the authority's procurement contract guidelines 7 adopted pursuant to section 2879 of the public authorities law 8 (13953). 9 Personal service (50000) ... 10,067,000 ............ (re. $10,067,000) 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 25,090,000 ......... (re. $25,090,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 12 For services and expenses related to the New York state commission for 13 the blind including transfer or suballocation to the state education 14 department. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 15 contrary, the money hereby appropriated may be interchanged or 16 transferred, without limit, to any special revenue funds federal 17 account and/or any appropriation of the office of children and fami- 18 ly services, and may be increased or decreased without limit by 19 transfer between these appropriated amounts and appropriations. A 20 portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to the 21 dormitory authority of the state of New York, in accordance with a 22 plan approved by the division of the budget, to design, construct, 23 reconstruct, rehabilitate, renovate, furnish, equip or otherwise 24 improve vending stands for the blind enterprise program pursuant to 25 an agreement between the New York state commission for the blind and 26 the dormitory authority, which may contain such other terms and 27 conditions as may be agreed upon by the parties thereto, including 28 provisions related to indemnities. All contracts for construction 29 awarded by the dormitory authority pursuant to this appropriation 30 shall be governed by article 8 of the labor law and shall be awarded 31 in accordance with the authority's procurement contract guidelines 32 adopted pursuant to section 2879 of the public authorities law 33 (13953). 34 Personal service (50000) ... 9,499,000 .............. (re. $2,720,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 25,090,000 ......... (re. $23,944,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 37 For services and expenses related to the New York state commission for 38 the blind including transfer or suballocation to the state education 39 department. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 40 contrary, the money hereby appropriated may be interchanged or 41 transferred, without limit, to any special revenue funds federal 42 account and/or any appropriation of the office of children and fami- 43 ly services, and may be increased or decreased without limit by 44 transfer between these appropriated amounts and appropriations. A 45 portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to the 46 dormitory authority of the state of New York, in accordance with a 47 plan approved by the division of the budget, to design, construct, 48 reconstruct, rehabilitate, renovate, furnish, equip or otherwise 49 improve vending stands for the blind enterprise program pursuant to 300 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 an agreement between the New York state commission for the blind and 2 the dormitory authority, which may contain such other terms and 3 conditions as may be agreed upon by the parties thereto, including 4 provisions related to indemnities. All contracts for construction 5 awarded by the dormitory authority pursuant to this appropriation 6 shall be governed by article 8 of the labor law and shall be awarded 7 in accordance with the authority's procurement contract guidelines 8 adopted pursuant to section 2879 of the public authorities law 9 (13953). 10 Personal service (50000) ... 9,366,000 ................ (re. $704,000) 11 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 25,090,000 .......... (re. $8,108,000) 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 13 For services and expenses related to the New York state commission for 14 the blind including transfer or suballocation to the state education 15 department. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 16 contrary, the money hereby appropriated may be interchanged or 17 transferred, without limit, to any special revenue funds federal 18 account and/or any appropriation of the office of children and fami- 19 ly services, and may be increased or decreased without limit by 20 transfer between these appropriated amounts and appropriations. A 21 portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to the 22 dormitory authority of the state of New York, in accordance with a 23 plan approved by the division of the budget, to design, construct, 24 reconstruct, rehabilitate, renovate, furnish, equip or otherwise 25 improve vending stands for the blind enterprise program pursuant to 26 an agreement between the New York state commission for the blind and 27 the dormitory authority, which may contain such other terms and 28 conditions as may be agreed upon by the parties thereto, including 29 provisions related to indemnities. All contracts for construction 30 awarded by the dormitory authority pursuant to this appropriation 31 shall be governed by article 8 of the labor law and shall be awarded 32 in accordance with the authority's procurement contract guidelines 33 adopted pursuant to section 2879 of the public authorities law 34 (13953). 35 Personal service (50000) ... 8,507,000 .............. (re. $2,274,000) 36 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 24,840,000 .......... (re. $3,267,000) 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 38 For services and expenses related to the New York state commission for 39 the blind including transfer or suballocation to the state education 40 department. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 41 contrary, the money hereby appropriated may be interchanged or 42 transferred, without limit, to any special revenue funds federal 43 account and/or any appropriation of the office of children and fami- 44 ly services, and may be increased or decreased without limit by 45 transfer between these appropriated amounts and appropriations. A 46 portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated to the 47 dormitory authority of the state of New York, in accordance with a 48 plan approved by the division of the budget, to design, construct, 49 reconstruct, rehabilitate, renovate, furnish, equip or otherwise 301 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 improve vending stands for the blind enterprise program pursuant to 2 an agreement between the New York state commission for the blind and 3 the dormitory authority, which may contain such other terms and 4 conditions as may be agreed upon by the parties thereto, including 5 provisions related to indemnities. All contracts for construction 6 awarded by the dormitory authority pursuant to this appropriation 7 shall be governed by article 8 of the labor law and shall be awarded 8 in accordance with the authority's procurement contract guidelines 9 adopted pursuant to section 2879 of the public authorities law 10 (13953). 11 Personal service (50000) ... 8,507,000 .................. (re. $3,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 24,840,000 .......... (re. $9,432,000) 13 Special Revenue Funds - Other 14 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 15 CBVH Gifts and Bequests Account - 20129 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 17 For services and expenses related to the New York state commission for 18 the blind (13953). 19 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 5,000 ................ (re. $5,000) 20 Contractual services (51000) ... 20,000 ................ (re. $20,000) 21 Equipment (56000) ... 2,000 ............................. (re. $2,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 23 For services and expenses related to the New York state commission for 24 the blind (13953). 25 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 5,000 ................ (re. $5,000) 26 Contractual services (51000) ... 20,000 ................ (re. $20,000) 27 Equipment (56000) ... 2,000 ............................. (re. $2,000) 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 29 For services and expenses related to the New York state commission for 30 the blind (13953). 31 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 5,000 ................ (re. $5,000) 32 Contractual services (51000) ... 20,000 ................ (re. $15,000) 33 Equipment (56000) ... 2,000 ............................. (re. $2,000) 34 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 35 For services and expenses related to the New York state commission for 36 the blind (13953). 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 5,000 ................ (re. $5,000) 38 Contractual services (51000) ... 20,000 ................ (re. $11,000) 39 Equipment (56000) ... 2,000 ............................. (re. $2,000) 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other 41 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 42 CBVH-Vending Stand Account - 20119 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 302 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the vending stand program and 2 pension plan and establishing food service sites. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the money 4 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or transferred, without 5 limit, to any special revenue funds - other account and/or any 6 appropriation of the office of children and family services, and may 7 be increased or decreased without limit by transfer between these 8 appropriated amounts and appropriations. 9 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 10 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 11 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 12 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 13 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 14 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 15 Contractual services (51000) ... 543,000 .............. (re. $543,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 17 For services and expenses related to the vending stand program and 18 pension plan and establishing food service sites. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the money 20 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or transferred, without 21 limit, to any special revenue funds - other account and/or any 22 appropriation of the office of children and family services, and may 23 be increased or decreased without limit by transfer between these 24 appropriated amounts and appropriations. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 26 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 27 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 28 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 29 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 30 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 31 Contractual services (51000) ... 543,000 .............. (re. $543,000) 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 33 For services and expenses related to the vending stand program and 34 pension plan and establishing food service sites. 35 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the money 36 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or transferred, without 37 limit, to any special revenue funds - other account and/or any 38 appropriation of the office of children and family services, and may 39 be increased or decreased without limit by transfer between these 40 appropriated amounts and appropriations. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 42 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 43 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 44 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 45 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 46 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 47 Contractual services (51000) ... 543,000 .............. (re. $543,000) 48 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 303 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the vending stand program and 2 pension plan and establishing food service sites. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the money 4 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or transferred, without 5 limit, to any special revenue funds - other account and/or any 6 appropriation of the office of children and family services, and may 7 be increased or decreased without limit by transfer between these 8 appropriated amounts and appropriations. 9 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 10 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 11 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 12 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 13 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 14 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 15 Contractual services (51000) ... 543,000 .............. (re. $535,000) 16 Special Revenue Funds - Other 17 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 18 CBVH-Vending Stand Account-Federal - 20126 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 20 For services and expenses related to the vending stand program and 21 pension plan and establishing food service sites. 22 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the money 23 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or transferred, without 24 limit, to any special revenue funds - other account and/or any 25 appropriation of the office of children and family services, and may 26 be increased or decreased without limit by transfer between these 27 appropriated amounts and appropriations. 28 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 29 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 30 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 31 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 32 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 33 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 34 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 200,000 ............ (re. $200,000) 35 Travel (54000) ... 4,000 ................................ (re. $4,000) 36 Contractual services (51000) ... 796,000 .............. (re. $796,000) 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 38 For services and expenses related to the vending stand program and 39 pension plan and establishing food service sites. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the money 41 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or transferred, without 42 limit, to any special revenue funds - other account and/or any 43 appropriation of the office of children and family services, and may 44 be increased or decreased without limit by transfer between these 45 appropriated amounts and appropriations. 46 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 47 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 48 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 304 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 2 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 3 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 4 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 200,000 ............ (re. $200,000) 5 Travel (54000) ... 4,000 ................................ (re. $4,000) 6 Contractual services (51000) ... 796,000 .............. (re. $796,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 8 For services and expenses related to the vending stand program and 9 pension plan and establishing food service sites. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the money 11 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or transferred, without 12 limit, to any special revenue funds - other account and/or any 13 appropriation of the office of children and family services, and may 14 be increased or decreased without limit by transfer between these 15 appropriated amounts and appropriations. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 17 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 18 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 19 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 20 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 22 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 200,000 ............ (re. $200,000) 23 Travel (54000) ... 4,000 ................................ (re. $4,000) 24 Contractual services (51000) ... 796,000 .............. (re. $573,000) 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 26 For services and expenses related to the vending stand program and 27 pension plan and establishing food service sites. 28 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the money 29 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or transferred, without 30 limit, to any special revenue funds - other account and/or any 31 appropriation of the office of children and family services, and may 32 be increased or decreased without limit by transfer between these 33 appropriated amounts and appropriations. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 35 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 36 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 37 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 38 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 39 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 40 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 200,000 ............ (re. $200,000) 41 Travel (54000) ... 4,000 ................................ (re. $4,000) 42 Contractual services (51000) ... 546,000 .............. (re. $427,000) 43 Special Revenue Funds - Other 44 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 45 CBVH-Vending Stand Account-State - 20146 46 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 305 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the vending stand program and 2 pension plan and establishing food service sites. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the money 4 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or transferred, without 5 limit, to any special revenue funds - other account and/or any 6 appropriation of the office of children and family services, and may 7 be increased or decreased without limit by transfer between these 8 appropriated amounts and appropriations. 9 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 10 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 11 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 12 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 13 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 14 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 15 Contractual services (51000) ... 950,000 .............. (re. $950,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 17 For services and expenses related to the vending stand program and 18 pension plan and establishing food service sites. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the money 20 hereby appropriated may be interchanged or transferred, without 21 limit, to any special revenue funds - other account and/or any 22 appropriation of the office of children and family services, and may 23 be increased or decreased without limit by transfer between these 24 appropriated amounts and appropriations. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 26 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 27 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 28 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 29 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 30 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 31 Contractual services (51000) ... 950,000 .............. (re. $327,000) 32 Special Revenue Funds - Other 33 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 34 CBVH Highway Revenue Account - 22108 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 36 For services and expenses of programs that support the blind. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 38 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 39 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 40 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 41 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 42 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 43 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $474,000) 44 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 45 For services and expenses of programs that support the blind. 46 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 47 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 306 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 2 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 3 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 4 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 5 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $498,000) 6 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 7 For services and expenses of programs that support the blind. 8 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 9 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 10 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 11 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 12 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 13 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 14 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $490,000) 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 16 For services and expenses of programs that support the blind. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 18 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 19 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 20 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 21 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13953). 23 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $252,000) 24 SYSTEMS SUPPORT PROGRAM 25 General Fund 26 State Purposes Account - 10050 27 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 28 For services and expenses related to the systems support program. 29 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 30 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 31 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 32 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 33 with any other state operations - general fund appropriation within 34 the office of children and family services except where transfer or 35 interchange of appropriations is prohibited or otherwise restricted 36 by law. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 38 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 39 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 40 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 41 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 42 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (14020). 43 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 50,000 .............. (re. $45,000) 44 Travel (54000) ... 23,000 .............................. (re. $23,000) 45 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,400,000 .......... (re. $1,662,000) 46 Equipment (56000) ... 25,000 ........................... (re. $25,000) 307 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For the non-federal share of services and expenses for the continued 2 maintenance of the statewide automated child welfare information 3 system; to operate the statewide automated child welfare information 4 system; and for the continued development of the statewide automated 5 child welfare information system. Of the amounts appropriated here- 6 in, a portion may be available for suballocation to the office of 7 information technology services for the administration of independ- 8 ent verification and validation services for child welfare systems 9 operated or developed by the office of children and family services. 10 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds appropri- 11 ated herein shall only be available upon approval of an expenditure 12 plan by the director of the budget. 13 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 14 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 15 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 16 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 17 with any other state operations - general fund appropriation within 18 the office of children and family services except where transfer or 19 interchange of appropriations is prohibited or otherwise restricted 20 by law. 21 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 22 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 23 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 24 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 25 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 26 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13986). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 214,000 ......... (re. $110,000) 28 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 129,000 ............ (re. $126,000) 29 Travel (54000) ... 129,000 ............................ (re. $119,000) 30 Contractual services (51000) ... 8,706,000 .......... (re. $7,372,000) 31 Equipment (56000) ... 846,000 ......................... (re. $846,000) 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 33 For services and expenses related to the systems support program. 34 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 35 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 36 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 37 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 38 with any other state operations - general fund appropriation within 39 the office of children and family services except where transfer or 40 interchange of appropriations is prohibited or otherwise restricted 41 by law. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 43 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 44 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 45 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 46 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 47 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (14020). 48 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 50,000 .............. (re. $42,000) 49 Travel (54000) ... 23,000 .............................. (re. $23,000) 50 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,400,000 ............ (re. $659,000) 308 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Equipment (56000) ... 25,000 ........................... (re. $25,000) 2 For the non-federal share of services and expenses for the continued 3 maintenance of the statewide automated child welfare information 4 system; to operate the statewide automated child welfare information 5 system; and for the continued development of the statewide automated 6 child welfare information system. Of the amounts appropriated here- 7 in, a portion may be available for suballocation to the office of 8 information technology services for the administration of independ- 9 ent verification and validation services for child welfare systems 10 operated or developed by the office of children and family services. 11 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, funds appropri- 12 ated herein shall only be available upon approval of an expenditure 13 plan by the director of the budget. 14 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 15 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 16 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 17 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 18 with any other state operations - general fund appropriation within 19 the office of children and family services except where transfer or 20 interchange of appropriations is prohibited or otherwise restricted 21 by law. 22 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 23 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 24 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 25 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 26 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 27 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13986). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 202,000 .......... (re. $40,000) 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 129,000 ............ (re. $125,000) 30 Travel (54000) ... 129,000 ............................. (re. $85,000) 31 Contractual services (51000) ... 8,706,000 .......... (re. $5,074,000) 32 Equipment (56000) ... 846,000 ......................... (re. $846,000) 33 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 34 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 35 Connections Account - 25175 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 37 For services and expenses for the statewide automated child welfare 38 information system including related administrative expenses 39 provided pursuant to title IV-e of the federal social security act. 40 Such funds are to be available heretofore accrued and hereafter to 41 accrue for liabilities associated with the continued maintenance, 42 operation, and development of the statewide automated child welfare 43 information system. Subject to the approval of the director of the 44 budget, such funds shall be available to the office net of disallow- 45 ances, refunds, reimbursements, and credits (13986). 46 Personal service (50000) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 47 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 29,753,000 ......... (re. $27,641,000) 48 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 305,000 ................... (re. $305,000) 49 Indirect costs (58850) ... 35,000 ...................... (re. $35,000) 309 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 2 For services and expenses for the statewide automated child welfare 3 information system including related administrative expenses 4 provided pursuant to title IV-e of the federal social security act. 5 Such funds are to be available heretofore accrued and hereafter to 6 accrue for liabilities associated with the continued maintenance, 7 operation, and development of the statewide automated child welfare 8 information system. Subject to the approval of the director of the 9 budget, such funds shall be available to the office net of disallow- 10 ances, refunds, reimbursements, and credits (13986). 11 Personal service (50000) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 29,753,000 ......... (re. $29,753,000) 13 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 305,000 ................... (re. $305,000) 14 Indirect costs (58850) ... 35,000 ...................... (re. $35,000) 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 16 For services and expenses for the statewide automated child welfare 17 information system including related administrative expenses 18 provided pursuant to title IV-e of the federal social security act. 19 Such funds are to be available heretofore accrued and hereafter to 20 accrue for liabilities associated with the continued maintenance, 21 operation, and development of the statewide automated child welfare 22 information system. Subject to the approval of the director of the 23 budget, such funds shall be available to the office net of disallow- 24 ances, refunds, reimbursements, and credits (13986). 25 Personal service (50000) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 26 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 29,753,000 ......... (re. $25,352,000) 27 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 305,000 ................... (re. $305,000) 28 Indirect costs (58850) ... 35,000 ...................... (re. $35,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 30 For services and expenses for the statewide automated child welfare 31 information system including related administrative expenses 32 provided pursuant to title IV-e of the federal social security act. 33 Such funds are to be available heretofore accrued and hereafter to 34 accrue for liabilities associated with the continued maintenance, 35 operation, and development of the statewide automated child welfare 36 information system. Subject to the approval of the director of the 37 budget, such funds shall be available to the office net of disallow- 38 ances, refunds, reimbursements, and credits (13986). 39 Personal service (50000) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 29,753,000 ......... (re. $27,007,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 305,000 ................... (re. $305,000) 42 Indirect costs (58850) ... 35,000 ...................... (re. $35,000) 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 44 For services and expenses for the statewide automated child welfare 45 information system including related administrative expenses 46 provided pursuant to title IV-e of the federal social security act. 47 Such funds are to be available heretofore accrued and hereafter to 48 accrue for liabilities associated with the continued maintenance, 310 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 operation, and development of the statewide automated child welfare 2 information system. 3 Subject to the approval of the director of the budget, such funds 4 shall be available to the office net of disallowances, refunds, 5 reimbursements, and credits (13986). 6 Personal service (50000) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 29,753,000 ......... (re. $26,524,000) 8 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 305,000 ................... (re. $305,000) 9 Indirect costs (58850) ... 35,000 ...................... (re. $35,000) 10 TRAINING AND DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 14 For services and expenses related to the training and development 15 program, including but not limited to, child welfare, public assist- 16 ance and medical assistance training contracts with not-for-profit 17 agencies or other governmental entities. Of the amount appropriated 18 herein, a minimum of $257,000 shall be used for the prevention of 19 domestic violence, of which $135,000 may be used to contract with 20 the office for the prevention of domestic violence to develop and 21 implement a training program on the dynamics of domestic violence 22 and its relationship to child abuse and neglect with particular 23 emphasis on alternatives to out-of-home placement. 24 For trainee travel reimbursement payments to counties and voluntary 25 agencies for employees receiving training from the office of chil- 26 dren and family services, up to the limits stated in the OCFS travel 27 guidelines. 28 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 29 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 30 upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of temporary and 31 disability assistance and the commissioner of the office of children 32 and family services, transfer or suballocate any of the amounts 33 appropriated herein, or made available through interchange to the 34 office of temporary and disability assistance. 35 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 36 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 37 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 38 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 39 with any other state operations - general fund or state special 40 revenue other fund appropriation within the office of children and 41 family services except where transfer or interchange of appropri- 42 ations is prohibited or otherwise restricted by law. 43 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 44 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 45 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 46 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 47 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 48 part of this appropriation as if fully stated. The money hereby 311 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 appropriated shall be available to the office net of disallowances, 2 refunds, reimbursements, and credits (14075). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 965,000 ......... (re. $192,000) 4 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 8,000 ......... (re. $8,000) 5 Contractual services (51000) ... 10,296,000 ......... (re. $9,345,000) 6 Travel (54000) ... 274,000 ............................ (re. $261,000) 7 Equipment(56000) ... 369,000 .......................... (re. $369,000) 8 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 47,000 .............. (re. $17,000) 9 For services and expenses related to Youth Research Incorporated 10 pursuant to an agreement with the office of children and family 11 services. 12 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 13 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 14 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 15 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 16 with any other state operations or aid to localities - general fund 17 or state special revenue other fund appropriation (15016). 18 Contractual services (51000) ... 7,535,000 .......... (re. $7,535,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 20 For services and expenses related to the training and development 21 program, including but not limited to, child welfare, public assist- 22 ance and medical assistance training contracts with not-for-profit 23 agencies or other governmental entities. Of the amount appropriated 24 herein, a minimum of $257,000 shall be used for the prevention of 25 domestic violence, of which $135,000 may be used to contract with 26 the office for the prevention of domestic violence to develop and 27 implement a training program on the dynamics of domestic violence 28 and its relationship to child abuse and neglect with particular 29 emphasis on alternatives to out-of-home placement. 30 For trainee travel reimbursement payments to counties and voluntary 31 agencies for employees receiving training from the office of chil- 32 dren and family services, up to the limits stated in the OCFS travel 33 guidelines. 34 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 35 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 36 upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of temporary and 37 disability assistance and the commissioner of the office of children 38 and family services, transfer or suballocate any of the amounts 39 appropriated herein, or made available through interchange to the 40 office of temporary and disability assistance. 41 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 42 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 43 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 44 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 45 with any other state operations - general fund or state special 46 revenue other fund appropriation within the office of children and 47 family services except where transfer or interchange of appropri- 48 ations is prohibited or otherwise restricted by law. 49 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 50 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 312 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 2 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 3 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 4 part of this appropriation as if fully stated. The money hereby 5 appropriated shall be available to the office net of disallowances, 6 refunds, reimbursements, and credits (14075). 7 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 870,000 .......... (re. $98,000) 8 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 8,000 ......... (re. $7,000) 9 Contractual services (51000) ... 10,296,000 ......... (re. $6,649,000) 10 Travel (54000) ... 274,000 ............................. (re. $11,000) 11 Equipment(56000) ... 369,000 ............................ (re. $6,000) 12 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 47,000 .............. (re. $10,000) 13 For services and expenses related to Youth Research Incorporated 14 pursuant to an agreement with the office of children and family 15 services. 16 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 17 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 18 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 19 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 20 with any other state operations or aid to localities - general fund 21 or state special revenue other fund appropriation (15016). 22 Contractual services (51000) ... 7,535,000 .......... (re. $6,761,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 24 For services and expenses related to the training and development 25 program, including but not limited to, child welfare, public assist- 26 ance and medical assistance training contracts with not-for-profit 27 agencies or other governmental entities. Of the amount appropriated 28 herein, a minimum of $257,000 shall be used for the prevention of 29 domestic violence, of which $135,000 may be used to contract with 30 the office for the prevention of domestic violence to develop and 31 implement a training program on the dynamics of domestic violence 32 and its relationship to child abuse and neglect with particular 33 emphasis on alternatives to out-of-home placement. 34 For trainee travel reimbursement payments to counties and voluntary 35 agencies for employees receiving training from the office of chil- 36 dren and family services, up to the limits stated in the OCFS travel 37 guidelines. 38 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 39 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 40 upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of temporary and 41 disability assistance and the commissioner of the office of children 42 and family services, transfer or suballocate any of the amounts 43 appropriated herein, or made available through interchange to the 44 office of temporary and disability assistance. 45 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 46 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 47 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 48 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 49 with any other state operations - general fund or state special 50 revenue other fund appropriation within the office of children and 313 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 family services except where transfer or interchange of appropri- 2 ations is prohibited or otherwise restricted by law. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 4 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 5 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 6 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 7 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 8 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (14075). 9 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 851,000 .......... (re. $14,000) 10 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 8,000 ......... (re. $7,000) 11 Contractual services (51000) ... 10,296,000 ......... (re. $3,572,000) 12 Travel (54000) ... 274,000 ............................. (re. $19,000) 13 Equipment(56000) ... 369,000 ........................... (re. $27,000) 14 For services and expenses related to Youth Research Incorporated 15 pursuant to an agreement with the office of children and family 16 services. 17 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 18 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 19 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 20 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 21 with any other state operations or aid to localities - general fund 22 or state special revenue other fund appropriation (15016). 23 Contractual services (51000) ... 7,535,000 .......... (re. $2,974,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 25 For services and expenses related to the training and development 26 program, including but not limited to, child welfare, public assist- 27 ance and medical assistance training contracts with not-for-profit 28 agencies or other governmental entities. Of the amount appropriated 29 herein, a minimum of $257,000 shall be used for the prevention of 30 domestic violence, of which $135,000 may be used to contract with 31 the office for the prevention of domestic violence to develop and 32 implement a training program on the dynamics of domestic violence 33 and its relationship to child abuse and neglect with particular 34 emphasis on alternatives to out-of-home placement. 35 For trainee travel reimbursement payments to counties and voluntary 36 agencies for employees receiving training from the office of chil- 37 dren and family services, up to the limits stated in the OCFS travel 38 guidelines. 39 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 40 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 41 upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of temporary and 42 disability assistance and the commissioner of the office of children 43 and family services, transfer or suballocate any of the amounts 44 appropriated herein, or made available through interchange to the 45 office of temporary and disability assistance. 46 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 47 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 48 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 49 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 50 with any other state operations - general fund or state special 314 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 revenue other fund appropriation within the office of children and 2 family services except where transfer or interchange of appropri- 3 ations is prohibited or otherwise restricted by law. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 5 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 6 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 7 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 8 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (14075). 10 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 770,000 ........... (re. $6,000) 11 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 8,000 ......... (re. $8,000) 12 Contractual services (51000) ... 10,296,000 ......... (re. $3,198,000) 13 Travel (54000) ... 274,000 ............................. (re. $81,000) 14 Equipment(56000) ... 369,000 .......................... (re. $266,000) 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 47,000 ............... (re. $3,000) 16 For services and expenses related to the provision and administration 17 of human services training by Youth Research Incorporated pursuant 18 to an agreement with the office of children and family services. 19 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 20 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 21 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 22 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 23 with any other state operations or aid to localities - general fund 24 or state special revenue other fund appropriation (15016). 25 Contractual services (51000) ... 7,535,000 .......... (re. $1,884,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 27 For services and expenses related to the training and development 28 program, including but not limited to, child welfare, public assist- 29 ance and medical assistance training contracts with not-for-profit 30 agencies or other governmental entities. Of the amount appropriated 31 herein, a minimum of $257,000 shall be used for the prevention of 32 domestic violence, of which $135,000 may be used to contract with 33 the office for the prevention of domestic violence to develop and 34 implement a training program on the dynamics of domestic violence 35 and its relationship to child abuse and neglect with particular 36 emphasis on alternatives to out-of-home placement. 37 For trainee travel reimbursement payments to counties and voluntary 38 agencies for employees receiving training from the office of chil- 39 dren and family services, up to the limits stated in the OCFS travel 40 guidelines. 41 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 42 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 43 upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of temporary and 44 disability assistance and the commissioner of the office of children 45 and family services, transfer or suballocate any of the amounts 46 appropriated herein, or made available through interchange to the 47 office of temporary and disability assistance. 48 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 49 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 50 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 315 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 2 with any other state operations - general fund or state special 3 revenue other fund appropriation within the office of children and 4 family services except where transfer or interchange of appropri- 5 ations is prohibited or otherwise restricted by law. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 7 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 8 fer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 9 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 10 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (14075). 12 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 770,000 .......... (re. $87,000) 13 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 8,000 ......... (re. $8,000) 14 Contractual services (51000) ... 10,296,000 ......... (re. $3,902,000) 15 Travel (54000) ... 274,000 ............................ (re. $265,000) 16 Equipment (56000) ... 369,000 .......................... (re. $99,000) 17 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 47,000 .............. (re. $12,000) 18 Special Revenue Funds - Other 19 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 20 Multiagency Training Contract Account - 21989 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 22 For services and expenses related to the operation of the training and 23 development program including, but not limited to, personal service, 24 fringe benefits and nonpersonal service. To the extent that costs 25 incurred through payment from this appropriation result from train- 26 ing activities performed on behalf of the office of children and 27 family services, the office of temporary and disability assistance, 28 the department of health, the department of labor or any other state 29 or local agency, expenditures made from this appropriation shall be 30 reduced by any federal, state, or local funding available for such 31 purpose in accordance with a cost allocation plan submitted to the 32 federal government. No expenditure shall be made from this account 33 until an expenditure plan has been approved by the director of the 34 budget. 35 For trainee travel reimbursement payments to counties and voluntary 36 agencies for employees receiving training from the office of chil- 37 dren and family services, up to the limits stated in the OCFS travel 38 guidelines. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 40 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 41 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 42 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 43 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 45 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,710,000 ..... (re. $1,516,000) 46 Contractual services (51000) ... 18,849,000 ........ (re. $18,849,000) 47 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,213,000 ................. (re. $364,000) 48 Indirect costs (58800) ... 71,000 ...................... (re. $39,000) 316 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to Youth Research Incorporated 2 pursuant to an agreement with the office of children and family 3 services. 4 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 5 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 6 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 7 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 8 with any other state operations or aid to localities - general fund 9 or state special revenue other fund appropriation (15016). 10 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,165,000 .......... (re. $6,165,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 12 For services and expenses related to the operation of the training and 13 development program including, but not limited to, personal service, 14 fringe benefits and nonpersonal service. To the extent that costs 15 incurred through payment from this appropriation result from train- 16 ing activities performed on behalf of the office of children and 17 family services, the office of temporary and disability assistance, 18 the department of health, the department of labor or any other state 19 or local agency, expenditures made from this appropriation shall be 20 reduced by any federal, state, or local funding available for such 21 purpose in accordance with a cost allocation plan submitted to the 22 federal government. No expenditure shall be made from this account 23 until an expenditure plan has been approved by the director of the 24 budget. 25 For trainee travel reimbursement payments to counties and voluntary 26 agencies for employees receiving training from the office of chil- 27 dren and family services, up to the limits stated in the OCFS travel 28 guidelines. 29 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 30 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 31 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 32 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 33 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 34 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,579,000 ....... (re. $982,000) 36 Contractual services (51000) ... 18,849,000 ........ (re. $17,817,000) 37 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,126,000 .................. (re. $27,000) 38 Indirect costs (58800) ... 71,000 ...................... (re. $27,000) 39 For services and expenses related to Youth Research Incorporated 40 pursuant to an agreement with the office of children and family 41 services. 42 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 43 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 44 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 45 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 46 with any other state operations or aid to localities - general fund 47 or state special revenue other fund appropriation (15016). 48 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,165,000 .......... (re. $5,463,000) 49 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 317 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the operation of the training and 2 development program including, but not limited to, personal service, 3 fringe benefits and nonpersonal service. To the extent that costs 4 incurred through payment from this appropriation result from train- 5 ing activities performed on behalf of the office of children and 6 family services, the office of temporary and disability assistance, 7 the department of health, the department of labor or any other state 8 or local agency, expenditures made from this appropriation shall be 9 reduced by any federal, state, or local funding available for such 10 purpose in accordance with a cost allocation plan submitted to the 11 federal government. No expenditure shall be made from this account 12 until an expenditure plan has been approved by the director of the 13 budget. 14 For trainee travel reimbursement payments to counties and voluntary 15 agencies for employees receiving training from the office of chil- 16 dren and family services, up to the limits stated in the OCFS travel 17 guidelines. 18 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 19 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 20 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 21 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 22 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,551,000 ....... (re. $694,000) 25 Contractual services (51000) ... 18,849,000 ........ (re. $14,172,000) 26 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,107,000 .................. (re. $13,000) 27 Indirect costs (58800) ... 71,000 ...................... (re. $14,000) 28 For services and expenses related to Youth Research Incorporated 29 pursuant to an agreement with the office of children and family 30 services. 31 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 32 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 33 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 34 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 35 with any other state operations or aid to localities - general fund 36 or state special revenue other fund appropriation (15016). 37 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,165,000 .......... (re. $3,171,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 39 For services and expenses related to the operation of the training and 40 development program including, but not limited to, personal service, 41 fringe benefits and nonpersonal service. To the extent that costs 42 incurred through payment from this appropriation result from train- 43 ing activities performed on behalf of the office of children and 44 family services, the office of temporary and disability assistance, 45 the department of health, the department of labor or any other state 46 or local agency, expenditures made from this appropriation shall be 47 reduced by any federal, state, or local funding available for such 48 purpose in accordance with a cost allocation plan submitted to the 49 federal government. No expenditure shall be made from this account 318 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 until an expenditure plan has been approved by the director of the 2 budget. 3 For trainee travel reimbursement payments to counties and voluntary 4 agencies for employees receiving training from the office of chil- 5 dren and family services, up to the limits stated in the OCFS travel 6 guidelines. 7 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 8 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 9 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 10 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 11 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,346,000 ........ (re. $14,000) 14 Contractual services (51000) ... 18,849,000 ........ (re. $13,736,000) 15 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 979,000 ................... (re. $128,000) 16 Indirect costs (58800) ... 65,000 ....................... (re. $2,000) 17 For services and expenses related to the provision and administration 18 of human services training by Youth Research Incorporated pursuant 19 to an agreement with the office of children and family services. 20 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 21 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 22 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 23 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 24 with any other state operations or aid to localities - general fund 25 or state special revenue other fund appropriation (15016). 26 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,165,000 .......... (re. $3,707,000) 27 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 28 For services and expenses related to the provision and administration 29 of human services training by Youth Research Incorporated pursuant 30 to an agreement with the office of children and family services. 31 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 32 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 33 upon the advice of the commissioner of children and family services, 34 authorize the transfer or interchange of moneys appropriated herein 35 with any other state operations or aid to localities - general fund 36 or state special revenue other fund appropriation (15016). 37 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,165,000 .......... (re. $3,190,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 50, 39 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 40 For services and expenses related to the operation of the training and 41 development program including, but not limited to, personal service, 42 fringe benefits and nonpersonal service. To the extent that costs 43 incurred through payment from this appropriation result from train- 44 ing activities performed on behalf of the office of children and 45 family services, the office of temporary and disability assistance, 46 the department of health, the department of labor or any other state 47 or local agency, expenditures made from this appropriation shall be 48 reduced by any federal, state, or local funding available for such 49 purpose in accordance with a cost allocation plan submitted to the 319 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 federal government. No expenditure shall be made from this account 2 until an expenditure plan has been approved by the director of the 3 budget. 4 For trainee travel reimbursement payments to counties and voluntary 5 agencies for employees receiving training from the office of chil- 6 dren and family services, up to the limits stated in the OCFS travel 7 guidelines. 8 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 9 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 10 fer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 11 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 12 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 13 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,326,000 ....... (re. $108,000) 15 Contractual services (51000) ... 18,849,000 ........ (re. $14,537,000) 16 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 979,000 ..................... (re. $5,000) 17 Special Revenue Funds - Other 18 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 19 State Match Account - 21967 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 For services and expenses related to the training and development 22 program. Of the amount appropriated herein, $1,500,000 may be used 23 only to provide state match for federal training funds in accordance 24 with an agreement with social services districts including, but not 25 limited to, the city of New York. Any agreement with a social 26 services district is subject to the approval of the director of the 27 budget. No expenditure shall be made from this account for personal 28 service costs. No expenditure shall be made from this account until 29 an expenditure plan for this purpose has been approved by the direc- 30 tor of the budget. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 32 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 33 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 34 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 35 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 36 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 37 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,000,000 .......... (re. $4,000,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 39 For services and expenses related to the training and development 40 program. Of the amount appropriated herein, $1,500,000 may be used 41 only to provide state match for federal training funds in accordance 42 with an agreement with social services districts including, but not 43 limited to, the city of New York. Any agreement with a social 44 services district is subject to the approval of the director of the 45 budget. No expenditure shall be made from this account for personal 46 service costs. No expenditure shall be made from this account until 47 an expenditure plan for this purpose has been approved by the direc- 48 tor of the budget. 320 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 2 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 3 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 4 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 5 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 6 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 7 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,000,000 .......... (re. $3,610,000) 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 9 For services and expenses related to the training and development 10 program. Of the amount appropriated herein, $1,500,000 may be used 11 only to provide state match for federal training funds in accordance 12 with an agreement with social services districts including, but not 13 limited to, the city of New York. Any agreement with a social 14 services district is subject to the approval of the director of the 15 budget. No expenditure shall be made from this account for personal 16 service costs. No expenditure shall be made from this account until 17 an expenditure plan for this purpose has been approved by the direc- 18 tor of the budget. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 20 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 21 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 22 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 23 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 25 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,000,000 .......... (re. $3,242,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 27 For services and expenses related to the training and development 28 program. Of the amount appropriated herein, $1,500,000 may be used 29 only to provide state match for federal training funds in accordance 30 with an agreement with social services districts including, but not 31 limited to, the city of New York. Any agreement with a social 32 services district is subject to the approval of the director of the 33 budget. No expenditure shall be made from this account for personal 34 service costs. No expenditure shall be made from this account until 35 an expenditure plan for this purpose has been approved by the direc- 36 tor of the budget. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 38 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 39 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 40 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 41 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 42 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 43 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,000,000 .......... (re. $3,132,000) 44 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 45 For services and expenses related to the training and development 46 program. Of the amount appropriated herein, $1,500,000 may be used 47 only to provide state match for federal training funds in accordance 48 with an agreement with social services districts including, but not 321 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 limited to, the city of New York. Any agreement with a social 2 services district is subject to the approval of the director of the 3 budget. No expenditure shall be made from this account for personal 4 service costs. No expenditure shall be made from this account until 5 an expenditure plan for this purpose has been approved by the direc- 6 tor of the budget. 7 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 8 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 9 fer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 10 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 11 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 13 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,000,000 .......... (re. $2,408,000) 14 Special Revenue Funds - Other 15 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 16 Training, Management and Evaluation Account - 21961 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 18 For services and expenses related to the training and development 19 program. Of the amount appropriated herein, the office shall expend 20 not less than $359,000 for services and expenses of child abuse 21 prevention training pursuant to chapters 676 and 677 of the laws of 22 1985. No expenditure shall be made from this account for any purpose 23 until an expenditure plan has been approved by the director of the 24 budget. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 26 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 27 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 28 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 29 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 30 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 31 Personal service (50100) ... 3,353,000 .............. (re. $3,132,000) 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 20,000 .............. (re. $20,000) 33 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 .............................. (re. $12,000) 34 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,854,000 .......... (re. $1,854,000) 35 Equipment (56000) ... 92,000 ........................... (re. $92,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,636,000 ............... (re. $1,491,000) 37 Indirect costs (58800) ... 104,000 ..................... (re. $98,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 39 For services and expenses related to the training and development 40 program. Of the amount appropriated herein, the office shall expend 41 not less than $359,000 for services and expenses of child abuse 42 prevention training pursuant to chapters 676 and 677 of the laws of 43 1985. No expenditure shall be made from this account for any purpose 44 until an expenditure plan has been approved by the director of the 45 budget. 46 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 47 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 48 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 322 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 2 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 3 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 4 Personal service (50100) ... 3,307,000 .............. (re. $2,519,000) 5 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 20,000 .............. (re. $14,000) 6 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 .............................. (re. $12,000) 7 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,854,000 .......... (re. $1,854,000) 8 Equipment (56000) ... 92,000 ........................... (re. $92,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,605,000 ............... (re. $1,095,000) 10 Indirect costs (58800) ... 104,000 ..................... (re. $83,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 12 For services and expenses related to the training and development 13 program. Of the amount appropriated herein, the office shall expend 14 not less than $359,000 for services and expenses of child abuse 15 prevention training pursuant to chapters 676 and 677 of the laws of 16 1985. No expenditure shall be made from this account for any purpose 17 until an expenditure plan has been approved by the director of the 18 budget. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 20 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 21 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 22 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 23 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 25 Personal service (50100) ... 3,297,000 .............. (re. $2,590,000) 26 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 .............................. (re. $12,000) 27 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,854,000 .......... (re. $1,293,000) 28 Equipment (56000) ... 92,000 ........................... (re. $91,000) 29 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,598,000 ............... (re. $1,144,000) 30 Indirect costs (58800) ... 104,000 ..................... (re. $82,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 32 For services and expenses related to the training and development 33 program. Of the amount appropriated herein, the office shall expend 34 not less than $359,000 for services and expenses of child abuse 35 prevention training pursuant to chapters 676 and 677 of the laws of 36 1985. No expenditure shall be made from this account for any purpose 37 until an expenditure plan has been approved by the director of the 38 budget. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 40 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 41 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 42 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 43 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 45 Personal service (50100) ... 3,245,000 .............. (re. $2,630,000) 46 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 20,000 ............... (re. $5,000) 47 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 .............................. (re. $12,000) 48 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,854,000 .......... (re. $1,338,000) 49 Equipment (56000) ... 92,000 ........................... (re. $92,000) 323 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,565,000 ............... (re. $1,183,000) 2 Indirect costs (58800) ... 102,000 ..................... (re. $82,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 4 For services and expenses related to the training and development 5 program. Of the amount appropriated herein, the office shall expend 6 not less than $359,000 for services and expenses of child abuse 7 prevention training pursuant to chapters 676 and 677 of the laws of 8 1985. No expenditure shall be made from this account for any purpose 9 until an expenditure plan has been approved by the director of the 10 budget. 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 12 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 13 fer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 14 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 15 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 16 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 17 Personal service (50100) ... 3,245,000 .............. (re. $2,673,000) 18 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 20,000 ............... (re. $5,000) 19 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 .............................. (re. $12,000) 20 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,854,000 .......... (re. $1,854,000) 21 Equipment (56000) ... 92,000 ........................... (re. $92,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,565,000 ............... (re. $1,208,000) 23 Indirect costs (58800) ... 102,000 ..................... (re. $81,000) 24 Enterprise Funds 25 Agencies Enterprise Fund 26 Training Materials Account - 50306 27 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 28 For services and expenses related to publication and sale of training 29 materials. 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 31 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 32 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 33 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 34 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 35 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 36 Contractual services (51000) ... 200,000 .............. (re. $200,000) 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 38 For services and expenses related to publication and sale of training 39 materials. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 41 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 42 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 43 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 44 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 45 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 46 Contractual services (51000) ... 200,000 .............. (re. $200,000) 324 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 2 For services and expenses related to publication and sale of training 3 materials. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 5 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 6 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 7 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 8 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 10 Contractual services (51000) ... 200,000 .............. (re. $200,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 12 For services and expenses related to publication and sale of training 13 materials. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 15 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 16 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 17 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 18 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 19 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (13984). 20 Contractual services (51000) ... 200,000 .............. (re. $200,000) 325 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 202,140,000 83,222,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 328,003,000 355,226,500 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 2,500,000 4,815,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 532,643,000 443,263,500 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 57,654,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses of the adminis- 15 tration program including the payment of 16 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 17 2025. The office is authorized to charge- 18 back New York city human resources admin- 19 istration for their contributed share of 20 costs for the training resource system. 21 Notwithstanding any other inconsistent 22 provision of law, the office shall reduce 23 reimbursement otherwise payable to social 24 services districts to recover 100 percent 25 of the costs incurred by the office for 26 employment verification services. 27 Notwithstanding any provision of law to 28 the contrary, and subject to the approval 29 of the director of the budget, the city of 30 New York shall be charged back for costs 31 related to Mapper. 32 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 33 finance law and any other provision of law 34 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 35 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 36 er of the office of temporary and disabil- 37 ity assistance, authorize the transfer or 38 interchange of moneys appropriated herein 39 with any other state operations - general 40 fund appropriation within the office of 41 temporary and disability assistance except 42 where transfer or interchange of appropri- 43 ations is prohibited or otherwise 44 restricted by law. 326 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 2 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 3 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 4 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 5 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 6 appropriation for the budget division 7 program of the division of the budget, are 8 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully 10 stated (81001). 11 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 27,475,000 12 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 100,000 13 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 44,000 14 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,529,000 15 Travel (54000) ................................... 353,000 16 Contractual services (51000) .................. 25,388,000 17 Equipment (56000) ................................ 265,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal .................. 55,154,000 20 -------------- 21 Special Revenue Funds - Other 22 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 23 OTDA Program Account - 21980 24 For services and expenses related to the 25 support of health and social services 26 programs. 27 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social 28 services law or any other inconsistent 29 provision of law, the office shall reduce 30 reimbursement otherwise payable to social 31 services districts to recover 100 percent 32 of costs incurred by the office on behalf 33 of social services districts, including 34 the costs incurred for electronic access 35 to federal systems to verify alien status 36 for entitlements (81001). 37 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,400,000 38 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 100,000 39 -------------- 40 Program account subtotal ................... 2,500,000 41 -------------- 42 ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS PROGRAM ............................. 39,410,000 43 -------------- 44 General Fund 45 State Purposes Account - 10050 327 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of the administra- 2 tive hearings program including the 3 payment of liabilities incurred prior to 4 April 1, 2025. 5 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 6 finance law and any other provision of law 7 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 8 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 9 er of the office of temporary and disabil- 10 ity assistance, authorize the transfer or 11 interchange of moneys appropriated herein 12 with any other state operations - general 13 fund appropriation within the office of 14 temporary and disability assistance except 15 where transfer or interchange of appropri- 16 ations is prohibited or otherwise 17 restricted by law. 18 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 19 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 20 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 21 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 22 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 23 appropriation for the budget division 24 program of the division of the budget, are 25 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 26 part of this appropriation as if fully 27 stated (52306). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 34,100,000 29 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 400,000 30 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 355,000 31 Travel (54000) ................................... 250,000 32 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,010,000 33 Equipment (56000) ................................ 295,000 34 -------------- 35 CHILD SUPPORT SERVICES PROGRAM ............................. 47,903,000 36 -------------- 37 General Fund 38 State Purposes Account - 10050 39 For services and expenses of the child 40 support services program including the 41 payment of liabilities incurred prior to 42 April 1, 2025. 43 Amounts appropriated herein may be matched 44 with available federal funds and without 45 local financial participation. Subject to 46 the approval of the director of the budg- 47 et, funds may be used by the office either 328 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 directly or through one or more contracts 2 with private or public organizations, for 3 services designed to strengthen child 4 support enforcement activities including 5 but not necessarily limited to instate 6 bank match services; a paternity media 7 campaign; a medical support unit; payments 8 to hospitals and other eligible entities 9 for obtaining voluntary paternity acknowl- 10 edgments; joint enforcement teams; remedi- 11 ation of hard-to-collect cases; location 12 services; website services; child support 13 guidelines review; and operation of a 14 centralized support collection unit, 15 including the cost of banking services and 16 an automated voice response system and 17 customer service unit. 18 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social 19 services law or any other inconsistent 20 provision of law, the office shall reduce 21 reimbursement otherwise payable to social 22 services districts to recover 50 percent 23 of the non-federal share of costs incurred 24 by the office for the operation of a 25 centralized support collection unit, 26 including the cost of banking services and 27 an automated voice response system and 28 customer service unit. Such reduction 29 shall be prorated among districts based on 30 the number of collections and disburse- 31 ments processed or on an alternative meth- 32 odology deemed appropriate by the commis- 33 sioner. 34 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 35 of law, amounts appropriated herein may be 36 used, as matched by federal funds, pursu- 37 ant to a plan approved by the director of 38 the budget, for the planning, development 39 and operation of an automated system 40 designed to meet the requirements of the 41 family support act of 1988, the personal 42 responsibility and work opportunity recon- 43 ciliation act of 1996 and to facilitate 44 and improve local districts operations 45 related to child support enforcement. 46 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 47 of the law to the contrary, pursuant to 48 memoranda of understanding and subject to 49 the approval of the director of the budg- 50 et, a portion of the amount appropriated 51 herein may be available for expenditures 329 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 of the department of taxation and finance, 2 the department of motor vehicles, and the 3 department of labor for reimbursement of 4 administrative costs of these departments 5 associated with efforts to increase child 6 support collections. 7 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 8 finance law and any other provision of law 9 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 10 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 11 er of the office of temporary and disabil- 12 ity assistance, authorize the transfer or 13 interchange of moneys appropriated herein 14 with any other state operations - general 15 fund appropriation within the office of 16 temporary and disability assistance except 17 where transfer or interchange of appropri- 18 ations is prohibited or otherwise 19 restricted by law. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 21 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 23 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 24 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 25 appropriation for the budget division 26 program of the division of the budget, are 27 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully 29 stated (52200). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,463,000 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 86,000 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 201,000 33 Travel (54000) ................................... 100,000 34 Contractual services (51000) ................... 8,019,000 35 Equipment (56000) ................................. 46,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal .................. 10,915,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 40 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 41 Child Support Account - 25178 42 For services and expenses related to the 43 administration of the child support 44 enforcement program. 45 A portion of the funds appropriated herein, 46 subject to the approval of the director of 47 the budget, may be used as the federal 48 match for services designed to strengthen 330 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 child support enforcement activities 2 including but not necessarily limited to 3 instate bank match services; a paternity 4 media campaign; a medical support unit; 5 payments to hospitals and other eligible 6 entities for obtaining voluntary paternity 7 acknowledgments; joint enforcement teams; 8 remediation of hard-to-collect cases; 9 location services; website services; child 10 support guidelines review; and operation 11 of a centralized support collection unit, 12 including the cost of banking services and 13 an automated voice response system and 14 customer service unit. 15 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 16 of law, amounts appropriated herein may be 17 used, pursuant to a plan approved by the 18 director of the budget, for the planning, 19 development and operation of an automated 20 system designed to meet the requirements 21 of the family support act of 1988, the 22 personal responsibility and work opportu- 23 nity reconciliation act of 1996 and to 24 facilitate and improve local districts 25 operations related to child support 26 enforcement. 27 Notwithstanding any other law to the contra- 28 ry, the amounts appropriated herein may be 29 suballocated or transferred to any other 30 state department or agency for the 31 purposes stated herein. 32 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 33 of the law to the contrary, pursuant to 34 memoranda of understanding and subject to 35 the approval of the director of the budg- 36 et, a portion of the amount appropriated 37 herein may be available for expenditures 38 of the department of taxation and finance, 39 the department of motor vehicles, and the 40 department of labor for reimbursement of 41 administrative costs of these departments 42 associated with efforts to increase child 43 support collections (52200). 44 Personal service (50000) ....................... 7,000,000 45 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 24,588,000 46 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 4,500,000 47 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 900,000 48 -------------- 49 Program account subtotal .................. 36,988,000 50 -------------- 331 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 DISABILITY DETERMINATIONS PROGRAM .......................... 216,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 4 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 5 Disability Determinations Account - 25153 6 For services and expenses related to the 7 office of disability determinations 8 (52201). 9 Personal service (50000) ...................... 91,400,000 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 62,729,000 11 Fringe benefits (60090) ....................... 61,871,000 12 -------------- 13 EMPLOYMENT AND INCOME SUPPORT PROGRAM ...................... 135,202,000 14 -------------- 15 General Fund 16 State Purposes Account - 10050 17 For services and expenses of the employment 18 and income support program including the 19 payment of liabilities incurred prior to 20 April 1, 2025. 21 The agency is authorized to chargeback 22 social services districts for 100 percent 23 of costs incurred by the agency on their 24 behalf for disability related consultative 25 examination contracts. 26 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social 27 services law or any other inconsistent 28 provision of law, the office shall reduce 29 reimbursement otherwise payable to social 30 services districts to recover 50 percent 31 of the non-federal share of costs incurred 32 by the office for the operation of the 33 statewide electronic benefit transfer 34 (EBT) system and the common benefit iden- 35 tification card (CBIC). 36 For services and expenses of client notices 37 including but not limited to personal 38 service costs, postage, other nonpersonal 39 services costs, and contractor costs paid 40 directly by the office including but not 41 limited to costs for mail processing. 42 Notwithstanding any other inconsistent 43 provision of law, the office shall reduce 44 reimbursement otherwise payable to social 45 services districts to recover 50 percent 332 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 of the non-federal share of costs, includ- 2 ing prior period costs, incurred by the 3 office for these purposes. 4 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 5 finance law and any other provision of law 6 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 7 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 8 er of the office of temporary and disabil- 9 ity assistance, authorize the transfer or 10 interchange of moneys appropriated herein 11 with any other state operations - general 12 fund appropriation within the office of 13 temporary and disability assistance except 14 where transfer or interchange of appropri- 15 ations is prohibited or otherwise 16 restricted by law. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 18 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 19 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 20 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 21 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 22 appropriation for the budget division 23 program of the division of the budget, are 24 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully 26 stated (52202). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 17,349,000 28 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 160,000 29 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 100,000 30 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 9,397,000 31 Travel (54000) ................................... 165,000 32 Contractual services (51000) .................. 41,951,000 33 Equipment (56000) ................................. 50,000 34 -------------- 35 Total amount available ...................... 69,172,000 36 -------------- 37 For services and expenses incurred by the 38 office's division of disability determi- 39 nations, including payments to the social 40 security administration, in making deter- 41 minations and re-determinations regarding 42 blindness and disability in accordance 43 with title XVI of the social security act 44 for the New York state supplement program 45 (52341). 46 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 600,000 47 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 600,000 48 -------------- 333 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Total amount available ....................... 1,200,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal .................. 70,372,000 4 -------------- 5 Special Revenue Funds- Federal 6 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 7 Home Energy Assistance Program Account - 25123 8 For services and expenses related to the 9 administration of the low income home 10 energy assistance program. Pursuant to 11 provisions of the federal omnibus budget 12 reconciliation act of 1981, and with the 13 approval of the director of the budget, a 14 portion of the funds appropriated herein 15 may be transferred or suballocated to 16 other state agencies for administration of 17 the home energy assistance program 18 (52215). 19 Personal service (50000) ....................... 6,800,000 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 3,500,000 21 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 4,700,000 22 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 2,000,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal .................. 17,000,000 25 -------------- 26 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 27 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 28 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25024 29 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 30 of law, the money hereby appropriated may, 31 with the approval of the director of the 32 budget, be increased or decreased by 33 interchange or transfer with amounts 34 appropriated within the office of tempo- 35 rary and disability assistance federal 36 food and nutrition services local assist- 37 ance account. 38 For services and expenses related to the 39 administration of the supplemental nutri- 40 tion assistance program, as well as a 41 summer electronic benefit transfer program 42 pursuant to the consolidated appropri- 43 ations act, 2023. Amounts appropriated 44 herein may be used for the expenses asso- 45 ciated with the operation of the statewide 46 electronic benefit transfer (EBT) system; 334 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 the common benefit identification card 2 (CBIC); and an integrated eligibility 3 system. With the approval of the director 4 of budget, a portion of the funds appro- 5 priated herein may be transferred or 6 suballocated to other state agencies for 7 the administration of supplemental nutri- 8 tion assistance program, summer electronic 9 benefit transfer program or for purposes 10 related to the implementation of an inte- 11 grated eligibility system (52224). 12 Personal service (50000) ....................... 9,465,000 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 30,775,000 14 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 6,750,000 15 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 840,000 16 -------------- 17 Program account subtotal .................. 47,830,000 18 -------------- 19 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM .............................. 13,383,000 20 -------------- 21 General Fund 22 State Purposes Account - 10050 23 For services and expenses for the design, 24 operations, implementation, and mainte- 25 nance of modifications and enhancements to 26 the welfare-to-work case management 27 system, the welfare management system, the 28 child support management system and other 29 related systems operated by the office of 30 temporary and disability assistance, the 31 office of children and family services, 32 the department of labor, or the department 33 of health necessary for the successful 34 implementation of the personal responsi- 35 bility and work opportunity reconciliation 36 act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) and the New 37 York state welfare reform act of 1997 38 (chapter 436 of the laws of 1997) includ- 39 ing the payment of liabilities incurred 40 prior to April 1, 2025. Funds may only be 41 made available pursuant to a cost allo- 42 cation plan submitted to the department of 43 health and human services, the United 44 States department of agriculture and any 45 other applicable federal agency to the 46 extent that such approvals are required by 47 federal statute or regulations or upon 335 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 determination by the director of the budg- 2 et that expenditure of these funds is 3 necessary to meet the purposes defined 4 herein. This appropriation shall only be 5 available upon approval of an expenditure 6 plan by the director of the budget. 7 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 8 finance law and any other provision of law 9 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 10 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 11 er of the office of temporary and disabil- 12 ity assistance, authorize the transfer or 13 interchange of moneys appropriated herein 14 with any other state operations - general 15 fund appropriation within the office of 16 temporary and disability assistance except 17 where transfer or interchange of appropri- 18 ations is prohibited or otherwise 19 restricted by law. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 21 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 23 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 24 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 25 appropriation for the budget division 26 program of the division of the budget, are 27 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully 29 stated (52295). 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 8,383,000 31 -------------- 32 Program account subtotal ................... 8,383,000 33 -------------- 34 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 35 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 36 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25024 37 For the federal share of the design and 38 implementation of modifications and 39 enhancements to the welfare-to-work case 40 management system, the welfare management 41 system, the child support management 42 system, the electronic benefit transfer 43 system, costs associated with New York 44 city facilities management, and other 45 related systems operated by the office of 46 temporary and disability assistance, the 47 office of children and family services, 48 the department of labor, or the department 336 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 of health necessary for the successful 2 implementation of the personal responsi- 3 bility and work opportunity reconciliation 4 act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) and the New 5 York state welfare reform act of 1997 6 (chapter 436 of the laws of 1997). 7 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 8 of law, this appropriation shall be avail- 9 able for costs heretofore and hereafter to 10 be accrued and to be supported with feder- 11 al funds including any department of agri- 12 culture food and nutrition services grant 13 award properly received by the state 14 during or for a federal fiscal year in 15 which costs can be properly submitted for 16 reimbursement to the department of agri- 17 culture. A portion of the amount appropri- 18 ated herein may be transferred or inter- 19 changed with any office of temporary and 20 disability assistance federal department 21 of agriculture food and nutrition services 22 funds. Funds may only be made available 23 pursuant to a cost allocation plan submit- 24 ted to the department of health and human 25 services, the United States department of 26 agriculture and any other applicable 27 federal agency to the extent that such 28 approvals are required by federal statute 29 or regulations. This appropriation shall 30 only be available upon approval of an 31 expenditure plan by the director of the 32 budget for the purposes defined herein 33 (52295). 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 5,000,000 35 -------------- 36 Program account subtotal ................... 5,000,000 37 -------------- 38 SPECIALIZED SERVICES PROGRAM ................................ 16,731,000 39 -------------- 40 General Fund 41 State Purposes Account - 10050 42 For services and expenses of the specialized 43 services program including the payment of 44 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 45 2025. 46 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 47 finance law and any other provision of law 337 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 2 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 3 er of the office of temporary and disabil- 4 ity assistance, authorize the transfer or 5 interchange of moneys appropriated herein 6 with any other state operations - general 7 fund appropriation within the office of 8 temporary and disability assistance except 9 where transfer or interchange of appropri- 10 ations is prohibited or otherwise 11 restricted by law. 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 13 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 14 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 15 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 16 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 17 appropriation for the budget division 18 program of the division of the budget, are 19 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 20 part of this appropriation as if fully 21 stated (52219). 22 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 10,165,000 23 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 31,000 24 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 17,000 25 Travel (54000) .................................... 80,000 26 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,243,000 27 Equipment (56000) ................................. 10,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal .................. 11,546,000 30 -------------- 31 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 32 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 33 Refugee Resettlement Account - 25160 34 For services and expenses related to the 35 administration of refugee programs includ- 36 ing but not limited to the Cuban-Haitian 37 and refugee resettlement program and the 38 Cuban-Haitian and refugee targeted assist- 39 ance program. 40 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 41 of law, and subject to the approval of the 42 director of the budget, funds appropriated 43 herein may be transferred or suballocated 44 to any other state agency for services and 45 expenses related to refugee resettlement 46 programs (52304). 338 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ....................... 1,555,000 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,550,000 3 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 980,000 4 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 100,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ................... 4,185,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 9 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 10 Homeless Housing Account - 25390 11 For services and expenses related to the 12 administration of federal homeless and 13 other support services grants. 14 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 15 finance law and any other provision of law 16 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 17 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 18 er of the office of temporary and disabil- 19 ity assistance, make an amount 20 appropriated herein available through 21 interchange to any other fund in which 22 federal homeless grants are received, for 23 services and expenses related to federal 24 homeless and other federal support 25 services grants (52219). 26 Personal service (50000) ......................... 513,000 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 131,000 28 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 323,000 29 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 33,000 30 -------------- 31 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 32 -------------- 33 SHELTER OVERSIGHT AND COMPLIANCE ............................. 6,360,000 34 -------------- 35 General Fund 36 State Purposes Account - 10050 37 For services and expenses incurred by the 38 office's division of shelter oversight and 39 compliance including the payment of 40 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 41 2025. 42 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 43 finance law and any other provision of law 44 to the contrary, the director of the budg- 45 et may, upon the advice of the commission- 339 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 er of the office of temporary and disabil- 2 ity assistance, authorize the transfer or 3 interchange of moneys appropriated herein 4 with any other state operations - general 5 fund appropriation within the office of 6 temporary and disability assistance except 7 where transfer or interchange of appropri- 8 ations is prohibited or otherwise 9 restricted by law. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 11 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 12 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 13 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 14 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 15 appropriation for the budget division 16 program of the division of the budget, are 17 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 18 part of this appropriation as if fully 19 stated (53042). 20 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 5,620,000 21 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 30,000 22 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 13,000 23 Travel (54000) ................................... 105,000 24 Contractual services (51000) ......................582,000 25 Equipment (56000) ................................. 10,000 26 -------------- 340 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 2 General Fund 3 State Purposes Account - 10050 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For services and expenses of the administration program including the 6 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024. The office 7 is authorized to charge-back New York city human resources adminis- 8 tration for their contributed share of costs for the training 9 resource system. 10 Notwithstanding any other inconsistent provision of law, the office 11 shall reduce reimbursement otherwise payable to social services 12 districts to recover 100 percent of the costs incurred by the office 13 for employment verification services. Notwithstanding any provision 14 of law to the contrary, and subject to the approval of the director 15 of the budget, the city of New York shall be charged back for costs 16 related to Mapper. The office is authorized to chargeback New York 17 city human resources administration for their contributed share of 18 occupancy costs at 14 Boerum Place. 19 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 20 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 21 upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of temporary and 22 disability assistance, authorize the transfer or interchange of 23 moneys appropriated herein with any other state operations - general 24 fund appropriation within the office of temporary and disability 25 assistance except where transfer or interchange of appropriations is 26 prohibited or otherwise restricted by law. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 28 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 29 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 30 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 31 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 32 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 33 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 25,475,000 .... (re. $5,903,000) 34 Contractual services (51000) ... 25,388,000 ........ (re. $16,010,000) 35 Special Revenue Funds - Other 36 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 37 OTDA Program Account - 21980 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 39 For services and expenses related to the support of health and social 40 services programs. 41 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law or any other 42 inconsistent provision of law, the office shall reduce reimbursement 43 otherwise payable to social services districts to recover 100 44 percent of costs incurred by the office on behalf of social services 45 districts, including the costs incurred for electronic access to 46 federal systems to verify alien status for entitlements (81001). 47 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,400,000 .......... (re. $2,376,000) 341 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 100,000 .................... (re. $94,000) 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 3 For services and expenses related to the support of health and social 4 services programs. 5 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law or any other 6 inconsistent provision of law, the office shall reduce reimbursement 7 otherwise payable to social services districts to recover 100 8 percent of costs incurred by the office on behalf of social services 9 districts, including the costs incurred for electronic access to 10 federal systems to verify alien status for entitlements (81001). 11 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,400,000 .......... (re. $2,345,000) 12 ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS PROGRAM 13 General Fund 14 State Purposes Account - 10050 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 16 For services and expenses of the administrative hearings program 17 including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 18 2024. 19 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 20 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 21 upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of temporary and 22 disability assistance, authorize the transfer or interchange of 23 moneys appropriated herein with any other state operations - general 24 fund appropriation within the office of temporary and disability 25 assistance except where transfer or interchange of appropriations is 26 prohibited or otherwise restricted by law. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 28 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 29 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 30 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 31 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 32 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (52306). 33 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 25,300,000 ... (re. $10,146,000) 34 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,010,000 .......... (re. $3,352,000) 35 CHILD SUPPORT SERVICES PROGRAM 36 General Fund 37 State Purposes Account - 10050 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 39 For services and expenses of the child support services program 40 including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 41 2024. 42 Amounts appropriated herein may be matched with available federal 43 funds and without local financial participation. Subject to the 44 approval of the director of the budget, funds may be used by the 342 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 office either directly or through one or more contracts with private 2 or public organizations, for services designed to strengthen child 3 support enforcement activities including but not necessarily limited 4 to instate bank match services; a paternity media campaign; a 5 medical support unit; payments to hospitals and other eligible enti- 6 ties for obtaining voluntary paternity acknowledgments; joint 7 enforcement teams; remediation of hard-to-collect cases; location 8 services; website services; child support guidelines review; and 9 operation of a centralized support collection unit, including the 10 cost of banking services and an automated voice response system and 11 customer service unit. 12 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law or any other 13 inconsistent provision of law, the office shall reduce reimbursement 14 otherwise payable to social services districts to recover 50 percent 15 of the non-federal share of costs incurred by the office for the 16 operation of a centralized support collection unit, including the 17 cost of banking services and an automated voice response system and 18 customer service unit. Such reduction shall be prorated among 19 districts based on the number of collections and disbursements proc- 20 essed or on an alternative methodology deemed appropriate by the 21 commissioner. 22 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, amounts appropri- 23 ated herein may be used, as matched by federal funds, pursuant to a 24 plan approved by the director of the budget, for the planning, 25 development and operation of an automated system designed to meet 26 the requirements of the family support act of 1988, the personal 27 responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation act of 1996 and 28 to facilitate and improve local districts operations related to 29 child support enforcement. 30 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the law to the contrary, 31 pursuant to memoranda of understanding and subject to the approval 32 of the director of the budget, a portion of the amount appropriated 33 herein may be available for expenditures of the department of taxa- 34 tion and finance, the department of motor vehicles, and the depart- 35 ment of labor for reimbursement of administrative costs of these 36 departments associated with efforts to increase child support 37 collections. 38 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 39 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 40 upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of temporary and 41 disability assistance, authorize the transfer or interchange of 42 moneys appropriated herein with any other state operations - general 43 fund appropriation within the office of temporary and disability 44 assistance except where transfer or interchange of appropriations is 45 prohibited or otherwise restricted by law. 46 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 47 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 48 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 49 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 50 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 51 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (52200). 343 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,463,000 ..... (re. $1,032,000) 2 Contractual services (51000) ... 8,019,000 .......... (re. $5,504,000) 3 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 4 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 5 Child Support Account - 25178 6 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 7 For services and expenses related to the administration of the child 8 support enforcement program. 9 A portion of the funds appropriated herein, subject to the approval of 10 the director of the budget, may be used as the federal match for 11 services designed to strengthen child support enforcement activities 12 including but not necessarily limited to instate bank match 13 services; a paternity media campaign; a medical support unit; 14 payments to hospitals and other eligible entities for obtaining 15 voluntary paternity acknowledgments; joint enforcement teams; reme- 16 diation of hard-to-collect cases; location services; website 17 services; child support guidelines review; and operation of a 18 centralized support collection unit, including the cost of banking 19 services and an automated voice response system and customer service 20 unit. 21 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, amounts appropri- 22 ated herein may be used, pursuant to a plan approved by the director 23 of the budget, for the planning, development and operation of an 24 automated system designed to meet the requirements of the family 25 support act of 1988, the personal responsibility and work opportu- 26 nity reconciliation act of 1996 and to facilitate and improve local 27 districts operations related to child support enforcement. 28 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 29 ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any other state 30 department or agency for the purposes stated herein. 31 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the law to the contrary, 32 pursuant to memoranda of understanding and subject to the approval 33 of the director of the budget, a portion of the amount appropriated 34 herein may be available for expenditures of the department of taxa- 35 tion and finance, the department of motor vehicles, and the depart- 36 ment of labor for reimbursement of administrative costs of these 37 departments associated with efforts to increase child support 38 collections (52200). 39 Personal service (50000) ... 7,000,000 .............. (re. $5,075,000) 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 24,588,000 ......... (re. $19,697,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 4,500,000 ............... (re. $3,287,000) 42 Indirect costs (58850) ... 900,000 .................... (re. $719,000) 43 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, is 44 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 45 For services and expenses related to the administration of the child 46 support enforcement program. 47 A portion of the funds appropriated herein, subject to the approval of 48 the director of the budget, may be used as the federal match for 344 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 services designed to strengthen child support enforcement activities 2 including but not necessarily limited to instate bank match 3 services; a paternity media campaign; a medical support unit; 4 payments to hospitals and other eligible entities for obtaining 5 voluntary paternity acknowledgments; joint enforcement teams; reme- 6 diation of hard-to-collect cases; location services; website 7 services; child support guidelines review; and operation of a 8 centralized support collection unit, including the cost of banking 9 services and an automated voice response system and customer service 10 unit. 11 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, amounts appropri- 12 ated herein may be used, pursuant to a plan approved by the director 13 of the budget, for the planning, development and operation of an 14 automated system designed to meet the requirements of the family 15 support act of 1988, the personal responsibility and work opportu- 16 nity reconciliation act of 1996 and to facilitate and improve local 17 districts operations related to child support enforcement. 18 Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the amounts appropri- 19 ated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any other state 20 department or agency for the purposes stated herein. 21 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the law to the contrary, 22 pursuant to memoranda of understanding and subject to the approval 23 of the director of the budget, a portion of the amount appropriated 24 herein may be available for expenditures of the department of taxa- 25 tion and finance, the department of motor vehicles, and the depart- 26 ment of labor for reimbursement of administrative costs of these 27 departments associated with efforts to increase child support 28 collections (52200). 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) .......................................... 30 [24,588,000] 24,066,740 .......................... (re. $11,131,000) 31 Indirect costs (58850) ... 900,000 .................... (re. $256,000) 32 DISABILITY DETERMINATIONS PROGRAM 33 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 34 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 35 Disability Determinations Account - 25153 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 37 For services and expenses related to the office of disability determi- 38 nations (52201). 39 Personal service (50000) ... 91,400,000 ............ (re. $51,440,000) 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 62,729,000 ......... (re. $44,667,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 61,871,000 ............. (re. $36,671,000) 42 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 43 supplemented by transfers in accordance with state finance law, is 44 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 45 For services and expenses related to the office of disability determi- 46 nations (52201). 345 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ............................................. 2 [87,400,000]89,912,979 ............................ (re. $1,077,000) 3 Nonpersonal service (57050) .......................................... 4 [53,000,000]55,920,000 ........................... (re. $12,814,000) 5 Fringe benefits (60090) .............................................. 6 [55,600,000]57,588,615 .............................. (re. $686,000) 7 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as 8 supplemented by transfers in accordance with state finance law, is 9 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 10 For services and expenses related to the office of disability determi- 11 nations (52201). 12 Personal service (50000) ............................................. 13 [86,500,000]90,011,091 ............................ (re. $1,814,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) .......................................... 15 [53,000,000]48,000,000 ........................... (re. $16,750,000) 16 Fringe benefits (60090) ... [55,000,000]57,270,885 .... (re. $913,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 18 For services and expenses related to the office of disability determi- 19 nations (52201). 20 Personal service (50000) ... 86,500,000 ............ (re. $13,575,000) 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 53,000,000 .......... (re. $3,447,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 55,000,000 ............. (re. $10,100,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 24 For services and expenses related to the office of disability determi- 25 nations (52201). 26 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 53,000,000 ......... (re. $15,296,000) 27 EMPLOYMENT AND INCOME SUPPORT PROGRAM 28 General Fund 29 State Purposes Account - 10050 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 31 For services and expenses of the employment and income support program 32 including the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 33 2024. 34 The agency is authorized to chargeback social services districts for 35 100 percent of costs incurred by the agency on their behalf for 36 disability related consultative examination contracts. 37 Notwithstanding section 153 of the social services law or any other 38 inconsistent provision of law, the office shall reduce reimbursement 39 otherwise payable to social services districts to recover 50 percent 40 of the non-federal share of costs incurred by the office for the 41 operation of the statewide electronic benefit transfer (EBT) system 42 and the common benefit identification card (CBIC). 43 For services and expenses of client notices including but not limited 44 to personal service costs, postage, other nonpersonal services 45 costs, and contractor costs paid directly by the office including 346 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 but not limited to costs for mail processing. Notwithstanding any 2 other inconsistent provision of law, the office shall reduce 3 reimbursement otherwise payable to social services districts to 4 recover 50 percent of the non-federal share of costs, including 5 prior period costs, incurred by the office for these purposes. 6 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 7 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 8 upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of temporary and 9 disability assistance, authorize the transfer or interchange of 10 moneys appropriated herein with any other state operations - general 11 fund appropriation within the office of temporary and disability 12 assistance except where transfer or interchange of appropriations is 13 prohibited or otherwise restricted by law. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 15 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 16 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 17 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 18 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 19 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (52202). 20 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 17,174,000 .... (re. $5,835,000) 21 Contractual services (51000) ... 33,601,000 ........ (re. $15,523,000) 22 For services and expenses incurred by the office's division of disa- 23 bility determinations, including payments to the social security 24 administration, in making determinations and re-determinations 25 regarding blindness and disability in accordance with title XVI of 26 the social security act for the New York state supplement program 27 (52341). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 600,000 ......... (re. $600,000) 29 Contractual services (51000) ... 600,000 .............. (re. $600,000) 30 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 31 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 32 Home Energy Assistance Program Account - 25123 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 34 For services and expenses related to the administration of the low 35 income home energy assistance program. Pursuant to provisions of the 36 federal omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1981, and with the 37 approval of the director of the budget, a portion of the funds 38 appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to other 39 state agencies for administration of the home energy assistance 40 program (52215). 41 Personal service (50000) ... 6,800,000 .............. (re. $6,800,000) 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,500,000 ........... (re. $3,468,000) 43 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 4,700,000 ............... (re. $4,700,000) 44 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,000,000 ................ (re. $2,000,000) 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 46 For services and expenses related to the administration of the low 47 income home energy assistance program. Pursuant to provisions of the 48 federal omnibus budget reconciliation act of 1981, and with the 347 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 approval of the director of the budget, a portion of the funds 2 appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to other 3 state agencies for administration of the home energy assistance 4 program (52215). 5 Personal service (50000) ... 6,800,000 .............. (re. $2,632,000) 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,500,000 ........... (re. $3,419,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 4,700,000 ............... (re. $2,039,000) 8 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,000,000 ................ (re. $1,688,000) 9 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 10 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 11 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25024 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 13 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the money hereby 14 appropriated may, with the approval of the director of the budget, 15 be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer with amounts 16 appropriated within the office of temporary and disability assist- 17 ance federal food and nutrition services local assistance account. 18 For services and expenses related to the administration of the supple- 19 mental nutrition assistance program, as well as a summer electronic 20 benefit transfer program pursuant to the consolidated appropriations 21 act, 2023. Amounts appropriated herein may be used for the expenses 22 associated with the operation of the statewide electronic benefit 23 transfer (EBT) system; the common benefit identification card 24 (CBIC); and an integrated eligibility system. With the approval of 25 the director of budget, a portion of the funds appropriated herein 26 may be transferred or suballocated to other state agencies for the 27 administration of supplemental nutrition assistance program, summer 28 electronic benefit transfer program or for purposes related to the 29 implementation of an integrated eligibility system (52224). 30 Personal service (50000) ... 9,465,000 .............. (re. $9,338,000) 31 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 30,775,000 ......... (re. $22,933,000) 32 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,750,000 ............... (re. $6,750,000) 33 Indirect costs (58850) ... 840,000 .................... (re. $840,000) 34 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 35 supplemented by transfers in accordance with state finance law, is 36 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 37 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the money hereby 38 appropriated may, with the approval of the director of the budget, 39 be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer with amounts 40 appropriated within the office of temporary and disability assist- 41 ance federal food and nutrition services local assistance account. 42 For services and expenses related to the administration of the supple- 43 mental nutrition assistance program. Amounts appropriated herein may 44 be used for the expenses associated with the operation of the state- 45 wide electronic benefit transfer (EBT) system; the common benefit 46 identification card (CBIC); and an integrated eligibility system. 47 With the approval of the director of budget, a portion of the funds 48 appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to other 348 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 state agencies for the administration of supplemental nutrition 2 assistance program or for purposes related to the implementation of 3 an integrated eligibility system (52224). 4 Personal service (50000) ... [8,975,000]11,752,611 .... (re. $877,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) .......................................... 6 [18,300,000]22,206,427 .............................. (re. $446,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ... [6,000,000]11,426,148 ..... (re. $314,000) 8 Indirect costs (58850) ... [800,000]1,716,877 .......... (re. $49,000) 9 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY PROGRAM 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 13 For the design and implementation of modifications and enhancements to 14 the welfare-to-work case management system, the welfare management 15 system, the child support management system and other related 16 systems operated by the office of temporary and disability assist- 17 ance, the office of children and family services, the department of 18 labor, or the department of health necessary for the successful 19 implementation of the personal responsibility and work opportunity 20 reconciliation act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) and the New York state 21 welfare reform act of 1997 (chapter 436 of the laws of 1997) includ- 22 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024. 23 Funds may only be made available pursuant to a cost allocation plan 24 submitted to the department of health and human services, the United 25 States department of agriculture and any other applicable federal 26 agency to the extent that such approvals are required by federal 27 statute or regulations or upon determination by the director of the 28 budget that expenditure of these funds is necessary to meet the 29 purposes defined herein. This appropriation shall only be available 30 upon approval of an expenditure plan by the director of the budget. 31 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 32 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 33 upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of temporary and 34 disability assistance, authorize the transfer or interchange of 35 moneys appropriated herein with any other state operations - general 36 fund appropriation within the office of temporary and disability 37 assistance except where transfer or interchange of appropriations is 38 prohibited or otherwise restricted by law. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 40 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 41 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 42 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 43 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (52295). 45 Contractual services (51000) ... 8,383,000 .......... (re. $7,178,000) 46 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 349 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For the design and implementation of modifications and enhancements to 2 the welfare-to-work case management system, the welfare management 3 system, the child support management system and other related 4 systems operated by the office of temporary and disability assist- 5 ance, the office of children and family services, the department of 6 labor, or the department of health necessary for the successful 7 implementation of the personal responsibility and work opportunity 8 reconciliation act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) and the New York state 9 welfare reform act of 1997 (chapter 436 of the laws of 1997) includ- 10 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023. 11 Funds may only be made available pursuant to a cost allocation plan 12 submitted to the department of health and human services, the United 13 States department of agriculture and any other applicable federal 14 agency to the extent that such approvals are required by federal 15 statute or regulations or upon determination by the director of the 16 budget that expenditure of these funds is necessary to meet the 17 purposes defined herein. This appropriation shall only be available 18 upon approval of an expenditure plan by the director of the budget. 19 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 20 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 21 upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of temporary and 22 disability assistance, authorize the transfer or interchange of 23 moneys appropriated herein with any other state operations - general 24 fund appropriation within the office of temporary and disability 25 assistance except where transfer or interchange of appropriations is 26 prohibited or otherwise restricted by law. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 28 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 29 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 30 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 31 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 32 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (52295). 33 Contractual services (51000) ... 8,383,000 ............ (re. $318,000) 34 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 35 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 36 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25024 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 38 For the federal share of the design and implementation of modifica- 39 tions and enhancements to the welfare-to-work case management 40 system, the welfare management system, the child support management 41 system, the electronic benefit transfer system, costs associated 42 with New York city facilities management, and other related systems 43 operated by the office of temporary and disability assistance, the 44 office of children and family services, the department of labor, or 45 the department of health necessary for the successful implementation 46 of the personal responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation 47 act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) and the New York state welfare reform act 48 of 1997 (chapter 436 of the laws of 1997). 350 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, this appropriation 2 shall be available for costs heretofore and hereafter to be accrued 3 and to be supported with federal funds including any department of 4 agriculture food and nutrition services grant award properly 5 received by the state during or for a federal fiscal year in which 6 costs can be properly submitted for reimbursement to the department 7 of agriculture. A portion of the amount appropriated herein may be 8 transferred or interchanged with any office of temporary and disa- 9 bility assistance federal department of agriculture food and nutri- 10 tion services funds. Funds may only be made available pursuant to a 11 cost allocation plan submitted to the department of health and human 12 services, the United States department of agriculture and any other 13 applicable federal agency to the extent that such approvals are 14 required by federal statute or regulations. This appropriation shall 15 only be available upon approval of an expenditure plan by the direc- 16 tor of the budget for the purposes defined herein (52295). 17 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $4,923,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022,as amended by chapter 50, 19 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 20 For the federal share of the design and implementation of modifica- 21 tions and enhancements to the welfare-to-work case management 22 system, the welfare management system, the child support management 23 system, the electronic benefit transfer system, costs associated 24 with New York city facilities management, and other related systems 25 operated by the office of temporary and disability assistance, the 26 office of children and family services, the department of labor, or 27 the department of health necessary for the successful implementation 28 of the personal responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation 29 act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) and the New York state welfare reform act 30 of 1997 (chapter 436 of the laws of 1997). 31 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, this appropriation 32 shall be available for costs heretofore and hereafter to be accrued 33 and to be supported with federal funds including any department of 34 agriculture food and nutrition services grant award properly 35 received by the state during or for a federal fiscal year in which 36 costs can be properly submitted for reimbursement to the department 37 of agriculture. A portion of the amount appropriated herein may be 38 transferred or interchanged with any office of temporary and disa- 39 bility assistance federal department of agriculture food and nutri- 40 tion services funds. Funds may only be made available pursuant to a 41 cost allocation plan submitted to the department of health and human 42 services, the United States department of agriculture and any other 43 applicable federal agency to the extent that such approvals are 44 required by federal statute or regulations. This appropriation shall 45 only be available upon approval of an expenditure plan by the direc- 46 tor of the budget for the purposes defined herein (52295). 47 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,909,670 ........... (re. $1,215,000) 48 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 50, 49 section 1, of the laws of 2022: 351 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For the federal share of the design and implementation of modifica- 2 tions and enhancements to the welfare-to-work case management 3 system, the welfare management system, the child support management 4 system, the electronic benefit transfer system, costs associated 5 with New York city facilities management, and other related systems 6 operated by the office of temporary and disability assistance, the 7 office of children and family services, the department of labor, or 8 the department of health necessary for the successful implementation 9 of the personal responsibility and work opportunity reconciliation 10 act of 1996 (P.L. 104-193) and the New York state welfare reform act 11 of 1997 (chapter 436 of the laws of 1997). 12 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, this appropriation 13 shall be available for costs heretofore and hereafter to be accrued 14 and to be supported with federal funds including any department of 15 agriculture food and nutrition services grant award properly 16 received by the state during or for a federal fiscal year in which 17 costs can be properly submitted for reimbursement to the department 18 of agriculture. A portion of the amount appropriated herein may be 19 transferred or interchanged with any office of temporary and disa- 20 bility assistance federal department of agriculture food and nutri- 21 tion services funds. Funds may only be made available pursuant to a 22 cost allocation plan submitted to the department of health and human 23 services, the United States department of agriculture and any other 24 applicable federal agency to the extent that such approvals are 25 required by federal statute or regulations. This appropriation shall 26 only be available upon approval of an expenditure plan by the direc- 27 tor of the budget for the purposes defined herein (52295). 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,554,500 ........... (re. $4,554,500) 29 SHELTER OVERSIGHT AND COMPLIANCE 30 General Fund 31 State Purposes Account - 10050 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 33 For services and expenses incurred by the office's division of shelter 34 oversight and compliance including the payment of liabilities 35 incurred prior to April 1, 2024. 36 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 37 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 38 upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of temporary and 39 disability assistance, authorize the transfer or interchange of 40 moneys appropriated herein with any other state operations - general 41 fund appropriation within the office of temporary and disability 42 assistance except where transfer or interchange of appropriations is 43 prohibited or otherwise restricted by law. 44 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 45 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 46 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 47 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 352 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 2 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (53042). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 5,620,000 ..... (re. $2,590,000) 4 Contractual services (51000) ... 582,000 .............. (re. $581,000) 5 SPECIALIZED SERVICES PROGRAM 6 General Fund 7 State Purposes Account - 10050 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 9 For services and expenses of the specialized services program includ- 10 ing the payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024. 11 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 12 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 13 upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of temporary and 14 disability assistance, authorize the transfer or interchange of 15 moneys appropriated herein with any other state operations - general 16 fund appropriation within the office of temporary and disability 17 assistance except where transfer or interchange of appropriations is 18 prohibited or otherwise restricted by law. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 20 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 21 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 22 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 23 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (52219). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 10,165,000 .... (re. $6,727,000) 26 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,243,000 .......... (re. $1,186,000) 27 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as 28 amended by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is hereby 29 amended and reappropriated to read: 30 For supplemental costs associated with an emergency rental assistance 31 program pursuant to a plan approved by the office of temporary and 32 disability assistance and director of the budget. 33 Funds appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to any 34 other state agency or authority. 35 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the budget director 36 is hereby authorized to transfer any of the amount appropriated 37 herein to state operations for administration of supplemental emer- 38 gency rental assistance activities (53010). 39 Contractual services (51000) ......................................... 40 [106,453,876]108,275,360 ............................. (re. $58,000) 41 For supplemental costs associated with assistance to small landlords 42 as defined in subdivision 12 of section 2 of subpart A of part BB of 43 chapter 56 of the laws of 2021, of a unit charging rent that does 44 not exceed one hundred fifty percent of the fair market rent by unit 45 size, with rental arrears accrued by a tenant, if such landlord has 46 used best efforts to contact and assist such tenant in applying for 47 a program funded with emergency rental assistance dollars, without 353 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 success, including instances in which such tenant has vacated while 2 owing such rental arrears or, provided funds remain available after 3 serving such landlords, for assistance to landlords of a unit charg- 4 ing rent that does not exceed one hundred fifty percent of the fair 5 market rent by unit size, with rental arrears accrued by a tenant, 6 if such landlord has used best efforts to contact and assist such 7 tenant in applying for a program funded with emergency rental 8 assistance dollars, without success, including instances in which 9 such tenant has vacated while owing such rental arrears. 10 Funds appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to any 11 other state agency or authority. 12 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the budget director 13 is hereby authorized to transfer any of the amount appropriated 14 herein to state operations for administration of supplemental emer- 15 gency rental assistance activities (53012). 16 Contractual services (51000) ......................................... 17 [10,387,573]9,778,573 ................................ (re. $79,000) 18 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 19 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 20 Refugee Resettlement Account - 25160 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 22 For services and expenses related to the administration of refugee 23 programs including but not limited to the Cuban-Haitian and refugee 24 resettlement program and the Cuban-Haitian and refugee targeted 25 assistance program. 26 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the 27 approval of the director of the budget, funds appropriated herein 28 may be transferred or suballocated to any other state agency for 29 services and expenses related to refugee resettlement programs 30 (52304). 31 Personal service (50000) ... 1,555,000 ................ (re. $809,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 550,000 ............... (re. $453,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 980,000 ................... (re. $508,000) 34 Indirect costs (58850) ... 100,000 ..................... (re. $44,000) 35 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 36 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 37 Homeless Housing Account - 25390 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 39 For services and expenses related to the administration of federal 40 homeless and other support services grants. 41 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law and any other 42 provision of law to the contrary, the director of the budget may, 43 upon the advice of the commissioner of the office of temporary and 44 disability assistance, make an amount appropriated herein available 45 through interchange to any other fund in which federal homeless 46 grants are received, for services and expenses related to federal 47 homeless and other federal support services grants (52219). 354 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY ASSISTANCE OFFICE OF TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ... 513,000 .................. (re. $362,000) 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 131,000 ............... (re. $131,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 323,000 ................... (re. $227,000) 4 Indirect costs (58850) ... 33,000 ...................... (re. $19,000) 5 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 6 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 7 CARES Emergency Rent - 25544 8 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as 9 amended by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, and as 10 reduced by transfers in accordance with state finance law, is hereby 11 amended and reappropriated to read: 12 For services and expenses of an emergency rental assistance program. 13 Households eligible for assistance under such program shall include 14 one or more individuals that has experienced financial hardship, is 15 at risk of homelessness or housing instability, and earns up to 16 eighty percent of area median income as determined by the United 17 States department of housing and urban development. Such assistance 18 shall support the payment of up to 12 months of rental arrears due 19 at the time of application and up to 3 months of prospective rent 20 pursuant to part BB of chapter 56 of the law of 2021, as amended by 21 chapter 417 of the laws of 2021, federal law and other purposes set 22 forth in Public Law No. 116-260, Public Law 117-2, or any other 23 federal funds made available for this purpose. Funds may also be 24 used to support a hardship fund for undocumented workers. 25 Funds appropriated herein may be transferred or suballocated to any 26 other state agency or authority. 27 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the budget director 28 is hereby authorized to transfer any of the amount appropriated 29 herein to state operations for administration of emergency rental 30 assistance activities (52219). 31 Nonpersonal service (57050) .......................................... 32 [58,935,020] 55,465,306 .......................... (re. $24,273,000) 355 12550-10-5 NEW YORK STATE FINANCIAL CONTROL BOARD STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 3,497,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 3,497,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 NEW YORK STATE FINANCIAL CONTROL BOARD ....................... 3,497,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 12 NYS Financial Control Board Account - 21911 13 This amount is appropriated to pay for 14 financial control board personal service 15 and nonpersonal service expenses including 16 the payment of liabilities incurred prior 17 to April 1, 2025. 18 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 19 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 20 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 21 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 22 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 23 appropriation for the budget division 24 program of the division of the budget, are 25 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 26 part of this appropriation as if fully 27 stated (55801). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,485,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 100,000 30 Travel (54000) ..................................... 3,000 31 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 853,600 32 Equipment (56000) ................................. 25,000 33 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 989,900 34 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 40,500 35 -------------- 356 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 471,060,000 299,368,700 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 471,060,000 299,368,700 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 89,630,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 12 State Transmitter of Money Insurance Fund Account - 13 20130 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 state transmitter of money insurance fund 16 in accordance with article 13-C of the 17 banking law (81001). 18 Contractual services (51000) .................. 14,000,000 19 -------------- 20 Program account subtotal .................. 14,000,000 21 -------------- 22 Special Revenue Funds - Other 23 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 24 Banking Department Account - 21970 25 For services and expenses related to the 26 administration and operation of the 27 department of financial services. 28 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 29 finance law, the money hereby appropriated 30 may be increased or decreased by inter- 31 change with any other appropriation within 32 the department of financial services. Such 33 annual interchanges made between banking 34 department account appropriations and 35 insurance department account appropri- 36 ations may not, in the aggregate, total 37 more than $5,000,000. The superintendent 38 of the department of financial services 39 shall report quarterly to the governor, 40 the speaker of the assembly and the major- 41 ity leader of the senate regarding any 42 interchanges made pursuant to this 43 provision. 357 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Such report shall specify the amount of 2 moneys so interchanged and detail the 3 expenditures funded as a result of such 4 interchange (81001). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 9,713,000 6 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 14,000 7 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 985,000 8 Travel (54000) ................................... 221,000 9 Contractual services (51000) .................. 12,115,000 10 Equipment (56000) ................................ 430,000 11 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 6,206,000 12 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 285,000 13 -------------- 14 Program account subtotal .................. 29,969,000 15 -------------- 16 Special Revenue Funds - Other 17 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 18 Equitable Sharing Agreement-DFS Justice Account - 22241 19 For services and expenses related to the 20 administration program (81001). 21 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 25,000 22 Equipment (56000) ................................ 475,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 25 -------------- 26 Special Revenue Funds - Other 27 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 28 Equitable Sharing Agreement-DFS Treasury Account - 22242 29 For services and expenses related to the 30 administration program (81001). 31 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 25,000 32 Equipment (56000) ................................ 475,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 38 Financial Services Seized Assets Account - 21973 39 For services and expenses related to the 40 administration program (81001). 358 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 25,000 2 Equipment (56000) ................................ 475,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 8 Insurance Department Account - 21994 9 For services and expenses related to the 10 administration and operation of the 11 department of financial services. 12 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 13 finance law, the money hereby appropriated 14 may be increased or decreased by inter- 15 change with any other appropriation within 16 the department of financial services. Such 17 annual interchanges made between banking 18 department account appropriations and 19 insurance department account appropri- 20 ations may not, in the aggregate, total 21 more than $5,000,000. The superintendent 22 of the department of financial services 23 shall report quarterly to the governor, 24 the speaker of the assembly and the major- 25 ity leader of the senate regarding any 26 interchanges made pursuant to this 27 provision. 28 Such report shall specify the amount of 29 moneys so interchanged and detail the 30 expenditures funded as a result of such 31 interchange (81001). 32 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 14,463,000 33 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 21,000 34 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,477,000 35 Travel (54000) ................................... 331,000 36 Contractual services (51000) .................. 17,508,000 37 Equipment (56000) ................................ 646,000 38 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 9,241,000 39 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 424,000 40 -------------- 41 Program account subtotal .................. 44,111,000 42 -------------- 43 Special Revenue Funds - Other 44 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 45 Settlement Account - 22045 46 For services and expenses related to the 47 enforcement actions in accordance with the 359 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 purpose outlined in the settlement under 2 which funding is obtained. Notwithstanding 3 any inconsistent provision of law, all or 4 a portion of this appropriation may, 5 subject to the approval of the director of 6 the budget, be transferred to the special 7 revenue funds - other / aid to localities, 8 miscellaneous special revenue fund - other 9 / aid to localities, banking department 10 settlement account. Notwithstanding any 11 inconsistent provision of law, the direc- 12 tor of the budget may suballocate up to 13 the full amount of this appropriation to 14 any department, agency or authority 15 (81001). 16 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 17 -------------- 18 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 19 -------------- 20 BANKING PROGRAM ............................................ 126,594,000 21 -------------- 22 Special Revenue Funds - Other 23 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 24 Banking Department Account - 21970 25 For services and expenses related to consum- 26 er protection activities. Notwithstanding 27 section 51 of the state finance law, the 28 money hereby appropriated may be increased 29 or decreased by interchange with any other 30 appropriation within the department of 31 financial services. Such annual inter- 32 changes made between banking department 33 account appropriations and insurance 34 department account appropriations may not, 35 in the aggregate, total more than 36 $5,000,000. The superintendent of the 37 department of financial services shall 38 report quarterly to the governor, the 39 speaker of the assembly and the majority 40 leader of the senate regarding any inter- 41 changes made pursuant to this provision. 42 Such report shall specify the amount of 43 moneys so interchanged and detail the 44 expenditures funded as a result of such 45 interchange (32435). 46 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 13,028,000 47 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 13,000 360 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 19,000 2 Travel (54000) ................................... 224,000 3 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 348,000 4 Equipment (56000) ................................. 10,000 5 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 8,324,000 6 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 382,000 7 -------------- 8 Total amount available ...................... 22,348,000 9 -------------- 10 For services and expenses related to the 11 regulatory activities of the department of 12 financial services. Notwithstanding 13 section 51 of the state finance law, the 14 money hereby appropriated may be increased 15 or decreased by interchange with any other 16 appropriation within the department of 17 financial services. Such annual inter- 18 changes made between banking department 19 account appropriations and insurance 20 department account appropriations may not, 21 in the aggregate, total more than 22 $5,000,000. The superintendent of the 23 department of financial services shall 24 report quarterly to the governor, the 25 speaker of the assembly and the majority 26 leader of the senate regarding any inter- 27 changes made pursuant to this provision. 28 Such report shall specify the amount of 29 moneys so interchanged and detail the 30 expenditures funded as a result of such 31 interchange (32436). 32 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 51,493,000 33 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 68,000 34 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 11,000 35 Travel (54000) ................................. 1,649,000 36 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,389,000 37 Equipment (56000) ................................ 100,000 38 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 30,314,000 39 Indirect costs (58800) ......................... 1,394,000 40 -------------- 41 Total amount available ...................... 87,418,000 42 -------------- 43 For suballocation to the office of the 44 inspector general for services and 45 expenses (32437). 46 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 55,000 47 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 55,000 361 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Travel (54000) .................................... 55,000 2 Equipment (56000) ................................. 62,000 3 -------------- 4 Total amount available ......................... 227,000 5 -------------- 6 For services and expenses related to the 7 crime proceeds task force. All or a 8 portion of these funds may be suballocated 9 to the departments of law and taxation and 10 finance for services and expenses incurred 11 on behalf of the crime proceeds task force 12 pursuant to an allocation plan developed 13 by the superintendent of the department of 14 financial services, the attorney general 15 and the commissioner of taxation and 16 finance, as appropriate, subject to the 17 approval of the director of the budget 18 (32438). 19 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 465,000 20 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 340,000 21 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 297,000 22 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 17,000 23 -------------- 24 Total amount available ....................... 1,119,000 25 -------------- 26 Program account subtotal ................. 111,112,000 27 -------------- 28 Special Revenue Funds - Other 29 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 30 Virtual Currency Assessments Account 31 For services and expenses of the virtual 32 currency business activities pursuant to 33 section 206 of the financial services law. 34 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 35 finance law, the money hereby appropriated 36 may be increased or decreased by inter- 37 change with any other appropriation within 38 the department of financial services. Such 39 annual interchanges made between virtual 40 currency assessment account appropriations 41 and banking department account appropri- 42 ations may not, in the aggregate, total 43 more than $5,000,000. The superintendent 44 of the department of financial services 45 shall report quarterly to the governor, 46 the speaker of the assembly and the major- 47 ity leader of the senate regarding any 48 interchanges made pursuant to this 362 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 provision. Such report shall specify the 2 amount of moneys so interchanged and 3 detail the expenditures funded as a result 4 of such interchange (32401). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 7,482,000 6 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 20,000 7 Travel (54000) ................................... 500,000 8 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,300,000 9 Equipment (56000) ................................. 40,000 10 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 4,900,000 11 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 240,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal .................. 15,482,000 14 -------------- 15 INSURANCE PROGRAM .......................................... 254,836,000 16 -------------- 17 Special Revenue Funds - Other 18 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 19 Insurance Department Account - 21994 20 For services and expenses related to consum- 21 er services activities. Notwithstanding 22 section 51 of the state finance law, the 23 money hereby appropriated may be increased 24 or decreased by interchange with any other 25 appropriation within the department of 26 financial services. Such annual inter- 27 changes may not, in the aggregate, total 28 more than five million dollars. The super- 29 intendent of the department of financial 30 services shall report quarterly to the 31 governor, the speaker of the assembly and 32 the majority leader of the senate regard- 33 ing any interchanges made pursuant to this 34 provision. Such report shall specify the 35 amount of moneys so interchanged and 36 detail the expenditures funded as a result 37 of such interchange (32405). 38 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 14,204,000 39 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 19,000 40 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 29,000 41 Travel (54000) ................................... 336,000 42 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 522,000 43 Equipment (56000) ................................. 16,000 44 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 9,075,000 45 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 423,000 46 -------------- 363 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Total amount available ...................... 24,624,000 2 -------------- 3 For services and expenses related to the 4 regulatory activities of the department of 5 financial services. Notwithstanding 6 section 51 of the state finance law, the 7 money hereby appropriated may be increased 8 or decreased by interchange with any other 9 appropriation within the department of 10 financial services. Such annual inter- 11 changes may not, in the aggregate, total 12 more than five million dollars. The super- 13 intendent of the department of financial 14 services shall report quarterly to the 15 governor, the speaker of the assembly and 16 the majority leader of the senate regard- 17 ing any interchanges made pursuant to this 18 provision. Such report shall specify the 19 amount of moneys so interchanged and 20 detail the expenditures funded as a result 21 of such interchange (32406). 22 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 73,118,000 23 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 18,000 24 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 135,000 25 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 372,000 26 Travel (54000) ................................. 2,488,000 27 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,286,000 28 Equipment (56000) ................................ 129,000 29 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 44,381,000 30 Indirect costs (58800) ......................... 2,055,000 31 -------------- 32 Total amount available ..................... 127,982,000 33 -------------- 34 For suballocation to the department of state 35 for expenses incurred in the enforcement, 36 development and maintenance of the state 37 building code (32408). 38 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 6,704,000 39 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 571,000 40 Travel (54000) ................................... 300,000 41 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,026,000 42 Equipment (56000) ................................ 201,000 43 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 4,283,000 44 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 201,000 45 -------------- 46 Total amount available ...................... 13,286,000 47 -------------- 364 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For suballocation to the division of home- 2 land security and emergency services for 3 expenses related to the urban search and 4 rescue program (32412). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 181,000 6 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 75,000 7 Travel (54000) .................................... 50,000 8 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 100,000 9 Equipment (56000) ................................. 61,000 10 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 54,000 11 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 5,000 12 -------------- 13 Total amount available ......................... 526,000 14 -------------- 15 For suballocation to the division of home- 16 land security and emergency services for 17 services and expenses related to the fire 18 prevention and control program and the 19 state fire reporting system (32413). 20 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 10,524,000 21 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 2,350,000 22 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 1,500,000 23 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,069,000 24 Travel (54000) ................................. 1,335,000 25 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,034,000 26 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,860,000 27 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 5,562,000 28 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 362,000 29 -------------- 30 Total amount available ...................... 25,596,000 31 -------------- 32 For suballocation to the office of the 33 inspector general for services and 34 expenses (32414). 35 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 60,000 36 Travel (54000) .................................... 60,000 37 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 60,000 38 Equipment (56000) ................................. 70,000 39 -------------- 40 Total amount available ......................... 250,000 41 -------------- 42 For suballocation to the division of home- 43 land security and emergency services for 44 services and expenses of developing and 45 promulgating fire safety standards for 365 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 cigarettes pursuant to section 156-c of 2 the executive law (32415). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 543,000 4 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 151,000 5 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 20,000 6 Travel (54000) .................................... 60,000 7 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 10,000 8 Equipment (56000) ................................. 10,000 9 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 344,000 10 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 20,000 11 -------------- 12 Total amount available ....................... 1,158,000 13 -------------- 14 For suballocation to the division of home- 15 land security and emergency services for 16 services and expenses related to the 17 repair and rehabilitation of the state 18 fire training academy (32416). 19 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 500,000 20 -------------- 21 For suballocation to the division of home- 22 land security and emergency services for 23 expenses related to fire inspections and 24 fire safety training programs at privately 25 operated colleges and universities in New 26 York state (32417). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 778,000 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 76,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 30 Travel (54000) .................................... 25,000 31 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 20,000 32 Equipment (56000) ................................. 15,000 33 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 506,000 34 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 24,000 35 -------------- 36 Total amount available ....................... 1,494,000 37 -------------- 38 For suballocation to the department of law 39 for services and expenses associated with 40 the implementation of executive order 109 41 appointing the attorney general as special 42 prosecutor for no-fault auto insurance 43 fraud (32418). 44 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,015,000 45 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 325,000 366 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Travel (54000) ................................... 325,000 2 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 325,000 3 Equipment (56000) ................................ 361,000 4 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,926,000 5 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 128,000 6 -------------- 7 Total amount available ....................... 6,405,000 8 -------------- 9 For suballocation to the department of 10 health for services and expenses of the 11 center for community health program 12 (32403). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 6,066,000 14 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,250,000 15 Travel (54000) ................................. 1,500,000 16 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 900,000 17 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,386,000 18 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 3,875,000 19 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 236,000 20 -------------- 21 Total amount available ...................... 15,213,000 22 -------------- 23 For suballocation to the department of law 24 for services and expenses associated with 25 investigating broker/insurer practices in 26 the insurance industry (32419). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 680,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 179,000 29 Travel (54000) ................................... 328,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 179,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................ 212,000 32 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 434,000 33 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 40,000 34 -------------- 35 Total amount available ....................... 2,052,000 36 -------------- 37 For suballocation to the department of 38 health for services and expenses incurred 39 for implementation of a forge-proof phar- 40 maceutical prescription program (32421). 41 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,656,000 42 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 376,000 43 Travel (54000) ................................... 210,000 44 Contractual services (51000) .................. 10,305,000 45 Equipment (56000) ................................ 191,000 367 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,687,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 91,000 3 -------------- 4 Total amount available ...................... 15,516,000 5 -------------- 6 For suballocation to the department of 7 health for services and expenses related 8 to the enhanced newborn screening program. 9 All or a portion of this appropriation may 10 be reduced, transferred, or interchanged 11 to the department of health federal health 12 and human services fund children's health 13 insurance account for services and expend- 14 itures for health services initiatives for 15 improving the health of children, includ- 16 ing targeted low-income children and other 17 low-income children, as permitted under 18 section 2105(a)(1)(D)(ii) of the social 19 security act and defined in the regu- 20 lations at 42 CFR 457.10. Such reduction, 21 transfer, and or interchange shall be in 22 accordance with an approved state plan 23 amendment submitted by the commissioner of 24 health and approved by the federal centers 25 for medicare and medicaid services 26 (32422). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,870,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 5,051,000 29 Travel (54000) ..................................... 1,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,223,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................ 208,000 32 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 3,111,000 33 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 143,000 34 -------------- 35 Total amount available ...................... 14,607,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ................. 249,209,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Other 40 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 41 Pharmacy Benefit Manager Regulatory Account - 22255 42 For services and expenses of the pharmacy 43 benefits bureau pursuant to section 99-oo 44 of the state finance law. 45 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state 46 finance law, the money hereby appropriated 47 may be increased or decreased by inter- 48 change with any other appropriation within 368 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 the department of financial services. Such 2 annual interchanges made between pharmacy 3 benefit manager regulatory account appro- 4 priations and insurance department account 5 appropriations may not, in the aggregate, 6 total more than $5,000,000. The super- 7 intendent of the department of financial 8 services shall report quarterly to the 9 governor, the speaker of the assembly and 10 the majority leader of the senate regard- 11 ing any interchanges made pursuant to this 12 provision. Such report shall specify the 13 amount of moneys so interchanged and 14 detail the expenditures funded as a result 15 of such interchange (32446). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,897,000 17 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 20,000 18 Travel (54000) ................................... 200,000 19 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 600,000 20 Equipment (56000) ................................. 10,000 21 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,816,000 22 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 84,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal ................... 5,627,000 25 -------------- 369 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Other 3 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 4 Banking Department Account - 21970 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to the administration and operation 7 of the department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 8 of the state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be 9 increased or decreased by interchange with any other appropriation 10 within the department of financial services. Such annual inter- 11 changes made between banking department account appropriations and 12 insurance department account appropriations may not, in the aggre- 13 gate, total more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the depart- 14 ment of financial services shall report quarterly to the governor, 15 the speaker of the assembly and the majority leader of the senate 16 regarding any interchanges made pursuant to this provision. 17 Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and 18 detail the expenditures funded as a result of such interchange 19 (81001). 20 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 9,430,000 ..... (re. $4,053,000) 21 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 14,000 ....... (re. $13,000) 22 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 985,000 ............ (re. $754,000) 23 Travel (54000) ... 221,000 ............................ (re. $211,000) 24 Contractual services (51000) ... 12,115,000 ......... (re. $7,166,000) 25 Equipment (56000) ... 430,000 ......................... (re. $293,000) 26 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 6,206,000 ............... (re. $2,693,000) 27 Indirect costs (58800) ... 285,000 .................... (re. $140,000) 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 29 For services and expenses related to the administration and operation 30 of the department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 31 of the state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be 32 increased or decreased by interchange with any other appropriation 33 within the department of financial services. Such annual inter- 34 changes made between banking department account appropriations and 35 insurance department account appropriations may not, in the aggre- 36 gate, total more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the depart- 37 ment of financial services shall report quarterly to the governor, 38 the speaker of the assembly and the majority leader of the senate 39 regarding any interchanges made pursuant to this provision. 40 Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and 41 detail the expenditures funded as a result of such interchange 42 (81001). 43 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 9,155,000 ..... (re. $1,217,000) 44 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 14,000 ....... (re. $13,000) 45 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 985,000 ............ (re. $441,000) 46 Travel (54000) ... 221,000 ............................ (re. $205,000) 47 Contractual services (51000) ... 12,115,000 ......... (re. $1,570,000) 48 Equipment (56000) ... 430,000 ......................... (re. $367,000) 49 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 6,139,000 ................. (re. $226,000) 370 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Indirect costs (58800) ... 285,000 .................... (re. $285,000) 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 3 For services and expenses related to the administration and operation 4 of the department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 5 of the state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be 6 increased or decreased by interchange with any other appropriation 7 within the department of financial services. Such annual inter- 8 changes made between banking department account appropriations and 9 insurance department account appropriations may not, in the aggre- 10 gate, total more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the depart- 11 ment of financial services shall report quarterly to the governor, 12 the speaker of the assembly and the majority leader of the senate 13 regarding any interchanges made pursuant to this provision. 14 Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and 15 detail the expenditures funded as a result of such interchange 16 (81001). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 8,543,000 ..... (re. $1,444,000) 18 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 14,000 ....... (re. $12,000) 19 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 985,000 ............ (re. $594,000) 20 Travel (54000) ... 221,000 ............................ (re. $209,000) 21 Contractual services (51000) ... 12,115,000 ......... (re. $2,108,000) 22 Equipment (56000) ... 430,000 ......................... (re. $393,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 5,448,000 ................. (re. $915,000) 24 Indirect costs (58800) ... 277,000 ..................... (re. $78,000) 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 26 For services and expenses related to the administration and operation 27 of the department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 28 of the state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be 29 increased or decreased by interchange with any other appropriation 30 within the department of financial services. Such annual inter- 31 changes made between banking department account appropriations and 32 insurance department account appropriations may not, in the aggre- 33 gate, total more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the depart- 34 ment of financial services shall report quarterly to the governor, 35 the speaker of the assembly and the majority leader of the senate 36 regarding any interchanges made pursuant to this provision. 37 Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and 38 detail the expenditures funded as a result of such interchange 39 (81001). 40 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 8,080,000 ....... (re. $641,000) 41 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 14,000 ........ (re. $4,000) 42 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 985,000 ............ (re. $520,000) 43 Travel (54000) ... 221,000 ............................ (re. $217,000) 44 Contractual services (51000) ... 12,115,000 ......... (re. $2,918,000) 45 Equipment (56000) ... 430,000 ......................... (re. $353,000) 46 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 5,153,000 ................. (re. $544,000) 47 Indirect costs (58800) ... 262,000 ..................... (re. $53,000) 48 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 371 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the administration and operation 2 of the department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 3 of the state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be 4 increased or decreased by interchange with any other appropriation 5 within the department of financial services. Such annual inter- 6 changes made between banking department account appropriations and 7 insurance department account appropriations may not, in the aggre- 8 gate, total more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the depart- 9 ment of financial services shall report quarterly to the governor, 10 the speaker of the assembly and the majority leader of the senate 11 regarding any interchanges made pursuant to this provision. 12 Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and 13 detail the expenditures funded as a result of such interchange 14 (81001). 15 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 8,080,000 ....... (re. $355,000) 16 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 14,000 ........ (re. $2,000) 17 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 985,000 ............ (re. $606,000) 18 Travel (54000) ... 221,000 ............................. (re. $60,000) 19 Contractual services (51000) ... 12,115,000 ......... (re. $2,015,000) 20 Equipment (56000) ... 430,000 ......................... (re. $427,000) 21 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 5,153,000 ................... (re. $5,000) 22 Indirect costs (58800) ... 262,000 ...................... (re. $5,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 24 For services and expenses related to the administration and operation 25 of the department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 26 of the state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be 27 increased or decreased by interchange with any other appropriation 28 within the department of financial services. Such annual inter- 29 changes made between banking department account appropriations and 30 insurance department account appropriations may not, in the aggre- 31 gate, total more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the depart- 32 ment of financial services shall report quarterly to the governor, 33 the speaker of the assembly and the majority leader of the senate 34 regarding any interchanges made pursuant to this provision. 35 Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and 36 detail the expenditures funded as a result of such interchange 37 (81001). 38 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 985,000 ............ (re. $367,000) 39 Travel (54000) ... 221,000 ............................ (re. $186,000) 40 Contractual services (51000) ... 12,115,000 ........... (re. $414,000) 41 Equipment (56000) ... 430,000 ......................... (re. $102,000) 42 Special Revenue Funds - Other 43 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 44 Insurance Department Account - 21994 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 46 For services and expenses related to the administration and operation 47 of the department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 48 of the state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be 49 increased or decreased by interchange with any other appropriation 372 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 within the department of financial services. Such annual inter- 2 changes made between banking department account appropriations and 3 insurance department account appropriations may not, in the aggre- 4 gate, total more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the depart- 5 ment of financial services shall report quarterly to the governor, 6 the speaker of the assembly and the majority leader of the senate 7 regarding any interchanges made pursuant to this provision. 8 Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and 9 detail the expenditures funded as a result of such interchange 10 (81001). 11 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 14,041,000 .... (re. $5,975,000) 12 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 21,000 ....... (re. $20,000) 13 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,477,000 .......... (re. $888,000) 14 Travel (54000) ... 331,000 ............................ (re. $259,000) 15 Contractual services (51000) ... 17,508,000 ........ (re. $10,082,000) 16 Equipment (56000) ... 646,000 ......................... (re. $441,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 9,241,000 ............... (re. $3,971,000) 18 Indirect costs (58800) ... 424,000 .................... (re. $207,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 20 For services and expenses related to the administration and operation 21 of the department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 22 of the state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be 23 increased or decreased by interchange with any other appropriation 24 within the department of financial services. Such annual inter- 25 changes made between banking department account appropriations and 26 insurance department account appropriations may not, in the aggre- 27 gate, total more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the depart- 28 ment of financial services shall report quarterly to the governor, 29 the speaker of the assembly and the majority leader of the senate 30 regarding any interchanges made pursuant to this provision. 31 Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and 32 detail the expenditures funded as a result of such interchange 33 (81001). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 13,632,000 .... (re. $1,266,000) 35 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 21,000 ....... (re. $19,000) 36 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,477,000 ........ (re. $1,080,000) 37 Travel (54000) ... 331,000 ............................ (re. $172,000) 38 Contractual services (51000) ... 17,508,000 ......... (re. $1,454,000) 39 Equipment (56000) ... 646,000 ......................... (re. $551,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 9,141,000 ................. (re. $257,000) 41 Indirect costs (58800) ... 424,000 .................... (re. $424,000) 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 43 For services and expenses related to the administration and operation 44 of the department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 45 of the state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be 46 increased or decreased by interchange with any other appropriation 47 within the department of financial services. Such annual inter- 48 changes made between banking department account appropriations and 49 insurance department account appropriations may not, in the aggre- 50 gate, total more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the depart- 373 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ment of financial services shall report quarterly to the governor, 2 the speaker of the assembly and the majority leader of the senate 3 regarding any interchanges made pursuant to this provision. 4 Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and 5 detail the expenditures funded as a result of such interchange 6 (81001). 7 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 12,721,000 .... (re. $2,073,000) 8 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 21,000 ....... (re. $19,000) 9 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,477,000 .......... (re. $887,000) 10 Travel (54000) ... 331,000 ............................ (re. $218,000) 11 Contractual services (51000) ... 17,508,000 ......... (re. $2,421,000) 12 Equipment (56000) ... 646,000 ......................... (re. $590,000) 13 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 8,091,000 ................. (re. $542,000) 14 Indirect costs (58800) ... 410,000 .................... (re. $112,000) 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 16 For services and expenses related to the administration and operation 17 of the department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 18 of the state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be 19 increased or decreased by interchange with any other appropriation 20 within the department of financial services. Such annual inter- 21 changes made between banking department account appropriations and 22 insurance department account appropriations may not, in the aggre- 23 gate, total more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the depart- 24 ment of financial services shall report quarterly to the governor, 25 the speaker of the assembly and the majority leader of the senate 26 regarding any interchanges made pursuant to this provision. 27 Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and 28 detail the expenditures funded as a result of such interchange 29 (81001). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 12,032,000 ...... (re. $631,000) 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 21,000 ........ (re. $6,000) 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,477,000 .......... (re. $780,000) 33 Travel (54000) ... 331,000 ............................ (re. $255,000) 34 Contractual services (51000) ... 17,508,000 ......... (re. $3,673,000) 35 Equipment (56000) ... 646,000 ......................... (re. $530,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 7,653,000 ................. (re. $589,000) 37 Indirect costs (58800) ... 387,000 ..................... (re. $68,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 39 For services and expenses related to the administration and operation 40 of the department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 41 of the state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be 42 increased or decreased by interchange with any other appropriation 43 within the department of financial services. Such annual inter- 44 changes made between banking department account appropriations and 45 insurance department account appropriations may not, in the aggre- 46 gate, total more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the depart- 47 ment of financial services shall report quarterly to the governor, 48 the speaker of the assembly and the majority leader of the senate 49 regarding any interchanges made pursuant to this provision. 374 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and 2 detail the expenditures funded as a result of such interchange 3 (81001). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 12,032,000 ...... (re. $534,000) 5 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 21,000 ........ (re. $2,000) 6 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,477,000 ........ (re. $1,275,000) 7 Travel (54000) ... 331,000 ............................ (re. $240,000) 8 Contractual services (51000) ... 17,508,000 ......... (re. $3,631,000) 9 Equipment (56000) ... 646,000 ......................... (re. $412,000) 10 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 7,653,000 ................... (re. $9,000) 11 Indirect costs (58800) ... 387,000 ...................... (re. $2,000) 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 13 For services and expenses related to the administration and operation 14 of the department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 15 of the state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be 16 increased or decreased by interchange with any other appropriation 17 within the department of financial services. Such annual inter- 18 changes made between banking department account appropriations and 19 insurance department account appropriations may not, in the aggre- 20 gate, total more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the depart- 21 ment of financial services shall report quarterly to the governor, 22 the speaker of the assembly and the majority leader of the senate 23 regarding any interchanges made pursuant to this provision. 24 Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and 25 detail the expenditures funded as a result of such interchange 26 (81001). 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,477,000 .......... (re. $536,000) 28 Travel (54000) ... 331,000 ............................. (re. $32,000) 29 Contractual services (51000) ... 17,508,000 ............ (re. $56,000) 30 Equipment (56000) ... 646,000 ......................... (re. $258,000) 31 BANKING PROGRAM 32 Special Revenue Funds - Other 33 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 34 Banking Department Account - 21970 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 36 For services and expenses related to consumer protection activities. 37 Notwithstanding section 51 of the state finance law, the money here- 38 by appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange with 39 any other appropriation within the department of financial services. 40 Such annual interchanges made between banking department account 41 appropriations and insurance department account appropriations may 42 not, in the aggregate, total more than $5,000,000. The superinten- 43 dent of the department of financial services shall report quarterly 44 to the governor, the speaker of the assembly and the majority leader 45 of the senate regarding any interchanges made pursuant to this 46 provision. Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so inter- 47 changed and detail the expenditures funded as a result of such 48 interchange (32435). 375 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 12,648,000 .... (re. $5,649,000) 2 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 13,000 ........ (re. $3,000) 3 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 19,000 .............. (re. $19,000) 4 Travel (54000) ... 224,000 ............................. (re. $57,000) 5 Contractual services (51000) ... 348,000 .............. (re. $348,000) 6 Equipment (56000) ... 10,000 ............................ (re. $9,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 8,324,000 ............... (re. $3,284,000) 8 Indirect costs (58800) ... 382,000 .................... (re. $193,000) 9 For services and expenses related to the regulatory activities of the 10 department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 of the 11 state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be increased or 12 decreased by interchange with any other appropriation within the 13 department of financial services. Such annual interchanges made 14 between banking department account appropriations and insurance 15 department account appropriations may not, in the aggregate, total 16 more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the department of finan- 17 cial services shall report quarterly to the governor, the speaker of 18 the assembly and the majority leader of the senate regarding any 19 interchanges made pursuant to this provision. Such report shall 20 specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and detail the expendi- 21 tures funded as a result of such interchange (32436). 22 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 46,085,000 ... (re. $25,003,000) 23 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 68,000 ....... (re. $58,000) 24 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 11,000 ............... (re. $8,000) 25 Travel (54000) ... 1,649,000 ........................ (re. $1,295,000) 26 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,389,000 .......... (re. $1,474,000) 27 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 ......................... (re. $100,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 30,314,000 ............. (re. $16,511,000) 29 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,394,000 .................. (re. $825,000) 30 For services and expenses related to the crime proceeds task force. 31 All or a portion of these funds may be suballocated to the depart- 32 ments of law and taxation and finance for services and expenses 33 incurred on behalf of the crime proceeds task force pursuant to an 34 allocation plan developed by the superintendent of the department of 35 financial services, the attorney general and the commissioner of 36 taxation and finance, as appropriate, subject to the approval of the 37 director of the budget (32438). 38 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 451,000 ......... (re. $451,000) 39 Contractual services (51000) ... 340,000 .............. (re. $340,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 297,000 ................... (re. $297,000) 41 Indirect costs (58800) ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $17,000) 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 43 For services and expenses related to the regulatory activities of the 44 department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 of the 45 state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be increased or 46 decreased by interchange with any other appropriation within the 47 department of financial services. Such annual interchanges made 48 between banking department account appropriations and insurance 49 department account appropriations may not, in the aggregate, total 50 more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the department of finan- 51 cial services shall report quarterly to the governor, the speaker of 376 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 the assembly and the majority leader of the senate regarding any 2 interchanges made pursuant to this provision. Such report shall 3 specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and detail the expendi- 4 tures funded as a result of such interchange (32436). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 44,160,000 .... (re. $7,110,000) 6 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 68,000 ....... (re. $52,000) 7 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 11,000 .............. (re. $11,000) 8 Travel (54000) ... 1,649,000 ........................ (re. $1,158,000) 9 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,389,000 ............ (re. $135,000) 10 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 .......................... (re. $99,000) 11 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 29,609,000 .............. (re. $5,201,000) 12 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,374,000 .................. (re. $379,000) 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 14 For services and expenses related to the regulatory activities of the 15 department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 of the 16 state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be increased or 17 decreased by interchange with any other appropriation within the 18 department of financial services. Such annual interchanges made 19 between banking department account appropriations and insurance 20 department account appropriations may not, in the aggregate, total 21 more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the department of finan- 22 cial services shall report quarterly to the governor, the speaker of 23 the assembly and the majority leader of the senate regarding any 24 interchanges made pursuant to this provision. Such report shall 25 specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and detail the expendi- 26 tures funded as a result of such interchange (32436). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 41,209,000 .... (re. $1,944,000) 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 68,000 ....... (re. $61,000) 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 11,000 .............. (re. $11,000) 30 Travel (54000) ... 1,649,000 ........................ (re. $1,534,000) 31 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,389,000 .......... (re. $1,130,000) 32 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 .......................... (re. $99,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 25,455,000 ................ (re. $405,000) 34 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,241,000 ................... (re. $38,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 36 For services and expenses related to the regulatory activities of the 37 department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 of the 38 state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be increased or 39 decreased by interchange with any other appropriation within the 40 department of financial services. Such annual interchanges made 41 between banking department account appropriations and insurance 42 department account appropriations may not, in the aggregate, total 43 more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the department of finan- 44 cial services shall report quarterly to the governor, the speaker of 45 the assembly and the majority leader of the senate regarding any 46 interchanges made pursuant to this provision. Such report shall 47 specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and detail the expendi- 48 tures funded as a result of such interchange (32436). 49 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 38,978,000 .... (re. $3,750,000) 50 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 68,000 ....... (re. $47,000) 377 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 11,000 .............. (re. $11,000) 2 Travel (54000) ... 1,649,000 .......................... (re. $540,000) 3 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,389,000 .......... (re. $1,929,000) 4 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 .......................... (re. $99,000) 5 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 24,077,000 .............. (re. $2,116,000) 6 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,173,000 .................. (re. $181,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 8 For services and expenses related to the regulatory activities of the 9 department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 of the 10 state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be increased or 11 decreased by interchange with any other appropriation within the 12 department of financial services. Such annual interchanges made 13 between banking department account appropriations and insurance 14 department account appropriations may not, in the aggregate, total 15 more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the department of finan- 16 cial services shall report quarterly to the governor, the speaker of 17 the assembly and the majority leader of the senate regarding any 18 interchanges made pursuant to this provision. Such report shall 19 specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and detail the expendi- 20 tures funded as a result of such interchange (32436). 21 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 38,978,000 .... (re. $4,568,000) 22 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 68,000 ....... (re. $45,000) 23 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 11,000 ............... (re. $5,000) 24 Travel (54000) ... 1,649,000 ........................ (re. $1,457,000) 25 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,389,000 .......... (re. $1,760,000) 26 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 .......................... (re. $99,000) 27 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 24,077,000 .............. (re. $2,722,000) 28 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,173,000 .................. (re. $207,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 30 For services and expenses related to the regulatory activities of the 31 department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 of the 32 state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be increased or 33 decreased by interchange with any other appropriation within the 34 department of financial services. Such annual interchanges made 35 between banking department account appropriations and insurance 36 department account appropriations may not, in the aggregate, total 37 more than $5,000,000. The superintendent of the department of finan- 38 cial services shall report quarterly to the governor, the speaker of 39 the assembly and the majority leader of the senate regarding any 40 interchanges made pursuant to this provision. Such report shall 41 specify the amount of moneys so interchanged and detail the expendi- 42 tures funded as a result of such interchange (32436). 43 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 11,000 ............... (re. $1,000) 44 Travel (54000) ... 1,649,000 .......................... (re. $259,000) 45 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,389,000 ............ (re. $752,000) 46 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 .......................... (re. $97,000) 47 INSURANCE PROGRAM 48 Special Revenue Funds - Other 378 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 2 Insurance Department Account - 21994 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 4 For services and expenses related to the regulatory activities of the 5 department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 of the 6 state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be increased or 7 decreased by interchange with any other appropriation within the 8 department of financial services. Such annual interchanges may not, 9 in the aggregate, total more than five million dollars. The super- 10 intendent of the department of financial services shall report quar- 11 terly to the governor, the speaker of the assembly and the majority 12 leader of the senate regarding any interchanges made pursuant to 13 this provision. Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so 14 interchanged and detail the expenditures funded as a result of such 15 interchange (32406). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 67,624,000 ... (re. $34,295,000) 17 Temporary service (50200) ... 18,000 ................... (re. $18,000) 18 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 135,000 ..... (re. $132,000) 19 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 372,000 ............ (re. $312,000) 20 Travel (54000) ... 2,488,000 ........................ (re. $2,120,000) 21 Contractual services (51000) ... 5,286,000 .......... (re. $4,179,000) 22 Equipment (56000) ... 129,000 ......................... (re. $129,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 44,381,000 ............. (re. $22,618,000) 24 Indirect costs (58800) ... 2,055,000 ................ (re. $1,158,000) 25 For suballocation to the division of homeland security and emergency 26 services for services and expenses related to the repair and reha- 27 bilitation of the state fire training academy (32416). 28 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $249,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 30 For services and expenses related to the regulatory activities of the 31 department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 of the 32 state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be increased or 33 decreased by interchange with any other appropriation within the 34 department of financial services. Such annual interchanges may not, 35 in the aggregate, total more than five million dollars. The super- 36 intendent of the department of financial services shall report quar- 37 terly to the governor, the speaker of the assembly and the majority 38 leader of the senate regarding any interchanges made pursuant to 39 this provision. Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so 40 interchanged and detail the expenditures funded as a result of such 41 interchange (32406). 42 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 64,441,000 .... (re. $7,819,000) 43 Temporary service (50200) ... 18,000 ................... (re. $18,000) 44 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 135,000 ..... (re. $119,000) 45 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 372,000 ............ (re. $209,000) 46 Travel (54000) ... 2,488,000 ........................ (re. $1,921,000) 47 Contractual services (51000) ... 5,286,000 .......... (re. $2,631,000) 48 Equipment (56000) ... 129,000 ......................... (re. $128,000) 49 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 43,208,000 .............. (re. $5,582,000) 50 Indirect costs (58800) ... 2,005,000 .................. (re. $472,000) 379 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For suballocation to the division of homeland security and emergency 2 services for services and expenses related to the repair and reha- 3 bilitation of the state fire training academy (32416). 4 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $455,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 6 For services and expenses related to the regulatory activities of the 7 department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 of the 8 state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be increased or 9 decreased by interchange with any other appropriation within the 10 department of financial services. Such annual interchanges may not, 11 in the aggregate, total more than five million dollars. The super- 12 intendent of the department of financial services shall report quar- 13 terly to the governor, the speaker of the assembly and the majority 14 leader of the senate regarding any interchanges made pursuant to 15 this provision. Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so 16 interchanged and detail the expenditures funded as a result of such 17 interchange (32406). 18 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 60,135,000 .... (re. $3,766,000) 19 Temporary service (50200) ... 18,000 ................... (re. $18,000) 20 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 135,000 ..... (re. $121,000) 21 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 372,000 ............ (re. $151,000) 22 Travel (54000) ... 2,488,000 ........................ (re. $1,849,000) 23 Contractual services (51000) ... 5,286,000 .......... (re. $3,544,000) 24 Equipment (56000) ... 129,000 ......................... (re. $128,000) 25 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 34,799,000 ................ (re. $377,000) 26 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,866,000 .................. (re. $134,000) 27 For suballocation to the division of homeland security and emergency 28 services for services and expenses related to the repair and reha- 29 bilitation of the state fire training academy (32416). 30 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $461,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 32 For services and expenses related to the regulatory activities of the 33 department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 of the 34 state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be increased or 35 decreased by interchange with any other appropriation within the 36 department of financial services. Such annual interchanges may not, 37 in the aggregate, total more than five million dollars. The super- 38 intendent of the department of financial services shall report quar- 39 terly to the governor, the speaker of the assembly and the majority 40 leader of the senate regarding any interchanges made pursuant to 41 this provision. Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so 42 interchanged and detail the expenditures funded as a result of such 43 interchange (32406). 44 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 56,880,000 .... (re. $2,368,000) 45 Temporary service (50200) ... 18,000 ................... (re. $18,000) 46 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 135,000 ..... (re. $105,000) 47 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 372,000 ............ (re. $320,000) 48 Travel (54000) ... 2,488,000 ........................ (re. $1,418,000) 49 Contractual services (51000) ... 5,286,000 .......... (re. $2,878,000) 50 Equipment (56000) ... 129,000 ......................... (re. $127,000) 380 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 32,915,000 ................ (re. $393,000) 2 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,765,000 .................. (re. $232,000) 3 For suballocation to the division of homeland security and emergency 4 services for services and expenses related to the repair and reha- 5 bilitation of the state fire training academy (32416). 6 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $447,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 8 For services and expenses related to the regulatory activities of the 9 department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 of the 10 state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be increased or 11 decreased by interchange with any other appropriation within the 12 department of financial services. Such annual interchanges may not, 13 in the aggregate, total more than five million dollars. The super- 14 intendent of the department of financial services shall report quar- 15 terly to the governor, the speaker of the assembly and the majority 16 leader of the senate regarding any interchanges made pursuant to 17 this provision. Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so 18 interchanged and detail the expenditures funded as a result of such 19 interchange (32406). 20 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 56,880,000 .... (re. $5,335,000) 21 Temporary service (50200) ... 18,000 ................... (re. $18,000) 22 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 135,000 ...... (re. $85,000) 23 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 372,000 ............ (re. $310,000) 24 Travel (54000) ... 2,488,000 ........................ (re. $2,229,000) 25 Contractual services (51000) ... 5,286,000 .......... (re. $3,876,000) 26 Equipment (56000) ... 129,000 ......................... (re. $113,000) 27 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 32,915,000 ................ (re. $850,000) 28 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,765,000 .................. (re. $315,000) 29 For suballocation to the division of homeland security and emergency 30 services for services and expenses related to the repair and reha- 31 bilitation of the state fire training academy (32416). 32 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $206,000) 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 34 For services and expenses related to the regulatory activities of the 35 department of financial services. Notwithstanding section 51 of the 36 state finance law, the money hereby appropriated may be increased or 37 decreased by interchange with any other appropriation within the 38 department of financial services. Such annual interchanges may not, 39 in the aggregate, total more than five million dollars. The super- 40 intendent of the department of financial services shall report quar- 41 terly to the governor, the speaker of the assembly and the majority 42 leader of the senate regarding any interchanges made pursuant to 43 this provision. Such report shall specify the amount of moneys so 44 interchanged and detail the expenditures funded as a result of such 45 interchange (32406). 46 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 372,000 ............ (re. $332,000) 47 Travel (54000) ... 2,488,000 .......................... (re. $788,000) 48 Contractual services (51000) ... 5,286,000 .......... (re. $2,398,000) 49 Equipment (56000) ... 129,000 ......................... (re. $122,700) 381 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF FINANCIAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For suballocation to the division of homeland security and emergency 2 services for services and expenses related to the repair and reha- 3 bilitation of the state fire training academy (32416). 4 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 .............. (re. $282,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 6 For suballocation to the division of homeland security and emergency 7 services for services and expenses related to the repair and reha- 8 bilitation of the state fire training academy (32416). 9 Contractual services (51000) ... 500,000 ............... (re. $96,000) 382 12550-10-5 NEW YORK STATE GAMING COMMISSION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 7,851,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 111,365,000 0 5 ---------------- ---------------- 6 All Funds ........................ 119,216,000 0 7 ================ ================ 8 SCHEDULE 9 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ....................................... 7,851,000 10 -------------- 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 administration program. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 16 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 17 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 18 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 19 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 20 appropriation for the budget division 21 program of the division of the budget, are 22 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully 24 stated (81001). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,223,000 26 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 33,000 27 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 5,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 500,000 29 Travel (54000) .................................... 70,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,985,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................. 35,000 32 -------------- 33 ADMINISTRATION OF THE LOTTERY PROGRAM ....................... 49,500,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Other 36 State Lottery Fund 37 State Lottery Account - 20902 38 For services and expenses related to the 39 administration and operation of the 40 lottery program, providing that moneys 41 hereby appropriated shall be available to 383 12550-10-5 NEW YORK STATE GAMING COMMISSION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 the program net of refunds, rebates, 2 reimbursements and credits. 3 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 4 contrary, the money hereby appropriated 5 may not be, in whole or in part, inter- 6 changed with any other appropriation with- 7 in the state gaming commission, except 8 those appropriations that fund activities 9 related to the state lottery program. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 11 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 12 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 13 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 14 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 15 appropriation for the budget division 16 program of the division of the budget, are 17 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 18 part of this appropriation as if fully 19 stated, provided, however, that any such 20 transfer or interchange made pursuant to 21 such authority shall be in accordance with 22 article I, section 9 of the state consti- 23 tution (81001). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 18,695,000 25 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 600,000 26 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 240,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,200,000 28 Travel (54000) .................................... 90,000 29 Contractual services (51000) .................. 13,900,000 30 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,450,000 31 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 12,750,000 32 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 575,000 33 -------------- 34 CHARITABLE GAMING PROGRAM .................................... 2,602,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 38 Bell Jar Collection Account - 22003 39 For services and expenses related to the 40 administration and operation of the chari- 41 table gaming program, providing that 42 moneys hereby appropriated shall be avail- 43 able to the program net of refunds, 44 rebates, reimbursements and credits. 45 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 46 contrary, the money hereby appropriated 47 may not be, in whole or in part, inter- 48 changed with any other appropriation with- 384 12550-10-5 NEW YORK STATE GAMING COMMISSION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 in the state gaming commission, except 2 those appropriations that fund activities 3 related to the state charitable gaming 4 program. 5 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 6 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 7 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 8 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 9 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 10 appropriation for the budget division 11 program of the division of the budget, are 12 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 13 part of this appropriation as if fully 14 stated (47702). 15 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,082,000 16 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 5,000 17 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 35,000 18 Travel (54000) .................................... 25,000 19 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 700,000 20 Equipment (56000) ................................. 25,000 21 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 700,000 22 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 30,000 23 -------------- 24 GAMING PROGRAM .............................................. 38,444,000 25 -------------- 26 Special Revenue Funds - Other 27 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 28 Regulation of Indian Gaming Account - 22046 29 For services and expenses related to the 30 administration and operation of the regu- 31 lation of the Indian gaming program, 32 providing that moneys hereby appropriated 33 shall be available to the program net of 34 refunds, rebates, reimbursements and cred- 35 its. 36 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 37 contrary, the money hereby appropriated 38 may not be, in whole or in part, inter- 39 changed with any other appropriation with- 40 in the state gaming commission, except 41 those appropriations that fund activities 42 related to the regulation of the Indian 43 gaming program. 44 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 45 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 46 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 47 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 48 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 385 12550-10-5 NEW YORK STATE GAMING COMMISSION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 appropriation for the budget division 2 program of the division of the budget, are 3 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 4 part of this appropriation as if fully 5 stated (47703). 6 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,028,000 7 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 420,000 8 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 35,000 9 Travel (54000) .................................... 40,000 10 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 500,000 11 Equipment (56000) ................................. 25,000 12 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,900,000 13 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 130,000 14 -------------- 15 Program account subtotal ................... 8,078,000 16 -------------- 17 Special Revenue Funds - Other 18 NYS Commercial Gaming Fund 19 Commercial Gaming Regulation Account - 23702 20 For services and expenses related to the 21 administration and operation of the 22 commercial gaming revenue account, provid- 23 ing that moneys hereby appropriated shall 24 be available to the program net of 25 refunds, rebates, reimbursements and cred- 26 its. 27 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 28 contrary, the money hereby appropriated 29 may not be, in whole or in part, inter- 30 changed with any other appropriation with- 31 in the state gaming commission, except 32 those appropriations that fund activities 33 related to the administration of the 34 gaming commission program. 35 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 36 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 37 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 38 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 39 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 40 appropriation for the budget division 41 program of the division of the budget, are 42 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 43 part of this appropriation as if fully 44 stated (81001). 45 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 10,398,000 46 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 240,000 47 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 45,000 48 Travel (54000) .................................... 60,000 386 12550-10-5 NEW YORK STATE GAMING COMMISSION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ................... 6,400,000 2 Equipment (56000) ................................. 50,000 3 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 6,266,000 4 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 282,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal .................. 23,741,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Other 9 State Lottery Fund 10 VLT Administration Account - 20903 11 For services and expenses related to the 12 administration of the video lottery gaming 13 program, providing that moneys hereby 14 appropriated shall be available to the 15 program net of refunds, rebates, 16 reimbursements and credits. 17 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 18 contrary, the money hereby appropriated 19 may not be, in whole or in part, inter- 20 changed with any other appropriation with- 21 in the state gaming commission, except 22 those appropriations that fund activities 23 related to the state video lottery gaming 24 program. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 26 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 27 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 28 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 29 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 30 appropriation for the budget division 31 program of the division of the budget, are 32 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 33 part of this appropriation as if fully 34 stated (47703). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,080,000 36 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 35,000 37 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 45,000 38 Travel (54000) .................................... 25,000 39 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,150,000 40 Equipment (56000) ................................ 175,000 41 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,025,000 42 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 90,000 43 -------------- 44 Program account subtotal ................... 6,625,000 45 -------------- 46 HORSE RACING AND PARI-MUTUEL WAGERING PROGRAM ............... 20,561,000 47 -------------- 387 12550-10-5 NEW YORK STATE GAMING COMMISSION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 3 Regulation of Racing Account - 21912 4 For services and expenses related to the 5 administration and operation of the regu- 6 lation of horse racing and pari-mutuel 7 wagering program, providing that moneys 8 hereby appropriated shall be available to 9 the program net of refunds, rebates, 10 reimbursements and credits. 11 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 12 contrary, the money hereby appropriated 13 may not be, in whole or in part, inter- 14 changed with any other appropriation with- 15 in the state gaming commission, except 16 those appropriations that fund activities 17 related to the horse racing and pari-mutu- 18 el wagering program. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 20 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 21 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 22 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 23 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 24 appropriation for the budget division 25 program of the division of the budget, are 26 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 27 part of this appropriation as if fully 28 stated (49202). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,271,000 30 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 5,250,000 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 60,000 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 250,000 33 Travel (54000) ................................... 265,000 34 Contractual services (51000) ................... 8,000,000 35 Equipment (56000) ................................ 160,000 36 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,950,000 37 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 255,000 38 -------------- 39 Total amount available ...................... 20,461,000 40 -------------- 41 For services and expenses related to the 42 administration and operation of the New 43 York state racing fan advisory council, 44 providing that moneys hereby appropriated 45 shall be available to the program net of 46 refunds, rebates, reimbursements and cred- 47 its (47711). 388 12550-10-5 NEW YORK STATE GAMING COMMISSION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 5,000 2 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 3 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 85,000 4 -------------- 5 Total amount available ......................... 100,000 6 -------------- 7 INTERACTIVE FANTASY SPORTS PROGRAM ............................. 258,000 8 -------------- 9 Special Revenue Funds - Other 10 Interactive Fantasy Sports Fund 11 Fantasy Sports Administration Account - 24951 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 administration and operation of the regu- 14 lation of interactive fantasy sports 15 program, providing that moneys hereby 16 appropriated shall be available to the 17 program net of refunds, reimbursements and 18 credits. 19 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 20 contrary, the money hereby appropriated 21 may not be, in whole or in part, inter- 22 changed with any other appropriation with- 23 in the state gaming commission, except 24 those appropriations that fund activities 25 related to the state regulation of inter- 26 active fantasy sports program. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 28 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 29 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 30 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 31 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 32 appropriation for the budget division 33 program of the division of the budget, are 34 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 35 part of this appropriation as if fully 36 stated (47713). 37 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 124,000 38 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 39 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 80,000 40 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 4,000 41 -------------- 389 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 209,946,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 26,730,000 23,898,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 39,798,000 0 6 Enterprise Funds ................... 3,333,000 0 7 Internal Service Funds ............. 899,137,000 0 8 Fiduciary Funds .................... 750,000 0 9 ---------------- ---------------- 10 All Funds ........................ 1,179,694,000 23,898,000 11 ================ ================ 12 SCHEDULE 13 BUSINESS SERVICES CENTER PROGRAM ............................ 42,609,000 14 -------------- 15 Internal Service Funds 16 Centralized Services Account 17 Business Services Center Account - 55022 18 For services and expenses related to the 19 business services center program. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 21 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 23 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 24 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 25 appropriation for the budget division 26 program of the division of the budget, are 27 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully 29 stated (26238). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 36,887,000 31 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 42,000 32 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 313,000 33 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 25,000 34 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 35 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,297,000 36 Equipment (56000) ................................. 35,000 37 -------------- 38 CURATORIAL SERVICES PROGRAM .................................... 750,000 39 -------------- 40 Fiduciary Funds 41 Miscellaneous New York State Agency Fund 42 Empire State Plaza Art Commission Account - 60600 390 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 operation of the empire state plaza art 3 commission in accordance with article 4 of 4 the arts and cultural affairs law (26227). 5 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 500,000 6 -------------- 7 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 8 -------------- 9 Fiduciary Funds 10 Miscellaneous New York State Agency Fund 11 Executive Mansion Trust Account - 60600 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 operation of the executive mansion trust 14 in accordance with article 54 of the arts 15 and cultural affairs law (26228). 16 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 250,000 17 -------------- 18 Program account subtotal ..................... 250,000 19 -------------- 20 DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION PROGRAM ............................. 97,737,000 21 -------------- 22 Internal Service Funds 23 Centralized Services Account 24 Design and Construction Account - 55010 25 For services and expenses related to the 26 design and construction program. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 28 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 29 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 30 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 31 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 32 appropriation for the budget division 33 program of the division of the budget, are 34 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 35 part of this appropriation as if fully 36 stated (26211). 37 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 36,646,000 38 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 15,000 39 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 233,000 40 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 506,000 41 Travel (54000) ................................. 1,317,000 42 Contractual services (51000) .................. 38,870,000 43 Equipment (56000) ................................ 636,000 391 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 18,665,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 849,000 3 -------------- 4 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION PROGRAM ................................ 320,825,000 5 -------------- 6 General Fund 7 State Purposes Account - 10050 8 For services and expenses related to the 9 executive direction program. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 11 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 12 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 13 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 14 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 15 appropriation for the budget division 16 program of the division of the budget, are 17 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 18 part of this appropriation as if fully 19 stated (81031). 20 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 21,583,000 21 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 114,000 22 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 104,000 23 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 3,349,000 24 Travel (54000) .................................... 51,000 25 Contractual services (51000) .................. 50,523,000 26 Equipment (56000) ................................ 346,000 27 -------------- 28 Total amount available ...................... 76,070,000 29 -------------- 30 For services and expenses of the New York 31 State Community Commission on Reparations 32 Remedies. 33 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 150,000 34 Travel (54000) ................................... 200,000 35 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,600,000 36 Equipment (56000) ................................. 50,000 37 -------------- 38 Total amount available ....................... 5,000,000 39 -------------- 40 For payments related to the new headquarters 41 for the department of audit and control, 42 the New York state and local employees' 43 retirement system and the New York state 44 and local police and fire retirement 45 system. 392 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 2 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 3 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 4 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 5 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 6 appropriation for the budget division 7 program of the division of the budget, are 8 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully 10 stated (26231). 11 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,168,000 12 -------------- 13 For services and expenses related to a 14 centralized risk management function with- 15 in state government (26239). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 491,000 17 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 102,000 18 -------------- 19 Total amount available ......................... 593,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal .................. 82,831,000 22 -------------- 23 Special Revenue Funds - Other 24 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 25 Plaza Special Events Account - 20120 26 For services and expenses related to the 27 executive direction program (81031). 28 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 229,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 12,000 30 Travel (54000) ..................................... 8,000 31 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,713,000 32 Equipment (56000) .................................. 9,000 33 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 132,000 34 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 6,000 35 -------------- 36 Program account subtotal ................... 2,109,000 37 -------------- 38 Special Revenue Funds - Other 39 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 40 Cuba Lake Management Account - 22124 41 For services and expenses related to the 42 executive direction program (81031). 393 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 386,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal ..................... 386,000 4 -------------- 5 Enterprise Funds 6 Agencies Enterprise Fund 7 Asset Preservation Account - 50322 8 For services and expenses related to the 9 executive direction program (81031). 10 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 16,000 11 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 509,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal ..................... 525,000 14 -------------- 15 Internal Service Funds 16 Centralized Services Account 17 Executive Direction Account - 55001 18 For services and expenses related to the 19 executive direction program. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 21 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 23 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 24 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 25 appropriation for the budget division 26 program of the division of the budget, are 27 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully 29 stated (81031). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 6,409,000 31 Supplies and materials (57000) ............... 143,683,000 32 Travel (54000) ................................... 253,000 33 Contractual services (51000) .................. 80,720,000 34 Equipment (56000) ................................ 110,000 35 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 3,624,000 36 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 175,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ................. 234,974,000 39 -------------- 40 OFFICE OF LANGUAGE ACCESS PROGRAM ............................ 2,312,000 41 -------------- 42 General Fund 43 State Purposes Account - 10050 394 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 office of language access program. These 3 funds may be suballocated to other agen- 4 cies (26241). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 222,000 6 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,090,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal ................... 2,312,000 9 -------------- 10 PROCUREMENT PROGRAM ........................................ 530,549,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 procurement program. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 19 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 20 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 21 appropriation for the budget division 22 program of the division of the budget, are 23 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully 25 stated (26212). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 11,381,000 27 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 28,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 29,000 29 Travel (54000) .................................... 40,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,119,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................. 61,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal .................. 13,658,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 36 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Funds 37 Environmental Projects Account - 25300 38 For services and expenses related to envi- 39 ronmental projects, including but not 40 limited to training, research and techni- 41 cal assistance and demonstration projects, 42 personal services, fringe benefits and 43 indirect costs (26212). 395 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 500,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 4 -------------- 5 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 6 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 7 Emergency Assistance-OGS-9461 Account - 25025 8 For services and expenses related to the 9 temporary emergency feeding assistance 10 program (26213). 11 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 10,865,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal .................. 10,865,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 16 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 17 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25025 18 For services and expenses related to state 19 administrative costs for the national 20 lunch program (26214). 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 15,365,000 22 -------------- 23 Program account subtotal .................. 15,365,000 24 -------------- 25 Special Revenue Funds - Other 26 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 27 Standards and Purchase Account - 22019 28 For services and expenses related to the 29 procurement program. 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 31 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 32 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 33 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 34 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 35 appropriation for the budget division 36 program of the division of the budget, are 37 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 38 part of this appropriation as if fully 39 stated (26212). 40 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 944,000 41 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 10,000 42 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 43 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 320,000 44 Travel (54000) .................................... 87,000 396 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ................... 9,101,000 2 Equipment (56000) ................................. 20,000 3 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 565,000 4 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 24,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal .................. 11,081,000 7 -------------- 8 Internal Service Funds 9 Centralized Services Account 10 Enterprise Contracting Account - 55020 11 For services and expenses related to the 12 procurement program. 13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 14 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 15 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 16 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 17 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 18 appropriation for the budget division 19 program of the division of the budget, are 20 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully 22 stated (26212). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 626,000 24 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,025,000 25 Travel (54000) ................................... 256,000 26 Contractual services (51000) ................. 445,202,000 27 Equipment (56000) .............................. 2,050,000 28 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 355,000 29 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 18,000 30 -------------- 31 Program account subtotal ................. 449,532,000 32 -------------- 33 Internal Service Funds 34 Centralized Services Account 35 Standards and Purchase Account - 55002 36 For services and expenses related to the 37 procurement program. 38 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 39 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 40 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 41 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 42 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 43 appropriation for the budget division 44 program of the division of the budget, are 45 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 46 part of this appropriation as if fully 47 stated (26212). 397 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,580,000 2 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 188,000 3 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 60,000 4 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,245,000 5 Travel (54000) ................................... 160,000 6 Contractual services (51000) .................. 19,578,000 7 Equipment (56000) .............................. 2,625,000 8 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,023,000 9 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 89,000 10 -------------- 11 Program account subtotal .................. 29,548,000 12 -------------- 13 REAL PROPERTY MANAGEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM ........... 184,912,000 14 -------------- 15 General Fund 16 State Purposes Account - 10050 17 For services and expenses related to the 18 real property management and development 19 program. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 21 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 23 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 24 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 25 appropriation for the budget division 26 program of the division of the budget, are 27 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully 29 stated (26201). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 18,582,000 31 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 2,317,000 32 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 1,376,000 33 Supplies and materials (57000) ................ 45,833,000 34 Travel (54000) ................................... 112,000 35 Contractual services (51000) .................. 40,769,000 36 Equipment (56000) .............................. 2,156,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ................. 111,145,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other 41 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 42 Building Administration Account - 22005 43 For services and expenses related to the 44 real property management and development 45 program. 398 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 2 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 3 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 4 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 5 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 6 appropriation for the budget division 7 program of the division of the budget, are 8 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully 10 stated (26201). 11 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 4,000 12 Travel (54000) .................................... 23,000 13 Contractual services (51000) .................. 12,379,000 14 -------------- 15 Program account subtotal .................. 12,406,000 16 -------------- 17 Special Revenue Funds - Other 18 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 19 Parking Account - 22007 20 For services and expenses related to the 21 real property management and development 22 program. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 24 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 25 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 26 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 27 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 28 appropriation for the budget division 29 program of the division of the budget, are 30 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 31 part of this appropriation as if fully 32 stated (26201). 33 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,345,000 34 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 798,000 35 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 363,000 36 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 154,000 37 Travel (54000) ..................................... 2,000 38 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,400,000 39 Equipment (56000) ................................ 169,000 40 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 3,178,000 41 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 209,000 42 -------------- 43 Program account subtotal .................. 13,618,000 44 -------------- 45 Special Revenue Funds - Other 46 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 47 OGS-Solid Waste Management Account - 22176 399 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 real property management and development 3 program. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 5 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 6 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 7 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 8 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 9 appropriation for the budget division 10 program of the division of the budget, are 11 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully 13 stated (26201). 14 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 121,000 15 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 5,000 16 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 69,000 17 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 3,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ..................... 198,000 20 -------------- 21 Enterprise Funds 22 Agencies Enterprise Fund 23 Convention Center Account - 50318 24 For services and expenses related to the 25 real property management and development 26 program (26201). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 753,000 28 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 63,000 29 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 68,000 30 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 96,000 31 Travel (54000) ..................................... 9,000 32 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 868,000 33 Equipment (56000) ................................. 24,000 34 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 387,000 35 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 17,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ................... 2,285,000 38 -------------- 39 Enterprise Funds 40 Agencies Enterprise Fund 41 Empire State Plaza Visitors Center and Gift Shop Account 42 - 50327 43 For services and expenses related to the 44 real property management and development 45 program (26201). 400 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 51,000 2 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 68,000 3 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 4 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 330,000 5 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 70,000 6 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 3,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal ..................... 523,000 9 -------------- 10 Internal Service Funds 11 Centralized Services Account 12 Building Administration Account - 55004 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 real property management and development 15 program. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 19 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 20 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 21 appropriation for the budget division 22 program of the division of the budget, are 23 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully 25 stated (26201). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,268,000 27 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 124,000 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 222,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,783,000 30 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 31 Contractual services (51000) .................. 37,616,000 32 Equipment (56000) ................................ 161,000 33 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,487,000 34 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 66,000 35 -------------- 36 Program account subtotal .................. 44,737,000 37 -------------- 401 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF GENERAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 PROCUREMENT PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 4 Emergency Assistance-OGS-9461 Account - 25025 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to the temporary emergency feeding 7 assistance program (26213). 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 10,865,000 .......... (re. $4,265,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 10 For services and expenses related to the temporary emergency feeding 11 assistance program (26213). 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 10,865,000 .......... (re. $3,931,000) 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 14 For services and expenses related to the temporary emergency feeding 15 assistance program (26213). 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 10,865,000 ............. (re. $17,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 18 For services and expenses related to the temporary emergency feeding 19 assistance program (26213). 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 10,865,000 ............ (re. $148,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 22 For services and expenses related to the temporary emergency feeding 23 assistance program (26213). 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 10,865,000 ............. (re. $28,000) 25 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 26 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 27 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25025 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 29 For services and expenses related to state administrative costs for 30 the national lunch program (26214). 31 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 15,365,000 ......... (re. $15,365,000) 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 33 For services and expenses related to state administrative costs for 34 the national lunch program (26214). 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 15,365,000 ............ (re. $144,000) 402 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 743,531,000 62,854,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 2,597,682,000 4,824,098,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 412,339,000 2,465,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 3,753,552,000 4,889,417,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ..................................... 304,640,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 15 the money hereby appropriated may be 16 increased or decreased by interchange, 17 with any appropriation of the department 18 of health, and may be increased or 19 decreased by transfer or suballocation 20 between these appropriated amounts and 21 appropriations of the medicaid inspector 22 general, office of mental health, office 23 for people with developmental disabilities 24 and office of addiction services and 25 supports with the approval of the director 26 of the budget, who shall file such 27 approval with the department of audit and 28 control and copies thereof with the chair- 29 man of the senate finance committee and 30 the chairman of the assembly ways and 31 means committee. For services and expenses 32 for payment of liabilities accrued hereto- 33 fore and hereafter to accrue. Provided 34 however, no funds shall be made available 35 for expenditures related to COVID-19 or 36 the maintenance of durable medical equip- 37 ment, except as pursuant to a plan 38 approved by the director of the division 39 of the budget. Up to $375,000 of this 40 amount may be used for the department of 41 health's share of costs related to the 42 services of a monitor appointed pursuant 43 to a remedial order of a federal district 44 court, in the 2009 case, Disability Advo- 45 cates, Inc. v. Paterson. 403 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 2 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 3 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 4 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 5 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 6 appropriation for the budget division 7 program of the division of the budget, are 8 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully 10 stated (81001). 11 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 154,946,000 12 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 329,000 13 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 1,893,000 14 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 7,649,000 15 Travel (54000) ................................. 2,234,000 16 Contractual services (51000) .................. 66,030,000 17 Equipment (56000) .............................. 2,383,000 18 -------------- 19 Total amount available ..................... 235,464,000 20 -------------- 21 For services and expenses related to the New 22 York state donor registry (26633). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 82,000 24 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 40,000 25 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 28,000 26 -------------- 27 Total amount available ......................... 150,000 28 -------------- 29 For suballocation to the office of children 30 and family services through a memorandum 31 of understanding with the AIDS institute, 32 for services and expenses related to HIV 33 policy development and training (29683). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 135,000 35 -------------- 36 For suballocation to the state education 37 department through a memorandum of under- 38 standing with the AIDS institute, for 39 services and expenses of the provision of 40 HIV/AIDS/sexual health education by 41 regional training coordinators for staff 42 in elementary and secondary schools 43 (29682). 44 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 180,000 45 -------------- 404 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 emergency preparedness - stockpile 3 (26629). 4 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,200,000 5 -------------- 6 For services and expenses related to osteo- 7 porosis prevention (26630). 8 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 31,000 9 -------------- 10 For services and expenses related to health 11 information technology program (26632). 12 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 167,000 13 -------------- 14 For services and expenses for a statewide 15 campaign to promote awareness of the New 16 York state donor registry to increase 17 organ and tissue donation (26943). 18 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 116,000 19 -------------- 20 For services and expenses related to the 21 operation of the incident reporting system 22 (NYPORTS) (26634). 23 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 591,000 24 -------------- 25 For services and expenses for patient health 26 information and quality improvement initi- 27 atives (26635). 28 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 174,000 29 -------------- 30 For services and expenses related to testing 31 for adrenoleukodystrophy (ALD) (26636). 32 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 110,000 33 -------------- 34 For suballocation to the office of mental 35 health for services and expenses for 36 surveys of psychiatric residential treat- 37 ment facilities (29678). 405 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 115,000 2 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 16,000 3 Travel (54000) .................................... 45,000 4 Equipment (56000) ................................. 70,000 5 -------------- 6 Total amount available ......................... 246,000 7 -------------- 8 For services and expenses related to the 9 home health aide registry (29677). 10 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 270,000 11 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 12 Travel (54000) ..................................... 1,000 13 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,512,000 14 Equipment (56000) ................................. 16,000 15 -------------- 16 Total amount available ....................... 1,800,000 17 -------------- 18 For services and expenses related to crimi- 19 nal history background checks for adult 20 care facilities (26899). 21 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,300,000 22 -------------- 23 For service and expenses related to changes 24 in state agency data collection activities 25 required to comply with section 170-e of 26 the executive law as added by chapter 745 27 of the laws of 2021. 28 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 29 the money hereby appropriated may be 30 increased or decreased by interchange, 31 with any appropriation of the department 32 of health, and may be increased or 33 decreased by transfer or suballocation 34 between these appropriated amounts and 35 appropriations of any state agency, board, 36 or commission with the approval of the 37 director of the budget, who shall file 38 such approval with the department of audit 39 and control and copies thereof with the 40 chairman of the senate finance committee 41 and the chairman of the assembly ways and 42 means committee (59027). 43 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,325,000 44 -------------- 406 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For expenses related to the acquisition of 2 bottled water in the event of a drinking 3 water emergency as determined by the 4 commissioner of health (59030). 5 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 100,000 6 -------------- 7 For services and expenses related to 8 programs for the reduction of the risk of 9 lead exposure in rental properties. The 10 amounts appropriated pursuant to such 11 appropriation may be suballocated to other 12 state agencies or accounts for expendi- 13 tures incurred in the operation of 14 programs funded by such appropriation 15 subject to the approval of the director of 16 the budget (59030). 17 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,720,000 18 -------------- 19 For services and expenses related to the 20 development and implementation of modern- 21 ized health care data systems. Notwith- 22 standing any other provision of law to the 23 contrary, the OGS Interchange and Transfer 24 Authority and the IT Interchange and 25 Transfer Authority as defined in the 26 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 27 appropriation for the budget division 28 program of the division of the budget, are 29 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 30 part of this appropriation as if fully 31 stated. Use of such funds shall not be 32 subject to the requirements of section 163 33 of the state finance law. Notwithstanding 34 any other provision of law, the money 35 hereby appropriated may be increased or 36 decreased by interchange, with any appro- 37 priation of the department of health, and 38 may be increased or decreased by transfer 39 or suballocation between these appropri- 40 ated amounts and appropriations of the 41 division of the budget with the approval 42 of the director of the budget, who shall 43 file such approval with the department of 44 audit and control and copies thereof with 45 the chairman of the senate finance commit- 46 tee and the chairman of the assembly ways 47 and means committee (59051). 407 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) .................. 12,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal ................. 262,809,000 4 -------------- 5 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 6 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 7 Federal Block Grant Account - 25183 8 For various health prevention, diagnostic, 9 detection and treatment services (26983). 10 Personal service (50000) ....................... 3,195,000 11 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,703,000 12 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,758,000 13 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 224,000 14 -------------- 15 Program account subtotal ................... 6,880,000 16 -------------- 17 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 18 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 19 Child and Adult Care Food Account - 25022 20 For various food and nutritional services 21 (26969). 22 Personal service (50000) ......................... 500,000 23 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 300,000 24 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 325,000 25 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 50,000 26 -------------- 27 Program account subtotal ................... 1,175,000 28 -------------- 29 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 30 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 31 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25022 32 For various food and nutritional services 33 (26984). 34 Personal service (50000) ....................... 1,500,000 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 640,000 36 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 909,000 37 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 84,000 38 -------------- 39 Program account subtotal ................... 3,133,000 40 -------------- 41 Special Revenue Funds - Other 42 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 408 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Technology Transfer Account - 20118 2 For services and expenses related to the 3 department of health's patent and technol- 4 ogy transfer program. The department of 5 health may receive and deposit revenue 6 from the sale and licensing of inventions 7 pursuant to a technology and patent trans- 8 fer policy established in accordance with 9 section 64-a of the public officers law. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 11 these funds may be used for payments to 12 Health Research, Inc. as reimbursement for 13 expenses incurred in its patent and tech- 14 nology transfer operations, to support 15 research, training, and infrastructure 16 development in the department's research 17 facilities, and for payments to inventors. 18 The moneys hereby appropriated shall be 19 available for liabilities heretofore and 20 hereafter to accrue (81001). 21 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 29,000 22 -------------- 23 Program account subtotal ...................... 29,000 24 -------------- 25 Special Revenue Funds - Other 26 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 27 Administration Program Account - 21982 28 For services and expenses, including indi- 29 rect costs, related to the administration 30 program. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 32 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 33 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 34 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 35 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 36 appropriation for the budget division 37 program of the division of the budget, are 38 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 39 part of this appropriation as if fully 40 stated (81001). 41 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,577,000 42 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 50,000 43 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 4,000 44 Travel (54000) .................................... 11,000 45 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,319,000 409 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,959,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 131,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal .................. 15,051,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 8 Health-SPARCS Account - 21902 9 For all services and expenses, including 10 indirect costs, related to the statewide 11 planning and research cooperative system. 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 13 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 14 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 15 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 16 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 17 appropriation for the budget division 18 program of the division of the budget, are 19 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 20 part of this appropriation as if fully 21 stated (81001). 22 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,206,000 23 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 24 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 38,000 25 Travel (54000) ..................................... 8,000 26 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,949,000 27 Equipment (56000) ................................. 11,000 28 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 778,000 29 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 35,000 30 -------------- 31 Program account subtotal ................... 6,035,000 32 -------------- 33 Special Revenue Funds - Other 34 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 35 Professional Medical Conduct Account - 22088 36 For services and expenses, including indi- 37 rect costs, related to the professional 38 medical conduct program. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 40 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 41 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 42 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 43 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 44 appropriation for the budget division 45 program of the division of the budget, are 46 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 410 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 part of this appropriation as if fully 2 stated (81001). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,297,000 4 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 5 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 45,000 6 Travel (54000) .................................... 35,000 7 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 526,000 8 Equipment (56000) .................................. 1,000 9 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,700,000 10 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 110,000 11 -------------- 12 Program account subtotal ................... 7,724,000 13 -------------- 14 Special Revenue Funds - Other 15 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 16 Vital Records Management Account - 22103 17 For services and expenses including the 18 collection of increased fees related to 19 the vital records program. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 21 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 23 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 24 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 25 appropriation for the budget division 26 program of the division of the budget, are 27 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully 29 stated (81001). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 776,000 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 32 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 33 Travel (54000) ..................................... 3,000 34 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 431,000 35 Equipment (56000) .................................. 8,000 36 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 503,000 37 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 23,000 38 -------------- 39 Program account subtotal ................... 1,804,000 40 -------------- 41 AIDS INSTITUTE PROGRAM ......................................... 600,000 42 -------------- 43 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 44 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 45 SAMHSA Account - 25170 411 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses to provide train- 2 ing and resources to first responders and 3 members of other key community sectors at 4 the state, tribal and local governmental 5 levels related to emergency treatment of 6 suspected opioid overdose (26847). 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 600,000 8 -------------- 9 CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH PROGRAM ........................ 232,950,000 10 -------------- 11 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 12 Federal Education Fund 13 Individuals with Disabilities-Part C Account - 25214 14 For activities related to a handicapped 15 infants and toddlers program (26837). 16 Personal service (50000) ....................... 5,000,000 17 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 17,949,000 18 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 3,200,000 19 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 1,100,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal .................. 27,249,000 22 -------------- 23 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 24 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 25 Federal Block Grant Account - 25183 26 For various health prevention, diagnostic, 27 detection and treatment services. The 28 amounts appropriated pursuant to such 29 appropriation may be suballocated to other 30 state agencies or accounts for expendi- 31 tures incurred in the operation of 32 programs funded by such appropriation 33 subject to the approval of the director of 34 the budget (26989). 35 Personal service (50000) ...................... 11,702,000 36 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 5,892,000 37 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 7,065,000 38 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 632,000 39 -------------- 40 Program account subtotal .................. 25,291,000 41 -------------- 42 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 43 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 412 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Federal Health, Education and Human Services Account - 2 25148 3 For various health prevention, diagnostic, 4 detection and treatment services. The 5 amounts appropriated pursuant to such 6 appropriation may be suballocated to other 7 state agencies or accounts for expendi- 8 tures incurred in the operation of 9 programs funded by such appropriation 10 subject to the approval of the director of 11 the budget. 12 The moneys hereby appropriated shall be 13 available for liabilities heretofore and 14 hereafter to accrue (26988). 15 Personal service (50000) ...................... 16,640,000 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 58,961,000 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ....................... 11,854,000 18 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 3,809,000 19 -------------- 20 Program account subtotal .................. 91,264,000 21 -------------- 22 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 23 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 24 Child and Adult Care Food Account - 25022 25 For various food and nutritional services 26 (26985). 27 Personal service (50000) ....................... 4,848,000 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 3,671,000 29 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 2,667,000 30 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 639,000 31 -------------- 32 Program account subtotal .................. 11,825,000 33 -------------- 34 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 35 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 36 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25022 37 For various food and nutritional services. 38 A portion of this appropriation may be 39 suballocated to other state agencies 40 (26986). 41 Personal service (50000) ...................... 26,284,000 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 25,104,000 413 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ....................... 14,457,000 2 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 1,982,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal .................. 67,827,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 7 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 8 Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) Civil Monetary 9 Account - 25035 10 For services and expenses of the department 11 of health related to the special supple- 12 mental nutrition program for women, 13 infants and children (29974). 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 5,000,000 15 -------------- 16 Program account subtotal ................... 5,000,000 17 -------------- 18 Special Revenue Funds - Other 19 HCRA Resources Fund 20 Tobacco Control and Cancer Services Account - 20801 21 For services and expenses related to the 22 tobacco control and cancer services 23 programs authorized pursuant to sections 24 2807-r and 1399-ii of the public health 25 law. 26 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 27 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 28 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 29 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 30 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 31 appropriation for the budget division 32 program of the division of the budget, are 33 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 34 part of this appropriation as if fully 35 stated (26813). 36 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,159,000 37 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 6,000 38 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 10,000 39 Travel (54000) .................................... 44,000 40 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 78,000 41 Equipment (56000) ................................. 30,000 42 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,451,000 43 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 62,000 44 -------------- 45 Program account subtotal ................... 3,840,000 46 -------------- 414 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 3 Cable Television Account - 21971 4 For services and expenses related to public 5 service education, with specific emphasis 6 on public health issues. 7 Notwithstanding any other law, rule or regu- 8 lation to the contrary, expenses of the 9 department of health public service educa- 10 tion program incurred pursuant to appro- 11 priations from the cable television 12 account of the state miscellaneous special 13 revenue funds shall be deemed expenses of 14 the department of public service. No later 15 than August 15, 2025, the commissioner of 16 the department of health shall submit an 17 accounting of expenses in the 2025-26 18 fiscal year to the chair of the public 19 service commission for the chair's review 20 pursuant to the provisions of section 217 21 of the public service law. 22 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 23 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 24 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 25 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 26 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 27 appropriation for the budget division 28 program of the division of the budget, are 29 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 30 part of this appropriation as if fully 31 stated (26813). 32 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 454,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal ..................... 454,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 38 CSFP Salvage Account - 22159 39 For services and expenses of the department 40 of health related to the commodity supple- 41 mental food program. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 43 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 44 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 45 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 46 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 47 appropriation for the budget division 48 program of the division of the budget, are 415 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 2 part of this appropriation as if fully 3 stated (26813). 4 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 25,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ...................... 25,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Other 9 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 10 Drive Out Diabetes Research and Education Account - 11 22035 12 For diabetes research and education pursuant 13 to chapter 339 of the laws of 2001. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 17 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 18 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 19 appropriation for the budget division 20 program of the division of the budget, are 21 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully 23 stated (26813). 24 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 100,000 25 -------------- 26 Program account subtotal ..................... 100,000 27 -------------- 28 Special Revenue Funds - Other 29 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 30 Tobacco Enforcement and Education Account - 22105 31 For services and expenses related to tobacco 32 enforcement, education and related activ- 33 ities, pursuant to chapter 162 of the laws 34 of 2002. 35 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 36 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 37 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 38 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 39 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 40 appropriation for the budget division 41 program of the division of the budget, are 42 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 43 part of this appropriation as if fully 44 stated (26813). 416 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 75,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal ...................... 75,000 4 -------------- 5 CENTER FOR ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM ..................... 28,357,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 8 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 9 Federal Block Grant CEH Account - 25170 10 For various health prevention, diagnostic, 11 detection and treatment services (26990). 12 Personal service (50000) ......................... 600,000 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 265,000 14 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 752,000 15 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 56,000 16 -------------- 17 Program account subtotal ................... 1,673,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 20 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 21 Federal Block Grant Account - 25183 22 For services and expenses of various health 23 prevention, diagnostic, detection and 24 treatment services (26991). 25 Personal service (50000) ....................... 3,268,000 26 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,644,000 27 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,873,000 28 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 229,000 29 -------------- 30 Program account subtotal ................... 8,014,000 31 -------------- 32 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 33 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 34 Federal Environmental Protection Agency Grants Account - 35 25467 36 For various environmental projects including 37 suballocation for the department of envi- 38 ronmental conservation (26992). 39 Personal service (50000) ....................... 4,657,000 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,590,000 417 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 2,235,000 2 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 326,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal ................... 9,808,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Clean Air Fund 8 Operating Permit Program Account - 21451 9 For services and expenses of the department 10 of health in developing, implementing and 11 operating the operating permit program 12 (26844). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 416,000 14 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 5,000 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 4,000 16 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 17 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 25,000 18 Equipment (56000) .................................. 8,000 19 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 185,000 20 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 126,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ..................... 774,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Other 25 Environmental Conservation Special Revenue Fund 26 Low Level Radioactive Waste Account - 21066 27 For services and expenses of the low-level 28 radioactive waste siting program. 29 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 30 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 31 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 32 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 33 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 34 appropriation for the budget division 35 program of the division of the budget, are 36 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 37 part of this appropriation as if fully 38 stated (26844). 39 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 544,000 40 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 6,000 41 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 32,000 42 Travel (54000) .................................... 44,000 43 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 104,000 44 Equipment (56000) ................................. 40,000 418 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 360,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 16,000 3 -------------- 4 Total amount available ....................... 1,146,000 5 -------------- 6 For suballocation to the energy research and 7 development authority, pursuant to chapter 8 673 of the laws of 1986, as amended by 9 chapters 368 and 913 of the laws of 1990. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 11 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 12 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 13 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 14 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 15 appropriation for the budget division 16 program of the division of the budget, are 17 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 18 part of this appropriation as if fully 19 stated (29776). 20 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 150,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ................... 1,296,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Other 25 Environmental Protection and Oil Spill Compensation Fund 26 Environmental Protection and Oil Spill Compensation 27 Account - 21202 28 For services and expenses related to the oil 29 spill relocation network program. 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 31 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 32 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 33 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 34 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 35 appropriation for the budget division 36 program of the division of the budget, are 37 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 38 part of this appropriation as if fully 39 stated (26844). 40 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 229,000 41 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 2,000 42 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 7,000 43 Travel (54000) ..................................... 2,000 44 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 15,000 45 Equipment (56000) .................................. 2,000 419 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 148,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 7,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal ..................... 412,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 8 Asbestos Safety Training Account - 22009 9 For services and expenses of the asbestos 10 safety training program. 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 12 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 13 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 14 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 15 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 16 appropriation for the budget division 17 program of the division of the budget, are 18 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 19 part of this appropriation as if fully 20 stated (26844). 21 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 293,000 22 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 6,000 23 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 2,000 24 Travel (54000) .................................... 17,000 25 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 22,000 26 Equipment (56000) .................................. 2,000 27 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 191,000 28 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 9,000 29 -------------- 30 Program account subtotal ..................... 542,000 31 -------------- 32 Special Revenue Funds - Other 33 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 34 Occupational Health Clinics Account - 22177 35 For services and expenses of implementing 36 and operating a statewide network of occu- 37 pational health clinics for diagnostic, 38 screening, treatment, referral, and educa- 39 tion services. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 41 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 42 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 43 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 44 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 45 appropriation for the budget division 46 program of the division of the budget, are 47 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 420 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 part of this appropriation as if fully 2 stated (26844). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 508,000 4 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 5 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 3,000 6 Travel (54000) ..................................... 8,000 7 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 1,000 8 Equipment (56000) .................................. 2,000 9 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 325,000 10 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 15,000 11 -------------- 12 Program account subtotal ..................... 863,000 13 -------------- 14 Special Revenue Funds - Other 15 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 16 Radiological Health Protection Program Account - 21965 17 For services and expenses related to the 18 radiological health protection account. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 20 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 21 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 22 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 23 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 24 appropriation for the budget division 25 program of the division of the budget, are 26 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 27 part of this appropriation as if fully 28 stated (26844). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,717,000 30 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 12,000 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 8,000 32 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 32,000 33 Travel (54000) .................................... 92,000 34 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 17,000 35 Equipment (56000) ................................. 13,000 36 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,751,000 37 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 78,000 38 -------------- 39 Program account subtotal ................... 4,720,000 40 -------------- 41 Special Revenue Funds - Other 42 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 43 Radon Detection Device Account - 21993 44 For services and expenses of the radon 45 detection device distribution program. 421 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 2 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 3 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 4 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 5 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 6 appropriation for the budget division 7 program of the division of the budget, are 8 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully 10 stated (26844). 11 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 205,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal ..................... 205,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other 16 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 17 Ultraviolet Radiation Device Account - 22197 18 For services and expenses related to the 19 ultraviolet radiation device program 20 (26844). 21 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 10,000 22 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 3,000 23 Travel (54000) ..................................... 2,000 24 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 28,000 25 Fringe Benefits (60000) ............................ 6,000 26 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 1,000 27 -------------- 28 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 29 -------------- 30 CHILD HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM ............................. 157,007,000 31 -------------- 32 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 33 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 34 Children's Health Insurance Account - 25148 35 The money hereby appropriated is available 36 for payment of aid heretofore accrued or 37 hereafter accrued. 38 For services and expenses related to the 39 children's health insurance program 40 provided pursuant to title XXI of the 41 federal social security act (26931). 42 Personal service (50000) ...................... 48,000,000 43 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 59,600,000 422 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ....................... 26,400,000 2 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 3,400,000 3 -------------- 4 Total amount available ..................... 137,400,000 5 -------------- 6 The money hereby appropriated is available 7 for payment of aid heretofore accrued or 8 hereafter accrued. 9 For state grants for poison control centers. 10 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 11 of law, this appropriation shall only be 12 available for transfer or interchange to 13 the HCRA resources fund HCRA program 14 account appropriation for state grants for 15 poison control centers in the event that 16 the director of the budget, in his or her 17 sole discretion, authorizes the transfer 18 or interchange of the moneys hereby appro- 19 priated to the HCRA resources fund HCRA 20 program account appropriation for state 21 grants for poison control centers, 22 provided however, any such interchange or 23 transfer for the foregoing purpose shall 24 not exceed $1,100,000 (26667). 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,100,000 26 -------------- 27 Program account subtotal ................. 138,500,000 28 -------------- 29 Special Revenue Funds - Other 30 HCRA Resources Fund 31 Children's Health Insurance Account - 20810 32 The money hereby appropriated is available 33 for payment of aid heretofore accrued or 34 hereafter accrued. 35 For services and expenses related to the 36 children's health insurance program 37 authorized pursuant to title 1-A of arti- 38 cle 25 of the public health law. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 40 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 41 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 42 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 43 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 44 appropriation for the budget division 45 program of the division of the budget, are 46 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 47 part of this appropriation as if fully 48 stated (26931). 423 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 994,000 2 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 5,000 3 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 40,000 4 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 2,000 5 Travel (54000) .................................... 15,000 6 Contractual services (51000) .................. 16,648,000 7 Equipment (56000) ................................. 20,000 8 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 565,000 9 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 218,000 10 -------------- 11 Program account subtotal .................. 18,507,000 12 -------------- 13 ELDERLY PHARMACEUTICAL INSURANCE COVERAGE PROGRAM ........... 13,250,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other 16 HCRA Resources Fund 17 EPIC Premium Account - 20818 18 For services and expenses related to the 19 elderly pharmaceutical insurance coverage 20 program (26803). 21 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,050,000 22 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 22,000 23 Travel (54000) .................................... 18,000 24 Contractual services (51000) .................. 10,291,000 25 Equipment (56000) ................................. 11,000 26 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 607,000 27 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 26,000 28 -------------- 29 Total amount available ...................... 13,025,000 30 -------------- 31 For suballocation to the state office for 32 the aging for the administration of the 33 elderly pharmaceutical insurance coverage 34 program. 35 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 36 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 37 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 38 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 39 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 40 appropriation for the budget division 41 program of the division of the budget, are 42 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 43 part of this appropriation as if fully 44 stated (29775). 45 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 225,000 46 -------------- 424 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Program account subtotal .................. 13,250,000 2 -------------- 3 ESSENTIAL PLAN PROGRAM ..................................... 790,686,000 4 -------------- 5 General Fund 6 State Purposes Account - 10050 7 For services and expenses to support the 8 administration of the essential plan 9 program. 10 The money hereby appropriated is available 11 for payment of aid heretofore accrued or 12 hereafter accrued. 13 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 14 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may 15 be increased or decreased by interchange 16 or transfer with any appropriation of the 17 department of health or for transfer to 18 Health Research Incorporated (HRI). 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 20 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 21 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 22 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 23 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 24 appropriation for the budget division 25 program of the division of the budget, are 26 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 27 part of this appropriation as if fully 28 stated (26940). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 5,415,000 30 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 37,000 31 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 10,000 32 Travel (54000) .................................... 23,000 33 Contractual services (51000) .................. 89,850,000 34 Equipment (56000) .................................. 8,000 35 -------------- 36 Program account subtotal .................. 95,343,000 37 -------------- 38 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 39 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 40 Essential Plan Account - 25186 41 For services and expenses to support the 42 administration of the essential plan 43 program, in accordance with the provisions 44 of the New York's State Innovation Waiver 45 authorized under Section 1332 of the 46 Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act 425 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 (ACA). The money hereby appropriated is 2 available for payment of aid heretofore 3 accrued or hereafter accrued. 4 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 5 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may 6 be increased or decreased by interchange 7 or transfer with any appropriation of the 8 department of health or for transfer to 9 Health Research Incorporated (HRI). 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 11 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 12 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 13 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 14 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 15 appropriation for the budget division 16 program of the division of the budget, are 17 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 18 part of this appropriation as if fully 19 stated (26940). 20 Personal service (50000) ....................... 5,452,000 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 89,891,000 22 -------------- 23 Program account subtotal .................. 95,343,000 24 -------------- 25 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 26 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 27 Essential Plan Account - 25184 28 For the return of interest earned on the 29 Basic Health Program Trust Fund to the 30 Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services 31 (CMS), pursuant to section 1331 of the 32 federal patient protection and affordable 33 care act. The money hereby appropriated is 34 available for payment of aid heretofore 35 accrued or hereafter accrued. 36 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 37 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may 38 be increased or decreased by interchange 39 or transfer with any appropriation of the 40 department of health. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 42 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 43 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 44 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 45 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 46 appropriation for the budget division 47 program of the division of budget, are 48 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 426 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 part of this appropriation as if fully 2 stated (26940). 3 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................. 600,000,000 4 -------------- 5 HEALTH CARE REFORM ACT PROGRAM .............................. 18,497,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Other 8 HCRA Resources Fund 9 HCRA Program Account - 20807 10 For services and expenses related to audit- 11 ing or payment of audit contracts to 12 determine payor and provider compliance 13 requirements (29872). 14 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,920,000 15 -------------- 16 For services and expenses related to the 17 pool administration (29869). 18 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,849,000 19 -------------- 20 For services and expenses related to audit- 21 ing or payment of audit contracts to 22 determine hospital compliance with para- 23 graph 6 of subdivision (a) of section 24 405.4 of title 10, NYCRR (26942). 25 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 575,000 26 -------------- 27 For services and expenses related to the New 28 York state workforce innovation center 29 (59031). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 896,000 31 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 512,000 32 Contractual services (51000) ................... 6,879,000 33 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,277,000 34 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 564,000 35 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 25,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal .................. 10,153,000 38 -------------- 39 INSTITUTIONAL MANAGEMENT PROGRAM ........................... 191,311,000 40 -------------- 427 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 General Fund 2 State Purposes Account - 10050 3 For recruitment and retention efforts 4 related to department of health adminis- 5 tered veterans facilities (26966). 6 Contractual service (51000) ...................... 200,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal ..................... 200,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 12 Batavia Home Donation Account - 20113 13 For services and expenses of patient bene- 14 fits and other activities and other 15 services as funded by gifts and donations 16 (26966). 17 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 20 -------------- 21 Special Revenue Funds - Other 22 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 23 Helen Hayes Hospital Account - 20109 24 For services and expenses of patient bene- 25 fits and other activities and services as 26 funded by gifts and donations (26966). 27 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 35,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal ...................... 35,000 30 -------------- 31 Special Revenue Funds - Other 32 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 33 Montrose Donation Account - 20114 34 For services and expenses of patient bene- 35 fits and other activities and other 36 services as funded by gifts and donations 37 (26966). 38 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 39 -------------- 40 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 41 -------------- 428 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 3 Oxford Gifts and Donations Account - 20110 4 For services and expenses of patient bene- 5 fits and other activities and services as 6 funded by gifts and donations (26966). 7 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 200,000 8 -------------- 9 Program account subtotal ..................... 200,000 10 -------------- 11 Special Revenue Funds - Other 12 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 13 St. Albans Donation Account - 20111 14 For services and expenses of patient bene- 15 fits and other activities and other 16 services as funded by gifts and donations 17 (26966). 18 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 19 -------------- 20 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 21 -------------- 22 Special Revenue Funds - Other 23 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 24 Veterans' Home Assistance Account - 20208 25 For services and expenses for the care and 26 maintenance of veterans' homes operated by 27 agencies of the state in accordance with 28 section 81 of the state finance law. 29 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule, 30 or regulation to the contrary, this appro- 31 priation may be suballocated or trans- 32 ferred to each of the following five 33 special revenue funds, and in accordance 34 with subdivision 4 of section 81 of the 35 state finance law, in an amount equal to 36 one fifth of the total receipts: New York 37 city veterans' home account, New York 38 State home for veterans and their depen- 39 dents at Oxford account, New York state 40 home for veterans in the Lower-Hudson 41 Valley account, the Western New York 42 veterans' home account, and the state 43 university of New York Long Island veter- 44 ans' home account (26966). 429 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 4 -------------- 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other 6 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 7 Helen Hayes Hospital Account - 22140 8 For services and expenses of the Helen Hayes 9 hospital including an affiliation agree- 10 ment contract. The money hereby appropri- 11 ated is available for payment of expenses 12 heretofore accrued. Any disbursements from 13 this appropriation shall be distributed 14 pursuant to a written plan prepared by the 15 department of health and approved by the 16 director of the budget. Up to $273,846 of 17 this amount may be suballocated to the 18 department of law for services and 19 expenses of a collection unit at Helen 20 Hayes hospital. 21 Notwithstanding section 409-c of the public 22 health law or any other provision of law 23 to the contrary, expenditures authorized 24 by this appropriation shall only be avail- 25 able if they are made in compliance with 26 the provisions of sections 44, 49, 50, 51, 27 and 93 of the state finance law. 28 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 29 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 30 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 31 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 32 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 33 appropriation for the budget division 34 program of the division of the budget, are 35 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 36 part of this appropriation as if fully 37 stated (26966). 38 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 36,554,000 39 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 4,505,000 40 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 646,000 41 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 5,471,000 42 Travel (54000) .................................... 36,000 43 Contractual services (51000) .................. 17,717,000 44 Equipment (56000) ................................ 545,000 45 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 5,096,000 46 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 47,000 47 -------------- 48 Program account subtotal .................. 70,617,000 49 -------------- 430 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 3 New York City Veterans' Home Account - 22141 4 For services and expenses of the New York 5 city veterans' home. The money hereby 6 appropriated is available for payment of 7 expenses heretofore accrued. Any disburse- 8 ments from this appropriation shall be 9 distributed pursuant to a written plan 10 prepared by the department of health and 11 approved by the director of the budget. Up 12 to $360,000 of this amount may be suballo- 13 cated to the department of law for 14 services and expenses of a collection unit 15 at the New York city veterans' home for 16 the New York state home for veterans and 17 their dependents at Oxford, the New York 18 city veterans' home, the Western New York 19 veterans' home and New York state veter- 20 ans' home at Montrose. 21 Notwithstanding section 409-c of the public 22 health law or any other provision of law 23 to the contrary, expenditures authorized 24 by this appropriation shall only be avail- 25 able if they are made in compliance with 26 the provisions of sections 44, 49, 50, 51, 27 and 93 of the state finance law. 28 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 29 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 30 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 31 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 32 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 33 appropriation for the budget division 34 program of the division of the budget, are 35 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 36 part of this appropriation as if fully 37 stated (26966). 38 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 23,369,000 39 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 2,765,000 40 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,450,000 41 Travel (54000) .................................... 16,000 42 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,590,000 43 Equipment (56000) ................................ 250,000 44 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 3,193,000 45 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 30,000 46 -------------- 47 Program account subtotal .................. 39,663,000 48 -------------- 49 Special Revenue Funds - Other 431 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 2 New York State Home for Veterans and Their Dependents at 3 Oxford Account - 22142 4 For services and expenses of the New York 5 state home for veterans and their depen- 6 dents at Oxford. The money hereby appro- 7 priated is available for payment of 8 expenses heretofore accrued. Any disburse- 9 ments from this appropriation shall be 10 distributed pursuant to a written plan 11 prepared by the department of health and 12 approved by the director of the budget. 13 Notwithstanding section 409-c of the public 14 health law or any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, expenditures authorized 16 by this appropriation shall only be avail- 17 able if they are made in compliance with 18 the provisions of sections 44, 49, 50, 51, 19 and 93 of the state finance law. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 21 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 23 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 24 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 25 appropriation for the budget division 26 program of the division of the budget, are 27 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully 29 stated (26966). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 17,047,000 31 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 367,000 32 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 1,330,000 33 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 3,434,000 34 Travel (54000) .................................... 28,000 35 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,808,000 36 Equipment (56000) ................................ 250,000 37 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,290,000 38 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 22,000 39 -------------- 40 Program account subtotal .................. 28,576,000 41 -------------- 42 Special Revenue Funds - Other 43 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 44 New York State Home for Veterans in the Lower-Hudson 45 Valley Account - 22144 46 For services and expenses of the New York 47 state home for veterans in the lower-Hud- 48 son Valley account. The money hereby 432 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 appropriated is available for payment of 2 expenses heretofore accrued. Any disburse- 3 ments from this appropriation shall be 4 distributed pursuant to a written plan 5 prepared by the department of health and 6 approved by the director of the budget. 7 Notwithstanding section 409-c of the public 8 health law or any other provision of law 9 to the contrary, expenditures authorized 10 by this appropriation shall only be avail- 11 able if they are made in compliance with 12 the provisions of sections 44, 49, 50, 51, 13 and 93 of the state finance law. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 17 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 18 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 19 appropriation for the budget division 20 program of the division of the budget, are 21 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully 23 stated (26966). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 19,491,000 25 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 2,818,000 26 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 5,032,000 27 Travel (54000) .................................... 21,000 28 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,369,000 29 Equipment (56000) ................................ 220,000 30 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,726,000 31 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 26,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal .................. 33,703,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Other 36 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 37 Western New York Veterans' Home Account - 22143 38 For services and expenses of the Western New 39 York veterans' home. The money hereby 40 appropriated is available for payment of 41 expenses heretofore accrued. Any disburse- 42 ments from this appropriation shall be 43 distributed pursuant to a written plan 44 prepared by the department of health and 45 approved by the director of the budget. 46 Notwithstanding section 409-c of the public 47 health law or any other provision of law 48 to the contrary, expenditures authorized 49 by this appropriation shall only be avail- 433 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 able if they are made in compliance with 2 the provisions of sections 44, 49, 50, 51, 3 and 93 of the state finance law. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 5 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 6 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 7 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 8 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 9 appropriation for the budget division 10 program of the division of the budget, are 11 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully 13 stated (26966). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 11,344,000 15 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 100,000 16 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 500,000 17 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,173,000 18 Travel (54000) .................................... 20,000 19 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,362,000 20 Equipment (56000) ................................ 145,000 21 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,459,000 22 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 14,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal .................. 18,117,000 25 -------------- 26 MEDICAL ASSISTANCE ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ................ 1,247,363,000 27 -------------- 28 General Fund 29 State Purposes Account - 10050 30 Notwithstanding section 40 of the state 31 finance law or any provision of law to the 32 contrary, subject to federal approval, 33 department of health state funds medicaid 34 spending, excluding payments for medical 35 services provided at state facilities 36 operated by the office of mental health, 37 the office for people with developmental 38 disabilities and the office of addiction 39 services and supports and further exclud- 40 ing any payments which are not appropri- 41 ated within the department of health, in 42 the aggregate, for the period April 1, 43 2025 through March 31, 2026, shall not 44 exceed $33,417,285,000 except as provided 45 below provided, however, such aggregate 46 limits may be adjusted by the director of 47 the budget to account for any changes in 48 the New York state federal medical assist- 434 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 ance percentage amount established pursu- 2 ant to the federal social security act, 3 increases in provider revenues, reductions 4 in local social services district payments 5 for medical assistance administration, 6 minimum wage increases, and beginning 7 April 1, 2013 the operational costs of the 8 New York state medical indemnity fund, 9 pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of 10 2011, and state costs or savings from the 11 essential plan. Such projections may be 12 adjusted by the director of the budget to 13 account for increased or expedited depart- 14 ment of health state funds medicaid 15 expenditures as a result of a natural or 16 other type of disaster, including a 17 governmental declaration of emergency. 18 The director of the budget, in consultation 19 with the commissioner of health, shall 20 assess on a quarterly basis known and 21 projected medicaid expenditures by catego- 22 ry of service and by geographic region, as 23 determined by the commissioner of health, 24 incurred both prior to and subsequent to 25 such assessment for each such period, and 26 if the director of the budget determines 27 that such expenditures are expected to 28 cause medicaid spending for such period to 29 exceed the aggregate limit specified here- 30 in for such period, the state medicaid 31 director, in consultation with the direc- 32 tor of the budget and the commissioner of 33 health, shall develop a medicaid savings 34 allocation adjustment to limit such spend- 35 ing to the aggregate limit specified here- 36 in for such period. 37 Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment 38 shall be designed, to reduce the expendi- 39 tures authorized by the appropriations 40 herein in compliance with the following 41 guidelines: (1) reductions shall be made 42 in compliance with applicable federal law, 43 including the provisions of the Patient 44 Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public 45 Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and 46 Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, 47 Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively 48 "Affordable Care Act") and any subsequent 49 amendments thereto or regulations promul- 50 gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be 51 made in a manner that complies with the 52 state medicaid plan approved by the feder- 435 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 al centers for medicare and medicaid 2 services, provided, however, that the 3 commissioner of health is authorized to 4 submit any state plan amendment or seek 5 other federal approval, including waiver 6 authority, to implement the provisions of 7 the medicaid savings allocation adjustment 8 that meets the other criteria set forth 9 herein; (3) reductions shall be made in a 10 manner that maximizes federal financial 11 participation, to the extent practicable, 12 including any federal financial partic- 13 ipation that is available or is reasonably 14 expected to become available, in the 15 discretion of the commissioner, under the 16 Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall 17 be made uniformly among categories of 18 services and geographic regions of the 19 state, to the extent practicable, and 20 shall be made uniformly within a category 21 of service, to the extent practicable, 22 except where the commissioner determines 23 that there are sufficient grounds for 24 non-uniformity, including but not limited 25 to: the extent to which specific catego- 26 ries of services contributed to department 27 of health medicaid state funds spending in 28 excess of the limits specified herein; the 29 need to maintain safety net services in 30 underserved communities; or the potential 31 benefits of pursuing innovative payment 32 models contemplated by the Affordable Care 33 Act, in which case such grounds shall be 34 set forth in the medicaid savings allo- 35 cation adjustment; and (5) reductions 36 shall be made in a manner that does not 37 unnecessarily create administrative 38 burdens to medicaid applicants and recipi- 39 ents or providers. 40 The commissioner shall seek the input of the 41 legislature, as well as organizations 42 representing health care providers, 43 consumers, businesses, workers, health 44 insurers, and others with relevant exper- 45 tise, in developing such medicaid savings 46 allocation adjustment, to the extent that 47 all or part of such adjustment, in the 48 discretion of the commissioner, is likely 49 to have a material impact on the overall 50 medicaid program, particular categories of 51 service or particular geographic regions 52 of the state. 436 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 (a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid 2 savings allocation adjustment on the 3 department of health's website and shall 4 provide written copies of such adjustment 5 to the chairs of the senate finance and 6 the assembly ways and means committees at 7 least 30 days before the date on which 8 implementation is expected to begin. 9 (b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid 10 savings allocation adjustment subsequent 11 to the provisions of notice and prior to 12 implementation but need provide a new 13 notice pursuant to subparagraph (i) of 14 this paragraph only if the commissioner 15 determines, in his or her discretion, that 16 such revisions materially alter the 17 adjustment. 18 Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs 19 (a) and (b) of this subdivision, the 20 commissioner need not seek the input 21 described in paragraph (a) of this subdi- 22 vision or provide notice pursuant to para- 23 graph (b) of this subdivision if, in the 24 discretion of the commissioner, expedited 25 development and implementation of a medi- 26 caid savings allocation adjustment is 27 necessary due to a public health emergen- 28 cy. 29 For purposes of this section, a public 30 health emergency is defined as: (i) a 31 disaster, natural or otherwise, that 32 significantly increases the immediate need 33 for health care personnel in an area of 34 the state; (ii) an event or condition that 35 creates a widespread risk of exposure to a 36 serious communicable disease, or the 37 potential for such widespread risk of 38 exposure; or (iii) any other event or 39 condition determined by the commissioner 40 to constitute an imminent threat to public 41 health. 42 Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to 43 prevent all or part of such medicaid 44 savings allocation adjustment from taking 45 effect retroactively to the extent permit- 46 ted by the federal centers for medicare 47 and medicaid services. 48 In accordance with the medicaid savings 49 allocation adjustment, the commissioner of 50 the department of health shall reduce 51 department of health state funds medicaid 52 spending by the amount of the projected 437 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 overspending through, actions including, 2 but not limited to modifying or suspending 3 reimbursement methods, including but not 4 limited to all fees, premium levels and 5 rates of payment, notwithstanding any 6 provision of law that sets a specific 7 amount or methodology for any such 8 payments or rates of payment; modifying 9 medicaid program benefits; seeking all 10 necessary federal approvals, including, 11 but not limited to waivers, and waiver 12 amendments; and suspending time frames for 13 notice, approval or certification of rate 14 requirements, notwithstanding any 15 provision of law, rule or regulation to 16 the contrary, including but not limited to 17 sections 2807 and 3614 of the public 18 health law, section 18 of chapter 2 of the 19 laws of 1988, and 18 NYCRR 505.14(h). 20 The department of health shall prepare a 21 quarterly report that sets forth: (a) 22 known and projected department of health 23 medicaid expenditures as described in 24 subdivision 1 of this section, and factors 25 that could result in medicaid disburse- 26 ments for the relevant state fiscal year 27 to exceed the projected department of 28 health state funds disbursements in the 29 enacted budget financial plan pursuant to 30 subdivision 3 of section 23 of the state 31 finance law, including spending increases 32 or decreases due to: enrollment fluctu- 33 ations, rate changes, utilization changes, 34 MRT investments, and shift of benefici- 35 aries to managed care; and variations in 36 offline medicaid payments; and (b) the 37 actions taken to implement any medicaid 38 savings allocation adjustment implemented 39 pursuant to subdivision 4 of this section, 40 including information concerning the 41 impact of such actions on each category of 42 service and each geographic region of the 43 state. Each such quarterly report shall be 44 provided to the chairs of the senate 45 finance and the assembly ways and means 46 committees and shall be posted on the 47 department of health's website in a timely 48 manner. 49 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 50 the money hereby appropriated may be 51 increased or decreased by transfer or 52 interchange, with any appropriation of the 438 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 department of health, and may be increased 2 or decreased by transfer or suballocation 3 between these appropriated amounts and 4 appropriations of the office of mental 5 health, the office for people with devel- 6 opmental disabilities, the office of 7 addiction services and supports, the 8 department of family assistance office of 9 temporary and disability assistance, the 10 department of corrections and community 11 supervision, the state university of New 12 York, the state office for the aging, the 13 office of the medicaid inspector general, 14 the state education department, the office 15 of information technology services, the 16 office of general services, and office of 17 children and family services with the 18 approval of the director of the budget, 19 who shall file such approval with the 20 department of audit and control and copies 21 thereof with the chairman of the senate 22 finance committee and the chairman of the 23 assembly ways and means committee. 24 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 25 of law to the contrary, funds may be used 26 by the department for outside legal 27 assistance on issues involving the federal 28 government, the conduct of preadmission 29 screening and annual resident reviews 30 required by the state's medicaid program, 31 computer matching with insurance carriers 32 to insure that medicaid is the payer of 33 last resort, activities related to the 34 management of the pharmacy benefit avail- 35 able under the medicaid program and admin- 36 istrative expenses of other health insur- 37 ance programs of the department of health. 38 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 39 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 40 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 41 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 42 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 43 appropriation for the budget division 44 program of the division of the budget, are 45 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 46 part of this appropriation as if fully 47 stated. 48 The money hereby appropriated is available 49 for payment of liabilities accrued hereto- 50 fore and hereafter to accrue. 51 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 52 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 439 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 2 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 3 reappropriation for this item covering 4 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 5 ation for this item covering fiscal year 6 2025-26 set forth in chapter 50 of the 7 laws of 2022 (29534). 8 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 65,501,000 9 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 65,000 10 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 245,000 11 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 524,000 12 Travel (54000) ................................... 300,000 13 Contractual services (51000) ................. 300,622,000 14 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,100,000 15 -------------- 16 Total amount available ..................... 368,357,000 17 -------------- 18 For services and expenses of the medical 19 assistance program including making 20 improvements in the long term care system 21 for the point of entry initiatives, for 22 the purposes of expanding and promoting a 23 more coordinated level of care for the 24 delivery of quality services in the commu- 25 nity. 26 The money herein appropriated, together with 27 any available federal matching funds, is 28 available for transfer or suballocation to 29 the New York state office for the aging. 30 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 31 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 32 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 33 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 34 reappropriation for this item covering 35 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 36 ation for this item covering fiscal year 37 2025-26 set forth in chapter 50 of the 38 laws of 2022 (26848). 39 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 509,000 40 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,635,000 41 -------------- 42 Total amount available ....................... 2,144,000 43 -------------- 44 For grants to the United Hospital Fund of 45 New York, Inc. for studies, reviews and 46 analysis, to be performed in conjunction 47 with the department of health, on medicaid 440 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 policy, operational and other issues as 2 defined by the department (26849). 3 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 696,000 4 -------------- 5 For services and expenses related to admin- 6 istration of statutory duties for the 7 collections authorized by sections 2807-j, 8 2807-s, 2807-t and 2807-v of the public 9 health law and the assessments authorized 10 by sections 2807-d, 3614-a and 3614-b of 11 the public health law and section 367-i of 12 the social services law pursuant to chap- 13 ter 41 of the laws of 1992 (26779). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 310,000 15 -------------- 16 For contractual services related to medical 17 necessity and quality of care reviews 18 related to medicaid patients and to moni- 19 tor health care services provided to 20 persons with AIDS (26780). 21 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,600,000 22 -------------- 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 24 the money herein appropriated, together 25 with any available federal matching funds, 26 is available for transfer or suballocation 27 to the state university of New York and 28 its subsidiaries, or to contract without 29 competition for services with the state 30 university of New York research founda- 31 tion, to provide support for the adminis- 32 tration of the medical assistance program 33 including activities such as dental prior 34 approval, retrospective and prospective 35 drug utilization review, development of 36 evidence based utilization thresholds, 37 data analysis, clinical consultation and 38 peer review, clinical support for the 39 pharmacy and therapeutic committee, cardi- 40 ac services, and other activities related 41 to utilization management and for health 42 information technology support for the 43 medicaid program. 44 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 45 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 46 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 441 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 2 reappropriation for this item covering 3 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 4 ation for this item covering fiscal year 5 2025-26 set forth in chapter 50 of the 6 laws of 2022 (29536). 7 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,272,000 8 -------------- 9 For services and expenses for conducting 10 audits of disproportionate share hospital 11 payments made by the state of New York to 12 general hospitals and for the purpose of 13 conducting audits of hospital cost reports 14 as submitted to the state of New York in 15 accordance with article 28 of the public 16 health law. 17 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 18 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 19 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 20 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 21 reappropriation for this item covering 22 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 23 ation for this item covering fiscal year 24 2025-26 set forth in chapter 50 of the 25 laws of 2022 (29537). 26 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,300,000 27 -------------- 28 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 29 of law, subject to the approval of the 30 director of the budget, up to the amount 31 appropriated herein, together with any 32 available federal matching funds, may be 33 interchanged to support personal service 34 costs related to required criminal back- 35 ground checks for non-licensed long-term 36 care employees including employees of 37 nursing homes, certified home health agen- 38 cies, long term home health care provid- 39 ers, AIDS home care providers, health 40 homes, and licensed home care service 41 agencies. 42 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 43 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 44 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 45 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 46 reappropriation for this item covering 47 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 48 ation for this item covering fiscal year 442 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 2025-26 set forth in chapter 50 of the 2 laws of 2022 (29538). 3 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,500,000 4 -------------- 5 Program account subtotal ................. 385,179,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 8 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 9 Electronic Medicaid System Account - 25107 10 For services and expenses related to the 11 operation of an electronic medicaid eligi- 12 bility verification system and operation 13 of a medicaid override application system, 14 and operation of a medicaid management 15 information system, and development and 16 operation of a replacement medicaid 17 system. The moneys hereby appropriated 18 shall be available for payment of liabil- 19 ities heretofore accrued and hereafter to 20 accrue. 21 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 22 of law and subject to the approval of the 23 director of the budget, the amount appro- 24 priated herein may be increased or 25 decreased by transfer or interchange, or 26 suballocation, with any other appropri- 27 ation or with any other item or items 28 within the amounts appropriated within the 29 department of health, the office of mental 30 health, the office for people with devel- 31 opmental disabilities, the office of 32 addiction services and supports, the 33 department of family assistance office of 34 temporary and disability assistance, the 35 department of corrections and community 36 supervision, the state university of New 37 York, the state office for the aging, the 38 office of the medicaid inspector general, 39 the state education department, the office 40 of information technology services, the 41 office of general services, and office of 42 children and family services special 43 revenue funds - federal with the approval 44 of the director of the budget who shall 45 file such approval with the department of 46 audit and control and copies thereof with 47 the chairman of the senate finance commit- 443 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 tee and the chairman of the assembly ways 2 and means committee. 3 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 4 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 5 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 6 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 7 reappropriation for this item covering 8 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 9 ation for this item covering fiscal year 10 2025-26 set forth in chapter 50 of the 11 laws of 2022 (29539). 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................. 202,000,000 13 -------------- 14 Program account subtotal ................. 202,000,000 15 -------------- 16 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 17 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 18 Medical Administration Transfer Account - 25107 19 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 20 of law and subject to the approval of the 21 director of the budget, moneys hereby 22 appropriated may be increased or decreased 23 by interchange, transfer or suballocation 24 between these appropriated amounts and 25 appropriations of other state agencies and 26 appropriations of the department of 27 health. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 28 provision of law and subject to approval 29 of the director of the budget, moneys 30 hereby appropriated may be transferred or 31 suballocated to other state agencies for 32 reimbursement to local government entities 33 for services and expenses related to 34 administration of the medical assistance 35 program. 36 The money hereby appropriated is available 37 for payment of liabilities accrued hereto- 38 fore and hereafter to accrue. 39 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 40 contrary, the portion of this appropri- 41 ation covering fiscal year 2025-26 shall 42 supersede and replace any duplicative (i) 43 reappropriation for this item covering 44 fiscal year 2025-26, and (ii) appropri- 45 ation for this item covering fiscal year 46 2025-26 set forth in chapter 50 of the 47 laws of 2022 (29540). 444 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ...................... 55,532,000 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................. 559,384,000 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ....................... 33,092,000 4 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 5,725,000 5 -------------- 6 Total amount available ..................... 653,733,000 7 -------------- 8 For services and expenses related to admin- 9 istration of statutory duties for the 10 collections authorized by sections 2807-j, 11 2807-s, 2807-t and 2807-v of the public 12 health law and the assessments authorized 13 by sections 2807-d, 3614-a and 3614-b of 14 the public health law and section 367-i of 15 the social services law pursuant to chap- 16 ter 41 of the laws of 1992 (26779). 17 Personal service (50000) ......................... 310,000 18 -------------- 19 For contractual services related to medical 20 necessity and quality of care reviews 21 related to medicaid patients and to moni- 22 tor health care services provided to 23 persons with AIDS (26780). 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 4,600,000 25 -------------- 26 Program account subtotal ................. 658,643,000 27 -------------- 28 Special Revenue Funds - Other 29 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 30 New York State Medical Indemnity Account - 22240 31 Notwithstanding section 40 of the state 32 finance law or any provision of law to the 33 contrary, subject to federal approval, 34 department of health state funds medicaid 35 spending, excluding payments for medical 36 services provided at state facilities 37 operated by the office of mental health, 38 the office for people with developmental 39 disabilities and the office of addiction 40 services and supports and further exclud- 41 ing any payments which are not appropri- 42 ated within the department of health, in 43 the aggregate, for the period April 1, 44 2025 through March 31, 2026, shall not 45 exceed $33,417,285,000 except as provided 46 below provided, however, such aggregate 445 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 limits may be adjusted by the director of 2 the budget to account for any changes in 3 the New York state federal medical assist- 4 ance percentage amount established pursu- 5 ant to the federal social security act, 6 increases in provider revenues, reductions 7 in local social services district payments 8 for medical assistance administration, 9 minimum wage increases, and beginning 10 April 1, 2013 the operational costs of the 11 New York state medical indemnity fund, 12 pursuant to chapter 59 of the laws of 13 2011, and state costs or savings from the 14 essential plan. Such projections may be 15 adjusted by the director of the budget to 16 account for increased or expedited depart- 17 ment of health state funds medicaid 18 expenditures as a result of a natural or 19 other type of disaster, including a 20 governmental declaration of emergency. 21 The director of the budget, in consultation 22 with the commissioner of health, shall 23 assess on a quarterly basis known and 24 projected medicaid expenditures by catego- 25 ry of service and by geographic region, as 26 determined by the commissioner of health, 27 incurred both prior to and subsequent to 28 such assessment for each such period, and 29 if the director of the budget determines 30 that such expenditures are expected to 31 cause medicaid spending for such period to 32 exceed the aggregate limit specified here- 33 in for such period, the state medicaid 34 director, in consultation with the direc- 35 tor of the budget and the commissioner of 36 health, shall develop a medicaid savings 37 allocation adjustment to limit such spend- 38 ing to the aggregate limit specified here- 39 in for such period. 40 Such medicaid savings allocation adjustment 41 shall be designed, to reduce the expendi- 42 tures authorized by the appropriations 43 herein in compliance with the following 44 guidelines: (1) reductions shall be made 45 in compliance with applicable federal law, 46 including the provisions of the Patient 47 Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public 48 Law No. 111-148, and the Health Care and 49 Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, 50 Public Law No. 111-152 (collectively 51 "Affordable Care Act") and any subsequent 52 amendments thereto or regulations promul- 446 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 gated thereunder; (2) reductions shall be 2 made in a manner that complies with the 3 state medicaid plan approved by the feder- 4 al centers for medicare and medicaid 5 services, provided, however, that the 6 commissioner of health is authorized to 7 submit any state plan amendment or seek 8 other federal approval, including waiver 9 authority, to implement the provisions of 10 the medicaid savings allocation adjustment 11 that meets the other criteria set forth 12 herein; (3) reductions shall be made in a 13 manner that maximizes federal financial 14 participation, to the extent practicable, 15 including any federal financial partic- 16 ipation that is available or is reasonably 17 expected to become available, in the 18 discretion of the commissioner, under the 19 Affordable Care Act; (4) reductions shall 20 be made uniformly among categories of 21 services and geographic regions of the 22 state, to the extent practicable, and 23 shall be made uniformly within a category 24 of service, to the extent practicable, 25 except where the commissioner determines 26 that there are sufficient grounds for 27 non-uniformity, including but not limited 28 to: the extent to which specific catego- 29 ries of services contributed to department 30 of health medicaid state funds spending in 31 excess of the limits specified herein; the 32 need to maintain safety net services in 33 underserved communities; or the potential 34 benefits of pursuing innovative payment 35 models contemplated by the Affordable Care 36 Act, in which case such grounds shall be 37 set forth in the medicaid savings allo- 38 cation adjustment; and (5) reductions 39 shall be made in a manner that does not 40 unnecessarily create administrative 41 burdens to medicaid applicants and recipi- 42 ents or providers. 43 The commissioner shall seek the input of the 44 legislature, as well as organizations 45 representing health care providers, 46 consumers, businesses, workers, health 47 insurers, and others with relevant exper- 48 tise, in developing such medicaid savings 49 allocation adjustment, to the extent that 50 all or part of such adjustment, in the 51 discretion of the commissioner, is likely 52 to have a material impact on the overall 447 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 medicaid program, particular categories of 2 service or particular geographic regions 3 of the state. 4 (a) The commissioner shall post the medicaid 5 savings allocation adjustment on the 6 department of health's website and shall 7 provide written copies of such adjustment 8 to the chairs of the senate finance and 9 the assembly ways and means committees at 10 least 30 days before the date on which 11 implementation is expected to begin. 12 (b) The commissioner may revise the medicaid 13 savings allocation adjustment subsequent 14 to the provisions of notice and prior to 15 implementation but need provide a new 16 notice pursuant to subparagraph (i) of 17 this paragraph only if the commissioner 18 determines, in his or her discretion, that 19 such revisions materially alter the 20 adjustment. 21 Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs 22 (a) and (b) of this subdivision, the 23 commissioner need not seek the input 24 described in paragraph (a) of this subdi- 25 vision or provide notice pursuant to para- 26 graph (b) of this subdivision if, in the 27 discretion of the commissioner, expedited 28 development and implementation of a medi- 29 caid savings allocation adjustment is 30 necessary due to a public health emergen- 31 cy. 32 For purposes of this section, a public 33 health emergency is defined as: (i) a 34 disaster, natural or otherwise, that 35 significantly increases the immediate need 36 for health care personnel in an area of 37 the state; (ii) an event or condition that 38 creates a widespread risk of exposure to a 39 serious communicable disease, or the 40 potential for such widespread risk of 41 exposure; or (iii) any other event or 42 condition determined by the commissioner 43 to constitute an imminent threat to public 44 health. 45 Nothing in this paragraph shall be deemed to 46 prevent all or part of such medicaid 47 savings allocation adjustment from taking 48 effect retroactively to the extent permit- 49 ted by the federal centers for medicare 50 and medicaid services. 51 In accordance with the medicaid savings 52 allocation adjustment, the commissioner of 448 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 the department of health shall reduce 2 department of health state funds medicaid 3 spending by the amount of the projected 4 overspending through, actions including, 5 but not limited to modifying or suspending 6 reimbursement methods, including but not 7 limited to all fees, premium levels and 8 rates of payment, notwithstanding any 9 provision of law that sets a specific 10 amount or methodology for any such 11 payments or rates of payment; modifying 12 medicaid program benefits; seeking all 13 necessary federal approvals, including, 14 but not limited to waivers, and waiver 15 amendments; and suspending time frames for 16 notice, approval or certification of rate 17 requirements, notwithstanding any 18 provision of law, rule or regulation to 19 the contrary, including but not limited to 20 sections 2807 and 3614 of the public 21 health law, section 18 of chapter 2 of the 22 laws of 1988, and 18 NYCRR 505.14(h). 23 The department of health shall prepare a 24 quarterly report that sets forth:(a) known 25 and projected department of health medi- 26 caid expenditures as described in subdivi- 27 sion 1 of this section, and factors that 28 could result in medicaid disbursements for 29 the relevant state fiscal year to exceed 30 the projected department of health state 31 funds disbursements in the enacted budget 32 financial plan pursuant to subdivision 3 33 of section 23 of the state finance law, 34 including spending increases or decreases 35 due to: enrollment fluctuations, rate 36 changes, utilization changes, MRT invest- 37 ments, and shift of beneficiaries to 38 managed care; and variations in offline 39 medicaid payments; and (b) the actions 40 taken to implement any medicaid savings 41 allocation plan implemented pursuant to 42 subdivision 4 of this section, including 43 information concerning the impact of such 44 actions on each category of service and 45 each geographic region of the state. Each 46 such quarterly report shall be provided to 47 the chairs of the senate finance and the 48 assembly ways and means committees and 49 shall be posted on the department of 50 health's website in a timely manner. 51 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 52 the money hereby appropriated may be 449 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 increased or decreased by interchange, 2 with any appropriation of the department 3 of health, and may be increased or 4 decreased by transfer or suballocation 5 between these appropriated amounts and 6 appropriations of the office of mental 7 health, the office for people with devel- 8 opmental disabilities, the office of 9 addiction services and support, the 10 department of family assistance office of 11 temporary and disability assistance, the 12 department of corrections and community 13 supervision, the state university of New 14 York, the state office for the aging, the 15 office of the medicaid inspector general, 16 the state education department, the office 17 of information technology services, the 18 office of general services, and office of 19 children and family services with the 20 approval of the director of the budget, 21 who shall file such approval with the 22 department of audit and control and copies 23 thereof with the chairman of the senate 24 finance committee and the chairman of the 25 assembly ways and means committee. 26 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 27 of law to the contrary, funds may be used 28 by the department for outside legal 29 assistance on issues involving the federal 30 government, the conduct of preadmission 31 screening and annual resident reviews 32 required by the state's medicaid program, 33 computer matching with insurance carriers 34 to insure that medicaid is the payer of 35 last resort, activities related to the 36 management of the pharmacy benefit avail- 37 able under the medicaid program and admin- 38 istrative expenses of other health insur- 39 ance programs of the department of health. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 41 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 42 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 43 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 44 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 45 appropriation for the budget division 46 program of the division of the budget, are 47 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 48 part of this appropriation as if fully 49 stated. 50 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 51 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 52 shall be net of refunds, rebates, 450 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 reimbursements, credits, repayments, 2 and/or disallowances. 3 For services and expenses to support the 4 administration of the New York state 5 medical indemnity fund established pursu- 6 ant to chapter 59 of the laws of 2011 7 (26850). 8 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 910,000 9 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 581,000 10 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 50,000 11 -------------- 12 Program account subtotal ................... 1,541,000 13 -------------- 14 NEW YORK STATE OF HEALTH PROGRAM ............................ 32,343,000 15 -------------- 16 Special Revenue Funds - Other 17 HCRA Resources Fund 18 New York State of Health Account - 20823 19 For services and expenses to support the 20 administration of the New York state of 21 health program. 22 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 23 of law, the moneys hereby appropriated may 24 be increased or decreased by interchange 25 or transfer with any appropriation of the 26 department of health or by transfer or 27 suballocation to any appropriation of the 28 department of financial services. 29 The money hereby appropriated is available 30 for payment of liabilities heretofore and 31 hereafter accrued and shall be available 32 to the department net of disallowances, 33 refunds, reimbursements, and credits. 34 The money hereby appropriated is available 35 for payment of aid heretofore accrued or 36 hereafter accrued. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 38 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 39 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 40 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 41 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 42 appropriation for the budget division 43 program of the division of the budget, are 44 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 45 part of this appropriation as if fully 46 stated (26852). 451 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,664,000 2 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 16,000 3 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 95,000 4 Travel (54000) .................................... 45,000 5 Contractual services (51000) .................. 23,463,000 6 Equipment (56000) ................................. 38,000 7 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 3,041,000 8 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 981,000 9 -------------- 10 OFFICE OF HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM ......................... 610,008,000 11 -------------- 12 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 13 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 14 Healthcare and Insurance Reform Account - 25148 15 For services and expenses of the department 16 of health for planning and implementing 17 various healthcare and insurance reform 18 initiatives authorized by federal legis- 19 lation, including, but not limited to, the 20 Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act 21 (P.L. 111-148) and the Health Care and 22 Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (P.L. 23 111-152) in accordance with the following 24 sub-schedule. Notwithstanding any other 25 provision of law, money hereby appropri- 26 ated may be increased or decreased by 27 interchange, transfer, or suballocation 28 within a program, account or sub-schedule 29 or with any appropriation of any state 30 agency or transferred to health research 31 incorporated or distributed to localities 32 with the approval of the director of the 33 budget, who shall file such approval with 34 the department of audit and control and 35 copies thereof with the chairman of the 36 senate finance committee and the chairman 37 of the assembly ways and means committee. 38 A portion of this appropriation may be 39 transferred to local assistance appropri- 40 ations. 41 Chronic Disease Incentive Program (29732) 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 5,000,000 43 -------------- 44 Insurance Exchange (29724) 452 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ....................... 6,800,000 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 56,200,000 3 -------------- 4 Total amount available ...................... 63,000,000 5 -------------- 6 Consumer Assistance -- Independent Health 7 Insurance Consumer Assistance Designee 8 Community Service Society of New York 9 (CSS) for Community Health Advocates (CHA) 10 statewide consortium (29729). 11 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,500,000 12 -------------- 13 Other purposes pursuant to the Patient 14 Protection and Affordable Care Act (P.L. 15 111-148) and the Health Care and Education 16 Reconciliation Act of 2010 (P.L. 111-152), 17 and other purposes related to federal 18 health care reform initiatives (29716). 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 4,000,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal .................. 74,500,000 22 -------------- 23 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 24 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 25 Medical Assistance and Survey Account - 25107 26 For services and expenses for the medical 27 assistance program and administration of 28 the medical assistance program and survey 29 and certification program, provided pursu- 30 ant to title XIX and title XVIII of the 31 federal social security act. 32 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 33 of law and subject to the approval of the 34 director of the budget, moneys hereby 35 appropriated may be increased or decreased 36 by transfer or suballocation between these 37 appropriated amounts and appropriations of 38 other state agencies and appropriations of 39 the department of health. Notwithstanding 40 any inconsistent provision of law and 41 subject to approval of the director of the 42 budget, moneys hereby appropriated may be 43 transferred or suballocated to other state 44 agencies for reimbursement to local 45 government entities for services and 453 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 expenses related to administration of the 2 medical assistance program (26872). 3 Personal service (50000) ...................... 67,000,000 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................. 409,141,000 5 Fringe benefits (60090) ....................... 36,850,000 6 Indirect costs (58850) ........................ 16,000,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal ................. 528,991,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 HCRA Resources Fund 12 Medicaid Fraud Hotline and Medicaid Administration 13 Account - 20803 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 medicaid fraud hotline established pursu- 16 ant to chapter 1 of the laws of 1999. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 18 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 19 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 20 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 21 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 22 appropriation for the budget division 23 program of the division of the budget, are 24 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully 26 stated (26870). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 228,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 25,000 29 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 494,000 30 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 88,000 31 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 82,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal ..................... 917,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Other 36 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 37 Disease Management Account - 22031 38 For services and expenses related to disease 39 management. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 41 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 42 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 43 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 44 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 45 appropriation for the budget division 46 program of the division of the budget, are 454 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 2 part of this appropriation as if fully 3 stated (26870). 4 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,000,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ................... 5,000,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Other 9 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 10 Medicaid Research Projects Account - 22177 11 For services and expenses related to improv- 12 ing services to medical assistance recipi- 13 ents and other medical assistance research 14 activities. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 16 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 17 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 18 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 19 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 20 appropriation for the budget division 21 program of the division of the budget, are 22 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully 24 stated (26870). 25 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 600,000 26 -------------- 27 Program account subtotal ..................... 600,000 28 -------------- 29 OFFICE OF PRIMARY CARE AND HEALTH SYSTEMS MANAGEMENT 30 PROGRAM ................................................... 90,718,000 31 -------------- 32 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 33 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 34 National Health Services Corps Account - 25144 35 For administration of the national health 36 services corps. Notwithstanding any incon- 37 sistent provision of law, and subject to 38 the approval of the director of the budg- 39 et, moneys hereby appropriated may be 40 suballocated to the higher education 41 services corporation. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 43 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 44 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 45 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 455 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 2 appropriation for the budget division 3 program of the division of the budget, are 4 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 5 part of this appropriation as if fully 6 stated (26876). 7 Personal service (50000) ......................... 193,000 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ....................... 63,000 9 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 127,000 10 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 53,000 11 -------------- 12 Program account subtotal ..................... 436,000 13 -------------- 14 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 15 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 16 SAMHSA Account - 25170 17 For expenses incurred in the administration 18 of the prescription drug monitoring 19 program relating to the prescribing and 20 dispensing of controlled substances. 21 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 22 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 23 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 24 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 25 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 26 appropriation for the budget division 27 program of the division of the budget, are 28 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 29 part of this appropriation as if fully 30 stated (26876). 31 Personal service (50000) ......................... 240,000 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 128,000 33 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 132,000 34 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 17,000 35 -------------- 36 Program account subtotal ..................... 517,000 37 -------------- 38 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 39 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 40 Title XVIII Survey and Certification Account - 25121 41 For services and expenses for the survey and 42 certification program, provided pursuant 43 to title XVIII of the federal social secu- 44 rity act. 45 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 46 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 456 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 2 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 3 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 4 appropriation for the budget division 5 program of the division of the budget, are 6 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 7 part of this appropriation as if fully 8 stated (26876). 9 Personal service (50000) ....................... 9,500,000 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 7,600,000 11 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 5,500,000 12 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 2,400,000 13 -------------- 14 Program account subtotal .................. 25,000,000 15 -------------- 16 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 17 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 18 United States Department of Justice Account - 25377 19 For expenses incurred in the administration 20 of the prescription drug monitoring 21 program relating to the prescribing and 22 dispensing of controlled substances 23 (26876). 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 400,000 25 -------------- 26 Program account subtotal ..................... 400,000 27 -------------- 28 Special Revenue Funds - Other 29 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 30 Life Pass It On Trust Fund Account - 20174 31 For services and expenses related to organ 32 donation and transplant research and 33 educational projects promoting organ and 34 tissue donation (26876). 35 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 618,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ..................... 618,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Other 40 HCRA Resources Fund 41 Emergency Medical Services Account - 20809 42 For services and expenses related to emer- 43 gency medical services (EMS) adminis- 457 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 tration including but not limited to, 2 expenses related to training courses and 3 instructor development, expenses of the 4 state EMS council, expenses of the EMS 5 regional councils and program agencies, 6 and expenses of the general public health 7 work - EMS reimbursement. 8 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 9 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 10 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 11 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 12 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 13 appropriation for the budget division 14 program of the division of the budget, are 15 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 16 part of this appropriation as if fully 17 stated (26876). 18 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 15,750,000 19 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 5,000 20 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 21 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 100,000 22 Travel (54000) .................................... 75,000 23 Contractual services (51000) .................. 10,640,000 24 Equipment (56000) ................................ 200,000 25 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 3,002,000 26 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 145,000 27 -------------- 28 Program account subtotal .................. 29,927,000 29 -------------- 30 Special Revenue Funds - Other 31 HCRA Resources Fund 32 Health Care Delivery Administration Account - 20821 33 For services and expenses related to admin- 34 istration of the health care and cancer 35 initiative programs pursuant to section 36 2807-l of the public health law. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 38 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 39 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 40 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 41 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 42 appropriation for the budget division 43 program of the division of the budget, are 44 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 45 part of this appropriation as if fully 46 stated (26876). 47 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 429,000 48 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 5,000 458 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 2,000 2 Travel (54000) ..................................... 2,000 3 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 278,000 4 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 13,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ..................... 729,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Other 9 HCRA Resources Fund 10 Primary Care Initiatives Account - 20814 11 For services and expenses related to the 12 administration of the program authorized 13 by section 2807-l of the public health 14 law. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 16 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 17 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 18 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 19 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 20 appropriation for the budget division 21 program of the division of the budget, are 22 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully 24 stated (26876). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 373,000 26 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 5,000 27 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 5,000 28 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 245,000 29 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 10,000 30 -------------- 31 Program account subtotal ..................... 638,000 32 -------------- 33 Special Revenue Funds - Other 34 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 35 Adult Home Quality Enhancement Account - 22091 36 For services and expenses to promote 37 programs to improve the quality of care 38 for residents in adult homes. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 40 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 41 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 42 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 43 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 44 appropriation for the budget division 45 program of the division of the budget, are 46 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 459 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 part of this appropriation as if fully 2 stated (26876). 3 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 500,000 4 -------------- 5 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Other 8 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 9 Certificate of Need Account - 21920 10 For services and expenses, including indi- 11 rect costs, related to the certificate of 12 need program. 13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 14 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 15 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 16 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 17 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 18 appropriation for the budget division 19 program of the division of the budget, are 20 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully 22 stated (26876). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,561,000 24 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 25 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 51,000 26 Travel (54000) .................................... 16,000 27 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,147,000 28 Equipment (56000) ................................. 21,000 29 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,284,000 30 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 101,000 31 -------------- 32 Program account subtotal ................... 8,191,000 33 -------------- 34 Special Revenue Funds - Other 35 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 36 Continuing Care Retirement Community Account - 21922 37 For services and expenses related to the 38 establishment of continuing care retire- 39 ment communities including expenses of the 40 continuing care retirement communities 41 council. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 43 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 44 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 45 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 46 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 460 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 appropriation for the budget division 2 program of the division of the budget, are 3 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 4 part of this appropriation as if fully 5 stated (26876). 6 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 84,000 7 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 8 Travel (54000) ..................................... 2,000 9 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 3,000 10 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 54,000 11 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 3,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal ..................... 147,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other 16 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 17 Funeral Directing Account - 22075 18 For services and expenses of a statewide 19 program, including indirect costs, related 20 to the funeral direction administration 21 program. 22 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 23 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 24 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 25 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 26 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 27 appropriation for the budget division 28 program of the division of the budget, are 29 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 30 part of this appropriation as if fully 31 stated (26876). 32 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 281,000 33 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 34 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 4,000 35 Travel (54000) ..................................... 2,000 36 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 44,000 37 Equipment (56000) .................................. 2,000 38 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 186,000 39 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 9,000 40 -------------- 41 Program account subtotal ..................... 538,000 42 -------------- 43 Special Revenue Funds - Other 44 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 45 Patient Safety Center Account - 22139 461 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of the patient 2 safety center created by title 2 of arti- 3 cle 29-D of the public health law. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 5 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 6 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 7 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 8 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 9 appropriation for the budget division 10 program of the division of the budget, are 11 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully 13 stated (26876). 14 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 949,000 15 -------------- 16 Program account subtotal ..................... 949,000 17 -------------- 18 Special Revenue Funds - Other 19 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 20 Professional Medical Conduct Account - 22088 21 For services and expenses, including indi- 22 rect costs, related to the professional 23 medical conduct program. 24 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 25 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 26 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 27 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 28 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 29 appropriation for the budget division 30 program of the division of the budget, are 31 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 32 part of this appropriation as if fully 33 stated (26876). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 9,528,000 35 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 10,000 36 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 37 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 63,000 38 Travel (54000) .................................... 86,000 39 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,921,000 40 Equipment (56000) ................................. 86,000 41 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 6,142,000 42 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 282,000 43 -------------- 44 Program account subtotal .................. 22,128,000 45 -------------- 46 WADSWORTH CENTER FOR LABORATORIES AND RESEARCH PROGRAM ...... 35,822,000 47 -------------- 462 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 2 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 3 Federal Block Grant Account - 25183 4 For health prevention, diagnostic, detection 5 and treatment services (26981). 6 Personal service (50000) ....................... 5,459,000 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,912,000 8 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 3,040,000 9 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 382,000 10 -------------- 11 Program account subtotal .................. 11,793,000 12 -------------- 13 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 14 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 15 Federal Grant WCLR Account - 25170 16 For health prevention, diagnostic, detection 17 and treatment services (26982). 18 Personal service (50000) ......................... 675,000 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 125,000 20 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 390,000 21 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 630,000 22 -------------- 23 Program account subtotal ................... 1,820,000 24 -------------- 25 Special Revenue Funds - Other 26 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 27 Multiple Sclerosis Research Account - 20178 28 For research into the causes and treatment 29 of pediatric multiple sclerosis pursuant 30 to section 95-d of the state finance law 31 (26884). 32 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 20,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal ...................... 20,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Medical Cannabis Fund 38 Medical Cannabis Health Operations and Oversight Account 39 - 23755 40 For services and expenses related to chapter 41 90 of the laws of 2014, establishing the 42 medical marihuana program. 463 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 2 the money hereby appropriated may be 3 increased or decreased by interchange, 4 transfer or suballocation between these 5 appropriated amounts and appropriations of 6 the department of agriculture and markets 7 for regulation and inspection of cannabis 8 cultivation subject to a plan approved by 9 director of the budget, who shall file 10 such approval with the department of audit 11 and control and copies thereof with the 12 chairman of the senate finance committee 13 and the chairman of the assembly ways and 14 means committee (29599). 15 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,000,000 16 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 190,000 17 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 240,000 18 Equipment (56000) ................................. 10,000 19 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 640,000 20 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 29,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ................... 2,109,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Other 25 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 26 Clinical Laboratory Reference System Assessment Account 27 - 21962 28 For services and expenses of the clinical 29 laboratory reference and accreditation 30 program. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 32 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 33 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 34 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 35 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 36 appropriation for the budget division 37 program of the division of the budget, are 38 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 39 part of this appropriation as if fully 40 stated (26884). 41 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 6,935,000 42 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 100,000 43 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,360,000 44 Travel (54000) ................................... 400,000 45 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,410,000 46 Equipment (56000) ................................ 210,000 464 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 4,499,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 199,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal .................. 16,113,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 8 Environmental Laboratory Fee Account - 21959 9 For services and expenses hereafter to 10 accrue for the environmental laboratory 11 reference and accreditation program 12 (26884). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,974,000 14 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 20,000 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 230,000 16 Travel (54000) ................................... 140,000 17 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 146,000 18 Equipment (56000) ................................ 125,000 19 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,275,000 20 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 57,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ................... 3,967,000 23 -------------- 465 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 2 General Fund 3 State Purposes Account - 10050 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For service and expenses related to changes in state agency data 6 collection activities required to comply with section 170-e of the 7 executive law as added by chapter 745 of the laws of 2021. 8 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 9 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, with any appro- 10 priation of the department of health, and may be increased or 11 decreased by transfer or suballocation between these appropriated 12 amounts and appropriations of any state agency, board, or commission 13 with the approval of the director of the budget, who shall file such 14 approval with the department of audit and control and copies thereof 15 with the chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman 16 of the assembly ways and means committee (59027). 17 Contractual services (51000) ... 7,325,000 .......... (re. $7,325,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 19 For service and expenses related to changes in state agency data 20 collection activities required to comply with section 170-e of the 21 executive law as added by chapter 745 of the laws of 2021. Notwith- 22 standing any other provision of law, the money hereby appropriated 23 may be increased or decreased by interchange, with any appropriation 24 of the department 30 of health, and may be increased or decreased by 25 transfer or suballocation between these appropriated amounts and 26 appropriations of any state agency, board, or commission with the 27 approval of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval 28 with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the 29 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 30 assembly ways and means committee (59027). 31 Contractual services (51000) ... 7,325,000 .......... (re. $6,825,000) 32 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 33 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 34 Federal Block Grant Account - 25183 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 36 For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment 37 services (26983). 38 Personal service (50000) ... 3,195,000 .............. (re. $3,098,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,703,000 ........... (re. $1,703,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,758,000 ............... (re. $1,697,000) 41 Indirect costs (58850) ... 224,000 .................... (re. $224,000) 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 43 For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment 44 services (26983). 45 Personal service (50000) ... 3,195,000 .............. (re. $1,798,000) 46 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,703,000 ........... (re. $1,059,000) 466 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,758,000 ................. (re. $865,000) 2 Indirect costs (58850) ... 224,000 .................... (re. $224,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 4 For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment 5 services (26983). 6 Personal service (50000) ... 3,195,000 .............. (re. $1,863,000) 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,703,000 ........... (re. $1,036,000) 8 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,758,000 ................. (re. $915,000) 9 Indirect costs (58850) ... 224,000 .................... (re. $224,000) 10 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 11 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 12 Child and Adult Care Food Account - 25022 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 14 For various food and nutritional services (26969). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 300,000 ............... (re. $300,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 325,000 ................... (re. $325,000) 18 Indirect costs (58850) ... 50,000 ...................... (re. $50,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 20 For various food and nutritional services (26969). 21 Personal service (50000) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $500,000) 22 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 300,000 ............... (re. $300,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 325,000 ................... (re. $325,000) 24 Indirect costs (58850) ... 50,000 ...................... (re. $50,000) 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 26 For various food and nutritional services (26969). 27 Personal service (50000) ... 500,000 .................. (re. $436,000) 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 300,000 ............... (re. $300,000) 29 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 325,000 ................... (re. $288,000) 30 Indirect costs (58850) ... 50,000 ...................... (re. $50,000) 31 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 32 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 33 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25022 34 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 35 For various food and nutritional services (26984). 36 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 .............. (re. $1,500,000) 37 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 640,000 ............... (re. $640,000) 38 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 909,000 ................... (re. $909,000) 39 Indirect costs (58850) ... 84,000 ...................... (re. $84,000) 40 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 41 For various food and nutritional services (26984). 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 640,000 ............... (re. $640,000) 43 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 909,000 .................... (re. $23,000) 44 Indirect costs (58850) ... 84,000 ...................... (re. $84,000) 467 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 2 For various food and nutritional services (26984). 3 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 640,000 ............... (re. $640,000) 4 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 909,000 .................... (re. $30,000) 5 Indirect costs (58850) ... 84,000 ...................... (re. $84,000) 6 CENTER FOR COMMUNITY HEALTH PROGRAM 7 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 8 Federal Education Fund 9 Individuals with Disabilities-Part C Account - 25214 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 11 For activities related to a handicapped infants and toddlers program 12 (26837). 13 Personal service (50000) ... 5,000,000 .............. (re. $4,706,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 18,449,000 ......... (re. $18,449,000) 15 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,700,000 ............... (re. $2,514,000) 16 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,100,000 ................ (re. $1,081,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 18 For activities related to a handicapped infants and toddlers program 19 (26837). 20 Personal service (50000) ... 5,000,000 .............. (re. $1,329,000) 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 18,449,000 ......... (re. $15,585,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,700,000 ................. (re. $379,000) 23 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,100,000 .................. (re. $861,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 25 For activities related to a handicapped infants and toddlers program 26 (26837). 27 Personal service (50000) ... 5,000,000 .............. (re. $1,337,000) 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 18,449,000 .......... (re. $7,967,000) 29 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,700,000 ................. (re. $355,000) 30 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,100,000 .................. (re. $859,000) 31 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 32 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 33 Federal Block Grant Account - 25183 34 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 35 For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment 36 services. The amounts appropriated pursuant to such appropriation 37 may be suballocated to other state agencies or accounts for expendi- 38 tures incurred in the operation of programs funded by such appropri- 39 ation subject to the approval of the director of the budget (26989). 40 Personal service (50000) ... 11,702,000 ............ (re. $10,862,000) 41 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,147,000 ........... (re. $6,146,000) 42 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,810,000 ............... (re. $6,277,000) 43 Indirect costs (58850) ... 632,000 .................... (re. $632,000) 44 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 468 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment 2 services. The amounts appropriated pursuant to such appropriation 3 may be suballocated to other state agencies or accounts for expendi- 4 tures incurred in the operation of programs funded by such appropri- 5 ation subject to the approval of the director of the budget (26989). 6 Personal service (50000) ... 11,702,000 ............. (re. $1,678,000) 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,147,000 ........... (re. $6,075,000) 8 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,635,000 ................. (re. $268,000) 9 Indirect costs (58850) ... 807,000 .................... (re. $807,000) 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 11 For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment 12 services. The amounts appropriated pursuant to such appropriation 13 may be suballocated to other state agencies or accounts for expendi- 14 tures incurred in the operation of programs funded by such appropri- 15 ation subject to the approval of the director of the budget (26989). 16 Personal service (50000) ... 11,702,000 ............. (re. $2,541,000) 17 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 6,147,000 ........... (re. $4,628,000) 18 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,635,000 ................. (re. $789,000) 19 Indirect costs (58850) ... 807,000 .................... (re. $807,000) 20 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 21 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 22 Federal Health, Education and Human Services Account - 25148 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 24 For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment 25 services. The amounts appropriated pursuant to such appropriation 26 may be suballocated to other state agencies or accounts for expendi- 27 tures incurred in the operation of programs funded by such appropri- 28 ation subject to the approval of the director of the budget. 29 The moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for liabilities 30 heretofore and hereafter to accrue (26988). 31 Personal service (50000) ... 15,940,000 ............ (re. $14,361,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 58,961,000 ......... (re. $58,730,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 11,316,000 ............. (re. $10,325,000) 34 Indirect costs (58850) ... 3,654,000 ................ (re. $3,500,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 36 For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment 37 services. The amounts appropriated pursuant to such appropriation 38 may be suballocated to other state agencies or accounts for expendi- 39 tures incurred in the operation of programs funded by such appropri- 40 ation subject to the approval of the director of the budget. 41 The moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for liabilities 42 heretofore and hereafter to accrue (26988). 43 Personal service (50000) ... 13,790,000 ............. (re. $8,004,000) 44 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 205,936,000 ....... (re. $204,032,000) 45 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 8,380,000 ............... (re. $4,688,000) 46 Indirect costs (58850) ... 3,181,000 ................ (re. $2,513,000) 47 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 469 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment 2 services. The amounts appropriated pursuant to such appropriation 3 may be suballocated to other state agencies or accounts for expendi- 4 tures incurred in the operation of programs funded by such appropri- 5 ation subject to the approval of the director of the budget. 6 The moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for liabilities 7 heretofore and hereafter to accrue (26988). 8 Personal service (50000) ... 13,790,000 ............. (re. $5,664,000) 9 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 205,936,000 ....... (re. $199,122,000) 10 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 8,380,000 ............... (re. $3,231,000) 11 Indirect costs (58850) ... 3,181,000 ................ (re. $1,773,000) 12 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 13 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 14 Child and Adult Care Food Account - 25022 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 16 For various food and nutritional services (26985). 17 Personal service (50000) ... 4,848,000 .............. (re. $4,848,000) 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,921,000 ........... (re. $2,921,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,667,000 ............... (re. $2,667,000) 20 Indirect costs (58850) ... 639,000 .................... (re. $639,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 22 For various food and nutritional services (26985). 23 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,921,000 ........... (re. $2,129,000) 24 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,667,000 ................. (re. $656,000) 25 Indirect costs (58850) ... 639,000 .................... (re. $130,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 27 For various food and nutritional services (26985). 28 Personal service (50000) ... 4,848,000 ................. (re. $42,000) 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,921,000 ........... (re. $1,058,000) 30 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,667,000 ................... (re. $9,000) 31 Indirect costs (58850) ... 639,000 ..................... (re. $96,000) 32 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 33 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 34 Federal Food and Nutrition Services Account - 25022 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 36 For various food and nutritional services. A portion of this appropri- 37 ation may be suballocated to other state agencies (26986). 38 Personal service (50000) ... 26,284,000 ............ (re. $26,284,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 25,104,000 ......... (re. $25,104,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 14,457,000 ............. (re. $14,457,000) 41 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,982,000 ................ (re. $1,982,000) 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 43 For various food and nutritional services. A portion of this appropri- 44 ation may be suballocated to other state agencies (26986). 45 Personal service (50000) ... 26,284,000 ............ (re. $12,869,000) 470 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 25,104,000 ......... (re. $14,840,000) 2 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 14,457,000 .............. (re. $5,943,000) 3 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,982,000 .................. (re. $614,000) 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 5 For various food and nutritional services. A portion of this appropri- 6 ation may be suballocated to other state agencies (26986). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 26,284,000 ............ (re. $13,382,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 25,104,000 ......... (re. $13,669,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 14,457,000 .............. (re. $6,548,000) 10 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,982,000 .................. (re. $499,000) 11 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 12 Federal USDA - Food and Nutrition Services Fund 13 Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) Civil Monetary Account - 25035 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 15 For services and expenses of the department of health related to the 16 special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants and chil- 17 dren (29974). 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 20 For services and expenses of the department of health related to the 21 special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants and chil- 22 dren (29974). 23 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 25 For services and expenses of the department of health related to the 26 special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants and chil- 27 dren (29974). 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $4,503,000) 29 CENTER FOR ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH PROGRAM 30 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 31 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 32 Federal Block Grant CEH Account - 25170 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 34 For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment 35 services (26990). 36 Personal service (50000) ... 600,000 .................. (re. $592,000) 37 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 265,000 ............... (re. $265,000) 38 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 752,000 ................... (re. $747,000) 39 Indirect costs (58850) ... 56,000 ...................... (re. $56,000) 40 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 41 For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment 42 services (26990). 43 Personal service (50000) ... 600,000 .................. (re. $489,000) 471 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 265,000 ............... (re. $176,000) 2 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 752,000 ................... (re. $681,000) 3 Indirect costs (58850) ... 56,000 ...................... (re. $45,000) 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 5 For various health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment 6 services (26990). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 600,000 .................. (re. $436,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 265,000 ............... (re. $178,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 752,000 ................... (re. $653,000) 10 Indirect costs (58850) ... 56,000 ...................... (re. $27,000) 11 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 12 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 13 Federal Block Grant Account - 25183 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 15 For services and expenses of various health prevention, diagnostic, 16 detection and treatment services (26991). 17 Personal service (50000) ... 3,268,000 .............. (re. $3,090,000) 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,644,000 ........... (re. $2,644,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,873,000 ............... (re. $1,760,000) 20 Indirect costs (58850) ... 229,000 .................... (re. $229,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 22 For services and expenses of various health prevention, diagnostic, 23 detection and treatment services (26991). 24 Personal service (50000) ... 3,268,000 ................ (re. $966,000) 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,644,000 ........... (re. $2,498,000) 26 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,873,000 ................. (re. $434,000) 27 Indirect costs (58850) ... 229,000 .................... (re. $229,000) 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 29 For services and expenses of various health prevention, diagnostic, 30 detection and treatment services (26991). 31 Personal service (50000) ... 3,268,000 ................ (re. $953,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,644,000 ........... (re. $1,343,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,873,000 ................. (re. $405,000) 34 Indirect costs (58850) ... 229,000 .................... (re. $229,000) 35 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 36 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 37 Federal Environmental Protection Agency Grants Account - 25467 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 39 For various environmental projects including suballocation for the 40 department of environmental conservation (26992). 41 Personal service (50000) ... 4,657,000 .............. (re. $4,404,000) 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,590,000 ........... (re. $2,590,000) 43 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,235,000 ............... (re. $2,075,000) 44 Indirect costs (58850) ... 326,000 .................... (re. $326,000) 472 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 2 For various environmental projects including suballocation for the 3 department of environmental conservation (26992). 4 Personal service (50000) ... 4,657,000 .............. (re. $1,614,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,590,000 ........... (re. $2,534,000) 6 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,235,000 ................. (re. $296,000) 7 Indirect costs (58850) ... 326,000 .................... (re. $318,000) 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 9 For various environmental projects including suballocation for the 10 department of environmental conservation (26992). 11 Personal service (50000) ... 4,657,000 .............. (re. $1,355,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,590,000 ........... (re. $2,211,000) 13 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,235,000 ................. (re. $131,000) 14 Indirect costs (58850) ... 326,000 .................... (re. $314,000) 15 CHILD HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM 16 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 17 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 18 Children's Health Insurance Account - 25148 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 20 The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto- 21 fore accrued or hereafter accrued. 22 For services and expenses related to the children's health insurance 23 program provided pursuant to title XXI of the federal social securi- 24 ty act (26931). 25 Personal service (50000) ... 48,000,000 ............ (re. $47,621,000) 26 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 59,600,000 ......... (re. $55,227,000) 27 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 26,400,000 ............. (re. $26,160,000) 28 Indirect costs (58850) ... 3,400,000 ................ (re. $3,363,000) 29 The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto- 30 fore accrued or hereafter accrued. 31 For state grants for poison control centers. 32 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, this appropriation 33 shall only be available for transfer or interchange to the HCRA 34 resources fund HCRA program account appropriation for state grants 35 for poison control centers in the event that the director of the 36 budget, in his or her sole discretion, authorizes the transfer or 37 interchange of the moneys hereby appropriated to the HCRA resources 38 fund HCRA program account appropriation for state grants for poison 39 control centers, provided however, any such interchange or transfer 40 for the foregoing purpose shall not exceed $1,100,000 (26667). 41 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,100,000 ........... (re. $1,100,000) 42 ESSENTIAL PLAN PROGRAM 43 General Fund 44 State Purposes Account - 10050 473 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, is 2 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 3 For services and expenses to support the administration of the essen- 4 tial plan program. 5 The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid hereto- 6 fore accrued or hereafter accrued. 7 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby 8 appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange or trans- 9 fer with any appropriation of the department of health or for trans- 10 fer to Health Research Incorporated (HRI). 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 12 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 13 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 14 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 15 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 16 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (26940). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 5,415,000 ..... (re. $2,754,000) 18 Contractual services (51000) ... 89,850,000 ........ (re. $45,950,000) 19 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 20 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 21 Essential Plan Account - [25100] 25186 22 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as 23 supplemented by interchanges in accordance with state finance law, 24 is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 25 For services and expenses to support the administration of the essen- 26 tial plan program, [to include the return of interest earned on the 27 Basic Health Program Trust Fund, as establish by state finance law 28 97-ooo on or after April 1, 2024 to the Centers for Medicare and 29 Medicaid Services (CMS),] in accordance with the provisions of the 30 New York's State Innovation Waiver authorized under Section 1332 of 31 the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (ACA). The money 32 hereby appropriated is available for payment of aid heretofore 33 accrued or hereafter accrued. 34 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the moneys hereby 35 appropriated may be increased or decreased by interchange or trans- 36 fer with any appropriation of the department of health or for trans- 37 fer to Health Research Incorporated (HRI). 38 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 39 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 40 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 41 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 42 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 43 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (26940). 44 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 5,415,000 ..... (re. $2,754,000) 45 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 37,000 ....... (re. $35,000) 46 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 10,000 .............. (re. $10,000) 47 Travel (54000) ... 23,000 .............................. (re. $23,000) 48 Contractual services (51000) ... 689,850,000 ...... (re. $678,623,000) 49 Equipment (56000) ... 8,000 ............................. (re. $8,000) 474 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 HEALTH CARE FINANCING PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Other 3 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 4 Nursing Home Receivership Account - 21925 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 1986: 6 For purposes of making payments pursuant to subdivision 3 of section 7 2810 of the public health law (26853) .............................. 8 2,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 9 MEDICAL ASSISTANCE ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 10 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 11 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 12 Electronic Medicaid System Account - 25107 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 14 For services and expenses related to the operation of an electronic 15 medicaid eligibility verification system and operation of a medicaid 16 override application system, and operation of a medicaid management 17 information system, and development and operation of a replacement 18 medicaid system. The moneys hereby appropriated shall be available 19 for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued and hereafter to 20 accrue. 21 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to the 22 approval of the director of the budget, the amount appropriated 23 herein may be increased or decreased by transfer or interchange, or 24 suballocation, with any other appropriation or with any other item 25 or items within the amounts appropriated within the department of 26 health, the office of mental health, the office for people with 27 developmental disabilities, the office of addiction services and 28 supports, the department of family assistance office of temporary 29 and disability assistance, the department of corrections and commu- 30 nity supervision, the state university of New York, the state office 31 for the aging, the office of the medicaid inspector general, the 32 state education department, the office of information technology 33 services, the office of general services, and office of children and 34 family services special revenue funds - federal with the approval of 35 the director of the budget who shall file such approval with the 36 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 37 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 38 ways and means committee. 39 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of 40 this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and 41 replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering 42 fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering 43 fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 50 of the laws of 2022 44 (29539). 45 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 202,000,000 ....... (re. $202,000,000) 46 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 475 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding section 40 of the state finance law or any other law 2 to the contrary, all medical assistance appropriations made from 3 this account shall remain in full force and effect in accordance, in 4 the aggregate, with the following schedule: not more than 50 percent 5 for the period April 1, 2023 to March 31, 2024; and the remaining 6 amount for the period April 1, 2024 to March 31, 2025. 7 For services and expenses related to the operation of an electronic 8 medicaid eligibility verification system and operation of a medicaid 9 override application system, and operation of a medicaid management 10 information system, and development and operation of a replacement 11 medicaid system. The moneys hereby appropriated shall be available 12 for payment of liabilities heretofore accrued and hereafter to 13 accrue. 14 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to the 15 approval of the director of the budget, the amount appropriated 16 herein may be increased or decreased by transfer or interchange, or 17 suballocation, with any other appropriation or with any other item 18 or items within the amounts appropriated within the department of 19 health, the office of mental health, the office for people with 20 developmental disabilities, the office of addiction services and 21 supports, the department of family assistance office of temporary 22 and disability assistance, the department of corrections and commu- 23 nity supervision, the state university of New York, the state office 24 for the aging, the office of the medicaid inspector general, the 25 state education department, the office of information technology 26 services, the office of general services, and office of children and 27 family services special revenue funds - federal with the approval of 28 the director of the budget who shall file such approval with the 29 department of audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman 30 of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the assembly 31 ways and means committee. 32 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of 33 this appropriation covering fiscal year 2023-24 shall supersede and 34 replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering 35 fiscal year 2023-24, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering 36 fiscal year 2023-24 set forth in chapter 50 of the laws of 2022 37 (29539). 38 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 404,000,000 ....... (re. $181,072,000) 39 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 40 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 41 Medical Administration Transfer Account - 25107 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 43 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to the 44 approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated 45 may be increased or decreased by interchange, transfer or suballo- 46 cation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations of 47 other state agencies and appropriations of the department of health. 48 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to 49 approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated 50 may be transferred or suballocated to other state agencies for 476 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 reimbursement to local government entities for services and expenses 2 related to administration of the medical assistance program. 3 The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of liabilities 4 accrued heretofore and hereafter to accrue. 5 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of 6 this appropriation covering fiscal year 2024-25 shall supersede and 7 replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering 8 fiscal year 2024-25, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering 9 fiscal year 2024-25 set forth in chapter 50 of the laws of 2022 10 (29540). 11 Personal service (50000) ... 45,030,000 ............ (re. $45,030,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 570,914,000 ....... (re. $570,914,000) 13 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 28,563,000 ............. (re. $28,563,000) 14 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,643,000 ................ (re. $4,643,000) 15 For services and expenses related to administration of statutory 16 duties for the collections authorized by sections 2807-j, 2807-s, 17 2807-t and 2807-v of the public health law and the assessments 18 authorized by sections 2807-d, 3614-a and 3614-b of the public 19 health law and section 367-i of the social services law pursuant to 20 chapter 41 of the laws of 1992 (26779). 21 Personal service (50000) ... 310,000 .................. (re. $310,000) 22 For contractual services related to medical necessity and quality of 23 care reviews related to medicaid patients and to monitor health care 24 services provided to persons with AIDS (26780). 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,600,000 ........... (re. $4,600,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 27 Notwithstanding section 40 of the state finance law or any other law 28 to the contrary, all medical assistance appropriations made from 29 this account shall remain in full force and effect in accordance, in 30 the aggregate, with the following schedule: not more than 48 percent 31 for the period April 1, 2023 to March 31, 2024; and the remaining 32 amount for the period April 1, 2024 to March 31, 2025. 33 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to the 34 approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated 35 may be increased or decreased by interchange, transfer or suballo- 36 cation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations of 37 other state agencies and appropriations of the department of health. 38 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to 39 approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated 40 may be transferred or suballocated to other state agencies for 41 reimbursement to local government entities for services and expenses 42 related to administration of the medical assistance program. 43 The money hereby appropriated is available for payment of liabilities 44 accrued heretofore and hereafter to accrue. 45 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the portion of 46 this appropriation covering fiscal year 2023-24 shall supersede and 47 replace any duplicative (i) reappropriation for this item covering 48 fiscal year 2023-24, and (ii) appropriation for this item covering 49 fiscal year 2023-24 set forth in chapter 50 of the laws of 2022 50 (29540). 51 Personal service (50000) ... 100,054,000 ........... (re. $55,359,000) 477 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,160,889,000 ... (re. $1,078,213,000) 2 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 64,985,000 ............. (re. $64,985,000) 3 Indirect costs (58850) ... 8,284,000 ................ (re. $8,284,000) 4 For services and expenses related to administration of statutory 5 duties for the collections authorized by sections 2807-j, 2807-s, 6 2807-t and 2807-v of the public health law and the assessments 7 authorized by sections 2807-d, 3614-a and 3614-b of the public 8 health law and section 367-i of the social services law pursuant to 9 chapter 41 of the laws of 1992 (26779). 10 Personal service (50000) ... 620,000 .................. (re. $288,000) 11 For contractual services related to medical necessity and quality of 12 care reviews related to medicaid patients and to monitor health care 13 services provided to persons with AIDS (26780). 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 9,200,000 .............. (re. $85,000) 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 50, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 17 The money hereby appropriated herein, together with any available 18 federal matching funds, is available for the services and expenses 19 related to the balancing incentive program. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 21 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange or transfer, with 22 any appropriation of the department of health, and may be increased 23 or decreased by transfer or suballocation between these appropriated 24 amounts and appropriations of state office for the aging with the 25 approval of the director of the budget (29541). 26 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 10,000,000 ............ (re. $159,000) 27 OFFICE OF HEALTH INSURANCE PROGRAM 28 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 29 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 30 Healthcare and Insurance Reform Account - 25148 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 32 For services and expenses of the department of health for planning and 33 implementing various healthcare and insurance reform initiatives 34 authorized by federal legislation, including, but not limited to, 35 the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (P.L. 111-148) and 36 the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (P.L. 37 111-152) in accordance with the following sub-schedule. Notwith- 38 standing any other provision of law, money hereby appropriated may 39 be increased or decreased by interchange, transfer, or suballocation 40 within a program, account or sub-schedule or with any appropriation 41 of any state agency or transferred to health research incorporated 42 or distributed to localities with the approval of the director of 43 the budget, who shall file such approval with the department of 44 audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate 45 finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means 46 committee. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to 47 local assistance appropriations. 48 Chronic Disease Incentive Program (29732) 478 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 2 Insurance Exchange (29724) 3 Personal service (50000) ... 6,800,000 .............. (re. $6,800,000) 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 56,200,000 ......... (re. $56,200,000) 5 Consumer Assistance -- Independent Health Insurance Consumer Assist- 6 ance Designee Community Service Society of New York (CSS) for Commu- 7 nity Health Advocates (CHA) statewide consortium (29729). 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,500,000 ........... (re. $2,500,000) 9 Other purposes pursuant to the Patient Protection and Affordable Care 10 Act (P.L. 111-148) and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation 11 Act of 2010 (P.L. 111-152), and other purposes related to federal 12 health care reform initiatives (29716). 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,000,000 ........... (re. $4,000,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 15 For services and expenses of the department of health for planning and 16 implementing various healthcare and insurance reform initiatives 17 authorized by federal legislation, including, but not limited to, 18 the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (P.L. 111-148) and 19 the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (P.L. 20 111-152) in accordance with the following sub-schedule. Notwith- 21 standing any other provision of law, money hereby appropriated may 22 be increased or decreased by interchange, transfer, or suballocation 23 within a program, account or sub-schedule or with any appropriation 24 of any state agency or transferred to health research incorporated 25 or distributed to localities with the approval of the director of 26 the budget, who shall file such approval with the department of 27 audit and control and copies thereof with the chairman of the senate 28 finance committee and the chairman of the assembly ways and means 29 committee. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to 30 local assistance appropriations. 31 Chronic Disease Incentive Program (29732) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,000,000 ........... (re. $5,000,000) 33 Insurance Exchange (29724) 34 Personal service (50000) ... 6,800,000 .............. (re. $6,800,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 56,200,000 ......... (re. $56,200,000) 36 Consumer Assistance -- Independent Health Insurance Consumer Assist- 37 ance Designee Community Service Society of New York (CSS) for Commu- 38 nity Health Advocates (CHA) statewide consortium (29729). 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,500,000 ........... (re. $2,500,000) 40 Other purposes pursuant to the Patient Protection and Affordable Care 41 Act (P.L. 111-148) and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation 42 Act of 2010 (P.L. 111-152), and other purposes related to federal 43 health care reform initiatives (29716). 44 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,000,000 ........... (re. $4,000,000) 45 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 46 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 47 Medical Assistance and Survey Account - 25107 48 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 479 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses for the medical assistance program and 2 administration of the medical assistance program and survey and 3 certification program, provided pursuant to title XIX and title 4 XVIII of the federal social security act. 5 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to the 6 approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated 7 may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation between 8 these appropriated amounts and appropriations of other state agen- 9 cies and appropriations of the department of health. Notwithstanding 10 any inconsistent provision of law and subject to approval of the 11 director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated may be trans- 12 ferred or suballocated to other state agencies for reimbursement to 13 local government entities for services and expenses related to 14 administration of the medical assistance program (26872). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 67,000,000 ............ (re. $66,976,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 409,141,000 ....... (re. $397,631,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 36,850,000 ............. (re. $36,835,000) 18 Indirect costs (58850) ... 16,000,000 .............. (re. $15,998,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 20 For services and expenses for the medical assistance program and 21 administration of the medical assistance program and survey and 22 certification program, provided pursuant to title XIX and title 23 XVIII of the federal social security act. 24 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law and subject to the 25 approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated 26 may be increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation between 27 these appropriated amounts and appropriations of other state agen- 28 cies and appropriations of the department of health. Notwithstanding 29 any inconsistent provision of law and subject to approval of the 30 director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated may be trans- 31 ferred or suballocated to other state agencies for reimbursement to 32 local government entities for services and expenses related to 33 administration of the medical assistance program (26872). 34 Personal service (50000) ... 67,000,000 ............ (re. $42,315,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 409,141,000 ........ (re. $96,646,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 36,850,000 ............. (re. $27,970,000) 37 Indirect costs (58850) ... 16,000,000 .............. (re. $13,523,000) 38 OFFICE OF PRIMARY CARE AND HEALTH SYSTEMS MANAGEMENT PROGRAM 39 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 40 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 41 National Health Services Corps Account - 25144 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 43 For administration of the national health services corps. Notwith- 44 standing any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the 45 approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated 46 may be suballocated to the higher education services corporation. 47 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 48 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 480 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 2 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 3 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 4 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (26876). 5 Personal service (50000) ... 193,000 .................. (re. $140,000) 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 63,000 ................. (re. $63,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 127,000 .................... (re. $95,000) 8 Indirect costs (58850) ... 53,000 ...................... (re. $48,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 10 For administration of the national health services corps. Notwith- 11 standing any inconsistent provision of law, and subject to the 12 approval of the director of the budget, moneys hereby appropriated 13 may be suballocated to the higher education services corporation. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 15 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 16 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 17 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 18 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 19 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (26876). 20 Personal service (50000) ... 193,000 .................. (re. $193,000) 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 63,000 ................. (re. $63,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 127,000 ................... (re. $127,000) 23 Indirect costs (58850) ... 53,000 ...................... (re. $53,000) 24 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 25 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 26 SAMHSA Account - 25170 27 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 28 For expenses incurred in the administration of the prescription drug 29 monitoring program relating to the prescribing and dispensing of 30 controlled substances. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 32 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 33 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 34 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 35 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 36 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (26876). 37 Personal service (50000) ... 240,000 .................. (re. $240,000) 38 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 128,000 ............... (re. $128,000) 39 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 132,000 ................... (re. $132,000) 40 Indirect costs (58850) ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $17,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 42 For expenses incurred in the administration of the prescription drug 43 monitoring program relating to the prescribing and dispensing of 44 controlled substances. 45 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 46 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 47 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 48 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 481 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 2 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (26876). 3 Personal service (50000) ... 240,000 .................. (re. $240,000) 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 128,000 ............... (re. $128,000) 5 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 132,000 ................... (re. $132,000) 6 Indirect costs (58850) ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $17,000) 7 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 8 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 9 Title XVIII Survey and Certification Account - 25121 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 11 For services and expenses for the survey and certification program, 12 provided pursuant to title XVIII of the federal social security act. 13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 14 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 15 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 16 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 17 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 18 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (26876). 19 Personal service (50000) ... 9,500,000 .............. (re. $9,500,000) 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 7,600,000 ........... (re. $6,492,000) 21 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,500,000 ............... (re. $5,500,000) 22 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,400,000 ................ (re. $2,400,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 24 For services and expenses for the survey and certification program, 25 provided pursuant to title XVIII of the federal social security act. 26 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 27 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 28 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 29 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 30 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 31 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (26876). 32 Personal service (50000) ... 9,500,000 .............. (re. $2,433,000) 33 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 7,600,000 ........... (re. $1,305,000) 34 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,500,000 ............... (re. $1,007,000) 35 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,400,000 ................ (re. $1,695,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 37 For services and expenses for the survey and certification program, 38 provided pursuant to title XVIII of the federal social security act. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 40 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 41 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 42 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 43 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (26876). 45 Personal service (50000) ... 9,500,000 .............. (re. $6,487,000) 46 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 7,600,000 ........... (re. $1,422,000) 47 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,500,000 ............... (re. $3,614,000) 48 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,400,000 ................ (re. $2,064,000) 482 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 2 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 3 United States Department of Justice Account - 25377 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For expenses incurred in the administration of the prescription drug 6 monitoring program relating to the prescribing and dispensing of 7 controlled substances (26876). 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 400,000 ............... (re. $400,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 10 For expenses incurred in the administration of the prescription drug 11 monitoring program relating to the prescribing and dispensing of 12 controlled substances (26876). 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 400,000 ............... (re. $400,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 15 For expenses incurred in the administration of the prescription drug 16 monitoring program relating to the prescribing and dispensing of 17 controlled substances (26876). 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 400,000 ............... (re. $400,000) 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other 20 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 21 Life Pass It On Trust Fund Account - 20174 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 23 For services and expenses related to organ donation and transplant 24 research and educational projects promoting organ and tissue 25 donation (26876). 26 Contractual services (51000) ... 618,000 ............... (re. 465,000) 27 WADSWORTH CENTER FOR LABORATORIES AND RESEARCH PROGRAM 28 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 29 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 30 Federal Block Grant Account - 25183 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 32 For health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment services 33 (26981). 34 Personal service (50000) ... 5,459,000 .............. (re. $5,313,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,912,000 ........... (re. $2,912,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,040,000 ............... (re. $2,947,000) 37 Indirect costs (58850) ... 382,000 .................... (re. $382,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 39 For health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment services 40 (26981). 41 Personal service (50000) ... 5,459,000 .............. (re. $3,331,000) 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,912,000 ........... (re. $2,912,000) 43 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,040,000 ............... (re. $1,688,000) 483 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Indirect costs (58850) ... 382,000 .................... (re. $382,000) 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 3 For health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment services 4 (26981). 5 Personal service (50000) ... 5,459,000 .............. (re. $3,567,000) 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,912,000 ........... (re. $2,912,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,040,000 ............... (re. $1,840,000) 8 Indirect costs (58850) ... 382,000 .................... (re. $382,000) 9 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 10 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 11 Federal Grant WCLR Account - 25170 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 13 For health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment services 14 (26982). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 675,000 .................. (re. $675,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 125,000 ............... (re. $125,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 390,000 ................... (re. $390,000) 18 Indirect costs (58850) ... 630,000 .................... (re. $630,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 20 For health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment services 21 (26982). 22 Personal service (50000) ... 675,000 ................... (re. $76,000) 23 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 125,000 ................ (re. $76,000) 24 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 390,000 .................... (re. $32,000) 25 Indirect costs (58850) ... 630,000 .................... (re. $572,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 27 For health prevention, diagnostic, detection and treatment services 28 (26982). 29 Personal service (50000) ... 675,000 .................. (re. $173,000) 30 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 125,000 ................ (re. $57,000) 31 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 390,000 .................... (re. $68,000) 32 Indirect costs (58850) ... 630,000 .................... (re. $577,000) 484 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH OFFICE OF THE MEDICAID INSPECTOR GENERAL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 22,608,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 36,561,000 35,711,000 5 ---------------- ---------------- 6 All Funds ........................ 59,169,000 35,711,000 7 ================ ================ 8 SCHEDULE 9 MEDICAID AUDIT AND FRAUD PREVENTION PROGRAM ................. 59,169,000 10 -------------- 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 medicaid audit and fraud prevention 15 program. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 17 the money hereby appropriated may be 18 increased or decreased by interchange, 19 with any appropriation of the office of 20 the medicaid inspector general, and may be 21 increased or decreased by transfer or 22 suballocation between these appropriated 23 amounts and appropriations of the depart- 24 ment of health, office of mental health, 25 office for people with developmental disa- 26 bilities and office of addiction services 27 and supports with the approval of the 28 director of the budget, who shall file 29 such approval with the department of audit 30 and control and copies thereof with the 31 chairman of the senate finance committee 32 and the chairman of the assembly ways and 33 means committee (36603). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 18,707,000 35 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 13,000 36 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 125,000 38 Travel (54000) ................................... 120,000 39 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,556,000 40 Equipment (56000) ................................. 77,000 41 -------------- 42 Program account subtotal .................. 22,608,000 43 -------------- 485 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH OFFICE OF THE MEDICAID INSPECTOR GENERAL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 2 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 3 Medicaid Fraud and Abuse Account - 25107 4 For services and expenses related to the 5 medicaid fraud and abuse program. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 7 the money hereby appropriated may be 8 increased or decreased by interchange, 9 with any appropriation of the office of 10 medicaid inspector general, and may be 11 increased or decreased by transfer or 12 suballocation between these appropriated 13 amounts and appropriations of the depart- 14 ment of health, office of mental health, 15 office for people with developmental disa- 16 bilities and office of addiction services 17 and supports with the approval of the 18 director of the budget, who shall file 19 such approval with the department of audit 20 and control and copies thereof with the 21 chairman of the senate finance committee 22 and the chairman of the assembly ways and 23 means committee (36603). 24 Personal service (50000) ...................... 18,730,000 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 4,405,000 26 Fringe benefits (60090) ....................... 12,069,000 27 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 1,357,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal .................. 36,561,000 30 -------------- 486 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH OFFICE OF THE MEDICAID INSPECTOR GENERAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 MEDICAID AUDIT AND FRAUD PREVENTION PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 4 Medicaid Fraud and Abuse Account - 25107 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to the medicaid fraud and abuse 7 program. 8 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 9 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, with any appro- 10 priation of the office of medicaid inspector general, and may be 11 increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation between these 12 appropriated amounts and appropriations of the department of health, 13 office of mental health, office for people with developmental disa- 14 bilities and office of addiction services and supports with the 15 approval of the director of the budget, who shall file such approval 16 with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the 17 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 18 assembly ways and means committee (36603). 19 Personal service (50000) ... 17,880,000 ............ (re. $17,880,000) 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,405,000 ........... (re. $4,405,000) 21 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 12,069,000 ............. (re. $12,069,000) 22 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,357,000 ................ (re. $1,357,000) 487 12550-10-5 HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 900,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 4,300,000 9,853,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 52,309,000 30,040,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 57,509,000 39,893,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 52,209,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 administration of the higher education 16 services corporation (81001). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 900,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ..................... 900,000 20 -------------- 21 Special Revenue Funds - Other 22 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 23 HESC-Insurance Premium Payments Account - 21960 24 For services and expenses related to the 25 administration program. 26 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 27 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 28 Transfer Authority and IT Interchange and 29 Transfer Authority as defined in the 30 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 31 appropriation for the budget division 32 program of the division of the budget, are 33 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 34 part of this appropriation as if fully 35 stated (81001). 36 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 11,100,000 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 523,000 38 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 39 Contractual services (51000) .................. 31,975,000 40 Equipment (56000) ................................. 20,000 488 12550-10-5 HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 7,354,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 327,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal .................. 51,309,000 5 -------------- 6 STUDENT GRANT AND AWARD PROGRAMS ............................. 5,300,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 9 Federal Department of Education Fund 10 HESC-Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for Under- 11 graduate Programs (GEAR UP) Account - 25219 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 gaining early awareness and readiness for 14 undergraduate program. Notwithstanding any 15 inconsistent provision of law, a portion 16 of these funds may be transferred or 17 suballocated, subject to the approval of 18 the director of the budget, to other state 19 agencies (30025). 20 Personal service--regular (50000) ................ 210,000 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 3,935,000 22 Fringe benefits(60090) ........................... 140,000 23 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 15,000 24 -------------- 25 Program account subtotal ................... 4,300,000 26 -------------- 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 29 Grants Account - 20199 30 For services and expenses in fulfillment of 31 donor bequests, grants, gifts, or other 32 contributions including but not limited to 33 those related to student financial aid 34 programs administered by the higher educa- 35 tion services corporation (30024) 36 Contractual Services (51000) ................... 1,000,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 39 -------------- 489 12550-10-5 HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Other 3 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 4 HESC-Insurance Premium Payments Account - 21960 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to the administration program. 7 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 8 Interchange and Transfer Authority and IT Interchange and Transfer 9 Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state oper- 10 ations appropriation for the budget division program of the division 11 of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a part of 12 this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 13 Contractual services (51000) ... 31,975,000 ........ (re. $30,040,000) 14 STUDENT GRANT AND AWARD PROGRAMS 15 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 16 Federal Department of Education Fund 17 HESC-Gaining Early Awareness and Readiness for Undergraduate Programs 18 (GEAR UP) Account - 25219 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 20 For services and expenses related to the gaining early awareness and 21 readiness for undergraduate program. Notwithstanding any inconsist- 22 ent provision of law, a portion of these funds may be transferred or 23 suballocated, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, 24 to other state agencies (30025). 25 Personal service--regular (50000) ... 210,000 ......... (re. $210,000) 26 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,935,000 ........... (re. $3,285,000) 27 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 140,000 ................... (re. $140,000) 28 Indirect costs (58850) ... 15,000 ...................... (re. $15,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 30 For services and expenses related to the gaining early awareness and 31 readiness for undergraduate program. Notwithstanding any inconsist- 32 ent provision of law, a portion of these funds may be transferred or 33 suballocated, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, 34 to other state agencies (30025). 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 8,600,000 ........... (re. $5,851,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 37 For services and expenses related to the gaining early awareness and 38 readiness for undergraduate program. Notwithstanding any inconsist- 39 ent provision of law, a portion of these funds may be transferred or 40 suballocated, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, 41 to other state agencies (30025). 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 225,000 ............... (re. $225,000) 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 490 12550-10-5 HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the gaining early awareness and 2 readiness for undergraduate program. Notwithstanding any inconsist- 3 ent provision of law, a portion of these funds may be transferred or 4 suballocated, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, 5 to other state agencies (30025). 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 225,000 ................ (re. $21,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 8 For services and expenses related to the gaining early awareness and 9 readiness for undergraduate program. Notwithstanding any inconsist- 10 ent provision of law, a portion of these funds may be transferred or 11 suballocated, subject to the approval of the director of the budget, 12 to other state agencies (30025). 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,400,000 ............. (re. $106,000) 491 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 27,960,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 73,411,000 9,147,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 63,904,000 215,497,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 165,275,000 224,644,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 34,028,000 11 -------------- 12 Special Revenue Funds - Other 13 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 14 Public Safety Communications Account - 22123 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 administration program. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 18 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 19 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 20 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 21 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 22 appropriation for the budget division 23 program of the division of the budget, are 24 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully 26 stated (81001). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 24,142,000 28 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 320,000 29 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 128,000 30 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 3,260,000 31 Travel (54000) ................................. 1,720,000 32 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,258,000 33 Equipment (56000) ................................ 200,000 34 -------------- 35 COUNTER TERRORISM PROGRAM ................................... 46,310,000 36 -------------- 37 General Fund 38 State Purposes Account - 10050 39 For services and expenses related to the 40 counter terrorism program (30326). 492 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,400,000 2 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 415,000 3 Travel (54000) ................................... 365,000 4 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,400,000 5 Equipment (56000) ................................ 730,000 6 -------------- 7 Total amount available ...................... 10,310,000 8 -------------- 9 For services and expenses related to the 10 creation and distribution of critical 11 media consumption teaching tools and 12 educators' toolkit for providing students 13 of various ages with the skills necessary 14 for critically consuming media. 15 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,000,000 16 -------------- 17 Program account subtotal .................. 11,310,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 20 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 21 Domestic Incident Preparedness Account - 25378 22 For services and expenses related to home- 23 land security grant programs to support 24 emergency preparedness and to combat 25 terrorism and weapons of mass destruction. 26 Funds appropriated herein may be trans- 27 ferred or suballocated to state agencies 28 in accordance with a plan developed by the 29 commissioner of homeland security and 30 emergency services and approved by the 31 director of the budget. 32 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, 33 funds appropriated herein that are trans- 34 ferred or interchanged shall lapse on the 35 same date as funds not transferred or 36 interchanged from this appropriation 37 (30326). 38 Personal service (50000) ....................... 9,000,000 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 20,000,000 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 6,000,000 41 -------------- 42 Program account subtotal .................. 35,000,000 43 -------------- 44 CYBER INCIDENT RESPONSE PROGRAM .............................. 6,600,000 45 -------------- 493 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 General Fund 2 State Purposes Account - 10050 3 For services and expenses related to cyber 4 incident response (30348). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,700,000 6 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 95,000 7 Travel (54000) ................................... 175,000 8 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,360,000 9 Equipment (56000) ................................ 270,000 10 -------------- 11 DISASTER ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ................................. 23,086,000 12 -------------- 13 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 14 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 15 Federal Grants for Disaster Assistance Account - 25325 16 For services and expenses related to the 17 disaster assistance program, including 18 suballocation to other state departments 19 and agencies (30315). 20 Personal service (50000) ...................... 10,000,000 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 7,586,000 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 5,500,000 23 -------------- 24 EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PROGRAM ................................ 37,287,000 25 -------------- 26 General Fund 27 State Purposes Account - 10050 28 For services and expenses related to the 29 emergency management program. 30 A portion of these funds may be suballocated 31 to the division of military and naval 32 affairs (30317). 33 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,000,000 34 -------------- 35 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 36 -------------- 37 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 38 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 39 Federal Grants for Emergency Management Performance 40 Account - 25516 494 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of state emergency 2 management activities, including suballo- 3 cation to other state departments and 4 agencies (30317). 5 Personal service (50000) ....................... 6,025,000 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,500,000 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 3,500,000 8 -------------- 9 Program account subtotal .................. 12,025,000 10 -------------- 11 Special Revenue Funds - Other 12 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 13 Public Safety Communications Account - 22123 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 emergency management program (30317). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 12,425,000 17 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 62,000 18 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 286,000 19 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 4,100,000 20 Travel (54000) ................................... 225,000 21 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,300,000 22 Equipment (56000) ................................ 825,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal .................. 20,223,000 25 -------------- 26 Special Revenue Funds - Other 27 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 28 Radiological Emergency Preparedness Account - 21944 29 For services and expenses related to the 30 emergency management program (30317). 31 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,704,000 32 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 10,000 33 Travel (54000) .................................... 43,000 34 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 292,000 35 Equipment (56000) ................................ 128,000 36 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 825,000 37 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 37,000 38 -------------- 39 Program account subtotal ................... 3,039,000 40 -------------- 41 Special Revenue Funds - Other 42 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 43 Securing the Cities Account - 22243 495 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 securing the cities program (30317). 3 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 250,000 4 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 250,000 5 Equipment (56000) ................................ 500,000 6 -------------- 7 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 8 -------------- 9 FIRE PREVENTION AND CONTROL PROGRAM ......................... 14,595,000 10 -------------- 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 For services and expenses of the office of 14 fire prevention and control (30318). 15 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 5,000,000 16 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 25,000 17 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 600,000 18 Travel (54000) ................................... 225,000 19 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 200,000 20 Equipment (56000) .............................. 3,000,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ................... 9,050,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 25 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 26 Fire Prevention and Control Account - 25382 27 For services and expenses of the office of 28 fire prevention and control, including 29 suballocation to other state departments 30 and agencies (30318). 31 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 3,300,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal ................... 3,300,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Other 36 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 37 Emergency Services Revolving Loan Account - 20150 38 For services and expenses related to the 39 fire prevention and control program 40 (30318). 41 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 159,000 496 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 21,000 2 Travel (54000) ..................................... 8,000 3 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 42,000 4 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 71,000 5 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 6,000 6 -------------- 7 Program account subtotal ..................... 307,000 8 -------------- 9 Special Revenue Funds - Other 10 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 11 Cigarette Fire Safety Act Account - 22018 12 For services and expenses of the cigarette 13 fire safety program, including suballo- 14 cation to other state departments or agen- 15 cies (30318). 16 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 20,000 17 Travel (54000) .................................... 20,000 18 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 171,000 19 Equipment (56000) ................................. 20,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal ..................... 231,000 22 -------------- 23 Special Revenue Funds - Other 24 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund Fireworks Revenue 25 Account - 22214 26 For services and expenses related to the 27 fire prevention and control program 28 (30318). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 315,000 30 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 177,000 31 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 8,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Other 36 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 37 New York Fire Academy Account - 21953 38 For services and expenses related to the 39 fire prevention and control program 40 (30318). 41 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 290,000 42 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 87,000 43 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 497 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 132,000 2 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 392,000 3 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 296,000 4 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 9,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ................... 1,207,000 7 -------------- 8 INTEROPERABLE COMMUNICATIONS PROGRAM ......................... 3,369,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 12 Public Safety Communications Account - 22123 13 For services and expenses related to public 14 safety communications (30330). 15 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,169,000 16 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 100,000 17 Travel (54000) ................................... 100,000 18 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 500,000 19 Equipment (56000) ................................ 500,000 20 -------------- 498 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 COUNTER TERRORISM PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 4 Domestic Incident Preparedness Account - 25378 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to the homeland security grant 7 programs to support emergency preparedness and to combat terrorism 8 and weapons of mass destruction. Funds appropriated herein may be 9 transferred or suballocated to state agencies in accordance with a 10 plan developed by the commissioner of homeland security and emergen- 11 cy services and approved by the director of the budget. 12 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, funds appropriated herein 13 that are transferred or interchanged shall lapse on the same date as 14 funds not transferred or interchanged from this appropriation 15 (30326). 16 Personal service (50000) ... 9,000,000 .............. (re. $9,000,000) 17 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 20,000,000 ......... (re. $20,000,000) 18 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,000,000 . ............. (re. $6,000,000) 19 DISASTER ASSISTANCE PROGRAM 20 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 21 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 22 Federal Grants for Disaster Assistance Account - 25325 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 24 For services and expenses related to the disaster assistance program 25 (30315). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 10,000,000 ............. (re. $7,163,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 7,586,000 ........... (re. $7,466,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,500,000 ............... (re. $4,348,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 30 For services and expenses related to the disaster assistance program 31 (30315). 32 Personal service (50000) ... 10,000,000 ............. (re. $2,436,000) 33 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 7,586,000 ........... (re. $6,521,000) 34 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,500,000 ............... (re. $2,466,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 36 For services and expenses related to the disaster assistance program 37 (30315). 38 Personal service (50000) ... 10,000,000 ............... (re. $968,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 7,586,000 ........... (re. $7,427,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,500,000 ............... (re. $2,155,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 42 For services and expenses related to the disaster assistance program 43 (30315). 44 Personal service (50000) ... 10,000,000 ................. (re. $1,000) 499 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 7,586,000 ........... (re. $6,590,000) 2 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,500,000 ............... (re. $1,198,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 4 For services and expenses related to the disaster assistance program 5 (30315). 6 Personal service (50000) ... 10,000,000 ............. (re. $3,363,000) 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 7,586,000 ........... (re. $7,453,000) 8 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,500,000 ............... (re. $2,622,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 10 For services and expenses related to the disaster assistance program 11 (30315). 12 Personal service (50000) ... 14,000,000 ............. (re. $6,257,000) 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,586,000 ........... (re. $1,088,000) 14 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 7,500,000 ............... (re. $5,151,000) 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 50, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 17 For services and expenses related to the disaster assistance program 18 (30315). 19 Personal service (50000) ... 14,000,000 ............. (re. $8,642,000) 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,586,000 ........... (re. $1,300,000) 21 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 7,500,000 ............... (re. $3,623,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 50, 23 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 24 For services and expenses related to the disaster assistance program 25 (30315). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 14,000,000 ............ (re. $10,599,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,586,000 ............. (re. $923,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 7,500,000 ............... (re. $4,502,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 50, 30 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 31 For services and expenses related to the disaster assistance program 32 (30315). 33 Personal service (50000) ... 14,000,000 ............ (re. $14,000,000) 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,586,000 ........... (re. $1,584,000) 35 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 7,500,000 ............... (re. $7,500,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 50, 37 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 38 For services and expenses related to the disaster assistance program 39 (30315). 40 Personal service (50000) ... 14,000,000 ............. (re. $2,869,000) 41 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,586,000 .............. (re. $24,000) 42 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 7,500,000 ............... (re. $1,889,000) 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 50, 44 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 500 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the disaster assistance program 2 (30315). 3 Personal service (50000) ... 2,200,000 ................ (re. $564,000) 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,586,000 ............. (re. $502,000) 5 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,000,000 .................. (re. $72,000) 6 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 50, 7 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 8 For services and expenses related to the disaster assistance program 9 (30315). 10 Personal service (50000) ... 2,200,000 ................ (re. $553,000) 11 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,586,000 .............. (re. $86,000) 12 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,000,000 ................. (re. $438,000) 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 50, 14 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 15 For services and expenses related to the disaster assistance program. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 17 Interchange and Transfer Authority, the IT Interchange and Transfer 18 Authority, and the Call Center Interchange and Transfer Authority as 19 defined in the 2012-13 state fiscal year state operations appropri- 20 ation for the budget division program of the division of the budget, 21 are deemed fully incorporated herein and a part of this appropri- 22 ation as if fully stated (30315). 23 Personal service (50000) ... 2,200,000 ................ (re. $295,000) 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,586,000 .............. (re. $31,000) 25 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,000,000 ................. (re. $518,000) 26 EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT PROGRAM 27 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 28 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 29 Federal Grants for Emergency Management Performance Account - 25516 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 31 For services and expenses of state emergency management activities, 32 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 33 (30317). 34 Personal service (50000) ... 6,025,000 .............. (re. $6,025,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,500,000 ........... (re. $2,500,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,500,000 ............... (re. $3,500,000) 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 38 For services and expenses of state emergency management activities, 39 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 40 (30317). 41 Personal service (50000) ... 5,025,000 .............. (re. $5,025,000) 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $993,000) 43 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,000,000 ............... (re. $3,000,000) 44 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 501 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of state emergency management activities, 2 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 3 (30317). 4 Personal service (50000) ... 5,025,000 ................ (re. $961,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $881,000) 6 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,000,000 ............... (re. $1,134,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 8 For services and expenses of state emergency management activities, 9 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 10 (30317). 11 Personal service (50000) ... 5,025,000 ................. (re. $71,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $172,000) 13 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,000,000 ................. (re. $895,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 15 For services and expenses of state emergency management activities, 16 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 17 (30317). 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $253,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 20 For services and expenses of state emergency management activities, 21 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 22 (30317). 23 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $452,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 25 For services and expenses of state emergency management activities, 26 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 27 (30317). 28 Personal service (50000) ... 5,025,000 .................. (re. $8,000) 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $3,000) 30 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,000,000 ................... (re. $1,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 32 For services and expenses of state emergency management activities, 33 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 34 (30317). 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $311,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 37 For services and expenses of state emergency management activities, 38 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 39 (30317). 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,000,000 ............... (re. $7,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 42 For services and expenses of state emergency management activities, 43 including suballocation to other state departments and agencies 44 (30317). 45 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,950,000 ........... (re. $1,131,000) 502 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 FIRE PREVENTION AND CONTROL PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 4 Fire Prevention and Control Account - 25382 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses of the office of fire prevention and 7 control, including suballocation to other state departments and 8 agencies (30318). 9 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,300,000 ........... (re. $3,300,000) 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 11 For services and expenses of the office of fire prevention and 12 control, including suballocation to other state departments and 13 agencies (30318). 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,300,000 ........... (re. $3,300,000) 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 16 For services and expenses of the office of fire prevention and 17 control, including suballocation to other state departments and 18 agencies (30318). 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,300,000 ........... (re. $3,300,000) 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 21 For services and expenses of the office of fire prevention and 22 control, including suballocation to other state departments and 23 agencies (30318). 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,300,000 ........... (re. $2,800,000) 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 26 For services and expenses of the office of fire prevention and 27 control, including suballocation to other state departments and 28 agencies (30318). 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,300,000 ........... (re. $2,370,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 31 For services and expenses of the office of fire prevention and 32 control, including suballocation to other state departments and 33 agencies (30318). 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,300,000 ........... (re. $2,917,000) 35 INTEROPERABLE COMMUNICATIONS PROGRAM 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 38 Statewide Public Safety Communications Account - 22123 39 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 40 For services and expenses related to the purchase of emergency commu- 41 nications equipment for state departments or agencies. The amounts 42 appropriated herein may be transferred to any other state department 503 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 or agency pursuant to a plan submitted by the division of homeland 2 security and emergency services and approved by the director of the 3 budget (30309). 4 Equipment (56000) ... 30,000,000 .................... (re. $9,147,000) 504 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 18,882,000 7,714,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 16,308,000 89,837,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 116,282,000 242,777,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 151,472,000 340,328,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 F&D-COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM .......................... 12,341,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 F&D-community development program (31449). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,698,000 17 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 18 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 10,000 19 Travel (54000) .................................... 25,000 20 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 10,000 21 Equipment (56000) ................................. 10,000 22 -------------- 23 Program account subtotal ................... 2,763,000 24 -------------- 25 Special Revenue Funds - Other 26 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 27 DHCR-HCA Application Fee Account - 22100 28 For services and expenses related to the 29 administration of the federal low-income 30 housing tax credit program (31449). 31 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,664,000 32 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 33 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 10,000 34 Travel (54000) ................................... 100,000 35 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 875,000 36 Equipment (56000) ................................ 100,000 37 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 3,281,000 38 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 538,000 39 -------------- 40 Program account subtotal ................... 9,578,000 41 -------------- 505 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 HOMEOWNER STABILIZATION FUND ................................... 120,000 2 -------------- 3 General Fund 4 State Purposes Account - 10050 5 For services and expenses of a homeowner 6 stabilization fund. Funds appropriated 7 herein may be suballocated or transferred 8 to any state department, agency, or public 9 authority for the purposes stated herein 10 (31528). 11 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 100,000 12 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 13 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 5,000 14 Travel (54000) ..................................... 7,000 15 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 5,000 16 Equipment (56000) .................................. 2,000 17 -------------- 18 LEAD ABATEMENT ................................................. 268,000 19 -------------- 20 General Fund 21 State Purposes Account - 10050 22 For services and expenses related to the 23 division of housing and community 24 renewal's lead abatement program. Funds 25 appropriated herein may be suballocated or 26 transferred to any state department, agen- 27 cy, or public authority for the purposes 28 stated herein (31534). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 200,000 30 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 31 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 10,000 32 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 33 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 37,000 34 Equipment (56000) ................................. 10,000 35 -------------- 36 OFFICE OF RESILIENT HOMES AND COMMUNITIES ...................... 744,000 37 -------------- 38 General Fund 39 State Purposes Account - 10050 40 For services and expenses related to the 41 office of resilient homes and communities. 42 Funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 506 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 cated or transferred to any state depart- 2 ment, agency, or public authority for the 3 purposes stated herein (31536). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 694,000 5 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 6 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 7 Travel (54000) ..................................... 1,000 8 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 46,000 9 Equipment (56000) .................................. 1,000 10 -------------- 11 OCR-COMMUNITY RENEWAL PROGRAM ................................. 927,000 12 -------------- 13 General Fund 14 State Purposes Account - 10050 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 OCR-community renewal program (31367). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 915,000 18 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 4,000 19 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 20 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 21 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 1,000 22 Equipment (56000) .................................. 1,000 23 -------------- 24 OHP-HOUSING PROGRAM ......................................... 23,570,000 25 -------------- 26 General Fund 27 State Purposes Account - 10050 28 For services and expenses related to the 29 OHP-housing program (31448). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 855,000 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 4,000 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 33 Travel (54000) ..................................... 2,000 34 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 1,000 35 Equipment (56000) .................................. 1,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ..................... 864,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 40 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 41 Housing and Urban Development Section 8 Account - 25315 507 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For expenditures related to administering 2 federal section 8 program grants (31448). 3 Personal service (50000) ....................... 5,576,000 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,018,000 5 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 3,520,000 6 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 470,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal .................. 11,584,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 12 DHCR Mortgage Servicing Account - 22085 13 For services and expenses related to asset 14 management activities performed by the 15 division of housing and community renewal 16 for the New York state housing finance 17 agency and the urban development corpo- 18 ration. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 20 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 21 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 22 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 23 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 24 appropriation for the budget division 25 program of the division of the budget, are 26 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 27 part of this appropriation as if fully 28 stated (31448). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,756,000 30 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 31 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 23,000 32 Travel (54000) ................................... 100,000 33 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 650,000 34 Equipment (56000) ................................ 124,000 35 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 600,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ................... 5,263,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Other 40 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 41 Low Income Housing Monitoring Account - 22130 42 For services and expenses related to the 43 monitoring of housing projects constructed 44 under low-income housing tax credit 45 programs (31448). 508 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,902,000 2 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 50,000 3 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 5,000 4 Travel (54000) ................................... 195,000 5 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 450,000 6 Equipment (56000) ................................. 75,000 7 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,035,000 8 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 147,000 9 -------------- 10 Program account subtotal ................... 5,859,000 11 -------------- 12 OHP-LOW INCOME WEATHERIZATION PROGRAM ........................ 4,724,000 13 -------------- 14 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 15 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 16 Department of Energy Weatherization Account - 25499 17 For services and expenses related to admin- 18 istering low income weatherization grants. 19 Funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 20 cated or transferred to any state depart- 21 ment, agency, or public authority for the 22 purposes stated herein (31446). 23 Personal service (50000) ....................... 1,543,000 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,378,000 25 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,589,000 26 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 214,000 27 -------------- 28 OHP-RENT ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ............................. 92,543,000 29 -------------- 30 General Fund 31 State Purposes Account - 10050 32 For services and expenses related to the 33 OHP-rent administration program (31442). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,784,000 35 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 3,000 36 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 37 Travel (54000) .................................... 35,000 38 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 1,000 39 Equipment (56000) .................................. 1,000 40 -------------- 41 Total amount available ....................... 1,825,000 42 -------------- 509 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 division of housing and community 3 renewal's administration of the tenant 4 protection unit(30918). Funds appropriated 5 herein may be suballocated or transferred 6 to any state department, agency, or public 7 authority for the purposes stated herein 8 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 300,000 9 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 10 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 5,000 11 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 12 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 85,000 13 Equipment (56000) .................................. 1,000 14 -------------- 15 Total amount available ......................... 402,000 16 -------------- 17 Program account subtotal ................... 2,227,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other 20 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 21 Rent Revenue Account - 22158 22 For services and expenses related to the 23 division of housing and community 24 renewal's administration and enforcement 25 of New York state's system of rent regu- 26 lation (31442). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 864,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 29 Travel (54000) .................................... 40,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 125,000 31 Equipment (56000) .................................. 1,000 32 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 569,000 33 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 24,000 34 -------------- 35 Program account subtotal ................... 1,624,000 36 -------------- 37 Special Revenue Funds - Other 38 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 39 Rent Revenue Other Account - 22156 40 For services and expenses related to the 41 division of housing and community 42 renewal's administration and enforcement 43 of New York state's system of rent regu- 44 lation. 45 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 46 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 510 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 2 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 3 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 4 appropriation for the budget division 5 program of the division of the budget, are 6 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 7 part of this appropriation as if fully 8 stated (31442). 9 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 30,451,000 10 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 37,000 11 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,305,000 12 Travel (54000) ................................... 238,000 13 Contractual services (51000) .................. 25,053,000 14 Equipment (56000) ................................ 637,000 15 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 23,538,000 16 Indirect costs (58800) ......................... 1,756,000 17 -------------- 18 Total amount available ...................... 83,015,000 19 -------------- 20 For services and expenses related to the 21 division of housing and community 22 renewal's administration of the tenant 23 protection unit (30918). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,713,000 25 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 26 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 60,000 27 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 28 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 979,000 29 Equipment (56000) ................................. 10,000 30 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,820,000 31 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 84,000 32 -------------- 33 Total amount available ....................... 5,677,000 34 -------------- 35 Program account subtotal .................. 88,692,000 36 -------------- 37 OPS-ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM .................................. 16,235,000 38 -------------- 39 General Fund 40 State Purposes Account - 10050 41 For services and expenses related to the 42 OPS-administration program. 43 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 44 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 45 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 46 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 511 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 2 appropriation for the budget division 3 program of the division of the budget, are 4 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 5 part of this appropriation as if fully 6 stated (81001). 7 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,082,000 8 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 15,000 9 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 317,000 10 Travel (54000) ................................... 160,000 11 Contractual services (51000) ................... 6,128,000 12 Equipment (56000) ................................ 267,000 13 -------------- 14 Program account subtotal .................. 10,969,000 15 -------------- 16 Special Revenue Funds - Other 17 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 18 Housing Indirect Cost Recovery Account - 22090 19 For services and expenses related to the 20 administration of special revenue funds - 21 other and special revenue funds - federal. 22 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 23 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 24 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 25 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 26 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 27 appropriation for the budget division 28 program of the division of the budget, are 29 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 30 part of this appropriation as if fully 31 stated (81001). 32 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,238,000 33 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 20,000 34 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 45,000 35 Travel (54000) .................................... 75,000 36 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,828,000 37 Equipment (56000) ................................. 60,000 38 -------------- 39 Program account subtotal ................... 5,266,000 40 -------------- 512 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 F&D-COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Other 3 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 4 DHCR-HCA Application Fee Account - 22100 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to the administration of the federal 7 low-income housing tax credit program (31449). 8 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,240,000 ..... (re. $2,454,000) 9 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ....... (re. $10,000) 10 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 10,000 .............. (re. $10,000) 11 Travel (54000) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000) 12 Contractual services (51000) ... 563,000 .............. (re. $560,000) 13 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 ......................... (re. $100,000) 14 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,843,000 ............... (re. $1,691,000) 15 Indirect costs (58800) ... 538,000 .................... (re. $491,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 17 For services and expenses related to the administration of the federal 18 low-income housing tax credit program (31449). 19 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,240,000 ..... (re. $1,011,000) 20 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ........ (re. $9,000) 21 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 10,000 .............. (re. $10,000) 22 Travel (54000) ... 100,000 ............................. (re. $97,000) 23 Contractual services (51000) ... 563,000 .............. (re. $562,000) 24 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 ......................... (re. $100,000) 25 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,843,000 ................. (re. $690,000) 26 Indirect costs (58800) ... 538,000 .................... (re. $450,000) 27 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 28 For services and expenses related to the administration of the federal 29 low-income housing tax credit program (31449). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,240,000 ..... (re. $2,228,000) 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ....... (re. $10,000) 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 10,000 .............. (re. $10,000) 33 Travel (54000) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000) 34 Contractual services (51000) ... 563,000 .............. (re. $563,000) 35 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 ......................... (re. $100,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,716,000 ............... (re. $1,465,000) 37 Indirect costs (58800) ... 538,000 .................... (re. $475,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 39 For services and expenses related to the administration of the federal 40 low-income housing tax credit program (31449). 41 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,240,000 ..... (re. $1,915,000) 42 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ........ (re. $9,000) 43 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 10,000 .............. (re. $10,000) 44 Travel (54000) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000) 45 Contractual services (51000) ... 563,000 .............. (re. $441,000) 46 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 ......................... (re. $100,000) 47 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,716,000 ............... (re. $1,086,000) 513 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Indirect costs (58800) ... 538,000 .................... (re. $468,000) 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 3 For services and expenses related to the administration of the federal 4 low-income housing tax credit program (31449). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,240,000 ..... (re. $1,241,000) 6 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ........ (re. $8,000) 7 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 10,000 .............. (re. $10,000) 8 Travel (54000) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000) 9 Contractual services (51000) ... 563,000 .............. (re. $439,000) 10 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 ......................... (re. $100,000) 11 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,716,000 ................. (re. $857,000) 12 Indirect costs (58800) ... 538,000 .................... (re. $454,000) 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 14 For services and expenses related to the administration of the federal 15 low-income housing tax credit program (31449). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,240,000 ..... (re. $1,411,000) 17 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ........ (re. $8,000) 18 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 10,000 ............... (re. $8,000) 19 Travel (54000) ... 100,000 ............................. (re. $18,000) 20 Contractual services (51000) ... 563,000 .............. (re. $225,000) 21 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 .......................... (re. $83,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,716,000 ............... (re. $2,350,000) 23 Indirect costs (58800) ... 538,000 .................... (re. $533,000) 24 OHP-HOUSING PROGRAM 25 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 26 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 27 Housing and Urban Development Section 8 Account - 25315 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 29 For expenditures related to administering federal section 8 program 30 grants (31448). 31 Personal service (50000) ... 5,576,000 .............. (re. $3,996,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,018,000 ........... (re. $1,259,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,520,000 ............... (re. $2,547,000) 34 Indirect costs (58850) ... 470,000 .................... (re. $376,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 36 For expenditures related to administering federal section 8 program 37 grants (31448). 38 Personal service (50000) ... 5,576,000 .............. (re. $1,568,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,018,000 ............. (re. $813,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,520,000 ................. (re. $960,000) 41 Indirect costs (58850) ... 470,000 .................... (re. $279,000) 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 43 For expenditures related to administering federal section 8 program 44 grants (31448). 45 Personal service (50000) ... 5,576,000 .............. (re. $1,079,000) 514 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,018,000 ........... (re. $1,791,000) 2 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,520,000 ............... (re. $1,290,000) 3 Indirect costs (58850) ... 470,000 .................... (re. $169,000) 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 5 For expenditures related to administering federal section 8 program 6 grants (31448). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 5,576,000 .............. (re. $2,845,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,018,000 ............. (re. $778,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,520,000 ............... (re. $1,851,000) 10 Indirect costs (58850) ... 470,000 .................... (re. $250,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 12 For expenditures related to administering federal section 8 program 13 grants (31448). 14 Personal service (50000) ... 5,576,000 .............. (re. $2,000,000) 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,018,000 ............. (re. $364,000) 16 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,520,000 ............... (re. $1,441,000) 17 Indirect costs (58850) ... 470,000 .................... (re. $131,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 19 For expenditures related to administering federal section 8 program 20 grants (31448). 21 Personal service (50000) ... 5,576,000 .............. (re. $2,164,000) 22 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,018,000 ............. (re. $853,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,520,000 ............... (re. $1,461,000) 24 Indirect costs (58850) ... 470,000 .................... (re. $194,000) 25 Special Revenue Funds - Other 26 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 27 DHCR Mortgage Servicing Account - 22085 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 29 For services and expenses related to asset management activities 30 performed by the division of housing and community renewal for the 31 New York state housing finance agency and the urban development 32 corporation. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 34 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 35 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 36 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 37 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 38 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (31448). 39 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 3,415,000 ..... (re. $2,259,000) 40 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ....... (re. $10,000) 41 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 23,000 .............. (re. $23,000) 42 Travel (54000) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000) 43 Contractual services (51000) ... 346,000 .............. (re. $346,000) 44 Equipment (56000) ... 124,000 ......................... (re. $124,000) 45 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 600,000 ................... (re. $600,000) 46 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 515 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to asset management activities 2 performed by the division of housing and community renewal for the 3 New York state housing finance agency and the urban development 4 corporation. 5 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 6 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 7 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 8 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 9 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 10 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (31448). 11 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 3,415,000 ..... (re. $1,711,000) 12 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ....... (re. $10,000) 13 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 23,000 .............. (re. $23,000) 14 Travel (54000) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000) 15 Contractual services (51000) ... 346,000 .............. (re. $298,000) 16 Equipment (56000) ... 124,000 ......................... (re. $124,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 600,000 ................... (re. $600,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 19 For services and expenses related to asset management activities 20 performed by the division of housing and community renewal for the 21 New York state housing finance agency and the urban development 22 corporation. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 24 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 25 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 26 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 27 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (31448). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 3,415,000 ..... (re. $2,224,000) 30 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ....... (re. $10,000) 31 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 23,000 .............. (re. $22,000) 32 Travel (54000) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000) 33 Contractual services (51000) ... 346,000 .............. (re. $128,000) 34 Equipment (56000) ... 124,000 ......................... (re. $124,000) 35 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 600,000 ................... (re. $600,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 37 For services and expenses related to asset management activities 38 performed by the division of housing and community renewal for the 39 New York state housing finance agency and the urban development 40 corporation. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 42 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 43 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 44 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 45 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 46 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (31448). 47 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 3,415,000 ..... (re. $1,729,000) 48 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ........ (re. $9,000) 49 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 23,000 .............. (re. $22,000) 50 Travel (54000) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000) 516 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ... 346,000 .............. (re. $327,000) 2 Equipment (56000) ... 124,000 ......................... (re. $124,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 600,000 ................... (re. $600,000) 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 5 For services and expenses related to asset management activities 6 performed by the division of housing and community renewal for the 7 New York state housing finance agency and the urban development 8 corporation. 9 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 10 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 11 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 12 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 13 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 14 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (31448). 15 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 3,415,000 ..... (re. $1,539,000) 16 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ........ (re. $4,000) 17 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 23,000 .............. (re. $23,000) 18 Travel (54000) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000) 19 Contractual services (51000) ... 346,000 .............. (re. $239,000) 20 Equipment (56000) ... 124,000 ......................... (re. $124,000) 21 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 600,000 ................... (re. $600,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 23 For services and expenses related to asset management activities 24 performed by the division of housing and community renewal for the 25 New York state housing finance agency and the urban development 26 corporation. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 28 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 29 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2019-20 state fiscal year state 30 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 31 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 32 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (31448). 33 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 3,415,000 ..... (re. $1,209,000) 34 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ........ (re. $6,000) 35 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 23,000 .............. (re. $22,000) 36 Travel (54000) ... 100,000 ............................. (re. $77,000) 37 Contractual services (51000) ... 346,000 .............. (re. $263,000) 38 Equipment (56000) ... 124,000 ......................... (re. $124,000) 39 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 600,000 ................... (re. $600,000) 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other 41 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 42 Low Income Housing Monitoring Account - 22130 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 44 For services and expenses related to the monitoring of housing 45 projects constructed under low-income housing tax credit programs 46 (31448). 47 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,580,000 ..... (re. $1,499,000) 48 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 50,000 ....... (re. $50,000) 517 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 5,000 ................ (re. $5,000) 2 Travel (54000) ... 195,000 ............................ (re. $195,000) 3 Contractual services (51000) ... 215,000 .............. (re. $214,000) 4 Equipment (56000) ... 75,000 ........................... (re. $75,000) 5 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,730,000 ............... (re. $1,037,000) 6 Indirect costs (58800) ... 84,000 ...................... (re. $55,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 8 For services and expenses related to the monitoring of housing 9 projects constructed under low-income housing tax credit programs 10 (31448). 11 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,580,000 ....... (re. $774,000) 12 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 50,000 ....... (re. $50,000) 13 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 5,000 ................ (re. $5,000) 14 Travel (54000) ... 195,000 ............................ (re. $195,000) 15 Contractual services (51000) ... 215,000 .............. (re. $215,000) 16 Equipment (56000) ... 75,000 ........................... (re. $75,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,730,000 ................. (re. $528,000) 18 Indirect costs (58800) ... 84,000 ...................... (re. $35,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 20 For services and expenses related to the monitoring of housing 21 projects constructed under low-income housing tax credit programs 22 (31448). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,580,000 ..... (re. $1,849,000) 24 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 50,000 ....... (re. $50,000) 25 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 5,000 ................ (re. $5,000) 26 Travel (54000) ... 195,000 ............................ (re. $195,000) 27 Contractual services (51000) ... 215,000 .............. (re. $215,000) 28 Equipment (56000) ... 75,000 ........................... (re. $75,000) 29 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,681,000 ............... (re. $1,245,000) 30 Indirect costs (58800) ... 84,000 ...................... (re. $48,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 32 For services and expenses related to the monitoring of housing 33 projects constructed under low-income housing tax credit programs 34 (31448). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,580,000 ....... (re. $788,000) 36 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 50,000 ....... (re. $50,000) 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 5,000 ................ (re. $5,000) 38 Travel (54000) ... 195,000 ............................ (re. $195,000) 39 Contractual services (51000) ... 215,000 ............... (re. $76,000) 40 Equipment (56000) ... 75,000 ........................... (re. $75,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,681,000 ................. (re. $568,000) 42 Indirect costs (58800) ... 84,000 ...................... (re. $34,000) 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 44 For services and expenses related to the monitoring of housing 45 projects constructed under low-income housing tax credit programs 46 (31448). 47 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,580,000 ....... (re. $349,000) 48 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 50,000 ....... (re. $49,000) 518 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 5,000 ................ (re. $5,000) 2 Travel (54000) ... 195,000 ............................ (re. $195,000) 3 Contractual services (51000) ... 215,000 .............. (re. $120,000) 4 Equipment (56000) ... 75,000 ........................... (re. $75,000) 5 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,681,000 ................. (re. $303,000) 6 Indirect costs (58800) ... 84,000 ...................... (re. $22,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 8 For services and expenses related to the monitoring of housing 9 projects constructed under low-income housing tax credit programs 10 (31448). 11 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,580,000 ....... (re. $774,000) 12 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 50,000 ....... (re. $50,000) 13 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 5,000 ................ (re. $5,000) 14 Travel (54000) ... 195,000 ............................ (re. $151,000) 15 Contractual services (51000) ... 215,000 .............. (re. $124,000) 16 Equipment (56000) ... 75,000 ........................... (re. $74,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,681,000 ............... (re. $1,440,000) 18 Indirect costs (58800) ... 84,000 ...................... (re. $68,000) 19 OHP-LOW INCOME WEATHERIZATION PROGRAM 20 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 21 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 22 Department of Energy Weatherization Account - 25499 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 24 For services and expenses related to administering low income weather- 25 ization grants. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or 26 transferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for 27 the purposes stated herein (31446). 28 Personal service (50000) ... 1,543,000 .............. (re. $1,290,000) 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,378,000 ........... (re. $1,373,000) 30 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,589,000 ............... (re. $1,455,000) 31 Indirect costs (58850) ... 214,000 .................... (re. $200,000) 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 33 For services and expenses related to administering low income weather- 34 ization grants. Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or 35 transferred to any state department, agency, or public authority for 36 the purposes stated herein (31446). 37 Personal service (50000) ... 11,543,000 ............ (re. $10,351,000) 38 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 23,878,000 ......... (re. $23,238,000) 39 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 8,089,000 ............... (re. $7,332,000) 40 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,214,000 ................ (re. $1,139,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 42 For services and expenses related to administering low income weather- 43 ization grants (31446). 44 Personal service (50000) ... 1,543,000 ................ (re. $634,000) 45 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,378,000 ........... (re. $1,059,000) 46 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,589,000 ................. (re. $944,000) 519 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Indirect costs (58850) ... 214,000 .................... (re. $152,000) 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 3 For services and expenses related to administering low income weather- 4 ization grants (31446). 5 Personal service (50000) ... 2,543,000 .............. (re. $1,781,000) 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 378,000 ............... (re. $340,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,589,000 ............... (re. $1,163,000) 8 Indirect costs (58850) ... 214,000 .................... (re. $159,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 50, 10 section 1, of the laws of 2022: 11 For services and expenses related to administering low income weather- 12 ization grants (31446). 13 Personal service (50000) ... 1,543,000 ................ (re. $958,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,378,000 ............. (re. $894,000) 15 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,589,000 ............... (re. $1,254,000) 16 Indirect costs (58850) ... 214,000 .................... (re. $156,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 18 For services and expenses related to administering low income weather- 19 ization grants (31446). 20 Personal service (50000) ... 2,543,000 .............. (re. $1,881,000) 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 378,000 ............... (re. $258,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,589,000 ............... (re. $1,203,000) 23 Indirect costs (58850) ... 214,000 .................... (re. $164,000) 24 OHP-RENT ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 25 Special Revenue Funds - Other 26 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 27 Rent Revenue Account - 22158 28 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as 29 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 51 of the 30 state finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 31 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 32 community renewal's administration and enforcement of New York 33 state's system of rent regulation (31442). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 533,000 ......... (re. $243,000) 35 Travel (54000) ... [15,000] 10,000 ..................... (re. $10,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 358,000 ................... (re. $167,000) 37 Indirect costs (58800) ... 18,000 ...................... (re. $10,000) 38 Contractual Services (51000) ... 3,000 .................. (re. $3,000) 39 Supplies and Materials (57000) ... 2,000 ................ (re. $2,000) 40 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 41 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 42 community renewal's administration and enforcement of New York 43 state's system of rent regulation (31442). 44 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 533,000 ......... (re. $260,000) 45 Travel (54000) ... 15,000 .............................. (re. $12,000) 520 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 358,000 ................... (re. $175,000) 2 Indirect costs (58800) ... 18,000 ...................... (re. $11,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 4 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 5 community renewal's administration and enforcement of New York 6 state's system of rent regulation (31442). 7 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 533,000 ......... (re. $400,000) 8 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 341,000 ................... (re. $256,000) 9 Indirect costs (58800) ... 18,000 ...................... (re. $14,000) 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 11 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 12 community renewal's administration and enforcement of New York 13 state's system of rent regulation (31442). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 533,000 ......... (re. $273,000) 15 Travel (54000) ... 10,000 .............................. (re. $10,000) 16 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 341,000 ................... (re. $178,000) 17 Indirect costs (58800) ... 18,000 ...................... (re. $11,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 19 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 20 community renewal's administration and enforcement of New York 21 state's system of rent regulation (31442). 22 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 533,000 ......... (re. $281,000) 23 Travel (54000) ... 10,000 .............................. (re. $10,000) 24 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 341,000 ................... (re. $184,000) 25 Indirect costs (58800) ... 18,000 ...................... (re. $11,000) 26 Special Revenue Funds - Other 27 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 28 Rent Revenue Other Account - 22156 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 30 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 31 community renewal's administration and enforcement of New York 32 state's system of rent regulation. 33 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 34 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 35 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to chapter 56 of the 36 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 37 accordance with subdivision c of section 8 of section 4 of chapter 38 576 of the laws of 1974, the division of housing and community 39 renewal is authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropri- 40 ation the value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies 41 which issues the reduced payment. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 43 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 44 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 45 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 46 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 47 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (31442). 521 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 30,451,000 ... (re. $14,074,000) 2 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 37,000 ....... (re. $30,000) 3 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,305,000 ........ (re. $1,305,000) 4 Travel (54000) ... 238,000 ............................ (re. $238,000) 5 Contractual services (51000) ... 25,053,000 ........ (re. $25,053,000) 6 Equipment (56000) ... 637,000 ......................... (re. $637,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 23,538,000 ............. (re. $12,804,000) 8 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,756,000 ................ (re. $1,314,000) 9 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 10 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 11 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to chapter 56 of the 12 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 13 accordance with subdivision c of section 8 of section 4 of chapter 14 576 of the laws of 1974, the division of housing and community 15 renewal is authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropri- 16 ation the value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies 17 which issues the reduced payment. 18 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 19 community renewal's administration of the tenant protection unit 20 (30918). 21 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,713,000 ..... (re. $1,221,000) 22 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 1,000 ......... (re. $1,000) 23 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 60,000 .............. (re. $60,000) 24 Travel (54000) ... 10,000 .............................. (re. $10,000) 25 Contractual services (51000) ... 979,000 .............. (re. $646,000) 26 Equipment (56000) ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000) 27 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,820,000 ................. (re. $850,000) 28 Indirect costs (58800) ... 84,000 ...................... (re. $44,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 30 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 31 community renewal's administration and enforcement of New York 32 state's system of rent regulation. 33 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 34 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 35 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to chapter 56 of the 36 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 37 accordance with subdivision c of section 8 of section 4 of chapter 38 576 of the laws of 1974, the division of housing and community 39 renewal is authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropri- 40 ation the value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies 41 which issues the reduced payment. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 43 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 44 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 45 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 46 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 47 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (31442) 48 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 28,250,000 .... (re. $5,032,000) 49 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 34,000 ....... (re. $23,000) 50 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,211,000 ........ (re. $1,211,000) 51 Travel (54000) ... 221,000 ............................ (re. $221,000) 522 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ... 23,242,000 ........ (re. $23,206,000) 2 Equipment (56000) ... 591,000 ......................... (re. $591,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 21,837,000 .............. (re. $6,374,000) 4 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,629,000 .................. (re. $999,000) 5 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 6 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 7 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to chapter 56 of the 8 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 9 accordance with subdivision c of section 8 of section 4 of chapter 10 576 of the laws of 1974, the division of housing and community 11 renewal is authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropri- 12 ation the value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies 13 which issues the reduced payment. For services and expenses related 14 to the division of housing and community renewal's administration of 15 the tenant protection unit (30918). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,713,000 ....... (re. $385,000) 17 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 1,000 ......... (re. $1,000) 18 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 60,000 .............. (re. $60,000) 19 Travel (54000) ... 10,000 .............................. (re. $10,000) 20 Contractual services (51000) ... 979,000 .............. (re. $298,000) 21 Equipment (56000) ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,820,000 ................. (re. $270,000) 23 Indirect costs (58800) ... 84,000 ...................... (re. $21,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 25 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 26 community renewal's administration and enforcement of New York 27 state's system of rent regulation. 28 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 29 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 30 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to chapter 56 of the 31 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 32 accordance with subdivision c of section 8 of section 4 of chapter 33 576 of the laws of 1974, the division of housing and community 34 renewal is authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropri- 35 ation the value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies 36 which issues the reduced payment. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 38 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 39 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 40 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 41 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 42 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (31442). 43 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 28,250,000 .... (re. $4,316,000) 44 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 34,000 ....... (re. $33,000) 45 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,211,000 ........ (re. $1,146,000) 46 Travel (54000) ... 221,000 ............................ (re. $207,000) 47 Contractual services (51000) ... 23,242,000 ........ (re. $12,232,000) 48 Equipment (56000) ... 591,000 ......................... (re. $589,000) 49 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 21,837,000 .............. (re. $6,653,000) 50 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,629,000 .................. (re. $896,000) 523 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 2 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 3 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to chapter 56 of the 4 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 5 accordance with subdivision c of section 8 of section 4 of chapter 6 576 of the laws of 1974, the division of housing and community 7 renewal is authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropri- 8 ation the value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies 9 which issues the reduced payment. 10 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 11 community renewal's administration of the tenant protection unit 12 (30918). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,713,000 ....... (re. $361,000) 14 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 1,000 ......... (re. $1,000) 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 60,000 .............. (re. $60,000) 16 Travel (54000) ... 10,000 .............................. (re. $10,000) 17 Contractual services (51000) ... 979,000 .............. (re. $653,000) 18 Equipment (56000) ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,643,000 ................. (re. $137,000) 20 Indirect costs (58800) ... 84,000 ...................... (re. $11,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 22 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 23 community renewal's administration and enforcement of New York 24 state's system of rent regulation. 25 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 26 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 27 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to a chapter of the 28 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 29 accordance with subdivision (c) of section 8 of chapter 576 of the 30 laws of 1974, the division of housing and community renewal is 31 authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropriation the 32 value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies which issues 33 the reduced payment. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 35 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 36 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 37 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 38 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 39 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (31442). 40 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 26,250,000 .... (re. $1,945,000) 41 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 34,000 ....... (re. $24,000) 42 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,211,000 ........ (re. $1,113,000) 43 Travel (54000) ... 221,000 ............................ (re. $209,000) 44 Contractual services (51000) ... 8,242,000 ............. (re. $35,000) 45 Equipment (56000) ... 591,000 ......................... (re. $583,000) 46 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 20,400,000 .............. (re. $5,263,000) 47 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,579,000 .................. (re. $896,000) 48 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 49 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 50 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to a chapter of the 51 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 524 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 accordance with subdivision (c) of section 8 of chapter 576 of the 2 laws of 1974, the division of housing and community renewal is 3 authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropriation the 4 value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies which issues 5 the reduced payment. 6 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 7 community renewal's administration of the tenant protection unit 8 (30918). 9 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,713,000 ....... (re. $508,000) 10 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 60,000 .............. (re. $60,000) 11 Travel (54000) ... 10,000 .............................. (re. $10,000) 12 Contractual services (51000) ... 979,000 .............. (re. $171,000) 13 Equipment (56000) ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000) 14 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,643,000 ................. (re. $290,000) 15 Indirect costs (58800) ... 84,000 ...................... (re. $23,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 17 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 18 community renewal's administration and enforcement of New York 19 state's system of rent regulation. 20 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 21 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 22 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to a chapter of the 23 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 24 accordance with subdivision (c) of section 8 of chapter 576 of the 25 laws of 1974, the division of housing and community renewal is 26 authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropriation the 27 value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies which issues 28 the reduced payment. 29 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 30 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 31 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 32 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 33 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 34 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (31442). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 26,250,000 ...... (re. $678,000) 36 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 34,000 ....... (re. $31,000) 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,211,000 .......... (re. $626,000) 38 Travel (54000) ... 221,000 ............................ (re. $190,000) 39 Contractual services (51000) ... 8,242,000 ............. (re. $49,000) 40 Equipment (56000) ... 591,000 ......................... (re. $582,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 20,400,000 .............. (re. $4,502,000) 42 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,579,000 .................. (re. $861,000) 43 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 44 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 45 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to a chapter of the 46 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 47 accordance with subdivision (c) of section 8 of chapter 576 of the 48 laws of 1974, the division of housing and community renewal is 49 authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropriation the 50 value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies which issues 51 the reduced payment. 525 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 2 community renewal's administration of the tenant protection unit 3 (30918). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,713,000 ....... (re. $426,000) 5 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 60,000 .............. (re. $34,000) 6 Travel (54000) ... 10,000 .............................. (re. $10,000) 7 Contractual services (51000) ... 979,000 .............. (re. $106,000) 8 Equipment (56000) ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,643,000 ................. (re. $216,000) 10 Indirect costs (58800) ... 84,000 ...................... (re. $20,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 50, 12 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 13 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 14 community renewal's administration and enforcement of New York 15 state's system of rent regulation. 16 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 17 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 18 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to a chapter of the 19 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 20 accordance with subdivision (c) of section 8 of chapter 576 of the 21 laws of 1974, the division of housing and community renewal is 22 authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropriation the 23 value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies which issues 24 the reduced payment. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 26 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 27 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2019-20 state fiscal year state 28 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 29 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 30 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (31442). 31 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 28,597,000 .... (re. $6,795,000) 32 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 34,000 ....... (re. $15,000) 33 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,211,000 ........ (re. $1,153,000) 34 Travel (54000) ... 221,000 ............................ (re. $206,000) 35 Equipment (56000) ... 591,000 ......................... (re. $591,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 23,400,000 .............. (re. $9,818,000) 37 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,579,000 .................. (re. $849,000) 38 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 39 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 40 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to a chapter of the 41 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 42 accordance with subdivision (c) of section 8 of chapter 576 of the 43 laws of 1974, the division of housing and community renewal is 44 authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropriation the 45 value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies which issues 46 the reduced payment. 47 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 48 community renewal's administration of the tenant protection unit 49 (30918). 50 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,713,000 ....... (re. $627,000) 51 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 60,000 .............. (re. $11,000) 526 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Travel (54000) ... 10,000 ............................... (re. $8,000) 2 Contractual services (51000) ... 979,000 ............... (re. $81,000) 3 Equipment (56000) ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000) 4 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,643,000 ................. (re. $311,000) 5 Indirect costs (58800) ... 84,000 ...................... (re. $12,000) 6 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 50, 7 section 1, of the laws of 2020: 8 For services and expenses related to the division of housing and 9 community renewal's administration and enforcement of New York 10 state's system of rent regulation. 11 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 12 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 13 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to a chapter of the 14 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 15 accordance with subdivision (c) of section 8 of chapter 576 of the 16 laws of 1974, the division of housing and community renewal is 17 authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropriation the 18 value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies which issues 19 the reduced payment. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 21 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2018-19 state fiscal year state 23 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 24 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (31442). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 22,308,000 ....... (re. $15,000) 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 471,000 ............. (re. $60,000) 28 Travel (54000) ... 76,000 .............................. (re. $30,000) 29 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,548,000 .............. (re. $3,000) 30 Equipment (56000) ... 405,000 ......................... (re. $272,000) 31 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 14,272,000 .............. (re. $3,654,000) 32 Indirect costs (58800) ... 680,000 ..................... (re. $88,000) 33 OPS-ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 34 General Fund 35 State Purposes Account - 10050 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 37 For services and expenses related to the OPS-administration program. 38 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 39 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 40 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 41 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 42 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 43 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 44 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 3,082,000 ..... (re. $1,342,000) 45 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 15,000 ....... (re. $15,000) 46 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 317,000 ............ (re. $298,000) 47 Travel (54000) ... 160,000 ............................ (re. $155,000) 48 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,128,000 .......... (re. $5,641,000) 527 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Equipment (56000) ... 267,000 ......................... (re. $263,000) 2 Special Revenue Funds - Other 3 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 4 Housing Indirect Cost Recovery Account - 22090 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to the administration of special 7 revenue funds - other and special revenue funds - federal. Notwith- 8 standing any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a city 9 of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumentality 10 thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to chapter 56 of the laws 11 of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in accord- 12 ance with subdivision c of section 8 of section 4 of chapter 576 of 13 the laws of 1974, the division of housing and community renewal is 14 authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropriation the 15 value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies which issues 16 the reduced payment. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 18 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 19 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 20 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 21 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,697,000 ..... (re. $1,021,000) 24 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 20,000 ....... (re. $19,000) 25 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 45,000 .............. (re. $45,000) 26 Travel (54000) ... 60,000 .............................. (re. $60,000) 27 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,828,000 .......... (re. $1,828,000) 28 Equipment (56000) ... 60,000 ............................ (re. 60,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 30 For services and expenses related to the administration of special 31 revenue funds - other and special revenue funds - federal. 32 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 33 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 34 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to chapter 56 of the 35 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 36 accordance with subdivision c of section 8 of section 4 of chapter 37 576 of the laws of 1974, the division of housing and community 38 renewal is authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropri- 39 ation the value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies 40 which issues the reduced payment. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 42 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 43 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 44 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 45 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 46 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 47 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,697,000 ....... (re. $534,000) 48 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 20,000 ....... (re. $19,000) 49 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 45,000 .............. (re. $45,000) 528 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Travel (54000) ... 60,000 .............................. (re. $60,000) 2 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,828,000 .......... (re. $1,828,000) 3 Equipment (56000) ... 60,000 ........................... (re. $60,000) 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 5 For services and expenses related to the administration of special 6 revenue funds - other and special revenue funds - federal. 7 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 8 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 9 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to chapter 56 of the 10 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 11 accordance with subdivision c of section 8 of section 4 of chapter 12 576 of the laws of 1974, the division of housing and community 13 renewal is authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropri- 14 ation the value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies 15 which issues the reduced payment. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 17 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 19 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 20 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 22 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,697,000 ....... (re. $568,000) 23 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 20,000 ....... (re. $20,000) 24 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 45,000 .............. (re. $45,000) 25 Travel (54000) ... 60,000 .............................. (re. $60,000) 26 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,828,000 .......... (re. $1,828,000) 27 Equipment (56000) ... 60,000 ........................... (re. $60,000) 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 29 For services and expenses related to the administration of special 30 revenue funds - other and special revenue funds - federal. 31 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 32 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 33 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to a chapter of the 34 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 35 accordance with subdivision (c) of section 8 of chapter 576 of the 36 laws of 1974, the division of housing and community renewal is 37 authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropriation the 38 value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies which issues 39 the reduced payment. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 41 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 42 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 43 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 44 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 45 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 46 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,697,000 ....... (re. $368,000) 47 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 20,000 ....... (re. $13,000) 48 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 45,000 .............. (re. $45,000) 49 Travel (54000) ... 60,000 .............................. (re. $60,000) 50 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,828,000 .......... (re. $1,828,000) 529 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Equipment (56000) ... 60,000 ........................... (re. $60,000) 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 3 For services and expenses related to the administration of special 4 revenue funds - other and special revenue funds - federal. 5 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 6 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 7 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to a chapter of the 8 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 9 accordance with subdivision (c) of section 8 of chapter 576 of the 10 laws of 1974, the division of housing and community renewal is 11 authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropriation the 12 value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies which issues 13 the reduced payment. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 15 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 17 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 18 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 19 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 20 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,697,000 ....... (re. $323,000) 21 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 20,000 ....... (re. $13,000) 22 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 45,000 .............. (re. $45,000) 23 Travel (54000) ... 60,000 .............................. (re. $60,000) 24 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,828,000 .......... (re. $1,828,000) 25 Equipment (56000) ... 60,000 ........................... (re. $60,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 50, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2022: 28 For services and expenses related to the administration of special 29 revenue funds - other and special revenue funds - federal. 30 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, to the extent a 31 city of one million or more or any department, agency, or instrumen- 32 tality thereof has any payment reduced pursuant to a chapter of the 33 laws of 2020 in an amount equal to costs incurred by the state in 34 accordance with subdivision (c) of section 8 of chapter 576 of the 35 laws of 1974, the division of housing and community renewal is 36 authorized to suballocate or transfer from this appropriation the 37 value of such incurred costs to the agency or agencies which issues 38 the reduced payment. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 40 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 41 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2019-20 state fiscal year state 42 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 43 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 45 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,697,000 ....... (re. $126,000) 46 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 20,000 ....... (re. $12,000) 47 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 311,000 ............. (re. $58,000) 48 Travel (54000) ... 60,000 ............................... (re. $5,000) 49 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,828,000 .......... (re. $1,787,000) 50 Equipment (56000) ... 60,000 ........................... (re. $60,000) 530 12550-10-5 STATE OF NEW YORK MORTGAGE AGENCY STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 76,800,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 76,800,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 HOMEOWNER MORTGAGE REVENUES REIMBURSEMENT PROGRAM ........... 61,800,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For deposit to the appropriate account or 13 accounts of the homeowner mortgage revenue 14 bonds general resolution pursuant to chap- 15 ter 261 of the laws of 1988. Notwith- 16 standing section 40 of the state finance 17 law, this appropriation shall remain in 18 effect until a subsequent appropriation is 19 made available (45603) ...................... 39,800,000 20 The sum of $22,000,000 is hereby appropri- 21 ated to the state of New York mortgage 22 agency, for deposit in the appropriate 23 account or fund of the homeowner mortgage 24 revenue bonds general resolution. Such 25 appropriation shall only be made avail- 26 able, upon certification by the director 27 of the budget, to the state of New York 28 mortgage agency when and to the extent 29 that the agency certifies to the director 30 of the budget that monies available to the 31 agency are not sufficient to meet the 32 agency's obligations with respect to all 33 bonds issued under the homeowner mortgage 34 revenue bonds general resolution dated 35 September 10, 1987 as amended. Copies of 36 the certification made by the director of 37 the budget shall be filed with the chairs 38 of the senate finance committee and the 39 assembly ways and means committee. 40 Notwithstanding section 40 of the state 41 finance law, this appropriation shall 42 remain in effect until a subsequent appro- 43 priation is made available (45604) .......... 22,000,000 44 -------------- 531 12550-10-5 STATE OF NEW YORK MORTGAGE AGENCY STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 MORTGAGE INSURANCE FUND REIMBURSEMENT PROGRAM ............... 15,000,000 2 -------------- 3 General Fund 4 State Purposes Account - 10050 5 The sum of $15,000,000, or so much thereof 6 as may be necessary and available, is 7 hereby appropriated from the state 8 purposes account of the general fund to 9 the state of New York mortgage agency, for 10 deposit in the mortgage insurance fund 11 established by section 2429-b of the 12 public authorities law as the aggregate 13 reserve amount of the mortgage insurance 14 fund. Any moneys expended pursuant to the 15 provisions of this appropriation shall 16 forthwith be transferred to the general 17 fund, to the extent moneys are available, 18 from the housing reserve account of the 19 New York state infrastructure trust fund 20 established pursuant to section 88 of the 21 state finance law. Such appropriation 22 shall only be made available, upon certif- 23 ication by the director of the budget, to 24 the state of New York mortgage agency to 25 the extent and if the agency requires the 26 use of the aggregate reserve amount of the 27 mortgage insurance fund. Copies of such 28 certification shall be filed with the 29 chairs of the senate finance committee and 30 the assembly ways and means committee. 31 Notwithstanding section 40 of the state 32 finance law, this appropriation shall 33 remain in effect until a subsequent appro- 34 priation is made available (45605) .......... 15,000,000 35 -------------- 532 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HUMAN RIGHTS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 33,870,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 6,018,000 20,599,000 5 ---------------- ---------------- 6 All Funds ........................ 39,888,000 20,599,000 7 ================ ================ 8 SCHEDULE 9 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 33,881,000 10 -------------- 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 administration program including the 15 creation and maintenance of a hate and 16 bias prevention unit. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 18 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 19 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 20 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 21 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 22 appropriation for the budget division 23 program of the division of the budget, are 24 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully 26 stated (81001). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 22,766,000 28 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 244,000 29 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 146,000 30 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 779,000 31 Travel (54000) ................................... 243,000 32 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,547,000 33 Equipment (56000) ................................ 138,000 34 -------------- 35 Program account subtotal .................. 27,863,000 36 -------------- 37 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 38 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 39 Federal Equal Employment Opportunity Account - 25447 40 For services and expenses related to equal 41 employment opportunity program enforcement 42 activities (81001). 533 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HUMAN RIGHTS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ....................... 2,066,000 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 140,000 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,126,000 4 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 150,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ................... 3,482,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 9 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 10 FHAP-Type I Account - 25308 11 For services and expenses related to fair 12 housing assistance program enforcement 13 activities (81001). 14 Personal service (50000) ......................... 683,000 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,428,000 16 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 375,000 17 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 50,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ................... 2,536,000 20 -------------- 21 FAIR HOUSING ASSISTANCE ...................................... 2,507,000 22 -------------- 23 General Fund 24 State Purposes Account - 10050 25 For services and expenses related to the 26 fair housing assistance program. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 28 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 29 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 30 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 31 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 32 appropriation for the budget division 33 program of the division of the budget, are 34 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 35 part of this appropriation as if fully 36 stated (31803). 37 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,483,000 38 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 118,000 39 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 118,000 40 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 94,000 41 Travel (54000) ..................................... 8,000 42 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 670,000 43 Equipment (56000) ................................. 16,000 44 -------------- 534 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HUMAN RIGHTS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 HATE AND BIAS PREVENTION ..................................... 3,500,000 2 -------------- 3 General Fund 4 State Purposes Account - 10050 5 For services and expenses of hate and bias 6 prevention including but not limited to 7 training, educational materials, outreach, 8 and conferences. Notwithstanding any 9 inconsistent provision of law, the funds 10 appropriated herein may be increased or 11 decreased by transfer between state oper- 12 ations and aid to localities (31800). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,100,000 14 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 30,000 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 275,000 16 Travel (54000) .................................... 50,000 17 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,000,000 18 Equipment (56000) ................................. 45,000 19 -------------- 20 Total amount available ..................... 3,500,000 21 -------------- 535 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HUMAN RIGHTS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 4 Federal Equal Employment Opportunity Account - 25447 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to equal employment opportunity 7 program enforcement activities (81001). 8 Personal service (50000) ... 2,066,000 .............. (re. $2,066,000) 9 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 140,000 ............... (re. $140,000) 10 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,126,000 ............... (re. $1,126,000) 11 Indirect costs (58850) ... 150,000 .................... (re. $150,000) 12 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 13 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 51 of 14 state finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 15 For services and expenses related to equal employment opportunity 16 program enforcement activities (81001). 17 Personal service (50000) ... 2,066,000 ................ (re. $266,000) 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) .......................................... 19 [140,000] 2,661,100 ............................ (re. $1,545,000) 20 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,126,000 ................. (re. $455,000) 21 Indirect costs (58850) ... 150,000 .................... (re. $100,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 50, 23 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 24 For services and expenses related to equal employment opportunity 25 program enforcement activities (81001). 26 Nonpersonal service (57050) .......................................... 27 3,006,000 ......................................... (re. $3,006,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,126,000 ................. (re. $326,000) 29 Indirect costs (58850) ... 150,000 .................... (re. $150,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 50, 31 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 32 For services and expenses related to equal employment opportunity 33 program enforcement activities (81001). 34 Personal service (50000) ... 966,000 .................. (re. $966,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,516,000 ............. (re. $914,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 50, 37 section 1, of the laws of 2022: 38 For services and expenses related to equal employment opportunity 39 program enforcement activities (81001). 40 Personal service (50000) ... 766,000 .................. (re. $766,000) 41 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,716,000 ............. (re. $351,000) 42 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 43 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 44 FHAP-Type I Account - 25308 536 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF HUMAN RIGHTS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 2 For services and expenses related to fair housing assistance program 3 enforcement activities (81001). 4 Personal service (50000) ... 683,000 .................. (re. $683,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,428,000 ........... (re. $1,428,000) 6 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 375,000 ................... (re. $375,000) 7 Indirect costs (58850) ... 50,000 ...................... (re. $50,000) 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 9 For services and expenses related to fair housing assistance program 10 enforcement activities (81001). 11 Personal service (50000) ... 683,000 .................. (re. $683,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,428,000 ........... (re. $1,185,000) 13 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 375,000 ................... (re. $375,000) 14 Indirect costs (58850) ... 50,000 ...................... (re. $50,000) 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 50, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 17 For services and expenses related to fair housing assistance program 18 enforcement activities (81001). 19 Personal service (50000) ... 1,058,000 .............. (re. $1,058,000) 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,428,000 ............. (re. $412,000) 21 Indirect costs (58850) ... 50,000 ...................... (re. $50,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 50, 23 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 24 For services and expenses related to fair housing assistance program 25 enforcement activities (81001). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 1,108,000 .............. (re. $1,108,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,428,000 ............. (re. $815,000) 537 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF INDIGENT LEGAL SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 8,515,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 8,515,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 INDIGENT LEGAL SERVICES PROGRAM .............................. 8,515,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Indigent Legal Services Fund 12 Indigent Legal Services Account - 23551 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 indigent legal services program and for 15 the statewide improvement to the quality 16 of indigent defense(55501). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,690,000 18 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 30,000 19 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 165,000 20 Travel (54000) ................................... 185,000 21 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 260,000 22 Equipment (56000) ................................ 113,000 23 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,844,000 24 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 128,000 25 -------------- 26 Program account subtotal ................... 8,415,000 27 -------------- 28 Special Revenue Funds - Other 29 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 30 Title IV-E Parental Services Account - 31 For services and expenses related to train- 32 ings for parental representations in child 33 welfare matters. 34 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 20,000 35 Travel (54000) .................................... 20,000 36 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 60,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ..................... 100,000 39 -------------- 538 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 863,781,000 13,041,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 500,000 1,159,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 30,000,000 0 6 Enterprise Funds ................... 4,000,000 0 7 Internal Service Funds ............. 201,636,000 601,901,000 8 ---------------- ---------------- 9 All Funds ........................ 1,099,917,000 616,101,000 10 ================ ================ 11 SCHEDULE 12 OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY SERVICES PROGRAM .................... 1,099,917,000 13 -------------- 14 General Fund 15 State Purposes Account - 10050 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 19 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 20 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 21 appropriation for the budget division 22 program of the division of the budget, are 23 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully 25 stated. 26 Any contracts which were previously funded 27 in other agencies, but which are now, due 28 to the consolidation of information tech- 29 nology services, paid for using amounts 30 appropriated for state operations herein 31 shall be deemed assigned from the agency 32 which previously funded such contracts to 33 the office of information technology 34 services. 35 For services and expenses of central admin- 36 istrative activities (51908). 37 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 17,686,000 38 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 244,000 39 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 172,000 40 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 116,000 41 Travel (54000) .................................... 15,000 42 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,818,000 43 Equipment (56000) ................................. 86,000 44 -------------- 539 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Total amount available ...................... 26,137,000 2 -------------- 3 For services and expenses of state data 4 centers (51924). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 64,974,000 6 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 4,721,000 7 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 2,384,000 8 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,800,000 9 Travel (54000) ................................... 300,000 10 Contractual services (51000) ................. 163,242,000 11 Equipment (56000) ................................. 16,000 12 -------------- 13 Total amount available ..................... 238,437,000 14 -------------- 15 For services and expenses of programs 16 providing services to end users (51923). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 69,226,000 18 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,297,000 19 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 2,605,000 20 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 600,000 21 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 22 Contractual services (51000) .................. 33,715,000 23 Equipment (56000) ................................ 100,000 24 -------------- 25 Total amount available ..................... 107,548,000 26 -------------- 27 For services and expenses related to 28 supporting and maintaining state computer 29 applications (51922). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 146,696,000 31 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 4,837,000 32 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 730,000 33 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 200,000 34 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 35 Contractual services (51000) .................. 37,784,000 36 Equipment (56000) ................................ 150,000 37 -------------- 38 Total amount available ..................... 190,402,000 39 -------------- 40 For services and expenses related to provid- 41 ing security and quality control services 42 for state applications and data, and for 43 providing shared services to local munici- 44 palities, including but not limited to, 45 endpoint detection and response, intrusion 540 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 detection, vulnerability scanning and data 2 backup. Provided further that a portion of 3 the funds appropriated herein shall be 4 suballocated to the Division of Homeland 5 Security and Emergency Services, for 6 providing shared services to local munici- 7 palities, pursuant to a plan approved by 8 the division of budget (51920). 9 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 34,643,000 10 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 108,000 11 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 24,000 12 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 46,000 13 Travel (54000) .................................... 39,000 14 Contractual services (51000) .................. 85,577,000 15 Equipment (56000) ............................. 77,585,000 16 -------------- 17 Total amount available ..................... 198,022,000 18 -------------- 19 For services and expenses related to network 20 services (51921). 21 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 16,523,000 22 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 2,524,000 23 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 3,163,000 24 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 165,000 25 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 26 Contractual services (51000) .................. 47,750,000 27 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,950,000 28 -------------- 29 Total amount available ...................... 72,080,000 30 -------------- 31 For services and expenses related to train- 32 ing pursuant to a plan developed in 33 consultation with the department of civil 34 service to train employees of the state to 35 obtain information technology certif- 36 ications that are not currently held by 37 employees of the state in sufficient quan- 38 tities, but are readily available in the 39 market place, in order to ensure that the 40 state's information technology needs can 41 be met by state employees (51901). 42 Personal service--regular (50100) .................. 1,000 43 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,300,000 44 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 7,000 45 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 27,000 46 Travel (54000) ..................................... 3,000 47 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 313,000 541 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Equipment (56000) ................................. 57,000 2 -------------- 3 Total amount available ....................... 1,708,000 4 -------------- 5 For services and expenses related to the 6 digitization of government services, 7 including, but not limited to, expanded 8 use of digital credentials, identity 9 rationalization, and streamlined access to 10 digitized government services (51900). 11 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,000,000 12 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,000,000 13 Equipment (56000) .............................. 2,000,000 14 -------------- 15 Total amount available ...................... 10,000,000 16 -------------- 17 For services and expenses related to the 18 modernization of IT legacy systems for the 19 department of taxation and finance 20 (51902). 21 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 13,948,000 22 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,300,000 23 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 20,000 24 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,000,000 25 Equipment (56000) .............................. 3,179,000 26 -------------- 27 Total amount available ...................... 19,447,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal.................. 863,781,000 30 -------------- 31 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 32 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 33 OFT Federal Account - 25532 34 For services and expenses related to grants 35 for geographic information systems and 36 emergency operations activities. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 38 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 39 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 40 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 41 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 42 appropriation for the budget division 43 program of the division of the budget, are 44 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 45 part of this appropriation as if fully 46 stated (51908). 542 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 500,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 4 -------------- 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other 6 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 7 Technology Financing Account - 22207 8 For services and expenses related to infor- 9 mation technology including, but not 10 limited to, services and expenses on 11 behalf of state agencies which have trans- 12 ferred funding to this account for such 13 purpose. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 17 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 18 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 19 appropriation for the budget division 20 program of the division of the budget, are 21 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully 23 stated (51908). 24 Contractual services (51000) .................. 25,000,000 25 Equipment (56000) .............................. 5,000,000 26 -------------- 27 Program account subtotal .................. 30,000,000 28 -------------- 29 Enterprise Funds 30 Agencies Enterprise Fund 31 New York Alert Account - 50326 32 For services and expenses related to the 33 office of technology services program 34 (51908). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 600,000 36 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 30,000 37 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,000,000 38 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 350,000 39 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 20,000 40 -------------- 41 Program account subtotal ................... 4,000,000 42 -------------- 43 Internal Service Funds 44 Agencies Internal Service Fund 45 Centralized Technology Services Account - 55069 543 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 office of technology services program. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 4 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 6 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 7 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 8 appropriation for the budget division 9 program of the division of the budget, are 10 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully 12 stated (51908). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,250,000 14 Contractual services (51000) ................. 121,763,000 15 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,240,000 16 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 92,000 17 -------------- 18 Program account subtotal ................. 125,345,000 19 -------------- 20 Internal Service Funds 21 Agencies Internal Service Fund NYT Account - 55061 22 For services and expenses related to the 23 office of technology services program. 24 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 25 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 26 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 27 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 28 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 29 appropriation for the budget division 30 program of the division of the budget, are 31 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 32 part of this appropriation as if fully 33 stated (51908). 34 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 18,000 35 Travel (54000) .................................... 12,000 36 Contractual services (51000) .................. 11,916,000 37 Equipment (56000) .............................. 3,124,000 38 -------------- 39 Program account subtotal .................. 15,070,000 40 -------------- 41 Internal Service Funds 42 Agencies Internal Service Fund 43 State Data Center Account - 55062 44 For services and expenses related to the 45 office of technology services program. 544 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 2 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 3 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 4 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 5 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 6 appropriation for the budget division 7 program of the division of the budget, are 8 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully 10 stated (51908). 11 Contractual services (51000) ................... 6,047,000 12 Equipment (56000) ............................. 55,174,000 13 -------------- 14 Program account subtotal .................. 61,221,000 15 -------------- 545 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY SERVICES PROGRAM 2 General Fund 3 State Purposes Account - 10050 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For services and expenses related to the modernization of IT legacy 6 systems for the department of taxation and finance (51902). 7 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 7,180,000 ..... (re. $7,180,000) 8 Temporary service (50200) ... 1,300,000 ............. (re. $1,300,000) 9 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 20,000 ....... (re. $20,000) 10 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 .......... (re. $1,000,000) 11 Equipment (56000) ... 500,000 ......................... (re. $500,000) 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 13 For services and expenses related to the modernization of IT legacy 14 systems for the department of taxation and finance (51902). 15 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 7,180,000 ..... (re. $1,256,000) 16 Temporary service (50200) ... 1,300,000 ............... (re. $610,000) 17 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 .......... (re. $1,175,000) 18 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 19 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 20 OFT Federal Account - 25532 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 22 For services and expenses related to grants for geographic information 23 systems and emergency operations activities. 24 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 25 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 26 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 27 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 28 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 29 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51908). 30 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 500,000 ............... (re. $500,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 32 For services and expenses related to grants for geographic information 33 systems and emergency operations activities. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 35 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 36 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 37 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 38 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 39 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51908). 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 500,000 ............... (re. $375,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 42 For services and expenses related to grants for geographic information 43 systems and emergency operations activities. 44 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 45 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 546 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 2 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 3 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 4 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51908). 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 500,000 ............... (re. $284,000) 6 Internal Service Funds 7 Agencies Internal Service Fund 8 Centralized Technology Services Account - 55069 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 10 For services and expenses related to the office of technology services 11 program. 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 13 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 14 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 15 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 16 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 17 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51908). 18 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,250,000 ..... (re. $2,250,000) 19 Contractual services (51000) ... 121,763,000 ...... (re. $120,507,000) 20 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,240,000 ............... (re. $1,240,000) 21 Indirect costs (58800) ... 92,000 ...................... (re. $92,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 23 For services and expenses related to the office of technology services 24 program. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 26 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 27 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 28 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 29 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 30 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51908). 31 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,250,000 ..... (re. $2,250,000) 32 Contractual services (51000) ... 121,763,000 ....... (re. $76,216,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,240,000 ............... (re. $1,240,000) 34 Indirect costs (58800) ... 92,000 ...................... (re. $92,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 36 For services and expenses related to the office of technology services 37 program. 38 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 39 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 40 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 41 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 42 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 43 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51908). 44 Contractual services (51000) ... 121,763,000 ...... (re. $117,729,000) 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 46 For services and expenses related to the office of technology services 47 program. 547 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 2 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 3 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 4 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 5 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 6 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51908). 7 Contractual services (51000) ... 121,763,000 ....... (re. $83,138,000) 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020 as amended by chapter 50, 9 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 10 For services and expenses related to the office of technology services 11 program. 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 13 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 14 fer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 15 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 16 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 17 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51908). 18 Contractual services (51000) ... 64,036,141 ........ (re. $41,512,000) 19 Equipment (56000) ... 11,067,643 ................... (re. $10,758,000) 20 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 708,927 ............ (re. $708,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019 as amended by chapter 50, 22 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 23 For services and expenses related to the office of technology services 24 program. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 26 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 27 fer Authority as defined in the 2019-20 state fiscal year state 28 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 29 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 30 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51908). 31 Contractual services (51000) ... 121,402,000 ....... (re. $83,419,000) 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018 as amended by chapter 50, 33 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 34 For services and expenses related to the office of technology services 35 program. 36 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 37 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 38 fer Authority as defined in the 2018-19 state fiscal year state 39 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 40 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 41 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51908). 42 Contractual services (51000) ... 92,366,003 ........ (re. $34,831,000) 43 Travel (54000) ... 327,000 ............................ (re. $208,000) 44 Equipment (56000) ... 12,330,703 .................... (re. $4,135,000) 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 50, 46 section 1, of the laws of 2021: 47 For services and expenses related to the office of technology services 48 program. 548 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 2 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 3 fer Authority as defined in the 2017-18 state fiscal year state 4 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 5 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 6 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51908). 7 Contractual services (51000) ... 78,166,508 ......... (re. $3,519,000) 8 Equipment (56000) ... 42,885,492 ................... (re. $17,738,000) 9 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 400,000 ............ (re. $319,000) 549 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF THE STATE INSPECTOR GENERAL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 11,713,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 300,000 0 5 ---------------- ---------------- 6 All Funds ........................ 12,013,000 0 7 ================ ================ 8 SCHEDULE 9 INSPECTOR GENERAL PROGRAM ................................... 12,013,000 10 -------------- 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 inspector general program. 15 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 16 money hereby appropriated may be increased 17 or decreased by transfer with any other 18 appropriation within any other agency. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 20 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 21 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 22 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 23 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 24 appropriation for the budget division 25 program of the division of the budget, are 26 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 27 part of this appropriation as if fully 28 stated (32101). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 8,985,000 30 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 700,000 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 3,000 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 200,000 33 Travel (54000) ................................... 110,000 34 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,516,000 35 Equipment (56000) ................................ 199,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal .................. 11,713,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Other 40 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 41 Inspector General Seized Assets Account - 22095 42 For services and expenses related to the 43 inspector general program. 550 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF THE STATE INSPECTOR GENERAL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 2 money hereby appropriated may be increased 3 or decreased by transfer with any other 4 appropriation within any other agency 5 (32101). 6 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 12 Equitable Sharing-SIG Justice Account - 22225 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 inspector general program. 15 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 16 money hereby appropriated may be increased 17 or decreased by transfer with any other 18 appropriation within any other agency 19 (32101). 20 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Other 25 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 26 Equitable Sharing-SIG Treasury Account - 22226 27 For services and expenses related to the 28 inspector general program. 29 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 30 money hereby appropriated may be increased 31 or decreased by transfer with any other 32 appropriation within any other agency 33 (32101). 34 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 35 -------------- 36 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 37 -------------- 38 Special Revenue Funds - Other 39 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 40 Equitable Sharing-WCF Justice Account - 22223 41 For services and expenses related to the 42 inspector general program. 551 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF THE STATE INSPECTOR GENERAL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 2 money hereby appropriated may be increased 3 or decreased by transfer with any other 4 appropriation within any other agency 5 (32101). 6 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 12 Equitable Sharing-WCF Treasury Account - 22224 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 inspector general program. 15 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 16 money hereby appropriated may be increased 17 or decreased by transfer with any other 18 appropriation within any other agency 19 (32101). 20 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Other 25 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 26 Workers Compensation Fraud Seized Assets Account - 22219 27 For services and expenses related to the 28 inspector general program. 29 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 30 money hereby appropriated may be increased 31 or decreased by transfer with any other 32 appropriation within any other agency 33 (32101). 34 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 35 -------------- 36 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 37 -------------- 552 12550-10-5 INTEREST ON LAWYER ACCOUNT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 Fiduciary Funds .................... 3,360,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 3,360,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 NEW YORK INTEREST ON LAWYER ACCOUNT .......................... 3,360,000 9 -------------- 10 Fiduciary Funds 11 New York Interest on Lawyer Fund 12 IOLA Private Contribution Account - 20301 13 For administrative services and expenses of 14 the interest on lawyer account fund in 15 support of the provision of grants by the 16 board of trustees. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 18 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 19 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 20 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 21 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 22 appropriation for the budget division 23 program of the division of the budget, are 24 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully 26 stated (32703). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,215,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 10,000 29 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,285,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................. 10,000 32 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 792,000 33 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 38,000 34 -------------- 553 12550-10-5 COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL CONDUCT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 9,330,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 9,330,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 JUDICIAL CONDUCT PROGRAM ..................................... 9,330,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 judicial conduct program. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 17 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 18 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 19 appropriation for the budget division 20 program of the division of the budget, are 21 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully 23 stated (33301). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 7,130,000 25 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 60,000 26 Travel (54000) .................................... 80,000 27 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,950,000 28 Equipment (56000) ................................ 110,000 29 -------------- 554 12550-10-5 COMMISSION ON JUDICIAL NOMINATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 30,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 30,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 JUDICIAL NOMINATION PROGRAM ..................................... 30,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 judicial nomination program. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 17 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 18 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 19 appropriation for the budget division 20 program of the division of the budget, are 21 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully 23 stated (33601). 24 Travel (54000) .................................... 30,000 25 -------------- 555 12550-10-5 JUDICIAL SCREENING COMMITTEES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 38,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 38,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 JUDICIAL SCREENING PROGRAM ...................................... 38,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 judicial screening program. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 17 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 18 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 19 appropriation for the budget division 20 program of the division of the budget, are 21 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully 23 stated (33901). 24 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 25 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 28,000 26 -------------- 556 12550-10-5 JUSTICE CENTER FOR THE PROTECTION OF PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 59,155,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 2,064,000 3,322,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 616,000 0 6 Enterprise Funds ................... 500,000 0 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 62,335,000 3,322,000 9 ================ ================ 10 SCHEDULE 11 PROGRAM OVERSIGHT PROGRAM ................................... 62,335,000 12 -------------- 13 General Fund 14 State Purposes Account - 10050 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 program oversight program. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 18 the money hereby appropriated may be 19 increased or decreased by interchange, 20 with any appropriation of the justice 21 center for the protection of people with 22 special needs, and may be increased or 23 decreased by transfer or suballocation 24 between these appropriated amounts and 25 appropriations of the office of mental 26 health, office for people with develop- 27 mental disabilities, office of addiction 28 services and supports, department of 29 health, and the office of children and 30 family services with the approval of the 31 director of the budget who shall file such 32 approval with the department of audit and 33 control and copies thereof with the chair- 34 man of the senate finance committee and 35 the chairman of the assembly ways and 36 means committee. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 38 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 39 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 40 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 41 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 42 appropriation for the budget division 43 program of the division of the budget, are 44 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 557 12550-10-5 JUSTICE CENTER FOR THE PROTECTION OF PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 part of this appropriation as if fully 2 stated (48927). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 46,142,000 4 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 317,000 5 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 522,000 6 Travel (54000) ................................. 2,174,000 7 Contractual services (51000) ................... 8,927,000 8 Equipment (56000) ................................ 703,000 9 -------------- 10 Program account subtotal................... 58,785,000 11 -------------- 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 Interagency Coordinating Council for 14 Services to Persons who are Deaf, Deafb- 15 lind, or Hard of Hearing (48903). 16 Personal service -- regular (50100) .............. 220,000 17 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 25,000 18 Travel (54000) .................................... 25,000 19 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 75,000 20 Equipment (56000) ................................. 25,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ..................... 370,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 25 Federal Education Fund 26 1031-OT-Education Account - 25203 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 28 the money hereby appropriated may be 29 increased or decreased by interchange, 30 with any appropriation of the justice 31 center for the protection of people with 32 special needs, and may be increased or 33 decreased by transfer or suballocation 34 between these appropriated amounts and 35 appropriations of the office of mental 36 health, office for people with develop- 37 mental disabilities, office of addiction 38 services and supports, department of 39 health, and the office of children and 40 family services with the approval of the 41 director of the budget who shall file such 42 approval with the department of audit and 43 control and copies thereof with the chair- 44 man of the senate finance committee and 45 the chairman of the assembly ways and 46 means committee. 558 12550-10-5 JUSTICE CENTER FOR THE PROTECTION OF PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to TRAID 2 including for contract for the delivery of 3 direct services to persons utilizing 4 regional technology centers or other enti- 5 ties funded through the TRAID project 6 (48928). 7 Personal service (50000) ......................... 460,000 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 897,000 9 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 192,000 10 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 15,000 11 -------------- 12 Program account subtotal ................... 1,564,000 13 -------------- 14 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 15 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 16 Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25100 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 18 the money hereby appropriated may be 19 increased or decreased by interchange, 20 with any appropriation of the justice 21 center for the protection of people with 22 special needs, and may be increased or 23 decreased by transfer or suballocation 24 between these appropriated amounts and 25 appropriations of the office of mental 26 health, office for people with develop- 27 mental disabilities, office of addiction 28 services and supports, department of 29 health, and the office of children and 30 family services with the approval of the 31 director of the budget who shall file such 32 approval with the department of audit and 33 control and copies thereof with the chair- 34 man of the senate finance committee and 35 the chairman of the assembly ways and 36 means committee. 37 For services and expenses associated with 38 federal grant awards yet to be allocated. 39 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 40 of law, the director of the budget is 41 hereby authorized to transfer appropri- 42 ation authority contained herein to any 43 other federal fund or program within the 44 justice center for the protection of 45 people with special needs (48927). 46 Personal service (50000) ......................... 100,000 47 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 342,000 559 12550-10-5 JUSTICE CENTER FOR THE PROTECTION OF PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................... 54,000 2 Indirect costs (58850) ............................. 4,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 8 Justice Center Grants and Bequests Account - 20202 9 For services and expenses associated with 10 gifts, grants and bequests to the justice 11 center for the protection of people with 12 special needs (48927). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 158,000 14 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 11,000 15 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 45,000 16 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 250,000 17 Equipment (56000) ................................. 45,000 18 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 100,000 19 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 7,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal ..................... 616,000 22 -------------- 23 Enterprise Funds 24 Agencies Enterprise Fund 25 Publications Account - 50301 26 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 27 the money hereby appropriated may be 28 increased or decreased by interchange, 29 with any appropriation of the justice 30 center for the protection of people with 31 special needs, and may be increased or 32 decreased by transfer or suballocation 33 between these appropriated amounts and 34 appropriations of the office of mental 35 health, office for people with develop- 36 mental disabilities, office of addiction 37 services and supports, department of 38 health, and the office of children and 39 family services with the approval of the 40 director of the budget who shall file such 41 approval with the department of audit and 42 control and copies thereof with the chair- 43 man of the senate finance committee and 44 the chairman of the assembly ways and 45 means committee. 560 12550-10-5 JUSTICE CENTER FOR THE PROTECTION OF PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses associated with 2 protection of vulnerable persons, includ- 3 ing, but not limited to, the provision of 4 investigative services, training, and the 5 development, production and distribution 6 of training materials, reports, promo- 7 tional materials and other items. 8 Notwithstanding any other inconsistent 9 provision of law, the justice center for 10 the protection of people with special 11 needs may establish and charge fees for 12 the provision of such services (48927). 13 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 150,000 14 Travel (54000) .................................... 50,000 15 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 150,000 16 Equipment (56000) ................................ 150,000 17 -------------- 18 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 19 -------------- 561 12550-10-5 JUSTICE CENTER FOR THE PROTECTION OF PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 PROGRAM OVERSIGHT PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Education Fund 4 1031-OT-Education Account - 25203 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 7 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, with any appro- 8 priation of the justice center for the protection of people with 9 special needs, and may be increased or decreased by transfer or 10 suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations 11 of the office of mental health, office for people with developmental 12 disabilities, office of addiction services and supports, department 13 of health, and the office of children and family services with the 14 approval of the director of the budget who shall file such approval 15 with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the 16 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 17 assembly ways and means committee. 18 For services and expenses related to TRAID including for contract for 19 the delivery of direct services to persons utilizing regional tech- 20 nology centers or other entities funded through the TRAID project 21 (48928). 22 Personal service (50000) ... 460,000 .................. (re. $460,000) 23 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 897,000 ............... (re. $897,000) 24 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 192,000 ................... (re. $192,000) 25 Indirect costs (58850) ... 15,000 ...................... (re. $15,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 28 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, with any appro- 29 priation of the justice center for the protection of people with 30 special needs, and may be increased or decreased by transfer or 31 suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations 32 of the office of mental health, office for people with developmental 33 disabilities, office of addiction services and support, department 34 of health, and the office of children and family services with the 35 approval of the director of the budget who shall file such approval 36 with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the 37 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 38 assembly ways and means committee. 39 For services and expenses related to TRAID including for contract for 40 the delivery of direct services to persons utilizing regional tech- 41 nology centers or other entities funded through the TRAID project 42 (48928). 43 Personal service (50000) ... 460,000 .................. (re. $410,000) 44 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 897,000 ............... (re. $141,000) 45 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 192,000 ................... (re. $192,000) 46 Indirect costs (58850) ... 15,000 ...................... (re. $15,000) 47 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 562 12550-10-5 JUSTICE CENTER FOR THE PROTECTION OF PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 2 Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25100 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 5 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, with any appro- 6 priation of the justice center for the protection of people with 7 special needs, and may be increased or decreased by transfer or 8 suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations 9 of the office of mental health, office for people with developmental 10 disabilities, office of addiction services and supports, department 11 of health, and the office of children and family services with the 12 approval of the director of the budget who shall file such approval 13 with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the 14 chair- man of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 15 assembly ways and means committee. 16 For services and expenses associated with federal grant awards yet to 17 be allocated. 18 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the 19 budget is hereby authorized to transfer appropriation authority 20 contained herein to any other federal fund or program within the 21 justice center for the protection of people with special needs 22 (48927). 23 Personal service (50000) ... 100,000 .................. (re. $100,000) 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 342,000 ............... (re. $342,000) 25 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 54,000 ..................... (re. $54,000) 26 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,000 ........................ (re. $4,000) 27 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 28 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 29 ated may be increased or decreased by interchange, with any appro- 30 priation of the justice center for the protection of people with 31 special needs, and may be increased or decreased by transfer or 32 suballocation between these appropriated amounts and appropriations 33 of the office of mental health, office for people with developmental 34 disabilities, office of addiction services and support, department 35 of health, and the office of children and family services with the 36 approval of the director of the budget who shall file such approval 37 with the department of audit and control and copies thereof with the 38 chairman of the senate finance committee and the chairman of the 39 assembly ways and means committee. 40 For services and expenses associated with federal grant awards yet to 41 be allocated. 42 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, the director of the 43 budget is hereby authorized to transfer appropriation authority 44 contained herein to any other federal fund or program within the 45 justice center for the protection of people with special needs 46 (48927). 47 Personal service (50000) ... 100,000 .................. (re. $100,000) 48 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 342,000 ............... (re. $342,000) 49 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 54,000 ..................... (re. $54,000) 563 12550-10-5 JUSTICE CENTER FOR THE PROTECTION OF PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,000 ........................ (re. $4,000) 564 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 13,787,000 3,275,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 671,242,000 1,968,718,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 98,631,000 157,740,000 6 Enterprise Funds ................... 250,000,000 0 7 Internal Service Funds ............. 5,340,000 4,146,000 8 ---------------- ---------------- 9 All Funds ........................ 1,039,000,000 2,133,879,000 10 ================ ================ 11 SCHEDULE 12 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ..................................... 591,064,000 13 -------------- 14 General Fund 15 State Purposes Account - 10050 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the New York state data 18 center is established in the department of 19 labor to be operated in cooperation with 20 the United States bureau of the census in 21 order to compile, analyze and disseminate 22 socio-economic information and data. 23 For services and expenses of the state data 24 center pursuant to section 21 of the labor 25 law (34771). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 87,000 27 -------------- 28 For contracted services for the state data 29 center program. Contractor will act as the 30 department of labor's agent for the feder- 31 al-state cooperative program for popu- 32 lation estimates (FSCPE) (34765). 33 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 200,000 34 -------------- 35 Program account subtotal ..................... 287,000 36 -------------- 37 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 38 Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund 39 Unemployment Insurance Administration Account - 25901 40 For services and expenses of administering 41 unemployment insurance programs, job 565 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 service programs, workforce investment act 2 programs, employability development 3 programs, other miscellaneous programs, 4 and a reserve for unanticipated funding, 5 pursuant to federal grants and contracts. 6 A portion of this appropriation may be 7 used to provide information and advice 8 regarding unemployment insurance benefit 9 appeals and hearing assistance. A portion 10 of this appropriation may be transferred 11 to aid to localities. Nothwithstanding any 12 other law to the contrary, a portion of 13 this appropriation may be suballocated or 14 transferred to any state department, agen- 15 cy, or public authority for the purposes 16 stated herein. 17 Notwithstanding section 135 of the civil 18 service law, the commissioner of the 19 department of labor, subject to approval 20 of the director of the budget, is hereby 21 authorized to grant additional compen- 22 sation to employees of the department of 23 labor whose positions are funded in whole 24 or in part by the disabled veterans' 25 outreach program specialists and/or local 26 veterans' employment representative grant 27 or grants based on merit as determined 28 pursuant to the performance incentive 29 program provided for in the grant consist- 30 ent with the terms of the grant and appli- 31 cable provisions of federal law. The 32 payment of such extra compensation shall 33 be in addition to and shall not be part of 34 an employee's basic annual salary and 35 shall not affect or impair any performance 36 advancement payments, performance awards, 37 longevity payments or other rights or 38 benefits to which an employee may be enti- 39 tled. Furthermore, any additional compen- 40 sation payable pursuant to this subdivi- 41 sion shall not be included as compensation 42 for retirement purposes. The amount appro- 43 priated herein shall also include any Reed 44 act funds that may be made available to 45 this state under section 903 of the social 46 security act as amended and in accordance 47 with federal regulations, to be used under 48 the direction of the New York state 49 department of labor subject to approval of 50 the director of the budget to pay the 51 administrative expenses of the employment 52 security program, including the adminis- 566 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 tration of the unemployment insurance law 2 and the administration of state public 3 employment offices. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 5 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 6 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 7 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 8 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 9 appropriation for the budget division 10 program of the division of the budget, are 11 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully 13 stated (34218). 14 Personal service (50000) ..................... 178,423,000 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 93,298,000 16 Fringe benefits (60090) ...................... 111,836,000 17 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 239,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ................. 383,796,000 20 -------------- 21 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 22 Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund 23 Unemployment Insurance Control Fund Account - 25903 24 For services and expenses of administering 25 the unemployment insurance control fund 26 program. The amount appropriated herein 27 shall include up to $16,000,000 credited 28 to the unemployment insurance control 29 fund, created pursuant to chapter 5 of the 30 laws of 2000, as costs are incurred for 31 allowable services pursuant to chapter 5 32 of the laws of 2000 (34218). 33 Personal service (50000) ....................... 8,509,000 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,148,000 35 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 5,334,000 36 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 209,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal .................. 16,200,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 41 Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund 42 Unemployment Insurance Reemployment Services Account - 43 25902 44 For services and expenses of administering 45 the reemployment services program. A 46 portion of this appropriation may be 567 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 transferred to aid to localities. The 2 amount appropriated herein shall include 3 any moneys credited to the reemployment 4 service fund, created pursuant to chapter 5 589 of the laws of 1998, as costs are 6 incurred for allowable services pursuant 7 to chapter 589 of the laws of 1998. 8 Notwithstanding section 581-b of the labor 9 law, or any other provision of law to the 10 contrary, when annual contributions paid 11 into the reemployment services fund by all 12 eligible employers exceed $35,000,000, 13 excess contributions may be used for 14 services and expenses of the unemployment 15 insurance systems modernization project, 16 for services and expenses of administering 17 the unemployment insurance program, and 18 for workforce development and employment 19 and training programs. Services and 20 expenses for workforce development shall 21 be administered in consultation with the 22 state workforce investment board estab- 23 lished in article 24-A of the labor law 24 and state agencies responsible for admin- 25 istration of workforce development 26 programs. The amounts appropriated herein 27 may be suballocated, transferred or other- 28 wise made available to any other state 29 department, agency or public authority 30 (34218). 31 Personal service (50000) ...................... 63,975,000 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 77,292,000 33 Fringe benefits (60090) ....................... 40,100,000 34 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 1,574,000 35 -------------- 36 Program account subtotal ................. 182,941,000 37 -------------- 38 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 39 Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund 40 Unemployment Insurance Renovation Fund Account - 25904 41 For services and expenses of the unemploy- 42 ment insurance renovation fund. The amount 43 appropriated herein shall include any 44 funds credited to the unemployment insur- 45 ance renovation sub fund as costs are 46 incurred (34218). 47 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,500,000 48 -------------- 568 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Program account subtotal ................... 2,500,000 2 -------------- 3 Internal Service Funds 4 Agencies Internal Service Account 5 Labor Contact Center Account - 55071 6 For payments related to the planning, devel- 7 opment and establishment of a new state- 8 wide contact center within the department 9 of taxation and finance, the office of 10 children and family services and the 11 department of labor on behalf of customer 12 state agencies. 13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 14 to the contrary, for the purpose of plan- 15 ning, developing and/or implementing the 16 consolidation of administration, business 17 services, procurement, information tech- 18 nology and/or other functions shared among 19 agencies to improve the efficiency and 20 effectiveness of government operations, 21 the amounts appropriated herein may be (i) 22 interchanged without limit, (ii) trans- 23 ferred between any other state operations 24 appropriations within this agency or to 25 any other state operations appropriations 26 of any state department, agency or public 27 authority, and/or (iii) suballocated to 28 any state department, agency or public 29 authority with the approval of the direc- 30 tor of the budget who shall file such 31 approval with the department of audit and 32 control and copies thereof with the chair- 33 man of the senate finance committee and 34 the chairman of the assembly ways and 35 means committee (34770). 36 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,400,000 37 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 50,000 38 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 50,000 39 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 28,000 40 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 41 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,061,000 42 Equipment (56000) ................................. 46,000 43 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,630,000 44 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 70,000 45 -------------- 46 Program account subtotal ................... 5,340,000 47 -------------- 569 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING PROGRAM ............................ 104,425,000 2 -------------- 3 General Fund 4 State Purposes Account - 10050 5 For services and expenses related to the 6 department of labor's office of just tran- 7 sition. Notwithstanding any inconsistent 8 provision of law, the funds appropriated 9 herein may be increased or decreased by 10 transfer between state operations and aid 11 to localities. 12 Funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 13 cated or transferred to any state depart- 14 ment, agency, or public authority for the 15 purposes stated herein (34747). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,150,000 17 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 15,000 18 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 15,000 19 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 20,000 20 Travel (54000) .................................... 12,000 21 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 268,000 22 Equipment (56000) ................................. 20,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal ................... 3,500,000 25 -------------- 26 For services and expenses related to the 27 department of labor's efforts to digitize 28 youth working papers. Notwithstanding any 29 inconsistent provision of law, the funds 30 appropriated herein may be increased or 31 decreased by transfer between state oper- 32 ations and aid to localities. 33 Funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 34 cated or transferred to any state depart- 35 ment, agency, or public authority for the 36 purposes stated herein. 37 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,500,000 38 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 50,000 39 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 50,000 40 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 300,000 41 Travel (54000) ................................... 300,000 42 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,500,000 43 Equipment (56000) ................................ 300,000 44 -------------- 45 Program account subtotal .................. 10,000,000 46 -------------- 570 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 2 Federal Emergency Employment Act Fund 3 Federal Workforce Investment Act Account - 26001 4 For the administration and operation of 5 employment and training programs as funded 6 by grants under the workforce investment 7 act, public law 105-220, and the workforce 8 innovation and opportunity act, public law 9 113-128, including grants to other govern- 10 mental units, community-based organiza- 11 tions, non-profit and for profit organiza- 12 tions, suballocations to state departments 13 and agencies and a portion may be trans- 14 ferred to aid to localities, according to 15 the following: 16 For services and expenses of statewide 17 activities, including but not limited to 18 state administration and technical assist- 19 ance to local workforce investment areas, 20 pursuant to an expenditure plan approved 21 by the director of the budget. Of the 22 moneys appropriated herein for statewide 23 activities, the state workforce investment 24 board shall assist the governor in devel- 25 oping programs and identifying activities 26 to be funded through the statewide reserve 27 pursuant to section 134 of the federal 28 workforce investment act, PL 105-220, and 29 section 134 of the workforce innovation 30 and opportunity act, public law 113-128, 31 and the commissioner of labor shall peri- 32 odically report to the state workforce 33 investment board on such programs and 34 activities which shall be developed giving 35 consideration to the strategic training 36 alliance program and other existing 37 programs. 38 Statewide employment and training activities 39 may include one-to-one business advisement 40 and training for qualified enrollees of 41 the self-employment assistance program 42 which may be operated by the state's small 43 business development centers or the entre- 44 preneurial assistance program (34780). 45 Personal service (50000) ...................... 20,557,000 46 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 7,549,000 47 Fringe benefits (60090) ....................... 12,885,000 48 -------------- 49 Total amount available ...................... 40,991,000 50 -------------- 571 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of adult, youth 2 and dislocated worker employment and 3 training local workforce investment area 4 programs and statewide rapid response 5 activities (34779). 6 Personal service (50000) ....................... 4,122,000 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 18,108,000 8 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 2,584,000 9 -------------- 10 Total amount available ...................... 24,814,000 11 -------------- 12 For services and expenses of miscellaneous 13 workforce investment act, public law 105- 14 220, and workforce innovation and opportu- 15 nity act, public law 113-128, national 16 reserve grants and other federal employ- 17 ment and training grants and federally 18 administered programs (34778). 19 Personal service (50000) ....................... 3,000,000 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 15,120,000 21 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,880,000 22 -------------- 23 Total amount available ...................... 20,000,000 24 -------------- 25 Program account subtotal .................. 85,805,000 26 -------------- 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 Unemployment Insurance Interest and Penalty Fund 29 Unemployment Insurance Interest and Penalty Account - 30 23601 31 For services and expenses of the department 32 of labor employment and training programs 33 (34222). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,476,000 35 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 3,000 36 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 3,000 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 137,000 38 Travel (54000) .................................... 46,000 39 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 716,000 40 Equipment (56000) ................................. 53,000 41 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,618,000 42 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 68,000 43 -------------- 44 Program account subtotal ................... 5,120,000 45 -------------- 572 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 LABOR STANDARDS PROGRAM ..................................... 43,877,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other 4 Child Performer Protection Fund 5 DOL-Child Performer Protection Account - 20401 6 For services and expenses related to labor 7 standards program enforcement activities 8 (34788). 9 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 390,000 10 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 1,000 11 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 12 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 16,000 13 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 14 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 85,000 15 Equipment (56000) .................................. 8,000 16 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 256,000 17 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 11,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ..................... 773,000 20 -------------- 21 Special Revenue Funds - Other 22 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 23 DOL-Fee and Penalty Account - 21923 24 For services and expenses related to labor 25 standards program enforcement activities 26 (34788). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 8,815,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 43,000 29 Travel (54000) .................................... 36,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,381,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................. 60,000 32 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 5,746,000 33 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 239,000 34 -------------- 35 Program account subtotal .................. 16,320,000 36 -------------- 37 Special Revenue Funds - Other 38 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 39 Public Work Enforcement Account - 21998 40 For services and expenses to implement chap- 41 ter 511 of the laws of 1995 as amended by 42 chapter 513 of the laws of 1997, chapter 43 655 of the laws of 1999, chapter 376 of 573 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 the laws of 2003 and chapter 407 of the 2 laws of 2005 (34788). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,251,000 4 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 9,000 5 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 2,000 6 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 78,000 7 Travel (54000) ................................... 108,000 8 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 907,000 9 Equipment (56000) ................................. 65,000 10 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,778,000 11 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 116,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal ................... 8,314,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other 16 Training and Education Program on Occupational Safety 17 and Health Fund 18 OSHA-Training and Education Account - 21251 19 For services and expenses related to labor 20 standards program enforcement activities. 21 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 22 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 23 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 24 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 25 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 26 appropriation for the budget division 27 program of the division of the budget, are 28 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 29 part of this appropriation as if fully 30 stated (34788). 31 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 9,425,000 32 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 36,000 33 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 11,000 34 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 230,000 35 Travel (54000) ................................... 139,000 36 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,024,000 37 Equipment (56000) ................................ 174,000 38 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 6,174,000 39 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 257,000 40 -------------- 41 Program account subtotal .................. 18,470,000 42 -------------- 43 OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH PROGRAM ...................... 49,634,000 44 -------------- 45 Special Revenue Funds - Other 46 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 574 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 DOL-Fee and Penalty Account - 21923 2 For services and expenses related to occupa- 3 tional safety and health program enforce- 4 ment activities (34203). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,900,000 6 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 575,000 7 Travel (54000) ................................... 575,000 8 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,429,000 9 Equipment (56000) ................................ 110,000 10 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,543,000 11 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 106,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal ................... 9,238,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other 16 Training and Education Program on Occupational Safety 17 and Health Fund 18 Occupational Safety and Health Inspection Account - 19 21252 20 For services and expenses related to occupa- 21 tional safety and health program enforce- 22 ment activities. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 24 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 25 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 26 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 27 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 28 appropriation for the budget division 29 program of the division of the budget, are 30 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 31 part of this appropriation as if fully 32 stated (34203). 33 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 12,900,000 34 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 34,000 35 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 40,000 36 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 143,000 37 Travel (54000) ................................... 500,000 38 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,627,000 39 Equipment (56000) ................................ 190,000 40 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 8,457,000 41 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 352,000 42 -------------- 43 Program account subtotal .................. 25,243,000 44 -------------- 45 Special Revenue Funds - Other 575 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Training and Education Program on Occupational Safety 2 and Health Fund 3 OSHA-Training and Education Account - 21251 4 For services and expenses related to occupa- 5 tional safety and health program enforce- 6 ment activities, services and expenses 7 associated with reporting requirements 8 included in the workers' compensation 9 reform law of 2007 as well as activities 10 previously funded from the department of 11 labor general fund administration appro- 12 priation. 13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 14 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 15 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 16 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 17 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 18 appropriation for the budget division 19 program of the division of the budget, are 20 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully 22 stated (34203). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,460,000 24 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 44,000 25 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 11,000 26 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 115,000 27 Travel (54000) .................................... 92,000 28 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,260,000 29 Equipment (56000) ................................ 101,000 30 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,945,000 31 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 125,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal .................. 15,153,000 34 -------------- 35 UNEMPLOYMENT INSURANCE BENEFIT PROGRAM ..................... 250,000,000 36 -------------- 37 Enterprise Funds 38 Unemployment Insurance Benefit Fund 39 Interest Assessment Account - 50651 40 For payment of interest costs due on 41 advances from the federal unemployment 42 account under title XII of the social 43 security act (42 U.S. code sections 1321- 44 1324). Funds appropriated herein shall not 45 be used in whole or in part for any 46 purpose or in any manner which would 47 permit substitution for, or reduction in, 576 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 federal funds for unemployment insurance 2 administration or would cause the United 3 States government to withhold any part of 4 an administrative grant which would other- 5 wise be made (34787). 6 Contractual services (51000) ................. 250,000,000 7 -------------- 577 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund 4 Unemployment Insurance Administration Account - 25901 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses of administering unemployment insurance 7 programs, job service programs, workforce investment act programs, 8 employability development programs, other miscellaneous programs, 9 and a reserve for unanticipated funding, pursuant to federal grants 10 and contracts. A portion of this appropriation may be used to 11 provide information and advice regarding unemployment insurance 12 benefit appeals and hearing assistance. A portion of this appropri- 13 ation may be transferred to aid to localities. Nothwithstanding any 14 other law to the contrary, a portion of this appropriation may be 15 suballocated or transferred to any state department, agency, or 16 public authority for the purposes stated herein. 17 Notwithstanding section 135 of the civil service law, the commissioner 18 of the department of labor, subject to approval of the director of 19 the budget, is hereby authorized to grant additional compensation to 20 employees of the department of labor whose positions are funded in 21 whole or in part by the disabled veterans' outreach program special- 22 ists and/or local veterans' employment representative grant or 23 grants based on merit as determined pursuant to the performance 24 incentive program provided for in the grant consistent with the 25 terms of the grant and applicable provisions of federal law. The 26 payment of such extra compensation shall be in addition to and shall 27 not be part of an employee's basic annual salary and shall not 28 affect or impair any performance advancement payments, performance 29 awards, longevity payments or other rights or benefits to which an 30 employee may be entitled. Furthermore, any additional compensation 31 payable pursuant to this subdivision shall not be included as 32 compensation for retirement purposes. The amount appropriated herein 33 shall also include any Reed act funds that may be made available to 34 this state under section 903 of the social security act as amended 35 and in accordance with federal regulations, to be used under the 36 direction of the New York state department of labor subject to 37 approval of the director of the budget to pay the administrative 38 expenses of the employment security program, including the adminis- 39 tration of the unemployment insurance law and the administration of 40 state public employment offices. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 42 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 43 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 44 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 45 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 46 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34218). 47 Personal service (50000) ... 150,143,000 ........... (re. $88,351,000) 48 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 100,140,000 ........ (re. $62,893,000) 49 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 98,269,000 ............. (re. $59,279,000) 50 Indirect costs (58850) ... 234,000 .................... (re. $117,000) 578 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 2 For services and expenses of administering unemployment insurance 3 programs, job service programs, workforce investment act programs, 4 employability development programs, other miscellaneous programs, 5 and a reserve for unanticipated funding, pursuant to federal grants 6 and contracts. A portion of this appropriation may be used to 7 provide information and advice regarding unemployment insurance 8 benefit appeals and hearing assistance. A portion of this appropri- 9 ation may be transferred to aid to localities. 10 Notwithstanding section 135 of the civil service law, the commissioner 11 of the department of labor, subject to approval of the director of 12 the budget, is hereby authorized to grant additional compensation to 13 employees of the department of labor whose positions are funded in 14 whole or in part by the disabled veterans' outreach program special- 15 ists and/or local veterans' employment representative grant or 16 grants based on merit as determined pursuant to the performance 17 incentive program provided for in the grant consistent with the 18 terms of the grant and applicable provisions of federal law. The 19 payment of such extra compensation shall be in addition to and shall 20 not be part of an employee's basic annual salary and shall not 21 affect or impair any performance advancement payments, performance 22 awards, longevity payments or other rights or benefits to which an 23 employee may be entitled. Furthermore, any additional compensation 24 payable pursuant to this subdivision shall not be included as 25 compensation for retirement purposes. The amount appropriated herein 26 shall also include any Reed act funds that may be made available to 27 this state under section 903 of the social security act as amended 28 and in accordance with federal regulations, to be used under the 29 direction of the New York state department of labor subject to 30 approval of the director of the budget to pay the administrative 31 expenses of the employment security program, including the adminis- 32 tration of the unemployment insurance law and the administration of 33 state public employment offices. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 35 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 36 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 37 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 38 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 39 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34218). 40 Personal service (50000) ... 133,810,000 ............ (re. $1,175,000) 41 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 118,732,000 ........ (re. $48,956,000) 42 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 90,803,000 .............. (re. $5,813,000) 43 Indirect costs (58850) ... 151,000 ...................... (re. $8,000) 44 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 45 For services and expenses of administering unemployment insurance 46 programs, job service programs, workforce investment act programs, 47 employability development programs, other miscellaneous programs, 48 and a reserve for unanticipated funding, pursuant to federal grants 49 and contracts. A portion of this appropriation may be used to 50 provide information and advice regarding unemployment insurance 579 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 benefit appeals and hearing assistance. A portion of this appropri- 2 ation may be transferred to aid to localities. 3 Notwithstanding section 135 of the civil service law, the commissioner 4 of the department of labor, subject to approval of the director of 5 the budget, is hereby authorized to grant additional compensation to 6 employees of the department of labor whose positions are funded in 7 whole or in part by the disabled veterans' outreach program special- 8 ists and/or local veterans' employment representative grant or 9 grants based on merit as determined pursuant to the performance 10 incentive program provided for in the grant consistent with the 11 terms of the grant and applicable provisions of federal law. The 12 payment of such extra compensation shall be in addition to and shall 13 not be part of an employee's basic annual salary and shall not 14 affect or impair any performance advancement payments, performance 15 awards, longevity payments or other rights or benefits to which an 16 employee may be entitled. Furthermore, any additional compensation 17 payable pursuant to this subdivision shall not be included as 18 compensation for retirement purposes. The amount appropriated herein 19 shall also include any Reed act funds that may be made available to 20 this state under section 903 of the social security act as amended 21 and in accordance with federal regulations, to be used under the 22 direction of the New York state department of labor subject to 23 approval of the director of the budget to pay the administrative 24 expenses of the employment security program, including the adminis- 25 tration of the unemployment insurance law and the administration of 26 state public employment offices. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 28 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 29 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 30 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 31 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 32 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34218). 33 Personal service (50000) ... 228,601,000 ........... (re. $40,283,000) 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 79,777,000 ......... (re. $49,656,000) 35 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 148,682,000 ............ (re. $29,290,000) 36 Indirect costs (58850) ... 709,000 .................... (re. $412,000) 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 38 For services and expenses of administering unemployment insurance 39 programs, job service programs, workforce investment act programs, 40 employability development programs, other miscellaneous programs, 41 and a reserve for unanticipated funding, pursuant to federal grants 42 and contracts. A portion of this appropriation may be used to 43 provide information and advice regarding unemployment insurance 44 benefit appeals and hearing assistance. A portion of this appropri- 45 ation may be transferred to aid to localities. 46 Notwithstanding section 135 of the civil service law, the commissioner 47 of the department of labor, subject to approval of the director of 48 the budget, is hereby authorized to grant additional compensation to 49 employees of the department of labor whose positions are funded in 50 whole or in part by the disabled veterans' outreach program special- 51 ists and/or local veterans' employment representative grant or 580 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 grants based on merit as determined pursuant to the performance 2 incentive program provided for in the grant consistent with the 3 terms of the grant and applicable provisions of federal law. The 4 payment of such extra compensation shall be in addition to and shall 5 not be part of an employee's basic annual salary and shall not 6 affect or impair any performance advancement payments, performance 7 awards, longevity payments or other rights or benefits to which an 8 employee may be entitled. Furthermore, any additional compensation 9 payable pursuant to this subdivision shall not be included as 10 compensation for retirement purposes. The amount appropriated herein 11 shall also include any Reed act funds that may be made available to 12 this state under section 903 of the social security act as amended 13 and in accordance with federal regulations, to be used under the 14 direction of the New York state department of labor subject to 15 approval of the director of the budget to pay the administrative 16 expenses of the employment security program, including the adminis- 17 tration of the unemployment insurance law and the administration of 18 state public employment offices. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 20 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 21 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 22 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 23 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34218). 25 Personal service (50000) ... 622,372,000 .......... (re. $447,750,000) 26 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 416,980,000 ....... (re. $299,331,000) 27 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 359,173,000 ........... (re. $251,953,000) 28 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,475,000 ................ (re. $1,214,000) 29 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 30 Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund 31 Unemployment Insurance Control Fund Account - 25903 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 33 For services and expenses of administering the unemployment insurance 34 control fund program. The amount appropriated herein shall include 35 up to $16,000,000 credited to the unemployment insurance control 36 fund, created pursuant to chapter 5 of the laws of 2000, as costs 37 are incurred for allowable services pursuant to chapter 5 of the 38 laws of 2000 (34218). 39 Personal service (50000) ... 6,528,000 .............. (re. $5,098,000) 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,652,000 ........... (re. $1,467,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 4,273,000 ............... (re. $3,372,000) 42 Indirect costs (58850) ... 147,000 .................... (re. $107,000) 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 44 For services and expenses of administering the unemployment insurance 45 control fund program. The amount appropriated herein shall include 46 up to $16,000,000 credited to the unemployment insurance control 47 fund, created pursuant to chapter 5 of the laws of 2000, as costs 48 are incurred for allowable services pursuant to chapter 5 of the 49 laws of 2000 (34218). 581 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ... 5,408,000 .............. (re. $2,665,000) 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,304,000 ............. (re. $998,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,669,000 ............... (re. $1,916,000) 4 Indirect costs (58850) ... 119,000 ..................... (re. $57,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 6 For services and expenses of administering the unemployment insurance 7 control fund program. The amount appropriated herein shall include 8 up to $16,000,000 credited to the unemployment insurance control 9 fund, created pursuant to chapter 5 of the laws of 2000, as costs 10 are incurred for allowable services pursuant to chapter 5 of the 11 laws of 2000 (34218). 12 Personal service (50000) ... 5,665,000 .............. (re. $2,515,000) 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,141,000 ............. (re. $771,000) 14 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,685,000 ............... (re. $1,692,000) 15 Indirect costs (58850) ... 159,000 ..................... (re. $90,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 17 For services and expenses of administering the unemployment insurance 18 control fund program. The amount appropriated herein shall include 19 up to $16,000,000 credited to the unemployment insurance control 20 fund, created pursuant to chapter 5 of the laws of 2000, as costs 21 are incurred for allowable services pursuant to chapter 5 of the 22 laws of 2000 (34218). 23 Personal service (50000) ... 4,155,000 .............. (re. $2,328,000) 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 868,000 ............... (re. $728,000) 25 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,429,000 ............... (re. $1,306,000) 26 Indirect costs (58850) ... 98,000 ...................... (re. $50,000) 27 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 28 Unemployment Insurance Administration Fund 29 Unemployment Insurance Reemployment Services Account - 25902 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 31 For services and expenses of administering the reemployment services 32 program. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to aid 33 to localities. The amount appropriated herein shall include any 34 moneys credited to the reemployment service fund, created pursuant 35 to chapter 589 of the laws of 1998, as costs are incurred for allow- 36 able services pursuant to chapter 589 of the laws of 1998. 37 Notwithstanding section 581-b of the labor law, or any other provision 38 of law to the contrary, when annual contributions paid into the 39 reemployment services fund by all eligible employers exceed 40 $35,000,000, excess contributions may be used for services and 41 expenses of the unemployment insurance systems modernization 42 project, for services and expenses of administering the unemployment 43 insurance program, and for workforce development and employment and 44 training programs. Services and expenses for workforce development 45 shall be administered in consultation with the state workforce 46 investment board established in article 24-A of the labor law and 47 state agencies responsible for administration of workforce develop- 48 ment programs. The amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated, 582 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 transferred or otherwise made available to any other state depart- 2 ment, agency or public authority (34218). 3 Personal service (50000) ... 52,040,000 ............ (re. $29,869,000) 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 98,309,000 ......... (re. $81,191,000) 5 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 34,060,000 ............. (re. $20,065,000) 6 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,171,000 .................. (re. $551,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 8 For services and expenses of administering the reemployment services 9 program. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to aid 10 to localities. The amount appropriated herein shall include any 11 moneys credited to the reemployment service fund, created pursuant 12 to chapter 589 of the laws of 1998, as costs are incurred for allow- 13 able services pursuant to chapter 589 of the laws of 1998. 14 Notwithstanding section 581-b of the labor law, or any other provision 15 of law to the contrary, when annual contributions paid into the 16 reemployment services fund by all eligible employers exceed 17 $35,000,000, excess contributions may be used for services and 18 expenses of the unemployment insurance systems modernization 19 project, for services and expenses of administering the unemployment 20 insurance program, and for workforce development and employment and 21 training programs. Services and expenses for workforce development 22 shall be administered in consultation with the state workforce 23 investment board established in article 24-A of the labor law and 24 state agencies responsible for administration of workforce develop- 25 ment programs. The amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated, 26 transferred or otherwise made available to any other state depart- 27 ment, agency or public authority (34218). 28 Personal service (50000) ... 47,311,000 ............. (re. $7,292,000) 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 106,001,000 ........ (re. $80,527,000) 30 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 32,106,000 .............. (re. $6,491,000) 31 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,046,000 ................... (re. $79,000) 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 33 For services and expenses of administering the reemployment services 34 program. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to aid 35 to localities. The amount appropriated herein shall include any 36 moneys credited to the reemployment service fund, created pursuant 37 to chapter 589 of the laws of 1998, as costs are incurred for allow- 38 able services pursuant to chapter 589 of the laws of 1998. 39 Notwithstanding section 581-b of the labor law, or any other provision 40 of law to the contrary, when annual contributions paid into the 41 reemployment services fund by all eligible employers exceed 42 $35,000,000, excess contributions may be used for services and 43 expenses of the unemployment insurance systems modernization 44 project, for services and expenses of administering the unemployment 45 insurance program, and for workforce development and employment and 46 training programs. Services and expenses for workforce development 47 shall be administered in consultation with the state workforce 48 investment board established in article 24-A of the labor law and 49 state agencies responsible for administration of workforce develop- 50 ment programs. The amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated, 583 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 transferred or otherwise made available to any other state depart- 2 ment, agency or public authority (34218). 3 Personal service (50000) ... 49,368,000 ............ (re. $15,289,000) 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 97,420,000 ......... (re. $78,921,000) 5 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 32,109,000 ............. (re. $10,518,000) 6 Indirect costs (58850) ... 1,382,000 .................. (re. $632,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 8 For services and expenses of administering the reemployment services 9 program. A portion of this appropriation may be transferred to aid 10 to localities. The amount appropriated herein shall include any 11 moneys credited to the reemployment service fund, created pursuant 12 to chapter 589 of the laws of 1998, as costs are incurred for allow- 13 able services pursuant to chapter 589 of the laws of 1998. 14 Notwithstanding section 581-b of the labor law, or any other provision 15 of law to the contrary, when annual contributions paid into the 16 reemployment services fund by all eligible employers exceed 17 $35,000,000, excess contributions may be used for services and 18 expenses of the unemployment insurance systems modernization 19 project, for services and expenses of administering the unemployment 20 insurance program, and for workforce development and employment and 21 training programs. Services and expenses for workforce development 22 shall be administered in consultation with the state workforce 23 investment board established in article 24-A of the labor law and 24 state agencies responsible for administration of workforce develop- 25 ment programs. The amounts appropriated herein may be suballocated, 26 transferred or otherwise made available to any other state depart- 27 ment, agency or public authority (34218). 28 Personal service (50000) ... 31,744,000 ............. (re. $7,813,000) 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 47,412,000 ......... (re. $12,018,000) 30 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 18,554,000 .............. (re. $3,798,000) 31 Indirect costs (58850) ... 749,000 .................... (re. $115,000) 32 Internal Service Funds 33 Agencies Internal Service Account 34 Labor Contact Center Account - 55071 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 36 For payments related to the planning, development and establishment of 37 a new statewide contact center within the department of tax and 38 finance, the office of children and family services and the depart- 39 ment of labor on behalf of customer state agencies. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, for the 41 purpose of planning, developing and/or implementing the consol- 42 idation of administration, business services, procurement, informa- 43 tion technology and/or other functions shared among agencies to 44 improve the efficiency and effectiveness of government operations, 45 the amounts appropriated herein may be (i) interchanged without 46 limit, (ii) transferred between any other state operations appropri- 47 ations within this agency or to any other state operations appropri- 48 ations of any state department, agency or public authority, and/or 49 (iii) suballocated to any state department, agency or public author- 584 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ity with the approval of the director of the budget who shall file 2 such approval with the department of audit and control and copies 3 thereof with the chairman of the senate finance committee and the 4 chairman of the assembly ways and means committee (34770). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,380,000 ..... (re. $1,750,000) 6 Temporary service (50200) ... 50,000 ................... (re. $49,000) 7 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 50,000 ....... (re. $50,000) 8 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 28,000 .............. (re. $26,000) 9 Travel (54000) ... 5,000 ................................ (re. $4,000) 10 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,051,000 ............ (re. $953,000) 11 Equipment (56000) ... 46,000 ........................... (re. $44,000) 12 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,660,000 ............... (re. $1,220,000) 13 Indirect costs (58800) ... 70,000 ...................... (re. $50,000) 14 EMPLOYMENT AND TRAINING PROGRAM 15 General Fund 16 State Purposes Account - 10050 17 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as 18 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 51 of 19 state finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 20 For services and expenses related to the department of labor's office 21 of just transition. Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of 22 law, the funds appropriated herein may be increased or decreased by 23 transfer between state operations and aid to localities. 24 Funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or transferred to any 25 state department, agency, or public authority for the purposes stat- 26 ed herein (34747). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 3,220,000 ..... (re. $3,016,000) 28 Temporary service (50200) ... 15,000 ................... (re. $15,000) 29 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 15,000 ....... (re. $15,000) 30 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 238,000 .............. (re. $4,000) 31 Travel (54000) ... 5,000 ................................ (re. $1,000) 32 Contractual services (51000) ... [1,000] 237,000 ...... (re. $220,000) 33 Equipment (56000) ... 6,000 ............................. (re. $4,000) 34 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 35 Federal Emergency Employment Act Fund 36 Federal Workforce Investment Act Account - 26001 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 38 For the administration and operation of employment and training 39 programs as funded by grants under the workforce investment act, 40 public law 105-220, and the workforce innovation and opportunity 41 act, public law 113-128, including grants to other governmental 42 units, community-based organizations, non-profit and for profit 43 organizations, suballocations to state departments and agencies and 44 a portion may be transferred to aid to localities, according to the 45 following: 46 For services and expenses of statewide activities, including but not 47 limited to state administration and technical assistance to local 585 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 workforce investment areas, pursuant to an expenditure plan approved 2 by the director of the budget. Of the moneys appropriated herein for 3 statewide activities, the state workforce investment board shall 4 assist the governor in developing programs and identifying activ- 5 ities to be funded through the statewide reserve pursuant to section 6 134 of the federal workforce investment act, PL 105-220, and section 7 134 of the workforce innovation and opportunity act, public law 8 113-128, and the commissioner of labor shall periodically report to 9 the state workforce investment board on such programs and activities 10 which shall be developed giving consideration to the strategic 11 training alliance program and other existing programs. 12 Statewide employment and training activities may include one-to-one 13 business advisement and training for qualified enrollees of the 14 self-employment assistance program which may be operated by the 15 state's small business development centers or the entrepreneurial 16 assistance program (34780). 17 Personal service (50000) ... 19,965,000 ............ (re. $13,638,000) 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 9,231,000 ........... (re. $7,577,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 13,067,000 .............. (re. $9,081,000) 20 For services and expenses of adult, youth and dislocated worker 21 employment and training local workforce investment area programs and 22 statewide rapid response activities (34779). 23 Personal service (50000) ... 3,938,000 .............. (re. $2,069,000) 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 20,605,000 ......... (re. $20,213,000) 25 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,577,000 ............... (re. $1,391,000) 26 For services and expenses of miscellaneous workforce investment act, 27 public law 105-220, and workforce innovation and opportunity act, 28 public law 113-128, national reserve grants and other federal 29 employment and training grants and federally administered programs 30 (34778). 31 Personal service (50000) ... 3,000,000 .............. (re. $2,952,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 15,036,000 ......... (re. $15,029,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,964,000 ............... (re. $1,933,000) 34 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 35 For the administration and operation of employment and training 36 programs as funded by grants under the workforce investment act, 37 public law 105-220, and the workforce innovation and opportunity 38 act, public law 113-128, including grants to other governmental 39 units, community-based organizations, non-profit and for profit 40 organizations, suballocations to state departments and agencies and 41 a portion may be transferred to aid to localities, according to the 42 following: 43 For services and expenses of statewide activities, including but not 44 limited to state administration and technical assistance to local 45 workforce investment areas, pursuant to an expenditure plan approved 46 by the director of the budget. Of the moneys appropriated herein for 47 statewide activities, the state workforce investment board shall 48 assist the governor in developing programs and identifying activ- 49 ities to be funded through the statewide reserve pursuant to section 50 134 of the federal workforce investment act, PL 105-220, and section 51 134 of the workforce innovation and opportunity act, public law 586 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 113-128, and the commissioner of labor shall periodically report to 2 the state workforce investment board on such programs and activities 3 which shall be developed giving consideration to the strategic 4 training alliance program and other existing programs. 5 Statewide employment and training activities may include one-to-one 6 business advisement and training for qualified enrollees of the 7 self-employment assistance program which may be operated by the 8 state's small business development centers or the entrepreneurial 9 assistance program (34780). 10 Personal service (50000) ... 18,612,000 ............. (re. $7,730,000) 11 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 11,860,000 .......... (re. $7,312,000) 12 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 12,630,000 .............. (re. $5,660,000) 13 For services and expenses of adult, youth and dislocated worker 14 employment and training local workforce investment area programs and 15 statewide rapid response activities (34779). 16 Personal service (50000) ... 3,244,000 ................ (re. $988,000) 17 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 19,596,000 ......... (re. $16,408,000) 18 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,201,000 ................. (re. $739,000) 19 For services and expenses of miscellaneous workforce investment act, 20 public law 105-220, and workforce innovation and opportunity act, 21 public law 113-128, national reserve grants and other federal 22 employment and training grants and federally administered programs 23 (34778). 24 Personal service (50000) ... 3,000,000 .............. (re. $2,952,000) 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 14,964,000 ......... (re. $14,950,000) 26 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,036,000 ............... (re. $2,005,000) 27 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as 28 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 51 of 29 state finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 30 For the administration and operation of employment and training 31 programs as funded by grants under the workforce investment act, 32 public law 105-220, and the workforce innovation and opportunity 33 act, public law 113-128, including grants to other governmental 34 units, community-based organizations, non-profit and for profit 35 organizations, suballocations to state departments and agencies and 36 a portion may be transferred to aid to localities, according to the 37 following: 38 For services and expenses of statewide activities, including but not 39 limited to state administration and technical assistance to local 40 workforce investment areas, pursuant to an expenditure plan approved 41 by the director of the budget. Of the moneys appropriated herein for 42 statewide activities, the state workforce investment board shall 43 assist the governor in developing programs and identifying activ- 44 ities to be funded through the statewide reserve pursuant to section 45 134 of the federal workforce investment act, PL 105-220, and section 46 134 of the workforce innovation and opportunity act, public law 47 113-128, and the commissioner of labor shall periodically report to 48 the state workforce investment board on such programs and activities 49 which shall be developed giving consideration to the strategic 50 training alliance program and other existing programs. 587 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Statewide employment and training activities may include one-to-one 2 business advisement and training for qualified enrollees of the 3 self-employment assistance program which may be operated by the 4 state's small business development centers or the entrepreneurial 5 assistance program (34780). 6 Personal service (50000) ... 18,095,000 ............. (re. $7,525,000) 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) .......................................... 8 [11,619,000] 22,619,000 .......................... (re. $13,289,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 11,769,000 .............. (re. $5,092,000) 10 For services and expenses of adult, youth and dislocated worker 11 employment and training local workforce investment area programs and 12 statewide rapid response activities (34779). 13 Personal service (50000) ... 3,279,000 ................. (re. $45,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 17,260,000 .......... (re. $9,178,000) 15 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,133,000 .................. (re. $68,000) 16 For services and expenses of miscellaneous workforce investment act, 17 public law 105-220, and workforce innovation and opportunity act, 18 public law 113-128, national reserve grants and other federal 19 employment and training grants and federally administered programs 20 (34778). 21 Personal service (50000) ... 3,000,000 .............. (re. $1,515,000) 22 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 15,049,000 ......... (re. $14,431,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,951,000 ............... (re. $1,009,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 25 For the administration and operation of employment and training 26 programs as funded by grants under the workforce investment act, 27 public law 105-220, and the workforce innovation and opportunity 28 act, public law 113-128, including grants to other governmental 29 units, community-based organizations, non-profit and for profit 30 organizations, suballocations to state departments and agencies and 31 a portion may be transferred to aid to localities, according to the 32 following: 33 For services and expenses of statewide activities, including but not 34 limited to state administration and technical assistance to local 35 workforce investment areas, pursuant to an expenditure plan approved 36 by the director of the budget. Of the moneys appropriated herein for 37 statewide activities, the state workforce investment board shall 38 assist the governor in developing programs and identifying activ- 39 ities to be funded through the statewide reserve pursuant to section 40 134 of the federal workforce investment act, PL 105-220, and section 41 134 of the workforce innovation and opportunity act, public law 42 113-128, and the commissioner of labor shall periodically report to 43 the state workforce investment board on such programs and activities 44 which shall be developed giving consideration to the strategic 45 training alliance program and other existing programs. 46 Statewide employment and training activities may include one-to-one 47 business advisement and training for qualified enrollees of the 48 self-employment assistance program which may be operated by the 49 state's small business development centers or the entrepreneurial 50 assistance program (34780). 51 Personal service (50000) ... 13,100,000 ............... (re. $978,000) 588 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,465,000 .......... (re. $1,789,000) 2 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 7,560,000 ................. (re. $940,000) 3 For services and expenses of adult, youth and dislocated worker 4 employment and training local workforce investment area programs and 5 statewide rapid response activities (34779). 6 Personal service (50000) ... 3,499,000 ................ (re. $369,000) 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 7,474,000 ........... (re. $2,414,000) 8 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,019,000 .................. (re. $68,000) 9 For services and expenses of miscellaneous workforce investment act, 10 public law 105-220, and workforce innovation and opportunity act, 11 public law 113-128, national reserve grants and other federal 12 employment and training grants and federally administered programs 13 (34778). 14 Personal service (50000) ... 3,000,000 ................ (re. $596,000) 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 15,269,000 .......... (re. $9,240,000) 16 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,731,000 ................. (re. $735,000) 17 Special Revenue Funds - Other 18 Unemployment Insurance Interest and Penalty Fund 19 Unemployment Insurance Interest and Penalty Account - 23601 20 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as 21 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 51 of 22 state finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 23 For services and expenses of the department of labor employment and 24 training programs (34222). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,476,000 ..... (re. $2,472,000) 26 Temporary service (50200) ... 3,000 ..................... (re. $3,000) 27 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 3,000 ......... (re. $3,000) 28 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 135,000 ............ (re. $132,000) 29 Travel (54000) ... 21,000 .............................. (re. $17,000) 30 Contractual services (51000) ... [699,000] 731,334 .... (re. $731,000) 31 Equipment (56000) ... 50,000 ........................... (re. $50,000) 32 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,665,000 ............... (re. $1,631,000) 33 Indirect costs (58800) ... 68,000 ...................... (re. $67,000) 34 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 35 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 51 of 36 state finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 37 For services and expenses of the department of labor employment and 38 training programs (34222). 39 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,476,000 ..... (re. $2,439,000) 40 Temporary service (50200) ... 3,000 ..................... (re. $3,000) 41 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 3,000 ......... (re. $2,000) 42 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 92,000 .............. (re. $82,000) 43 Travel (54000) ... 21,000 .............................. (re. $16,000) 44 Contractual services (51000) ... [687,000] 774,186 .... (re. $764,000) 45 Equipment (56000) ... 50,000 ........................... (re. $50,000) 46 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,710,000 ............... (re. $1,609,000) 47 Indirect costs (58800) ... 78,000 ...................... (re. $66,000) 48 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 589 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of the department of labor employment and 2 training programs (34222). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,524,000 ..... (re. $2,513,000) 4 Temporary service (50200) ... 3,000 ..................... (re. $3,000) 5 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 3,000 ......... (re. $3,000) 6 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 92,000 .............. (re. $80,000) 7 Travel (54000) ... 21,000 .............................. (re. $20,000) 8 Contractual services (51000) ... 688,000 .............. (re. $686,000) 9 Equipment (56000) ... 50,000 ........................... (re. $50,000) 10 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,667,000 ............... (re. $1,657,000) 11 Indirect costs (58800) ... 72,000 ...................... (re. $68,000) 12 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as 13 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 51 of 14 state finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 15 For services and expenses of the department of labor employment and 16 training programs (34222). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,255,000 ..... (re. $2,149,000) 18 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 89,000 .............. (re. $80,000) 19 Travel (54000) ... 20,000 .............................. (re. $20,000) 20 Contractual services (51000) ... 665,000 .............. (re. $599,000) 21 Equipment (56000) ... 49,000 ........................... (re. $32,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60000) ... [1,411,000] 1,483,020 ... (re. $1,414,000) 23 Indirect costs (58800) ... 78,000 ...................... (re. $58,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 25 For services and expenses of the department of labor employment and 26 training programs (34222). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,255,000 ..... (re. $1,955,000) 28 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 89,000 .............. (re. $69,000) 29 Travel (54000) ... 20,000 .............................. (re. $20,000) 30 Contractual services (51000) ... 665,000 .............. (re. $323,000) 31 Equipment (56000) ... 49,000 ........................... (re. $45,000) 32 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,411,000 ............... (re. $1,286,000) 33 Indirect costs (58800) ... 78,000 ...................... (re. $53,000) 34 LABOR STANDARDS PROGRAM 35 Special Revenue Funds - Other 36 Child Performer Protection Fund 37 DOL-Child Performer Protection Account - 20401 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 39 For services and expenses related to labor standards program enforce- 40 ment activities (34788). 41 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 390,000 ......... (re. $230,000) 42 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 15,000 .............. (re. $13,000) 43 Travel (54000) ... 2,000 ................................ (re. $2,000) 44 Contractual services (51000) ... 84,000 ................ (re. $75,000) 45 Equipment (56000) ... 6,000 ............................. (re. $6,000) 46 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 263,000 ................... (re. $153,000) 47 Indirect costs (58800) ... 11,000 ....................... (re. $6,000) 590 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 2 For services and expenses related to labor standards program enforce- 3 ment activities (34788). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 390,000 ......... (re. $166,000) 5 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 14,000 .............. (re. $10,000) 6 Travel (54000) ... 2,000 ................................ (re. $2,000) 7 Contractual services (51000) ... 77,000 ................ (re. $74,000) 8 Equipment (56000) ... 5,000 ............................. (re. $3,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 270,000 ................... (re. $104,000) 10 Indirect costs (58800) ... 13,000 ....................... (re. $4,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 12 For services and expenses related to labor standards program enforce- 13 ment activities (34788). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 397,000 ......... (re. $179,000) 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 15,000 .............. (re. $10,000) 16 Travel (54000) ... 2,000 ................................ (re. $2,000) 17 Contractual services (51000) ... 77,000 ................ (re. $57,000) 18 Equipment (56000) ... 5,000 ............................. (re. $4,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 263,000 ................... (re. $118,000) 20 Indirect costs (58800) ... 12,000 ....................... (re. $5,000) 21 Special Revenue Funds - Other 22 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 23 DOL-Fee and Penalty Account - 21923 24 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as 25 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 51 of 26 state finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 27 For services and expenses related to labor standards program enforce- 28 ment activities (34788). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 8,744,000 ..... (re. $8,644,000) 30 Supplies and materials (57000) ... [43,000] 64,000 ..... (re. $64,000) 31 Travel (54000) ... [30,000] 50,000 ..................... (re. $37,000) 32 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,341,000 .......... (re. $1,232,000) 33 Equipment (56000) ... [60,000] 130,000 ................ (re. $130,000) 34 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 5,863,000 ............... (re. $5,689,000) 35 Indirect costs (58800) ... 239,000 .................... (re. $234,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 37 For services and expenses related to labor standards program enforce- 38 ment activities (34788). 39 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 8,743,000 ..... (re. $6,243,000) 40 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 17,000 .............. (re. $17,000) 41 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,181,000 ............ (re. $388,000) 42 Equipment (56000) ... 60,000 ........................... (re. $60,000) 43 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 6,021,000 ............... (re. $4,109,000) 44 Indirect costs (58800) ... 272,000 .................... (re. $169,000) 45 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as 46 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 51 of 47 state finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 591 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to labor standards program enforce- 2 ment activities (34788). 3 Contractual services (51000) ......................................... 4 [1,183,000] 3,835,313 ............................. (re. $1,983,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 6 For services and expenses related to labor standards program enforce- 7 ment activities (34788). 8 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,099,000 ............ (re. $478,000) 9 Special Revenue Funds - Other 10 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 11 Public Work Enforcement Account - 21998 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 13 For services and expenses to implement chapter 511 of the laws of 1995 14 as amended by chapter 513 of the laws of 1997, chapter 655 of the 15 laws of 1999, chapter 376 of the laws of 2003 and chapter 407 of the 16 laws of 2005 (34788). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,251,000 ..... (re. $2,043,000) 18 Temporary service (50200) ... 9,000 ..................... (re. $6,000) 19 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 2,000 ......... (re. $2,000) 20 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 78,000 .............. (re. $35,000) 21 Travel (54000) ... 68,000 .............................. (re. $46,000) 22 Contractual services (51000) ... 886,000 .............. (re. $501,000) 23 Equipment (56000) ... 45,000 ........................... (re. $27,000) 24 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,858,000 ............... (re. $1,363,000) 25 Indirect costs (58800) ... 117,000 ..................... (re. $56,000) 26 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 27 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 51 of 28 state finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 29 For services and expenses to implement chapter 511 of the laws of 1995 30 as amended by chapter 513 of the laws of 1997, chapter 655 of the 31 laws of 1999, chapter 376 of the laws of 2003 and chapter 407 of the 32 laws of 2005 (34788). 33 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,251,000 ..... (re. $1,070,000) 34 Temporary service (50200) ... 9,000 ..................... (re. $4,000) 35 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ................................ 36 [2,000] 7,000 ......................................... (re. $4,000) 37 Contractual services (51000) ... 801,000 .............. (re. $486,000) 38 Equipment (56000) ... 45,000 ............................ (re. $7,000) 39 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,935,000 ................. (re. $517,000) 40 Indirect costs (58800) ... 133,000 ..................... (re. $21,000) 41 Special Revenue Funds - Other 42 Training and Education Program on Occupational Safety and Health Fund 43 OSHA-Training and Education Account - 21251 44 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as 45 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 51 of 46 state finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 592 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to labor standards program enforce- 2 ment activities. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 4 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 6 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 7 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 8 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34788). 9 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 9,354,000 ..... (re. $3,461,000) 10 Temporary service (50200) ... 36,000 ................... (re. $22,000) 11 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ................................ 12 [11,000] 161,000 .................................... (re. $139,000) 13 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 230,000 ............ (re. $190,000) 14 Travel (54000) ... 120,000 ............................. (re. $93,000) 15 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,984,000 .......... (re. $1,237,000) 16 Equipment (56000) ... [174,000] 219,000 ............... (re. $189,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 6,304,000 ............... (re. $2,404,000) 18 Indirect costs (58800) ... 257,000 ..................... (re. $99,000) 19 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 20 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 51 of 21 state finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 22 For services and expenses related to labor standards program enforce- 23 ment activities. 24 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 25 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 26 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 27 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 28 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 29 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34788). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 9,353,000 ....... (re. $479,000) 31 Temporary service (50200) ... 36,000 ................... (re. $17,000) 32 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ................................ 33 [11,000] 151,000 .................................... (re. $146,000) 34 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 216,000 ............. (re. $57,000) 35 Travel (54000) ... 110,000 ............................. (re. $32,000) 36 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,804,000 ............ (re. $887,000) 37 Equipment (56000) ... 174,000 .......................... (re. $50,000) 38 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 6,473,000 ................. (re. $417,000) 39 Indirect costs (58800) ... 293,000 ..................... (re. $17,000) 40 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 41 For services and expenses related to labor standards program enforce- 42 ment activities. 43 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 44 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 45 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 46 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 47 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 48 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34788). 49 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 216,000 ............. (re. $30,000) 50 Travel (54000) ... 110,000 ............................. (re. $79,000) 593 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,804,000 .......... (re. $1,255,000) 2 Equipment (56000) ... 174,000 ......................... (re. $108,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 4 For services and expenses related to labor standards program enforce- 5 ment activities. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 7 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 8 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 9 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 10 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34788). 12 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 185,000 ............. (re. $75,000) 13 Travel (54000) ... 112,000 ............................. (re. $98,000) 14 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,447,000 ............ (re. $675,000) 15 OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH PROGRAM 16 Special Revenue Funds - Other 17 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 18 DOL-Fee and Penalty Account - 21923 19 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as 20 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 51 of 21 state finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 22 For services and expenses related to occupational safety and health 23 program enforcement activities (34203). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 3,900,000 ..... (re. $3,644,000) 25 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 575,000 ............ (re. $515,000) 26 Travel (54000) ... 575,000 ............................ (re. $368,000) 27 Contractual services (51000) ......................................... 28 [1,356,000] 1,405,720 ............................. (re. $1,363,000) 29 Equipment (56000) ... 110,000 .......................... (re. $43,000) 30 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,615,000 ............... (re. $2,401,000) 31 Indirect costs (58800) ... 107,000 ..................... (re. $99,000) 32 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 33 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 51 of 34 state finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 35 For services and expenses related to occupational safety and health 36 program enforcement activities (34203). 37 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 3,899,000 ..... (re. $3,269,000) 38 Supplies and materials (57000) ... [575,000] 595,000 .. (re. $595,000) 39 Travel (54000) ... 575,000 ............................ (re. $435,000) 40 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,282,000 ............ (re. $313,000) 41 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 .......................... (re. $87,000) 42 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,685,000 ............... (re. $2,151,000) 43 Indirect costs (58800) ... 122,000 ..................... (re. $89,000) 44 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 45 For services and expenses related to occupational safety and health 46 program enforcement activities (34203). 594 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,283,000 ............ (re. $747,000) 2 Special Revenue Funds - Other 3 Training and Education Program on Occupational Safety and Health Fund 4 Occupational Safety and Health Inspection Account - 21252 5 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024, as 6 supplemented by an interchange in accordance with section 51 of 7 state finance law, is hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 8 For services and expenses related to occupational safety and health 9 program enforcement activities. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 11 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 12 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 13 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 14 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 15 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34203). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 12,900,000 .... (re. $6,561,000) 17 Temporary service (50200) ... 34,000 ................... (re. $26,000) 18 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 40,000 ....... (re. $23,000) 19 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 143,000 ............. (re. $87,000) 20 Travel (54000) ... 400,000 ............................ (re. $202,000) 21 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,540,000 .......... (re. $1,685,000) 22 Equipment (56000) ... [131,000] 251,000 ............... (re. $139,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 8,700,000 ............... (re. $4,372,000) 24 Indirect costs (58800) ... 355,000 .................... (re. $180,000) 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 26 For services and expenses related to occupational safety and health 27 program enforcement activities. 28 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 29 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 30 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 31 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 32 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 33 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34203). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 12,900,000 .... (re. $7,126,000) 35 Temporary service (50200) ... 34,000 ................... (re. $24,000) 36 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 40,000 ....... (re. $24,000) 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 123,000 ............. (re. $32,000) 38 Travel (54000) ... 368,000 ............................ (re. $153,000) 39 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,314,000 .......... (re. $1,979,000) 40 Equipment (56000) ... 126,000 ......................... (re. $107,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 8,934,000 ............... (re. $4,420,000) 42 Indirect costs (58800) ... 404,000 .................... (re. $182,000) 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 50, 44 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 45 For services and expenses related to occupational safety and health 46 program enforcement activities. 47 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 48 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 595 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 2 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 3 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 4 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34203). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 13,166,000 .... (re. $1,372,000) 6 Travel (54000) ... 368,000 ............................. (re. $80,000) 7 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,372,000 .......... (re. $1,292,000) 8 Equipment (56000) ... 426,000 ......................... (re. $110,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 8,689,000 ................. (re. $903,000) 10 Indirect costs (58800) ... 373,000 ..................... (re. $37,000) 11 Special Revenue Funds - Other 12 Training and Education Program on Occupational Safety and Health Fund 13 OSHA-Training and Education Account - 21251 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 15 For services and expenses related to occupational safety and health 16 program enforcement activities, services and expenses associated 17 with reporting requirements included in the workers' compensation 18 reform law of 2007 as well as activities previously funded from the 19 department of labor general fund administration appropriation. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 21 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 23 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 24 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34203). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,460,000 ..... (re. $3,149,000) 27 Temporary service (50200) ... 44,000 ................... (re. $34,000) 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 11,000 ........ (re. $6,000) 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 110,000 ............. (re. $81,000) 30 Travel (54000) ... 87,000 .............................. (re. $76,000) 31 Contractual services (51000) ... 7,191,000 .......... (re. $6,778,000) 32 Equipment (56000) ... 96,000 ........................... (re. $83,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 3,029,000 ............... (re. $2,102,000) 34 Indirect costs (58800) ... 125,000 ..................... (re. $86,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 36 For services and expenses related to occupational safety and health 37 program enforcement activities, services and expenses associated 38 with reporting requirements included in the workers' compensation 39 reform law of 2007 as well as activities previously funded from the 40 department of labor general fund administration appropriation. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 42 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 43 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 44 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 45 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 46 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34203). 47 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,460,000 ..... (re. $2,431,000) 48 Temporary service (50200) ... 44,000 ................... (re. $22,000) 49 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 11,000 ........ (re. $4,000) 596 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 105,000 ............. (re. $48,000) 2 Travel (54000) ... 87,000 .............................. (re. $67,000) 3 Contractual services (51000) ... 7,102,000 .......... (re. $3,559,000) 4 Equipment (56000) ... 91,000 ........................... (re. $57,000) 5 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 3,112,000 ............... (re. $1,558,000) 6 Indirect costs (58800) ... 141,000 ..................... (re. $64,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 8 For services and expenses related to occupational safety and health 9 program enforcement activities, services and expenses associated 10 with reporting requirements included in the workers' compensation 11 reform law of 2007 as well as activities previously funded from the 12 department of labor general fund administration appropriation. 13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 14 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 15 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 16 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 17 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 18 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34203). 19 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,536,000 ..... (re. $2,877,000) 20 Temporary service (50200) ... 44,000 ................... (re. $20,000) 21 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 11,000 ........ (re. $5,000) 22 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 105,000 ............. (re. $67,000) 23 Travel (54000) ... 90,000 .............................. (re. $67,000) 24 Contractual services (51000) ... 7,104,000 .......... (re. $4,215,000) 25 Equipment (56000) ... 109,000 .......................... (re. $69,000) 26 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 3,024,000 ............... (re. $1,910,000) 27 Indirect costs (58800) ... 130,000 ..................... (re. $79,000) 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 29 For services and expenses related to occupational safety and health 30 program enforcement activities, services and expenses associated 31 with reporting requirements included in the workers' compensation 32 reform law of 2007 as well as activities previously funded from the 33 department of labor general fund administration appropriation. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 35 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 36 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 37 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 38 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 39 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34203). 40 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 3,512,000 ..... (re. $1,959,000) 41 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 87,000 .............. (re. $58,000) 42 Travel (54000) ... 92,000 .............................. (re. $86,000) 43 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,859,000 .......... (re. $3,275,000) 44 Equipment (56000) ... 90,000 ........................... (re. $66,000) 45 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,227,000 ............... (re. $1,289,000) 46 Indirect costs (58800) ... 125,000 ..................... (re. $53,000) 47 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 48 For services and expenses related to occupational safety and health 49 program enforcement activities, services and expenses associated 597 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 with reporting requirements included in the workers' compensation 2 reform law of 2007 as well as activities previously funded from the 3 department of labor general fund administration appropriation. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 5 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 6 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 7 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 8 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (34203). 10 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,859,000 ........... (re.$1,741,000) 598 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LAW STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 185,010,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 52,877,000 39,760,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 138,563,000 0 6 Internal Service Funds ............. 22,734,000 0 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 399,184,000 39,760,000 9 ================ ================ 10 SCHEDULE 11 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 26,193,000 12 -------------- 13 General Fund 14 State Purposes Account - 10050 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 administration program. 17 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 18 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 19 changed or transferred without limit to 20 any other appropriation in any other 21 program or fund within the department of 22 law, with the approval of the director of 23 the budget (81001). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 20,875,000 25 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 146,000 26 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 28,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,000,000 28 Travel (54000) ................................... 107,000 29 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,794,000 30 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,243,000 31 -------------- 32 APPEALS AND OPINIONS PROGRAM ................................ 11,786,000 33 -------------- 34 General Fund 35 State Purposes Account - 10050 36 For services and expenses related to the 37 appeals and opinions program. 38 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 39 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 40 changed or transferred without limit to 41 any other appropriation in any other 599 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LAW STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 program or fund within the department of 2 law, with the approval of the director of 3 the budget (35109). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 10,637,000 5 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 27,000 6 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 8,000 7 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 450,000 8 Travel (54000) .................................... 20,000 9 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 644,000 10 -------------- 11 CANNABIS MANAGEMENT PROGRAM .................................. 2,817,000 12 -------------- 13 General Fund 14 State Purposes Account - 10050 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 cannabis management program. 17 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 18 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 19 changed or transferred without limit to 20 any other appropriation in any other 21 program or fund within the department of 22 law, with the approval of the director of 23 the budget (35122). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,200,000 25 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 2,000 26 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 25,000 27 Travel (54000) .................................... 30,000 28 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 560,000 29 -------------- 30 COUNSEL FOR THE STATE PROGRAM .............................. 111,723,000 31 -------------- 32 General Fund 33 State Purposes Account - 10050 34 For services and expenses related to the 35 counsel for the state program. 36 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 37 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 38 changed or transferred without limit to 39 any other appropriation in any other 40 program or fund within the department of 41 law, with the approval of the director of 42 the budget (35110). 600 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LAW STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 50,352,000 2 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 881,000 3 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 35,000 4 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 3,000 5 Travel (54000) .................................... 60,000 6 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,111,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal .................. 54,442,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Environmental Protection and Oil Spill Compensation Fund 12 Department of Environmental Conservation Account - 21206 13 For services and expenses related to the oil 14 spill program, including suballocation to 15 other state departments and agencies 16 (35110). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,734,000 18 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 19 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,045,000 20 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 47,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ................... 2,876,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Other 25 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 26 Litigation Settlement and Civil Recovery Account - 22117 27 For services and expenses related to the 28 counsel for the state program. 29 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 30 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 31 changed or transferred without limit to 32 any other appropriation in any other 33 program or fund within the department of 34 law, with the approval of the director of 35 the budget (35110). 36 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,340,000 37 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 38 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,220,000 39 Travel (54000) ................................... 840,000 40 Contractual services (51000) .................. 22,536,000 41 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,616,000 42 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 118,000 43 -------------- 44 Program account subtotal .................. 31,671,000 45 -------------- 601 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LAW STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Internal Service Funds 2 Agencies Internal Service Fund 3 Civil Recoveries Account - 55074 4 For services and expenses related to the 5 counsel for the state program. 6 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 7 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 8 changed or transferred without limit to 9 any other appropriation in any other 10 program or fund within the department of 11 law, with the approval of the director of 12 the budget (35110). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 9,854,000 14 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 15,000 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 16 Contractual services (51000) ................... 6,650,000 17 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 5,947,000 18 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 267,000 19 -------------- 20 Program account subtotal .................. 22,734,000 21 -------------- 22 CRIMINAL INVESTIGATIONS PROGRAM ............................. 18,891,000 23 -------------- 24 General Fund 25 State Purposes Account - 10050 26 For services and expenses related to the 27 criminal investigations program. 28 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 29 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 30 changed or transferred without limit to 31 any other appropriation in any other 32 program or fund within the department of 33 law, with the approval of the director of 34 the budget (35111). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 16,406,000 36 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 1,006,000 37 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 27,000 38 Travel (54000) ................................... 267,000 39 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 285,000 40 Equipment (56000) ................................ 900,000 41 -------------- 42 CRIMINAL JUSTICE PROGRAM .................................... 24,134,000 43 -------------- 44 General Fund 602 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LAW STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 State Purposes Account - 10050 2 For services and expenses related to the 3 criminal justice program. 4 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 5 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 6 changed or transferred without limit to 7 any other appropriation in any other 8 program or fund within the department of 9 law, with the approval of the director of 10 the budget (35112). 11 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 11,217,000 12 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 44,000 13 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 14 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 14,000 15 Travel (54000) .................................... 60,000 16 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,290,000 17 -------------- 18 Total amount available ...................... 12,635,000 19 -------------- 20 For services and expenses related to the 21 office of special investigations (OSI) 22 (35118). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 6,530,000 24 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 243,000 25 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 94,000 26 Travel (54000) .................................... 80,000 27 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,117,000 28 Equipment (56000) ................................ 478,000 29 -------------- 30 Total amount available ....................... 8,542,000 31 -------------- 32 Program account subtotal .................. 21,177,000 33 -------------- 34 Special Revenue Funds - Other 35 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 36 Department of Law Seized Assets Account - 21990 37 For services and expenses related to the 38 criminal justice program. 39 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 40 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 41 changed or transferred without limit to 42 any other appropriation in any other 43 program or fund within the department of 44 law, with the approval of the director of 45 the budget (35112). 603 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LAW STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 146,000 2 Equipment (56000) ................................ 334,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal ..................... 480,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 8 Equitable Sharing-Law Justice Account - 22221 9 For services and expenses related to the 10 criminal justice program. 11 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 12 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 13 changed or transferred without limit to 14 any other appropriation in any other 15 program or fund within the department of 16 law, with the approval of the director of 17 the budget (35112). 18 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 325,000 19 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 622,000 20 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,052,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ................... 1,999,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Other 25 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 26 Equitable Sharing-Law Treasury Account - 22222 27 For services and expenses related to the 28 criminal justice program. 29 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 30 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 31 changed or transferred without limit to 32 any other appropriation in any other 33 program or fund within the department of 34 law, with the approval of the director of 35 the budget (35112). 36 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 145,000 37 Equipment (56000) ................................ 333,000 38 -------------- 39 Program account subtotal ..................... 478,000 40 -------------- 41 DEED THEFT INTERVENTION PROGRAM .............................. 2,154,000 42 -------------- 43 General Fund 44 State Purposes Account - 10050 604 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LAW STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 deed theft intervention program. Notwith- 3 standing any law to the contrary, the 4 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 5 changed or transferred without limit to 6 any other appropriation in any other 7 program or fund within the department of 8 law, with the approval of the director of 9 the budget (35121). 10 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,154,000 11 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,000,000 12 -------------- 13 ECONOMIC JUSTICE PROGRAM .................................... 46,915,000 14 -------------- 15 General Fund 16 State Purposes Account - 10050 17 For services and expenses related to the 18 economic justice program. 19 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 20 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 21 changed or transferred without limit to 22 any other appropriation in any other 23 program or fund within the department of 24 law, with the approval of the director of 25 the budget (35113). 26 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 185,000 27 -------------- 28 Program account subtotal ..................... 185,000 29 -------------- 30 Special Revenue Funds - Other 31 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 32 Litigation Settlement and Civil Recovery Account - 22117 33 For services and expenses related to the 34 economic justice program. 35 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 36 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 37 changed or transferred without limit to 38 any other appropriation in any other 39 program or fund within the department of 40 law, with the approval of the director of 41 the budget (35113). 42 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 20,536,000 43 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 42,000 44 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 56,000 605 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LAW STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Travel (54000) ................................... 150,000 2 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,233,000 3 Equipment (56000) .............................. 2,165,000 4 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 12,400,000 5 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 558,000 6 -------------- 7 Program account subtotal .................. 43,140,000 8 -------------- 9 Special Revenue Funds - Other 10 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 11 Real Estate Finance Account - 22154 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 economic justice program. 14 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 15 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 16 changed or transferred without limit to 17 any other appropriation in any other 18 program or fund within the department of 19 law, with the approval of the director of 20 the budget (35113). 21 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,345,000 22 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 23 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 8,000 24 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,365,000 25 Equipment (56000) .................................. 8,000 26 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 817,000 27 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 37,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal ................... 3,590,000 30 -------------- 31 MEDICAID FRAUD CONTROL PROGRAM .............................. 70,503,000 32 -------------- 33 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 34 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 35 Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25117 36 For services and expenses related to grants 37 for the investigation and prosecution of 38 medicaid fraud. 39 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 40 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 41 changed or transferred without limit to 42 any other appropriation in any other 43 program or fund within the department of 44 law, with the approval of the director of 45 the budget (35114). 606 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LAW STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ...................... 25,473,000 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 7,346,000 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ....................... 16,212,000 4 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 3,846,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal .................. 52,877,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Other 9 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 10 Medicaid Fraud Seized Assets Account - 21917 11 For services and expenses related to the 12 medicaid fraud control program. 13 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 14 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 15 changed or transferred without limit to 16 any other appropriation in any other 17 program or fund within the department of 18 law, with the approval of the director of 19 the budget (35114). 20 Equipment (56000) ................................ 160,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ..................... 160,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Other 25 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 26 Recoveries and Revenue Account - 22041 27 For services and expenses related to the 28 medicaid fraud control program. 29 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 30 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 31 changed or transferred without limit to 32 any other appropriation in any other 33 program or fund within the department of 34 law, with the approval of the director of 35 the budget (35114). 36 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 8,461,000 37 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 30,000 38 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 88,000 39 Travel (54000) ................................... 225,000 40 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,587,000 41 Equipment (56000) ................................ 549,000 42 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 5,404,000 43 Indirect costs (58800) ......................... 1,122,000 44 -------------- 45 Program account subtotal .................. 17,466,000 46 -------------- 607 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LAW STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 REGIONAL OFFICES PROGRAM .................................... 29,783,000 2 -------------- 3 General Fund 4 State Purposes Account - 10050 5 For services and expenses related to the 6 regional offices program. 7 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 8 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 9 changed or transferred without limit to 10 any other appropriation in any other 11 program or fund within the department of 12 law, with the approval of the director of 13 the budget (35115). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 25,076,000 15 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 100,000 16 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 3,000 17 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 142,000 18 Travel (54000) ................................... 130,000 19 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,332,000 20 -------------- 21 SOCIAL JUSTICE PROGRAM ...................................... 54,285,000 22 -------------- 23 General Fund 24 State Purposes Account - 10050 25 For services and expenses related to the 26 social justice program. 27 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 28 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 29 changed or transferred without limit to 30 any other appropriation in any other 31 program or fund within the department of 32 law, with the approval of the director of 33 the budget (35116). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 10,901,000 35 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 130,000 36 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 28,000 37 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 55,000 38 Travel (54000) .................................... 20,000 39 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,270,000 40 Equipment (56000) ................................. 50,000 41 -------------- 42 Total amount available ...................... 14,454,000 43 -------------- 608 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LAW STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the law 2 enforcement misconduct investigative 3 office (LEMIO) (35119). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,544,000 5 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 4,000 6 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 36,000 7 Travel (54000) .................................... 55,000 8 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 417,000 9 Equipment (56000) ................................. 72,000 10 -------------- 11 Total amount available ....................... 3,128,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal .................. 17,582,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other 16 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 17 Anti-Discrimination in Housing Account - 22254 18 For services and expenses related to the 19 social justice program. The amounts appro- 20 priated herein shall be made available for 21 fair housing compliance as outlined in 22 section 80-a of the state finance law 23 (35116). 24 Contractual Services (51000) ................... 2,000,000 25 -------------- 26 Program account subtotal ................... 2,000,000 27 -------------- 28 Special Revenue Funds - Other 29 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 30 Litigation Settlement and Civil Recovery Account - 22117 31 For services and expenses related to the 32 social justice program. 33 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 34 amounts herein appropriated may be inter- 35 changed or transferred without limit to 36 any other appropriation in any other 37 program or fund within the department of 38 law, with the approval of the director of 39 the budget (35116). 40 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 17,020,000 41 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 16,000 42 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 100,000 43 Travel (54000) ................................... 197,000 44 Contractual services (51000) ................... 6,642,000 609 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LAW STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 10,266,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 462,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal .................. 34,703,000 5 -------------- 610 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF LAW STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 MEDICAID FRAUD CONTROL PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 4 Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25117 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to grants for the investigation and 7 prosecution of medicaid fraud. 8 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the amounts herein appropri- 9 ated may be interchanged or transferred without limit to any other 10 appropriation in any other program or fund within the department of 11 law, with the approval of the director of the budget (35114). 12 Personal service (50000) ... 24,000,000 ............ (re. $12,044,000) 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 8,426,000 ........... (re. $4,908,000) 14 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 15,745,000 .............. (re. $8,204,000) 15 Indirect costs (58850) ... 3,579,000 ................ (re. $3,417,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 17 For services and expenses related to grants for the investigation and 18 prosecution of medicaid fraud. 19 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the amounts herein appropri- 20 ated may be interchanged or transferred without limit to any other 21 appropriation in any other program or fund within the department of 22 law, with the approval of the director of the budget (35114). 23 Personal service (50000) ... 23,601,000 ............. (re. $2,864,000) 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 7,285,000 ........... (re. $2,443,000) 25 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 14,910,000 .............. (re. $1,571,000) 26 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,390,000 ................ (re. $4,309,000) 611 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 600,000,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 600,000,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE EMPLOYEE FRINGE BENEFITS ...... 600,000,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 Amount appropriated for the various offices 13 of the department of mental hygiene and 14 for employee fringe benefits of any other 15 state agency. The director of the budget 16 is hereby authorized to transfer this 17 appropriation to state operations and/or 18 local assistance in the office of mental 19 health, office for people with develop- 20 mental disabilities, office of addiction 21 services and supports and the justice 22 center for the protection of people with 23 special needs or to any fund from this 24 appropriation by certificate of approval. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 26 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 27 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 28 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 29 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 30 appropriation for the budget division 31 program of the division of the budget, are 32 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 33 part of this appropriation as if fully 34 stated (80530) ............................. 600,000,000 35 -------------- 612 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 161,974,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 15,177,000 14,912,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 13,138,000 15,380,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 190,289,000 30,292,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION PROGRAM ................................ 110,823,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 executive direction program. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 17 the money hereby appropriated may be 18 transferred to local assistance and/or any 19 appropriation of the office of addiction 20 services and supports, and may be 21 increased or decreased by transfer or 22 suballocation between these appropriated 23 amounts and appropriations of the depart- 24 ment of health, the office of medicaid 25 inspector general, the office of mental 26 health, the office for people with devel- 27 opmental disabilities, and the justice 28 center for the protection of people with 29 special needs with the approval of the 30 director of the budget. 31 Up to $3,500,000 of this appropriation may 32 be available for services and expenses 33 associated with the review of the current 34 system of financing and reimbursement of 35 addiction services provided by programs 36 financed under articles 25 and 41 of the 37 mental hygiene law, and to make recommen- 38 dations for changes designed to ensure 39 that the financing and reimbursement 40 system provides for the equitable 41 reimbursement of providers of addiction 42 services and is conducive to the provision 43 of effective and high quality services. 613 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding section 163 of the state 2 finance law and section 142 of the econom- 3 ic development law, up to or any other 4 inconsistent provision of law, funds 5 available for expenditure pursuant to this 6 appropriation for the establishment of 7 this program, may be allocated and 8 distributed by the commissioner of the 9 office of addiction services and supports, 10 subject to the approval of the director of 11 the budget, without a competitive bid or 12 request for proposal process. 13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 14 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 15 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 16 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 17 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 18 appropriation for the budget division 19 program of the division of the budget, are 20 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully 22 stated. 23 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 24 of law, funds hereby appropriated may, 25 subject to the approval of the director of 26 the budget, be used for services and 27 expenses related to the credentialing of 28 prevention, alcohol and substance abuse, 29 and problem gambling counselors. 30 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 31 of law, funds hereby appropriated may, 32 subject to the approval of the director of 33 the budget, be used for services and 34 expenses related to the operation of 35 methadone services and a patient registry, 36 pursuant to section 19.16 of the mental 37 hygiene law, that shall be used for the 38 prevention of simultaneous enrollment in 39 multiple methadone treatment programs, as 40 well as maintaining accurate patient 41 dosing information. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 43 to the contrary, a portion of this appro- 44 priation shall be available to the 45 Research Foundation for Mental Hygiene, 46 Inc. pursuant to a contract, subject to 47 the approval of the director of the budg- 48 et, to assist the office in tasks related 49 to the executive direction program 50 (81031). 614 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 51,094,000 2 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 36,000 3 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 5,485,000 4 Travel (54000) ................................... 578,000 5 Contractual services (51000) .................. 26,403,000 6 Equipment (56000) ................................ 122,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal .................. 83,718,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 11 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 12 Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment (SAPT) Account 13 - 25147 14 For services and expenses associated with 15 administering the Substance Use 16 Prevention, Treatment and Recovery 17 Services (SUPTRS) block grant. 18 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 19 of law, a portion of the funds hereby 20 appropriated may, subject to the approval 21 of the director of the budget, be trans- 22 ferred to local assistance and/or any 23 appropriation of the office of addiction 24 services and supports consistent with the 25 terms and conditions of the SUPTRS block 26 grant award. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 28 to the contrary, a portion of this appro- 29 priation shall be available to the 30 Research Foundation for Mental Hygiene, 31 Inc. pursuant to a contract, subject to 32 the approval of the director of the budg- 33 et, to assist the office in tasks related 34 to the executive direction program 35 (81031). 36 Personal service (50000) ....................... 7,400,000 37 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,555,000 38 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 4,577,000 39 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 435,000 40 -------------- 41 Program account subtotal .................. 13,967,000 42 -------------- 43 Special Revenue Funds - Other 44 Chemical Dependence Service Fund 45 Substance Abuse Services Fund Account - 22700 615 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to chemi- 2 cal dependence treatment and prevention 3 activities. 4 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 5 of law, moneys hereby appropriated may, 6 subject to the approval of the director of 7 the budget, be transferred to local 8 assistance and/or any appropriation of the 9 office of addiction services and supports 10 (81031). 11 Contractual services (51000) ................... 6,500,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal ................... 6,500,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other 16 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 17 Conference and Special Projects Account - 22109 18 For services and expenses related to special 19 projects. 20 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 21 of law, moneys hereby appropriated may, 22 subject to the approval of the director of 23 the budget, be transferred to local 24 assistance and/or any appropriation of the 25 office of addiction services and supports. 26 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 27 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 28 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 29 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 30 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 31 appropriation for the budget division 32 program of the division of the budget, are 33 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 34 part of this appropriation as if fully 35 stated (81031). 36 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 130,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ..................... 130,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other 41 Designated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account 42 Opioid Settlement Fund Account - 23817 43 For the administration of programs and 44 activities supported by the opioid settle- 616 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 ment fund and in accordance with the terms 2 of the statewide opioid settlement agree- 3 ments. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 5 to the contrary, a portion of this appro- 6 priation shall be available to the 7 Research Foundation for Mental Hygiene, 8 Inc. pursuant to a contract, subject to 9 the approval of the director of the budg- 10 et, to assist the office in tasks related 11 to the statewide opioid settlement agree- 12 ments (81031). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 855,000 14 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 6,000 15 Travel (54000) .................................... 57,000 16 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,175,000 17 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 588,000 18 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 27,000 19 -------------- 20 Program account subtotal ................... 3,708,000 21 -------------- 22 Special Revenue Funds - Other 23 New York State Commercial Gaming Fund 24 Problem Gambling Services Account - 23703 25 For services and expenses of problem gambl- 26 ing education, prevention, recovery, and 27 treatment services (81031). 28 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,000,000 29 -------------- 30 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 31 -------------- 32 Special Revenue Funds - Other 33 NYS Drug Treatment and Education Fund 34 NYS Drug Treatment and Public Education Account - 24802 35 For services and expenses of substance use 36 disorder treatment, prevention, recovery, 37 and harm reduction services, including the 38 development, implementation, and evalu- 39 ation of public health education and 40 prevention campaigns focused on the health 41 effects and legal use of cannabis and the 42 support of substance use disorder treat- 43 ment programs (81031). 617 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50100) ......................... 400,000 2 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 912,000 3 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 248,000 4 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 240,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ................... 1,800,000 7 -------------- 8 INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES ...................................... 79,466,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 institutional services program. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 15 the money hereby appropriated may be 16 transferred to local assistance and/or any 17 appropriation of the office of addiction 18 services and supports with the approval of 19 the director of the budget. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 21 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 23 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 24 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 25 appropriation for the budget division 26 program of the division of the budget, are 27 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully 29 stated (81038). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 59,691,000 31 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 825,000 32 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 2,155,000 33 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 7,178,000 34 Travel (54000) .................................... 75,000 35 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,970,000 36 Equipment (56000) ................................ 362,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal .................. 78,256,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 41 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 42 Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment (SAPT) Account 43 - 25147 618 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to inter- 2 vention and treatment provided by the 3 Substance Use Prevention, Treatment and 4 Recovery Services (SUPTRS) block grant. 5 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 6 of law, a portion of the funds hereby 7 appropriated may, subject to the approval 8 of the director of the budget, be trans- 9 ferred to local assistance and/or any 10 appropriation of the office of addiction 11 services and supports consistent with the 12 terms and conditions of the SUPTRS block 13 grant award (81038). 14 Personal service (50000) ......................... 516,000 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 340,000 16 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 325,000 17 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 29,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ................... 1,210,000 20 -------------- 619 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 EXECUTIVE DIRECTION PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 4 Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment (SAPT) Account - 25147 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses associated with administering the Substance 7 Use Prevention, Treatment and Recovery Services (SUPTRS) block 8 grant. 9 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of the 10 funds hereby appropriated may, subject to the approval of the direc- 11 tor of the budget, be transferred to local assistance and/or any 12 appropriation of the office of addiction services and supports 13 consistent with the terms and conditions of the SUPTRS block grant 14 award. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a portion 16 of this appropriation shall be available to the Research Foundation 17 for Mental Hygiene, Inc. pursuant to a contract, subject to the 18 approval of the director of the budget, to assist the office in 19 tasks related to the executive direction program (81031). 20 Personal service (50000) ... 7,400,000 .............. (re. $7,400,000) 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,555,000 ........... (re. $1,555,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 50, 23 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 24 For services and expenses associated with administering the substance 25 abuse prevention and treatment (SAPT) block grant. 26 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of the 27 funds hereby appropriated may, subject to the approval of the direc- 28 tor of the budget, be transferred to local assistance and/or any 29 appropriation of the office of addiction services and supports 30 consistent with the terms and conditions of the SAPT block grant 31 award (81031). 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 22,837,000 .......... (re. $5,263,000) 33 Special Revenue Funds - Other 34 Designated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account 35 Opioid Settlement Fund Account - 23817 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 37 For the administration of programs and activities supported by the 38 opioid settlement fund and in accordance with the terms of the 39 statewide opioid settlement agreements. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a portion 41 of this appropriation shall be available to the Research Foundation 42 for Mental Hygiene, Inc. pursuant to a contract, subject to the 43 approval of the director of the budget, to assist the office in 44 tasks related to the statewide opioid settlement agreements (81031). 45 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,046,000 ..... (re. $1,046,000) 620 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 8,000 ................ (re. $8,000) 2 Travel (54000) ... 70,000 .............................. (re. $70,000) 3 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,662,000 .......... (re. $2,662,000) 4 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 720,000 ................... (re. $720,000) 5 Indirect costs (58800) ... 32,000 ...................... (re. $32,000) 6 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 7 For the administration of programs and activities supported by the 8 opioid settlement fund and in accordance with the terms of the 9 statewide opioid settlement agreements. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a portion 11 of this appropriation shall be available to the Research Foundation 12 for Mental Hygiene, Inc. pursuant to a contract, subject to the 13 approval of the director of the budget, to assist the office in 14 tasks related to the statewide opioid settlement agreements (81031). 15 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,575,000 ..... (re. $2,575,000) 16 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 17,000 .............. (re. $17,000) 17 Travel (54000) ... 172,000 ............................ (re. $167,000) 18 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,554,000 .......... (re. $6,129,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,773,000 ............... (re. $1,773,000) 20 Indirect costs (58800) ... 81,000 ...................... (re. $81,000) 21 Special Revenue Funds - Other 22 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account 23 Opioid Stewardship Account - 22239 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 25 For the administration of programs and activities supported by the 26 opioid stewardship account. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a portion 28 of this appropriation shall be available to the Research Foundation 29 for Mental Hygiene, Inc. pursuant to a contract, subject to the 30 approval of the director of the budget, to assist the office in 31 tasks related to the opioid stewardship account (81031). 32 Contractual services (51000) ... 100,000 .............. (re. $100,000) 33 INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES 34 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 35 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 36 Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment (SAPT) Account - 25147 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 38 For services and expenses related to intervention and treatment 39 provided by the Substance Use Prevention, Treatment and Recovery 40 Services (SUPTRS) block grant. 41 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, a portion of the 42 funds hereby appropriated may, subject to the approval of the direc- 43 tor of the budget, be transferred to local assistance and/or any 44 appropriation of the office of addiction services and supports 621 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 consistent with the terms and conditions of the SUPTRS block grant 2 award (81038). 3 Personal service (50000) ... 516,000 .................. (re. $354,000) 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 340,000 ............... (re. $340,000) 622 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 2,367,335,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 4,513,000 4,693,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 17,482,000 0 6 Enterprise Funds ................... 8,606,000 0 7 Internal Service Funds ............. 2,597,000 0 8 ---------------- ---------------- 9 All Funds ........................ 2,400,533,000 4,693,000 10 ================ ================ 11 SCHEDULE 12 ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE PROGRAM ......................... 130,907,000 13 -------------- 14 General Fund 15 State Purposes Account - 10050 16 For services and expenses related to the 17 administration and finance program. 18 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 19 the money hereby appropriated may be 20 increased or decreased by interchange, 21 with any appropriation of the office of 22 mental health, and may be increased or 23 decreased by transfer or suballocation 24 between these appropriated amounts and 25 appropriations of the department of 26 health, the office of medicaid inspector 27 general, the office for people with devel- 28 opmental disabilities, the justice center 29 for the protection of people with special 30 needs, and the office of addiction 31 services and supports, with the approval 32 of the director of the budget. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 34 to the contrary, any of the amounts appro- 35 priated herein may be increased or 36 decreased by interchange or transfer with- 37 out limit, with any appropriation of the 38 office of mental health or by transfer or 39 suballocation to any department, agency or 40 public authority for expenditures incurred 41 in the operation of such programs with the 42 approval of the director of the budget. 43 Notwithstanding any other provisions of law 44 to the contrary, the state comptroller is 623 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 hereby authorized to receive funds from 2 the office of mental health that were 3 returned as a refund, rebate, reimburse- 4 ment, or credit in the current fiscal year 5 from expenditures made in prior fiscal 6 years and is authorized to refund such 7 moneys to the credit of this fund for the 8 purpose of reimbursing the 2025-2026 9 appropriation. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 11 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 12 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 13 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 14 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 15 appropriation for the budget division 16 program of the division of the budget, are 17 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 18 part of this appropriation as if fully 19 stated. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 21 to the contrary, a portion of this appro- 22 priation shall be available to the 23 Research Foundation for Mental Hygiene, 24 Inc. pursuant to a contract, subject to 25 the approval of the director of the budg- 26 et, to assist the office in restructuring 27 the financing of community-based mental 28 health programs (36900). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 68,013,000 30 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 772,000 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 236,000 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,245,000 33 Travel (54000) ................................... 884,000 34 Contractual services (51000) .................. 34,309,000 35 Equipment (56000) .............................. 4,330,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ................. 110,789,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 40 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 41 Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25180 42 For administration of the community services 43 block grant (36982). 44 Personal service (50000) ....................... 3,191,000 45 Nonpersonal service (57050) ....................... 12,000 46 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,106,000 624 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 24,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal ................... 4,333,000 4 -------------- 5 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 6 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 7 PATH Account - 25124 8 For administration of programs to assist and 9 transition from homelessness (PATH) grants 10 (36981). 11 Personal service (50000) ......................... 105,000 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ....................... 17,000 13 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................... 56,000 14 Indirect costs (58850) ............................. 2,000 15 -------------- 16 Program account subtotal ..................... 180,000 17 -------------- 18 Special Revenue Funds - Other 19 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 20 Mental Hygiene Combined Gifts and Grants Account - 20209 21 For nonpersonal service expenditures to 22 benefit patients or for other purposes 23 from grants, gifts, donations, bequests, 24 combined expendable trusts or other 25 contributions (36900). 26 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 633,000 27 Travel (54000) .................................... 48,000 28 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 610,000 29 Equipment (56000) ................................ 186,000 30 -------------- 31 Program account subtotal ................... 1,477,000 32 -------------- 33 Special Revenue Funds - Other 34 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 35 Cook/Chill Account - 22057 36 For services and expenses related to the 37 operation of the cook/chill production 38 center at the Rockland psychiatric center. 39 Appropriations may be transferred to the 40 department of corrections and community 41 supervision for expenses related to 625 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 cook/chill production with the approval of 2 the director of the budget. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 4 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 6 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 7 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 8 appropriation for the budget division 9 program of the division of the budget, are 10 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully 12 stated (36900). 13 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,283,000 14 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 642,000 15 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,000,000 16 -------------- 17 Program account subtotal ................... 2,925,000 18 -------------- 19 Enterprise Funds 20 Mental Hygiene Community Stores Account 21 MH & MR Community Stores Fund Account - 50500 22 For services and expenses related to enter- 23 prise programs (36900). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 508,000 25 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 100,000 26 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,509,000 27 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 28 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 201,000 29 Equipment (56000) ................................ 115,000 30 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 309,000 31 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 18,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal ................... 2,770,000 34 -------------- 35 Enterprise Funds 36 OMH Sheltered Workshop Fund 37 Mental Health Sheltered Workshop Fund Account - 50400 38 For services and expenses related to enter- 39 prise programs (36900). 40 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,243,000 41 Travel (54000) ................................... 123,000 42 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,213,000 43 Equipment (56000) ................................ 257,000 626 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 -------------- 2 Program account subtotal ................... 5,836,000 3 -------------- 4 Internal Service Funds 5 Mental Hygiene Revolving Account 6 Mental Hygiene Internal Service Fund Account - 55101 7 For services and expenses related to the 8 internal services operations for print and 9 design (36900). 10 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 941,000 11 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 40,000 12 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 566,000 13 Travel (54000) ..................................... 1,000 14 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 200,000 15 Equipment (56000) ................................ 430,000 16 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 401,000 17 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 18,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ................... 2,597,000 20 -------------- 21 ADULT SERVICES PROGRAM ................................... 1,459,025,000 22 -------------- 23 General Fund 24 State Purposes Account - 10050 25 For services and expenses related to the 26 adult services program. 27 Funds appropriated under this program are 28 available for the payment of tolls at the 29 Robert F. Kennedy bridge, for vehicles 30 driven by persons commuting to and from 31 work who are employed at facilities 32 located on Ward's island operated by the 33 department of mental hygiene. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 35 to the contrary, any of the amounts appro- 36 priated herein may be increased or 37 decreased by interchange or transfer with- 38 out limit, with any appropriation of the 39 office of mental health or by transfer or 40 suballocation to any department, agency or 41 public authority for expenditures incurred 42 in the operation of such programs with the 43 approval of the director of the budget. 627 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 2 to the contrary, the commissioner of the 3 office of mental health shall be author- 4 ized, subject to the approval of the 5 director of the budget, to transfer up to 6 $3,000,000 of this appropriation to the 7 department of health for the purpose of 8 making physician loan repayment awards to 9 psychiatrists who are licensed to practice 10 in New York state and who agree to work 11 for a period of at least three years in 12 one or more hospitals or outpatient 13 programs that are operated by the office 14 of mental health and deemed to be in one 15 or more underserved areas, as determined 16 by the commissioner of mental health. 17 Notwithstanding paragraph (d) of subdivi- 18 sion 5-a, and paragraphs (d), (e), and (f) 19 of subdivision 10 of section 2807-m of the 20 public health law, all awards made by the 21 department of health from any of the 22 office of mental health funds transferred 23 herein shall be made consistent with the 24 provisions of paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) 25 of subdivision 10 of section 2807-m of the 26 public health law and may not supplant or 27 otherwise support the department of 28 health's physician's loan repayment 29 program. 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 31 to the contrary, subject to the approval 32 of the director of the budget, the commis- 33 sioner of the office of mental health 34 shall be authorized to reimburse medical 35 providers at a rate up to 200 percent of 36 the established medicaid rate or rates for 37 non-psychiatric medical services, when 38 such non-psychiatric medical services are 39 provided within the office of mental 40 health facilities. 41 Notwithstanding any other provisions of law 42 to the contrary, the state comptroller is 43 hereby authorized to receive funds from 44 the office of mental health that were 45 returned as a refund, rebate, reimburse- 46 ment, or credit in the current fiscal year 47 from expenditures made in prior fiscal 48 years and is authorized to refund such 49 moneys to the credit of this fund for the 628 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 purpose of reimbursing the 2025-2026 2 appropriation. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 4 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 6 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 7 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 8 appropriation for the budget division 9 program of the division of the budget, are 10 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully 12 stated (36901). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) .......... 1,074,946,000 14 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 3,662,000 15 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ......... 45,526,000 16 Supplies and materials (57000) ................ 86,691,000 17 Travel (54000) ................................. 2,418,000 18 Contractual services (51000) ................. 229,057,000 19 Equipment (56000) ............................. 10,875,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal ............... 1,453,175,000 22 -------------- 23 Special Revenue Funds - Other 24 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 25 Healthcare Emergency Preparedness Program (HEP) Account 26 - 22198 27 For services and expenses incurred by 28 psychiatric centers participating in the 29 healthcare emergency preparedness program. 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 31 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 32 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 33 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 34 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 35 appropriation for the budget division 36 program of the division of the budget, are 37 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 38 part of this appropriation as if fully 39 stated (36901). 40 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 20,000 41 Travel (54000) ..................................... 2,000 42 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 15,000 43 Equipment (56000) ................................. 13,000 44 -------------- 45 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 46 -------------- 629 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 3 Mental Health Service Delivery Transformation Incentive 4 Fund Account - 22215 5 For nonpersonal service expenditures of 6 office of mental health facilities that 7 participate in the system reform incen- 8 tives (36901). 9 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,000,000 10 Travel (54000) ................................... 100,000 11 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,700,000 12 Equipment(56000) ............................... 2,000,000 13 -------------- 14 Program account subtotal ................... 5,800,000 15 -------------- 16 CHILDREN AND YOUTH SERVICES PROGRAM ........................ 247,903,000 17 -------------- 18 General Fund 19 State Purposes Account - 10050 20 For services and expenses related to the 21 children and youth services program. 22 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 23 to the contrary, any of the amounts appro- 24 priated herein may be increased or 25 decreased by interchange or transfer with- 26 out limit, with any appropriation of the 27 office of mental health or by transfer or 28 suballocation to any department, agency or 29 public authority for expenditures incurred 30 in the operation of such programs with the 31 approval of the director of the budget. 32 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 33 to the contrary, subject to the approval 34 of the director of the budget, the commis- 35 sioner of the office of mental health 36 shall be authorized to reimburse medical 37 providers at a rate up to 200 percent of 38 the established medicaid rate or rates for 39 non-psychiatric medical services, when 40 such non-psychiatric medical services are 41 provided within the office of mental 42 health facilities. 43 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 44 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 45 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 630 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 2 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 3 appropriation for the budget division 4 program of the division of the budget, are 5 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 6 part of this appropriation as if fully 7 stated (36902). 8 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 201,764,000 9 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 2,410,000 10 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 9,374,000 11 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 9,113,000 12 Travel (54000) ................................... 683,000 13 Contractual services (51000) .................. 23,689,000 14 Equipment (56000) ................................ 870,000 15 -------------- 16 FORENSIC SERVICES PROGRAM .................................. 384,952,000 17 -------------- 18 General Fund 19 State Purposes Account - 10050 20 For services and expenses related to the 21 forensic services program. 22 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 23 to the contrary, any of the amounts appro- 24 priated herein may be increased or 25 decreased by interchange or transfer with- 26 out limit, with any appropriation of the 27 office of mental health or by transfer or 28 suballocation to any department, agency or 29 public authority for expenditures incurred 30 in the operation of such programs with the 31 approval of the director of the budget. 32 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 33 to the contrary, subject to the approval 34 of the director of the budget, the commis- 35 sioner of the office of mental health 36 shall be authorized to reimburse medical 37 providers at a rate up to 200 percent of 38 the established medicaid rate or rates for 39 non-psychiatric medical services, when 40 such non-psychiatric medical services are 41 provided within the office of mental 42 health facilities. 43 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 44 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 45 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 46 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 631 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 2 appropriation for the budget division 3 program of the division of the budget, are 4 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 5 part of this appropriation as if fully 6 stated (36903). 7 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 300,303,000 8 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 2,396,000 9 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ......... 29,483,000 10 Supplies and materials (57000) ................ 14,785,000 11 Travel (54000) ................................... 637,000 12 Contractual services (51000) .................. 36,303,000 13 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,045,000 14 -------------- 15 RESEARCH IN MENTAL ILLNESS PROGRAM .......................... 95,302,000 16 -------------- 17 General Fund 18 State Purposes Account - 10050 19 For services and expenses related to the 20 research in mental illness program. 21 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 22 to the contrary, any of the amounts appro- 23 priated herein may be increased or 24 decreased by interchange or transfer with- 25 out limit, with any appropriation of the 26 office of mental health or by transfer or 27 suballocation to any department, agency or 28 public authority for expenditures incurred 29 in the operation of such programs with the 30 approval of the director of the budget. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 32 to the contrary, subject to the approval 33 of the director of the budget, the commis- 34 sioner of the office of mental health 35 shall be authorized to reimburse medical 36 providers at a rate up to 200 percent of 37 the established medicaid rate or rates for 38 non-psychiatric medical services, when 39 such non-psychiatric medical services are 40 provided within the office of mental 41 health facilities. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 43 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 44 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 45 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 46 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 632 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 appropriation for the budget division 2 program of the division of the budget, are 3 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 4 part of this appropriation as if fully 5 stated (36904). 6 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 68,694,000 7 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 76,000 8 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 848,000 9 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,729,000 10 Travel (54000) .................................... 31,000 11 Contractual services (51000) .................. 15,390,000 12 Equipment (56000) ................................ 304,000 13 -------------- 14 Program account subtotal .................. 88,072,000 15 -------------- 16 Special Revenue Funds - Other 17 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 18 OMH-Research Recovery Account - 22086 19 For services and expenses to support central 20 administration, research associates, 21 equipment provided through external 22 grants, travel, conference expenses, 23 including the annual research conference, 24 contractual services, grant writers to 25 increase income from non-state sources, 26 and other research initiatives. Funding 27 will be provided through research founda- 28 tion for mental hygiene, inc. resources, 29 including, but not limited to, indirect 30 costs recoveries, direct grant reimburse- 31 ment, interest earnings and operating 32 balances. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 34 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 35 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 36 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 37 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 38 appropriation for the budget division 39 program of the division of the budget, are 40 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 41 part of this appropriation as if fully 42 stated (36904). 43 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,915,000 44 Contractual services (51000) ................... 4,665,000 45 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 650,000 46 -------------- 633 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Program account subtotal ................... 7,230,000 2 -------------- 3 SECURE TREATMENT PROGRAM .................................... 82,444,000 4 -------------- 5 General Fund 6 State Purposes Account - 10050 7 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 8 to the contrary, any of the amounts appro- 9 priated herein may be increased or 10 decreased by interchange or transfer with- 11 out limit, with any appropriation of the 12 office of mental health or by transfer or 13 suballocation to any department, agency or 14 public authority for expenditures incurred 15 in the operation of such programs with the 16 approval of the director of the budget. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 18 to the contrary, subject to the approval 19 of the director of the budget, the commis- 20 sioner of the office of mental health 21 shall be authorized to reimburse medical 22 providers at a rate up to 200 percent of 23 the established medicaid rate or rates for 24 non-psychiatric medical services, when 25 such non-psychiatric medical services are 26 provided within the office of mental 27 health facilities. 28 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 29 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 30 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 31 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 32 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 33 appropriation for the budget division 34 program of the division of the budget, are 35 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 36 part of this appropriation as if fully 37 stated (37030). 38 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 63,514,000 39 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,000,000 40 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 6,412,000 41 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 4,754,000 42 Travel (54000) .................................... 70,000 43 Contractual services (51000) ................... 6,271,000 44 Equipment (56000) ................................ 423,000 45 -------------- 634 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE OF MENTAL HEALTH STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 4 Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25180 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For administration of the community services block grant (36982). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 3,191,000 .............. (re. $3,191,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 12,000 ................. (re. $12,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,106,000 ............... (re. $1,106,000) 10 Indirect costs (58850) ... 24,000 ...................... (re. $24,000) 11 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 12 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 13 PATH Account - 25124 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 15 For administration of programs to assist and transition from homeless- 16 ness (PATH) grants (36981). 17 Personal service (50000) ... 105,000 .................. (re. $105,000) 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 17,000 ................. (re. $17,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 56,000 ..................... (re. $56,000) 20 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 22 For administration of programs to assist and transition from homeless- 23 ness (PATH) grants (36981). 24 Personal service (50000) ... 105,000 .................. (re. $105,000) 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 17,000 ................. (re. $17,000) 26 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 56,000 ..................... (re. $56,000) 27 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 635 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 2,364,496,000 62,974,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 751,000 0 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 773,000 0 6 Enterprise Funds ................... 2,657,000 0 7 Internal Service Funds ............. 348,000 0 8 ---------------- ---------------- 9 All Funds ........................ 2,369,025,000 62,974,000 10 ================ ================ 11 SCHEDULE 12 CENTRAL COORDINATION AND SUPPORT PROGRAM ................... 141,361,000 13 -------------- 14 General Fund 15 State Purposes Account - 10050 16 For services and expenses related to the 17 central coordination and support program. 18 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 19 the money hereby appropriated may be 20 transferred to local assistance and/or any 21 appropriation of the office for people 22 with developmental disabilities, and may 23 be increased or decreased by transfer or 24 suballocation between these appropriated 25 amounts and appropriations of the depart- 26 ment of health, the office of medicaid 27 inspector general, the office of mental 28 health, the justice center for the 29 protection of people with special needs 30 and the office of addiction services and 31 supports with the approval of the director 32 of the budget. 33 Notwithstanding section 163 of the state 34 finance law, section 142 of the economic 35 development law, and/or any other law to 36 the contrary, the commissioner may, with 37 the approval of the director of the budg- 38 et, award a portion of the funds appropri- 39 ated herein, either as a grant, service 40 contract, or any other payment mechanism, 41 for services and expenses incurred by a 42 temporary operator as defined by and in 43 accordance with section 16.25 of the 44 mental hygiene law. 636 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 2 to the contrary, a portion of this appro- 3 priation may be made available to the 4 Research Foundation for Mental Hygiene, 5 Inc., subject to the approval of the 6 director of the budget, pursuant to a 7 contract, to assist the office in imple- 8 menting priority policies, including, but 9 not limited to, transforming the OPWDD 10 service delivery system. 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 12 to the contrary, the state comptroller is 13 hereby authorized to receive funds from 14 the office for people with developmental 15 disabilities that were returned as a 16 refund, rebate, reimbursement or credit in 17 the current fiscal year from expenditures 18 made in prior fiscal years and is author- 19 ized to refund such moneys to the credit 20 of this fund for the purpose of reimburs- 21 ing the 2025-26 appropriation. 22 Notwithstanding sections 112 and 163 of 23 state finance law and section 142 of the 24 economic development law, or any other law 25 to the contrary, the office for people 26 with developmental disabilities may enter 27 into a contract with a vendor to provide 28 support to the chief disability officer 29 with updating and issuing an Olmstead 30 Plan. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 32 to the contrary, and consistent with 33 section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, 34 the directors of facilities operated by 35 the office for people with developmental 36 disabilities who act as federally-appoint- 37 ed representative payees and who assume 38 management responsibility over the funds 39 of a resident may continue to use such 40 funds for the cost of the resident's care 41 and treatment, consistent with federal law 42 and regulations. 43 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 44 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 45 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 46 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 47 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 48 appropriation for the budget division 49 program of the division of the budget, are 50 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 637 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 part of this appropriation as if fully 2 stated (37829). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 82,865,000 4 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 489,000 5 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 165,000 6 Nonpersonal service, including for services 7 and expenses of the assets for independ- 8 ence program and other health and human 9 services programs (37829). 10 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,072,000 11 Travel (54000) ................................. 2,268,000 12 Contractual services (51000) .................. 46,445,000 13 Equipment (56000) .............................. 3,958,000 14 -------------- 15 Program account subtotal ................. 138,262,000 16 -------------- 17 For services and expenses associated with 18 the intellectual and developmental disa- 19 bility ombudsman program (37915). 20 Contractual Services (51000) ................... 2,000,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ................... 2,000,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 25 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 26 Housing Counseling Assistance and Training Account - 27 25350 28 For services and expenses associated with 29 housing counseling assistance and training 30 programs (37831). 31 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 418,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal ..................... 418,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 36 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 37 Senior Companions Account - 25445 38 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 39 the money hereby appropriated may be 40 transferred to local assistance and/or any 638 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 appropriation of the office for people 2 with developmental disabilities, with the 3 approval of the director of the budget. 4 For services and expenses related to the 5 administration of the federal senior 6 companions program (37830). 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 333,000 8 -------------- 9 Program account subtotal ..................... 333,000 10 -------------- 11 Internal Service Funds 12 Agencies Internal Service Fund 13 OPWDD Copy Center Account - 55065 14 For services and expenses associated with 15 the office for people with developmental 16 disabilities copy center. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 18 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 19 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 20 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 21 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 22 appropriation for the budget division 23 program of the division of the budget, are 24 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully 26 stated (37829). 27 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 348,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal ..................... 348,000 30 -------------- 31 COMMUNITY SERVICES PROGRAM ............................... 1,707,307,000 32 -------------- 33 General Fund 34 State Purposes Account - 10050 35 For services and expenses related to the 36 community services program. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 38 the money hereby appropriated may be 39 transferred to local assistance and/or any 40 appropriation of the office for people 41 with developmental disabilities, with the 42 approval of the director of the budget. 639 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding section 6908 of the educa- 2 tion law and any other provision of law, 3 rule or regulation to the contrary, direct 4 support staff in programs certified or 5 approved by the office for people with 6 developmental disabilities, including the 7 home and community based services waiver 8 programs that the office for people with 9 developmental disabilities is authorized 10 to administer with federal approval pursu- 11 ant to subdivision (c) of section 1915 of 12 the federal social security act, are 13 authorized to provide such tasks as OPWDD 14 may specify when performed under the 15 supervision, training and periodic 16 inspection of a registered professional 17 nurse and in accordance with an authorized 18 practitioner's ordered care. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 20 to the contrary, the state comptroller is 21 hereby authorized to receive funds from 22 the office for people with developmental 23 disabilities that were returned as a 24 refund, rebate, reimbursement or credit in 25 the current fiscal year from expenditures 26 made in prior fiscal years and is author- 27 ized to refund such moneys to the credit 28 of this fund for the purpose of reimburs- 29 ing the 2025-26 appropriation. 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 31 to the contrary, and consistent with 32 section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, 33 the directors of facilities operated by 34 the office for people with developmental 35 disabilities who act as federally-appoint- 36 ed representative payees and who assume 37 management responsibility over the funds 38 of a resident may continue to use such 39 funds for the cost of the resident's care 40 and treatment, consistent with federal law 41 and regulations. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 43 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 44 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 45 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 46 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 47 appropriation for the budget division 48 program of the division of the budget, are 49 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 640 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 part of this appropriation as if fully 2 stated (81034). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) .......... 1,268,863,000 4 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,792,000 5 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ........ 239,999,000 6 Nonpersonal service, including moneys for 7 the community services program, net of 8 refunds, rebates, reimbursements and cred- 9 its, and expenses related to the payment 10 of a provider of services assessment for 11 the period April 1, 2025 through March 31, 12 2026 pursuant to section 43.04 of the 13 mental hygiene law (81034). 14 Supplies and materials (57000) ................ 77,040,000 15 Travel (54000) ................................. 5,656,000 16 Contractual services (51000) .................. 89,295,000 17 Equipment (56000) ............................. 24,662,000 18 -------------- 19 INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES PROGRAM ............................. 490,441,000 20 -------------- 21 General Fund 22 State Purposes Account - 10050 23 For services and expenses related to the 24 institutional services program. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 26 the money hereby appropriated may be 27 transferred to local assistance and/or any 28 appropriation of the office for people 29 with developmental disabilities, with the 30 approval of the director of the budget. 31 Notwithstanding section 6908 of the educa- 32 tion law and any other provision of law, 33 rule or regulation to the contrary, direct 34 support staff in programs certified or 35 approved by the office for people with 36 developmental disabilities, including the 37 home and community based services waiver 38 programs that the office for people with 39 developmental disabilities is authorized 40 to administer with federal approval pursu- 41 ant to subdivision (c) of section 1915 of 42 the federal social security act, are 43 authorized to provide such tasks as OPWDD 44 may specify when performed under the 641 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 supervision, training and periodic 2 inspection of a registered professional 3 nurse and in accordance with an authorized 4 practitioner's ordered care. 5 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 6 to the contrary, the state comptroller is 7 hereby authorized to receive funds from 8 the office for people with developmental 9 disabilities that were returned as a 10 refund, rebate, reimbursement or credit in 11 the current fiscal year from expenditures 12 made in prior fiscal years and is author- 13 ized to refund such moneys to the credit 14 of this fund for the purpose of reimburs- 15 ing the 2025-26 appropriation. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, and consistent with 18 section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, 19 the directors of facilities operated by 20 the office for people with developmental 21 disabilities who act as federally-appoint- 22 ed representative payees and who assume 23 management responsibility over the funds 24 of a resident may continue to use such 25 funds for the cost of the resident's care 26 and treatment, consistent with federal law 27 and regulations. 28 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 29 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 30 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 31 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 32 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 33 appropriation for the budget division 34 program of the division of the budget, are 35 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 36 part of this appropriation as if fully 37 stated (81038). 38 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 345,404,000 39 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,061,000 40 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ......... 24,335,000 41 Nonpersonal service, including moneys for 42 the community services program, net of 43 refunds, rebates, reimbursements and cred- 44 its, and expenses related to the payment 45 of a provider of services assessment for 46 the period April 1, 2025 through March 31, 47 2026 pursuant to section 43.04 of the 48 mental hygiene law (81038). 642 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ................ 69,865,000 2 Travel (54000) ................................. 1,694,000 3 Contractual services (51000) .................. 32,757,000 4 Equipment (56000) ............................. 12,166,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ................. 487,282,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Other 9 Combined Nonexpendable Trust Fund 10 OPWDD Nonexpendable Trust Account - 21654 11 For expenditures on behalf of individuals 12 from donated funds. Notwithstanding any 13 other provision of law, the money hereby 14 appropriated may be transferred to local 15 assistance and/or any appropriation of the 16 office for people with developmental disa- 17 bilities, with the approval of the direc- 18 tor of the budget (81038). 19 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 4,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal ....................... 4,000 22 -------------- 23 Special Revenue Funds - Other 24 Mental Health Gifts and Donations Fund 25 Office for People With Developmental Disabilities Gifts 26 and Donations Account - 20000 27 For expenditures on behalf of individuals 28 from donated funds. Notwithstanding any 29 other provision of law, the money hereby 30 appropriated may be transferred to local 31 assistance and/or any appropriation of the 32 office for people with developmental disa- 33 bilities, with the approval of the direc- 34 tor of the budget (81038). 35 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 498,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ..................... 498,000 38 -------------- 39 Enterprise Funds 40 Mental Hygiene Community Stores Account 41 OPWDD Community Stores Fund Account - 50500 643 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of community 2 stores located at various developmental 3 centers. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 5 the money hereby appropriated may be 6 transferred to local assistance and/or any 7 appropriation of the office for people 8 with developmental disabilities, with the 9 approval of the director of the budget. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 11 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 12 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 13 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 14 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 15 appropriation for the budget division 16 program of the division of the budget, are 17 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 18 part of this appropriation as if fully 19 stated (81038). 20 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 383,000 21 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 731,000 22 -------------- 23 Program account subtotal ................... 1,114,000 24 -------------- 25 Enterprise Funds 26 OPWDD Sheltered Workshop Fund 27 Sheltered Workshop Fund OPWDD Account - 50450 28 For services and expenses including sala- 29 ries, supplies and materials of sheltered 30 workshops and vocational rehabilitation 31 work activities. 32 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 33 the money hereby appropriated may be 34 transferred to local assistance and/or any 35 appropriation of the office for people 36 with developmental disabilities, with the 37 approval of the director of the budget. 38 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 39 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 40 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 41 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 42 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 43 appropriation for the budget division 44 program of the division of the budget, are 45 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 46 part of this appropriation as if fully 47 stated (81038). 644 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 697,000 2 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 3 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 796,000 4 Equipment (56000) ................................. 40,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ................... 1,543,000 7 -------------- 8 RESEARCH IN DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES PROGRAM .............. 29,916,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 research in developmental disabilities 14 program. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 16 the money hereby appropriated may be 17 transferred to local assistance and/or any 18 appropriation of the office for people 19 with developmental disabilities, with the 20 approval of the director of the budget. 21 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 22 to the contrary, and consistent with 23 section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, 24 the directors of facilities operated by 25 the office for people with developmental 26 disabilities who act as federally-appoint- 27 ed representative payees and who assume 28 management responsibility over the funds 29 of a resident may continue to use such 30 funds for the cost of the resident's care 31 and treatment, consistent with federal law 32 and regulations. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 34 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 35 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 36 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 37 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 38 appropriation for the budget division 39 program of the division of the budget, are 40 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 41 part of this appropriation as if fully 42 stated (37852). 43 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 26,151,000 44 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 341,000 45 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,333,000 46 Travel (54000) ..................................... 6,000 645 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,251,000 2 Equipment (56000) ................................ 563,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal .................. 29,645,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 8 Autism Awareness and Research Account - 20149 9 For services and expenses related to autism 10 awareness and research pursuant to section 11 404-v of the vehicle and traffic law and 12 section 95-e of the state finance law, as 13 added by chapter 301 of the laws of 2004 14 (37852). 15 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 22,000 16 -------------- 17 Program account subtotal ...................... 22,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other 20 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 21 Research in Developmental Disabilities Account - 20116 22 Amount available for genetic counseling and 23 research from external grants and contrib- 24 utions. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 26 the money hereby appropriated may be 27 transferred to local assistance and/or any 28 appropriation of the office for people 29 with developmental disabilities, with the 30 approval of the director of the budget. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 32 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 33 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 34 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 35 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 36 appropriation for the budget division 37 program of the division of the budget, are 38 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 39 part of this appropriation as if fully 40 stated (37852). 41 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 149,000 42 -------------- 43 Program account subtotal ..................... 149,000 44 -------------- 646 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 3 Down's Syndrome Research Account - 23810 4 For services and expenses related to down's 5 syndrome research pursuant to section 6 404-ee of the vehicle and traffic law and 7 section 99-ee of the state finance law, as 8 added by chapter 125 of the laws of 2018 9 (37852). 10 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 100,000 11 -------------- 12 Program account subtotal ..................... 100,000 13 -------------- 647 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 CENTRAL COORDINATION AND SUPPORT PROGRAM 2 General Fund 3 State Purposes Account - 10050 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For services and expenses related to the central coordination and 6 support program. 7 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the money hereby appropri- 8 ated may be transferred to local assistance and/or any appropriation 9 of the office for people with developmental disabilities, and may be 10 increased or decreased by transfer or suballocation between these 11 appropriated amounts and appropriations of the department of health, 12 the office of medicaid inspector general, the office of mental 13 health, the justice center for the protection of people with special 14 needs and the office of addiction services and supports with the 15 approval of the director of the budget. 16 Notwithstanding section 163 of the state finance law, section 142 of 17 the economic development law, and/or any other law to the contrary, 18 the commissioner may, with the approval of the director of the budg- 19 et, award a portion of the funds appropriated herein, either as a 20 grant, service contract, or any other payment mechanism, for 21 services and expenses incurred by a temporary operator as defined by 22 and in accordance with section 16.25 of the mental hygiene law. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a portion 24 of this appropriation may be made available to the Research Founda- 25 tion for Mental Hygiene, Inc., subject to the approval of the direc- 26 tor of the budget, pursuant to a contract, to assist the office in 27 implementing priority policies, including, but not limited to, 28 transforming the OPWDD service delivery system. 29 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the state 30 comptroller is hereby authorized to receive funds from the office 31 for people with developmental disabilities that were returned as a 32 refund, rebate, reimbursement or credit in the current fiscal year 33 from expenditures made in prior fiscal years and is authorized to 34 refund such moneys to the credit of this fund for the purpose of 35 reimbursing the 2024-25 appropriation. 36 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, and 37 consistent with section 33.07 of the mental hygiene law, the direc- 38 tors of facilities operated by the office for people with develop- 39 mental disabilities who act as federally-appointed representative 40 payees and who assume management responsibility over the funds of a 41 resident may continue to use such funds for the cost of the resi- 42 dent's care and treatment, consistent with federal law and regu- 43 lations. 44 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 45 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 46 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 47 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 648 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HYGIENE OFFICE FOR PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 2 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (37829). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 82,865,000 ... (re. $18,975,000) 4 Temporary service (50200) ... 489,000 ................... (re. $2,000) 5 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 165,000 ...... (re. $97,000) 6 Nonpersonal service, including for services and expenses of the assets 7 for independence program and other health and human services 8 programs (37829). 9 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 2,072,000 ........ (re. $1,928,000) 10 Travel (54000) ... 2,268,000 ........................ (re. $1,178,000) 11 Contractual services (51000) ... 46,445,000 ........ (re. $37,525,000) 12 Equipment (56000) ... 3,958,000 ..................... (re. $3,269,000) 649 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 134,335,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 45,080,000 62,982,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 11,777,000 3,300,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 191,192,000 66,282,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ....................................... 8,555,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 administration program. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 19 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 20 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 21 appropriation for the budget division 22 program of the division of the budget, are 23 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully 25 stated (81001). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,635,000 27 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 100,000 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 28,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 3,790,000 30 Travel (54000) .................................... 30,000 31 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 959,000 32 Equipment (56000) ................................. 13,000 33 -------------- 34 MILITARY READINESS PROGRAM .................................. 60,010,000 35 -------------- 36 General Fund 37 State Purposes Account - 10050 38 For services and expenses related to the 39 military readiness program. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 41 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 42 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 650 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 2 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 3 appropriation for the budget division 4 program of the division of the budget, are 5 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 6 part of this appropriation as if fully 7 stated (38700). 8 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 8,505,000 9 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,002,000 10 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 82,000 11 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,043,000 12 Travel (54000) ................................... 303,000 13 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,300,000 14 Equipment (56000) ................................ 635,000 15 -------------- 16 Total amount available ...................... 14,870,000 17 -------------- 18 For services and expenses of the New York 19 guard as directed and approved by the 20 adjutant general of the national guard 21 (38707). 22 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 11,000 23 Travel (54000) ..................................... 7,000 24 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 35,000 25 Equipment (56000) .................................. 7,000 26 -------------- 27 Total amount available .......................... 60,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal .................. 14,930,000 30 -------------- 31 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 32 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 33 Federal Miscellaneous Grants Account - Air Force, Naval 34 Militia and Army - 25380 35 For services and expenses related to the 36 military readiness program (38700). 37 Personal service (50000) ...................... 16,466,000 38 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 23,495,000 39 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 5,119,000 40 -------------- 41 Program account subtotal .................. 45,080,000 42 -------------- 43 SPECIAL SERVICES PROGRAM ................................... 122,627,000 44 -------------- 651 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 General Fund 2 State Purposes Account - 10050 3 For operating expenses associated with task 4 force empire shield and other homeland 5 security activities. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 7 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 8 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 9 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 10 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 11 appropriation for the budget division 12 program of the division of the budget, are 13 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 14 part of this appropriation as if fully 15 stated (38710). 16 Temporary service (50200) .................... 106,775,000 17 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,080,000 18 Travel (54000) ................................... 490,000 19 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,816,000 20 Equipment (56000) ................................ 500,000 21 -------------- 22 Total amount available ..................... 110,661,000 23 -------------- 24 For operating expenses associated with the 25 New York state military museum and veter- 26 ans research center (38701). 27 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 59,000 28 Travel (54000) ..................................... 9,000 29 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 108,000 30 Equipment (56000) ................................. 13,000 31 -------------- 32 Total amount available ......................... 189,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal ................. 110,850,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Combined Expendable Trust Fund L.M. Josephthal Account - 38 20123 39 For services and expenses related to the 40 special services program (38701). 41 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 42 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 1,000 43 -------------- 44 Program account subtotal ....................... 2,000 45 -------------- 652 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 3 Military Fund Account - 20127 4 For expenses from rentals and other funds 5 collected pursuant to sections 183 and 221 6 of the military law (38701). 7 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 10,000 8 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 10,000 9 -------------- 10 Program account subtotal ...................... 20,000 11 -------------- 12 Special Revenue Funds - Other 13 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 14 Youth, Bequests and Donations Account - 20165 15 For services and expenses related to youth 16 academic and drug demand reduction 17 programs, the New York guard, the New York 18 naval militia, the New York state military 19 museum and veterans' research center and 20 the preservation and restoration of 21 historic artifacts (38701). 22 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 720,000 23 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 180,000 24 Equipment (56000) ................................ 100,000 25 -------------- 26 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 27 -------------- 28 Special Revenue Funds - Other 29 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 30 Armory Rental Account - 22052 31 For services and expenses related to the 32 special services program (38701). 33 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 163,000 34 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 440,000 35 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 139,000 36 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 943,000 37 Travel (54000) .................................... 44,000 38 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,151,000 39 Equipment (56000) ................................. 48,000 40 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 176,000 41 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 22,000 42 -------------- 43 Program account subtotal ................... 3,126,000 44 -------------- 653 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 3 Camp Smith Billeting Account - 22017 4 For services and expenses related to the 5 special services program (38701). 6 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 32,000 7 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 28,000 8 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 37,000 9 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 10 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 73,000 11 Equipment (56000) ................................. 30,000 12 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 20,000 13 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 4,000 14 -------------- 15 Program account subtotal ..................... 229,000 16 -------------- 17 Special Revenue Funds - Other 18 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 19 Distance Learning Account - 22064 20 For services and expenses related to the 21 special services program (38701). 22 Equipment (56000) ................................ 100,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal ..................... 100,000 25 -------------- 26 Special Revenue Funds - Other 27 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 28 Equitable Sharing-DMNA Justice Account - 22233 29 For moneys to the division of military and 30 naval affairs for the justice department 31 federal equitable sharing agreement to be 32 used for law enforcement purposes distrib- 33 uted pursuant to a plan prepared by the 34 division of military and naval affairs and 35 approved by the division of budget 36 (38712). 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 650,000 38 Travel (54000) ................................... 100,000 39 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 500,000 40 Equipment (56000) ................................ 750,000 41 -------------- 42 Program account subtotal ................... 2,000,000 43 -------------- 654 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 3 Equitable Sharing-DMNA Treasury Account - 22234 4 For moneys to the division of military and 5 naval affairs for the treasury department 6 federal equitable sharing agreement to be 7 used for law enforcement purposes distrib- 8 uted pursuant to a plan prepared by the 9 division of military and naval affairs and 10 approved by the division of budget 11 (38713). 12 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 650,000 13 Travel (54000) ................................... 100,000 14 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 500,000 15 Equipment (56000) ................................ 750,000 16 -------------- 17 Program account subtotal ................... 2,000,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other 20 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 21 Recruitment Incentive Account - 22171 22 For the payment of tuition benefits provided 23 to eligible members of the state's organ- 24 ized militia pursuant to section 669-b of 25 the education law. The moneys hereby 26 appropriated shall be available for 27 expenses already accrued or to accrue 28 (38701). 29 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,300,000 30 -------------- 31 Program account subtotal ................... 3,300,000 32 -------------- 655 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 MILITARY READINESS PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 4 Federal Miscellaneous Grants Account - Air Force, Naval Militia and 5 Army - 25380 6 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 7 For services and expenses related to the military readiness program 8 (38700). 9 Personal service (50000) ... 16,466,000 ............ (re. $16,466,000) 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 23,495,000 ......... (re. $23,097,000) 11 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,119,000 ............... (re. $5,119,000) 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 13 For services and expenses related to the military readiness program 14 (38700). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 16,466,000 ................. (re. $9,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 23,495,000 .......... (re. $5,369,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 5,119,000 ................. (re. $733,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 19 For services and expenses related to the military readiness program 20 (38700). 21 Personal service (50000) ... 14,166,000 ............... (re. $581,000) 22 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 20,495,000 .......... (re. $2,425,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 8,119,000 .................. (re. $51,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 25 For services and expenses related to the military readiness program 26 (38700). 27 Personal service (50000) ... 14,166,000 ............... (re. $380,000) 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 20,495,000 .......... (re. $1,165,000) 29 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 8,119,000 .................. (re. $70,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 31 For services and expenses related to the military readiness program 32 (38700). 33 Personal service (50000) ... 14,166,000 ................. (re. $2,000) 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 20,495,000 .......... (re. $7,316,000) 35 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 8,119,000 ................. (re. $161,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 37 For services and expenses related to the military readiness program 38 (38700). 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 20,495,000 ............. (re. $38,000) 40 SPECIAL SERVICES PROGRAM 41 Special Revenue Funds - Other 42 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 43 Recruitment Incentive Account - 22171 656 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 2 For the payment of tuition benefits provided to eligible members of 3 the state's organized militia pursuant to section 669-b of the 4 education law. The moneys hereby appropriated shall be available for 5 expenses already accrued or to accrue (38701). 6 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,300,000 .......... (re. $3,300,000) 657 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 14,012,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 31,772,000 66,940,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 75,001,000 0 6 Internal Service Funds ............. 5,300,000 0 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 126,085,000 66,940,000 9 ================ ================ 10 SCHEDULE 11 ACCIDENT PREVENTION COURSE PROGRAM ............................. 425,000 12 -------------- 13 General Fund 14 State Purposes Account - 10050 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 accident prevention course internet tech- 17 nology pilot program in accordance with 18 article 12-C of the vehicle and traffic 19 law (39021). 20 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 160,000 21 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 5,000 22 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 48,000 23 Travel (54000) ..................................... 1,000 24 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 211,000 25 -------------- 26 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ....................................... 8,300,000 27 -------------- 28 Special Revenue Funds - Other 29 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 30 Equitable Sharing-DMV Justice Account - 22229 31 For services and expenses related to the 32 administration program. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 34 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 35 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 36 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 37 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 38 appropriation for the budget division 39 program of the division of the budget, are 40 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 41 part of this appropriation as if fully 42 stated (81001). 658 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 11,000 2 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 98,000 3 Equipment (56000) ................................ 891,000 4 -------------- 5 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Other 8 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 9 Equitable Sharing-DMV Treasury Account - 22230 10 For services and expenses related to the 11 administration program. 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 13 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 14 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 15 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 16 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 17 appropriation for the budget division 18 program of the division of the budget, are 19 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 20 part of this appropriation as if fully 21 stated (81001). 22 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 11,000 23 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 98,000 24 Equipment (56000) ................................ 891,000 25 -------------- 26 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 27 -------------- 28 Special Revenue Funds - Other 29 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 30 Federal Seized Assets Account - 22084 31 For services and expenses related to the 32 administration program (81001). 33 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 11,000 34 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 98,000 35 Equipment (56000) ................................ 891,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 38 -------------- 39 Internal Service Funds 40 Agencies Internal Service Fund 41 Banking Services Account - 55057 42 For services and expenses in connection with 43 the purchase of banking services (81001). 659 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,300,000 2 -------------- 3 Program account subtotal ................... 5,300,000 4 -------------- 5 ADMINISTRATIVE ADJUDICATION PROGRAM ......................... 48,787,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Other 8 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 9 Administrative Adjudication Account - 22055 10 For services and expenses for the adjudi- 11 cation of traffic infractions in accord- 12 ance with article 2-A of the vehicle and 13 traffic law. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 17 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 18 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 19 appropriation for the budget division 20 program of the division of the budget, are 21 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully 23 stated (39007). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 22,395,000 25 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 955,000 26 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 135,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,308,000 28 Travel (54000) .................................... 12,000 29 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,997,000 30 Equipment (56000) ................................ 184,000 31 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 15,071,000 32 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 730,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal .................. 48,787,000 35 -------------- 36 CLEAN AIR PROGRAM ........................................... 23,189,000 37 -------------- 38 Special Revenue Funds - Other 39 Clean Air Fund 40 Mobile Source Account - 21452 41 For services and expenses related to devel- 42 oping, implementing and operating the 43 emissions testing program. 44 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 45 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 660 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 2 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 3 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 4 appropriation for the budget division 5 program of the division of the budget, are 6 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 7 part of this appropriation as if fully 8 stated (81016). 9 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 11,875,000 10 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 45,000 11 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 138,000 12 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 275,000 13 Travel (54000) .................................... 27,000 14 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,299,000 15 Equipment (56000) ................................. 50,000 16 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 8,078,000 17 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 402,000 18 -------------- 19 COMPULSORY INSURANCE PROGRAM ................................ 11,577,000 20 -------------- 21 General Fund 22 State Purposes Account - 10050 23 For services and expenses related to the 24 compulsory insurance program. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 26 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 27 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 28 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 29 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 30 appropriation for the budget division 31 program of the division of the budget, are 32 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 33 part of this appropriation as if fully 34 stated (39008). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 9,994,000 36 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 41,000 37 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 162,000 38 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 630,000 39 Travel (54000) .................................... 25,000 40 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 659,000 41 Equipment (56000) ................................. 66,000 42 -------------- 43 DISTINCTIVE PLATE DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM ........................... 25,000 44 -------------- 45 Special Revenue Funds - Other 661 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 2 Distinctive Plate Development Account - 22120 3 For services and expenses for the distinc- 4 tive license plates in accordance with 5 article 14 of the vehicle and traffic law 6 (39018). 7 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 15,000 8 Fringe benefits (60000) ............................ 9,000 9 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 1,000 10 -------------- 11 DMV SEIZED ASSETS PROGRAM ...................................... 400,000 12 -------------- 13 General Fund 14 State Purposes Account - 10050 15 For services and expenses related to the DMV 16 seized assets program (39023). 17 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 28,000 18 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 257,000 19 Equipment (56000) ................................ 115,000 20 -------------- 21 GOVERNOR'S TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMITTEE ......................... 31,772,000 22 -------------- 23 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 24 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 25 Highway Safety Section 402 Account - 25319 26 For services and expenses related to highway 27 safety programs (39013). 28 Personal service (50000) ....................... 1,450,000 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) ....................... 95,000 30 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,046,000 31 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 165,000 32 -------------- 33 Total amount available ....................... 2,756,000 34 -------------- 35 For suballocation to other state agencies 36 for services and expenses related to high- 37 way safety programs. A portion of these 38 funds may be transferred to aid to locali- 39 ties (39009). 662 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ...................... 10,334,000 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 10,631,000 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,861,000 4 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 190,000 5 -------------- 6 Total amount available ...................... 23,016,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal .................. 25,772,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 11 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 12 Highway Safety Section 403 Account - 25320 13 For suballocation to other state agencies 14 for services and expenses related to high- 15 way safety programs. A portion of these 16 funds may be transferred to aid to locali- 17 ties (39011). 18 Personal service (50000) ......................... 625,000 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 4,842,000 20 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 452,000 21 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 81,000 22 -------------- 23 Program account subtotal ................... 6,000,000 24 -------------- 25 MOTORCYCLE SAFETY PROGRAM .................................... 1,610,000 26 -------------- 27 General Fund 28 State Purposes Account - 10050 29 For services and expenses related to the 30 motorcycle safety program in accordance 31 with section 410-a of the vehicle and 32 traffic law (39025). 33 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 120,000 34 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 26,000 35 Travel (54000) ..................................... 4,000 36 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,460,000 37 -------------- 663 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 GOVERNOR'S TRAFFIC SAFETY COMMITTEE 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 4 Highway Safety Section 402 Account - 25319 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to highway safety programs (39013). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 1,450,000 .............. (re. $1,450,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 95,000 ................. (re. $95,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,046,000 ............... (re. $1,046,000) 10 Indirect costs (58850) ... 165,000 .................... (re. $165,000) 11 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 12 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 13 transferred to aid to localities (39009). 14 Personal service (50000) ... 10,334,000 ............. (re. $2,667,000) 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 9,759,000 ........... (re. $4,850,000) 16 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,861,000 .................. (re. $16,000) 17 Indirect costs (58850) ... 190,000 .................... (re. $113,000) 18 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023, as 19 supplemented by a transfer in accordance with state finance law, is 20 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 21 For services and expenses related to highway safety programs (39013). 22 Personal service (50000) ... 1,450,000 ................ (re. $785,000) 23 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 95,000 ................. (re. $63,000) 24 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,046,000 ................. (re. $662,000) 25 Indirect costs (58850) ... [165,000]225,000 ........... (re. $181,000) 26 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 27 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 28 transferred to aid to localities (39009). 29 Personal service (50000) ... 9,090,000 ................ (re. $626,000) 30 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 8,515,000 ........... (re. $5,612,000) 31 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,861,000 ................. (re. $455,000) 32 Indirect costs (58850) ... 190,000 .................... (re. $124,000) 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 50, 34 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 35 For services and expenses related to highway safety programs (39013). 36 Personal service (50000) ... 1,450,000 ................ (re. $881,000) 37 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 145,000 ............... (re. $132,000) 38 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 849,000 ................... (re. $523,000) 39 Indirect costs (58850) ... 100,000 ..................... (re. $60,000) 40 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 41 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 42 transferred to aid to localities (39009). 43 Personal service (50000) ... 7,777,000 ................. (re. $52,000) 44 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 7,285,000 ........... (re. $4,441,000) 45 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,292,000 .................. (re. $95,000) 46 Indirect costs (58850) ... 98,000 ...................... (re. $26,000) 664 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021 as amended by chapter 50, 2 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 3 For services and expenses related to highway safety programs (39013). 4 Personal service (50000) ... 846,000 .................. (re. $379,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 54,000 ................. (re. $48,000) 6 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 495,000 ................... (re. $207,000) 7 Indirect costs (58850) ... 58,000 ...................... (re. $17,000) 8 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 9 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 10 transferred to aid to localities (39009). 11 Personal service (50000) ... 6,159,000 ................ (re. $181,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,770,000 ............. (re. $177,000) 13 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,017,000 ................. (re. $160,000) 14 Indirect costs (58850) ... 182,000 ..................... (re. $42,000) 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 16 For services and expenses related to highway safety programs (39013). 17 Personal service (50000) ... 846,000 .................. (re. $410,000) 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 54,000 ................. (re. $50,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 495,000 ................... (re. $233,000) 20 Indirect costs (58850) ... 58,000 ...................... (re. $11,000) 21 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 22 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 23 transferred to aid to localities (39009). 24 Personal service (50000) ... 6,159,000 .................. (re. $8,000) 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,770,000 ........... (re. $1,387,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 27 For services and expenses related to highway safety programs (39013). 28 Personal service (50000) ... 846,000 .................. (re. $416,000) 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 54,000 ................. (re. $52,000) 30 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 495,000 ................... (re. $241,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 32 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 33 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 34 transferred to aid to localities (39009). 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,770,000 .............. (re. $22,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 50, 37 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 38 For services and expenses related to highway safety programs (39013). 39 Personal service (50000) ... 846,000 .................. (re. $446,000) 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 76,000 ................. (re. $68,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 495,000 ................... (re. $227,000) 42 Indirect costs (58850) ... 58,000 ...................... (re. $12,000) 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 50, 44 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 45 For services and expenses related to highway safety programs (39013). 46 Personal service (50000) ... 608,000 .................. (re. $159,000) 47 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 105,000 ................ (re. $95,000) 665 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 347,000 ................... (re. $105,000) 2 Indirect costs (58850) ... 46,000 ...................... (re. $23,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 4 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 5 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 6 transferred to aid to localities (39009). 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,770,000 ............... (re. $3,000) 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 50, 9 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 10 For services and expenses related to highway safety programs (39013). 11 Personal service (50000) ... 608,000 .................. (re. $255,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 105,000 ................ (re. $98,000) 13 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 347,000 .................... (re. $86,000) 14 Indirect costs (58850) ... 46,000 ...................... (re. $37,000) 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 16 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 17 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 18 transferred to aid to localities (39009). 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,770,000 ............... (re. $3,000) 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 50, 21 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 22 For services and expenses related to highway safety programs (39013). 23 Personal service (50000) ... 598,000 .................. (re. $188,000) 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 114,000 ............... (re. $106,000) 25 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 341,000 .................... (re. $92,000) 26 Indirect costs (58850) ... 45,000 ....................... (re. $2,000) 27 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 28 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 29 Highway Safety Section 403 Account - 25320 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 31 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 32 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 33 transferred to aid to localities (39011). 34 Personal service (50000) ... 625,000 .................. (re. $625,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,842,000 ........... (re. $4,842,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 452,000 ................... (re. $452,000) 37 Indirect costs (58850) ... 81,000 ...................... (re. $81,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 39 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 40 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 41 transferred to aid to localities (39011). 42 Personal service (50000) ... 625,000 .................. (re. $581,000) 43 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,959,000 ........... (re. $4,959,000) 44 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 452,000 ................... (re. $424,000) 45 Indirect costs (58850) ... 81,000 ...................... (re. $81,000) 666 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 The appropriation made by chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022 as 2 supplemented by a transfer in accordance with state finance law, is 3 hereby amended and reappropriated to read: 4 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 5 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 6 transferred to aid to localities (39011). 7 Personal service (50000) ... [625,000]4,324,000 ..... (re. $4,282,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,959,000 .............. (re. $33,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... [367,000]1,589,000 ...... (re. $1,562,000) 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 50, 11 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 12 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 13 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 14 transferred to aid to localities (39011). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 725,000 .................. (re. $703,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,959,000 ........... (re. $4,759,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 467,000 ................... (re. $453,000) 18 Indirect costs (58850) ... 49,000 ...................... (re. $49,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 50, 20 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 22 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 23 transferred to aid to localities (39011) 24 Personal service (50000) ... 3,624,000 .............. (re. $2,009,000) 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,959,000 ............. (re. $177,000) 26 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,117,000 ............... (re. $1,091,000) 27 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019, as amended by chapter 50, 28 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 29 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 30 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 31 transferred to aid to localities (39011). 32 Personal service (50000) ... 2,674,000 .............. (re. $2,114,000) 33 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,959,000 ........... (re. $1,095,000) 34 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,367,000 ............... (re. $1,013,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 50, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 37 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 38 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 39 transferred to aid to localities (39011). 40 Personal service (50000) ... 3,000,000 ................ (re. $636,000) 41 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,959,000 ............. (re. $605,000) 42 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,000,000 ................. (re. $488,000) 43 Indirect costs (58850) ... 49,000 ...................... (re. $49,000) 44 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 50, 45 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 667 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 2 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 3 transferred to aid to localities (39011). 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,959,000 .............. (re. $10,000) 5 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 367,000 ................... (re. $152,000) 6 Indirect costs (58850) ... 119,000 .................... (re. $100,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1,of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 50, 8 section 1, of the laws of 2024: 9 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 10 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 11 transferred to aid to localities (39011). 12 Personal service (50000) ... 625,000 .................. (re. $157,000) 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,959,000 ........... (re. $1,502,000) 14 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,140,000 ................. (re. $381,000) 15 Indirect costs (58850) ... 49,000 ...................... (re. $40,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 17 For suballocation to other state agencies for services and expenses 18 related to highway safety programs. A portion of these funds may be 19 transferred to aid to localities (39011). 20 Personal service (50000) ... 573,000 .................. (re. $147,000) 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,546,000 .............. (re. $11,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 336,000 .................... (re. $99,000) 23 Indirect costs (58850) ... 45,000 ...................... (re. $12,000) 668 12550-10-5 OLYMPIC REGIONAL DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 14,240,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 150,000 0 5 ---------------- ---------------- 6 All Funds ........................ 14,390,000 0 7 ================ ================ 8 SCHEDULE 9 OLYMPIC FACILITIES OPERATIONS PROGRAM ....................... 14,390,000 10 -------------- 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 For services and expenses related to opera- 14 tion and maintenance of olympic facilities 15 (44702). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 7,125,000 17 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,788,000 18 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,840,000 19 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,487,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal .................. 14,240,000 22 -------------- 23 Special Revenue Funds - Other 24 US Olympic Committee/Lake Placid Olympic Training Fund 25 Lake Placid Training - DMV Account - 23501 26 For services and expenses of the Lake Placid 27 training account (44702). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 20,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 20,000 30 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 10,000 31 -------------- 32 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 33 -------------- 34 Special Revenue Funds - Other 35 US Olympic Committee/Lake Placid Olympic Training Fund 36 Lake Placid Training - Tax Account - 23502 37 For services and expenses of the Lake Placid 38 training account (44702). 669 12550-10-5 OLYMPIC REGIONAL DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 45,000 2 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 35,000 3 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 20,000 4 -------------- 5 Program account subtotal ..................... 100,000 6 -------------- 670 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 209,580,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 8,783,000 27,225,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 137,099,000 137,991,000 6 Enterprise Funds ................... 41,682,000 39,229,000 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 397,144,000 204,445,000 9 ================ ================ 10 SCHEDULE 11 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 27,929,000 12 -------------- 13 General Fund 14 State Purposes Account - 10050 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 administration program. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 18 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 19 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 20 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 21 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 22 appropriation for the budget division 23 program of the division of the budget, are 24 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully 26 stated (81001). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 24,946,000 28 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 100,000 29 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 11,000 30 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 684,000 31 Travel (54000) ................................... 209,000 32 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 393,000 33 Equipment (56000) ................................. 88,000 34 -------------- 35 Program account subtotal .................. 26,431,000 36 -------------- 37 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 38 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 39 Federal Operating Grants Fund Account - 25383 40 For services and expenses related to the 41 administration program (81001). 671 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ......................... 725,000 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 225,000 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................... 46,000 4 Indirect costs (58850) ............................. 4,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Other 9 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 10 Federal Indirect Recovery Account - 22188 11 For services and expenses related to the 12 administration of special revenue funds - 13 other, special revenue funds - federal and 14 internal service funds and for services 15 provided to other state agencies, govern- 16 mental bodies and other entities. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 18 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 19 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 20 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 21 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 22 appropriation for the budget division 23 program of the division of the budget, are 24 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully 26 stated (81001). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 48,000 28 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 25,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 65,000 30 Travel (54000) .................................... 30,000 31 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 170,000 32 Equipment (56000) ................................ 100,000 33 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 50,000 34 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 10,000 35 -------------- 36 Program account subtotal ..................... 498,000 37 -------------- 38 HISTORIC PRESERVATION PROGRAM ............................... 19,491,000 39 -------------- 40 General Fund 41 State Purposes Account - 10050 42 For services and expenses related to the 43 historic preservation program. 44 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 45 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 46 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 672 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 2 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 3 appropriation for the budget division 4 program of the division of the budget, are 5 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 6 part of this appropriation as if fully 7 stated (39901). 8 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 14,781,000 9 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,588,000 10 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 87,000 11 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 221,000 12 Travel (54000) .................................... 23,000 13 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 351,000 14 Equipment (56000) ................................. 54,000 15 -------------- 16 Program account subtotal .................. 17,105,000 17 -------------- 18 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 19 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 20 Federal Operating Grants Fund Account - 25462 21 For services and expenses related to grants 22 for historic preservation projects includ- 23 ing acquisition, research, development, 24 education and rehabilitation of historic 25 sites, programs and facilities (39901). 26 Personal service (50000) ....................... 1,600,000 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 501,000 28 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 151,000 29 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 31,000 30 -------------- 31 Program account subtotal ................... 2,283,000 32 -------------- 33 Special Revenue Funds - Other 34 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 35 Public Service Account - 22011 36 For services and expenses related to the 37 historic preservation program. 38 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 39 to the contrary, direct and indirect 40 expenses relating to the office of parks, 41 recreation and historic preservation's 42 participation in general ratemaking 43 proceedings pursuant to section 65 of the 44 public service law or certification 45 proceedings or permits issued pursuant to 46 article 7, 8, or 10 of the public service 673 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 law, shall be deemed expenses of the 2 department of public service within the 3 meaning of section 18-a of the public 4 service law (39901). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 60,000 6 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 40,000 7 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 3,000 8 -------------- 9 Program account subtotal ..................... 103,000 10 -------------- 11 PARK OPERATIONS PROGRAM .................................... 297,688,000 12 -------------- 13 General Fund 14 State Purposes Account - 10050 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 16 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 17 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 18 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 19 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 20 appropriation for the budget division 21 program of the division of the budget, are 22 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully 24 stated (81003). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 120,388,000 26 Temporary service (50200) ..................... 22,358,000 27 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 5,505,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 5,587,000 29 Travel (54000) ................................... 216,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,246,000 31 Equipment (56000) .............................. 4,644,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal ................. 165,944,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Other 36 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 37 250th Commemoration Commission Account - 22261 38 For services and expenses related to New 39 York State's 250th Commemoration of the 40 founding of the United States including 41 operation and administration of the 250th 42 Commemoration Commission and suballocation 43 to other state agencies, authorities, and 44 entities to use for commemoration purposes 45 (40436). 674 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 173,000 2 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 119,000 3 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 8,000 4 -------------- 5 Program account subtotal ..................... 300,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Other 8 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 9 Patron Services Account - 22163 10 For services and expenses related to the 11 administration and operation of the park 12 operations program, providing that moneys 13 hereby appropriated shall be available to 14 the program net of refunds, rebates, 15 reimbursements, credits, and deductions 16 taken by contractors, including the golf 17 management system, for fees associated 18 with operating park facilities. 19 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 20 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 21 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 22 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 23 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 24 appropriation for the budget division 25 program of the division of the budget, are 26 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 27 part of this appropriation as if fully 28 stated (81003). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 37,181,000 30 Temporary service (50200) ..................... 32,412,000 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 1,459,000 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ................ 28,594,000 33 Travel (54000) ................................... 637,000 34 Contractual services (51000) .................. 17,682,000 35 Equipment (56000) .............................. 7,176,000 36 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 6,303,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ................. 131,444,000 39 -------------- 40 RECREATION SERVICES PROGRAM ................................. 52,036,000 41 -------------- 42 General Fund 43 State Purposes Account - 10050 44 For services and expenses related to the 45 recreation services program, including but 46 not limited to the Empire State Trails 675 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 program. Notwithstanding any other 2 provision of the law to the contrary, the 3 OGS Interchange and Transfer Authority and 4 the IT Interchange and Transfer Authority 5 as defined in the 2025-26 state fiscal 6 year state operations appropriation for 7 the budget division program of the divi- 8 sion of the budget, are deemed fully 9 incorporated herein and apart of this 10 appropriation as if fully stated (39910). 11 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 12 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 13 -------------- 14 Program account subtotal ..................... 100,000 15 -------------- 16 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 17 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 18 Federal Operating Grants Fund Account - 25383 19 For services and expenses related to grants 20 for park operations projects including 21 acquisition, research, development, educa- 22 tion and rehabilitation of parklands, 23 programs and facilities (39910). 24 Personal service (50000) ....................... 2,000,000 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,550,000 26 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 690,000 27 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 60,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal ................... 5,300,000 30 -------------- 31 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 32 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 33 USDA Forest Service - Parks Account - 25036 34 For services and expenses related to the 35 federal park lands and forest grants, 36 including suballocation to other state 37 departments and agencies (39910). 38 Personal service (50000) .......................... 25,000 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 150,000 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................... 23,000 41 Indirect costs (58850) ............................. 2,000 42 -------------- 43 Program account subtotal ..................... 200,000 44 -------------- 676 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 3 Bayard Cutting Arboretum Fund Account - 20121 4 For services and expenses related to the 5 recreation services program. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 7 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 8 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 9 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 10 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 11 appropriation for the budget division 12 program of the division of the budget, are 13 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 14 part of this appropriation as if fully 15 stated (39910). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 40,000 17 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 10,000 18 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 19 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 143,000 20 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 274,000 21 Equipment (56000) ................................. 12,000 22 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 30,000 23 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 2,000 24 -------------- 25 Program account subtotal ..................... 512,000 26 -------------- 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 29 OPR-Miscellaneous Gifts Account - 20104 30 For services and expenses related to the 31 recreation services program. 32 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 33 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 34 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 35 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 36 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 37 appropriation for the budget division 38 program of the division of the budget, are 39 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 40 part of this appropriation as if fully 41 stated (39910). 42 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 612,000 43 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 219,000 44 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 206,000 45 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 77,000 46 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 17,000 47 -------------- 677 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Program account subtotal ................... 1,131,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other 4 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 5 Planting Fields Foundation and Friends Account - 20101 6 For services and expenses related to the 7 recreation services program. 8 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 9 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 10 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 11 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 12 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 13 appropriation for the budget division 14 program of the division of the budget, are 15 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 16 part of this appropriation as if fully 17 stated (39910). 18 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 124,000 19 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 161,000 20 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 5,000 21 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 22 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 96,000 23 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 34,000 24 -------------- 25 Program account subtotal ..................... 421,000 26 -------------- 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 29 Boating Noise Level Enforcement Account - 21927 30 For services and expenses related to the 31 recreation services program. 32 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 33 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 34 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 35 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 36 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 37 appropriation for the budget division 38 program of the division of the budget, are 39 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 40 part of this appropriation as if fully 41 stated (39910). 42 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 4,500 43 -------------- 44 Program account subtotal ....................... 4,500 45 -------------- 678 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 3 I Love NY Water Account - 21930 4 For services and expenses related to the 5 recreation services program. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 7 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 8 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 9 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 10 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 11 appropriation for the budget division 12 program of the division of the budget, are 13 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 14 part of this appropriation as if fully 15 stated (39910). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 106,000 17 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 65,000 18 Travel (54000) ..................................... 3,500 19 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 55,000 20 Equipment (56000) .................................. 4,000 21 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 71,000 22 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 8,000 23 -------------- 24 Total amount available ......................... 312,500 25 -------------- 26 For services and expenses related to boating 27 access and maintenance in accordance with 28 a plan to be approved by the director of 29 the budget. Notwithstanding any other 30 provision of law, the director of the 31 budget is hereby authorized to transfer 32 any or all of this appropriation to any 33 capital projects fund or aid to localities 34 (39945). 35 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,200,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ................... 1,512,500 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Other 40 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 41 NYS Water Rescue Team Awareness and Research Fund 42 Account - 22181 43 For services and expenses related to the 44 recreation services program. 45 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 46 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 679 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 2 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 3 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 4 appropriation for the budget division 5 program of the division of the budget, are 6 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 7 part of this appropriation as if fully 8 stated (39910). 9 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 20,000 10 -------------- 11 Program account subtotal ...................... 20,000 12 -------------- 13 Special Revenue Funds - Other 14 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 15 Equitable Sharing-PRK Justice Account - 22210 16 For services and expenses related to the 17 recreation services program. 18 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 19 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 20 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 21 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 22 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 23 appropriation for the budget division 24 program of the division of the budget, are 25 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 26 part of this appropriation as if fully 27 stated (39910). 28 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 29 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 30 Equipment (56000) .................................. 6,000 31 -------------- 32 Program account subtotal ..................... 106,000 33 -------------- 34 Special Revenue Funds - Other 35 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 36 Equitable Sharing-PRK Treasury Account - 22238 37 For services and expenses related to the 38 recreation services program. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 40 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 41 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 42 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 43 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 44 appropriation for the budget division 45 program of the division of the budget, are 46 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 680 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 part of this appropriation as if fully 2 stated (39910). 3 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 4 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 5 Equipment (56000) .................................. 6,000 6 -------------- 7 Program account subtotal ..................... 106,000 8 -------------- 9 Special Revenue Funds - Other 10 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 11 Seized Asset Account - 21986 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 recreation services program. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 17 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 18 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 19 appropriation for the budget division 20 program of the division of the budget, are 21 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully 23 stated (39910). 24 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 25 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 26 Equipment (56000) .................................. 6,000 27 -------------- 28 Program account subtotal ..................... 106,000 29 -------------- 30 Special Revenue Funds - Other 31 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 32 Snowmobile Trail Development and Management Account - 33 21932 34 For services and expenses related to the 35 recreation services program. 36 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 37 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 38 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 39 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 40 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 41 appropriation for the budget division 42 program of the division of the budget, are 43 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 44 part of this appropriation as if fully 45 stated (39910). 681 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 229,000 2 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 24,000 3 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 4 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 15,000 5 Travel (54000) .................................... 14,000 6 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 55,000 7 Equipment (56000) ................................. 31,000 8 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 150,000 9 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 7,000 10 -------------- 11 Total amount available ......................... 535,000 12 -------------- 13 For services and expenses related to snowmo- 14 bile trail development and maintenance, 15 including suballocation to other state 16 departments and agencies (39946). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 29,000 18 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 80,000 19 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 40,000 20 Equipment (56000) ................................ 120,000 21 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 31,000 22 -------------- 23 Total amount available ......................... 300,000 24 -------------- 25 Program account subtotal ..................... 835,000 26 -------------- 27 Enterprise Funds 28 Agencies Enterprise Fund 29 Golf Account - 50332 30 For services and expenses relating to the 31 office of parks, recreation and historic 32 preservation's golf courses. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 34 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 35 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 36 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 37 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 38 appropriation for the budget division 39 program of the division of the budget, are 40 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 41 part of this appropriation as if fully 42 stated (39910). 43 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 7,682,000 44 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 7,000,000 45 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 1,000,000 46 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 5,800,000 47 Travel (54000) ................................... 500,000 682 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,000,000 2 Equipment (56000) .............................. 2,000,000 3 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,600,000 4 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 100,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal .................. 30,682,000 7 -------------- 8 Enterprise Funds 9 Agencies Enterprise Fund 10 Retail Sales Account - 50331 11 For services and expenses relating to the 12 office of parks, recreation and historic 13 preservation's retail stores. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 17 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 18 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 19 appropriation for the budget division 20 program of the division of the budget, are 21 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully 23 stated (39910). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 50,000 25 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 50,000 26 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 50,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 7,500,000 28 Travel (54000) ................................... 350,000 29 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 850,000 30 Equipment (56000) .............................. 2,050,000 31 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 50,000 32 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 50,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal .................. 11,000,000 35 -------------- 683 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 4 Federal Operating Grants Fund Account - 25383 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to the administration program 7 (81001). 8 Personal service (50000) ... 725,000 .................. (re. $725,000) 9 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 225,000 ............... (re. $225,000) 10 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 46,000 ..................... (re. $46,000) 11 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,000 ........................ (re. $4,000) 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 13 For services and expenses related to the administration program 14 (81001). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 225,000 .................. (re. $225,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 225,000 ............... (re. $225,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 46,000 ..................... (re. $46,000) 18 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,000 ........................ (re. $4,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 20 For services and expenses related to the administration program 21 (81001). 22 Personal service (50000) ... 225,000 .................. (re. $136,000) 23 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 225,000 ............... (re. $215,000) 24 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 46,000 ..................... (re. $46,000) 25 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,000 ........................ (re. $4,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 27 For services and expenses related to the administration program 28 (81001). 29 Personal service (50000) ... 180,000 ................... (re. $41,000) 30 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 270,000 ............... (re. $238,000) 31 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 46,000 ..................... (re. $46,000) 32 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,000 ........................ (re. $4,000) 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 34 For services and expenses related to the administration program 35 (81001). 36 Personal service (50000) ... 100,000 ................... (re. $47,000) 37 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 350,000 ............... (re. $242,000) 38 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 46,000 ..................... (re. $38,000) 39 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 40 For services and expenses related to the administration program 41 (81001). 42 Personal service (50000) ... 100,000 .................. (re. $100,000) 43 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 350,000 ............... (re. $105,000) 44 Special Revenue Funds - Other 684 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 2 Federal Indirect Recovery Account - 22188 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 4 For services and expenses related to the administration of special 5 revenue funds - other, special revenue funds - federal and internal 6 service funds and for services provided to other state agencies, 7 governmental bodies and other entities. 8 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 9 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 10 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 11 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 12 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 13 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 48,000 ........... (re. $48,000) 15 Temporary service (50200) ... 25,000 ................... (re. $25,000) 16 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 65,000 .............. (re. $65,000) 17 Travel (54000) ... 30,000 .............................. (re. $30,000) 18 Contractual services (51000) ... 170,000 .............. (re. $170,000) 19 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 ......................... (re. $100,000) 20 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 50,000 ..................... (re. $50,000) 21 Indirect costs (58800) ... 10,000 ...................... (re. $10,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 23 For services and expenses related to the administration of special 24 revenue funds - other, special revenue funds - federal and internal 25 service funds and for services provided to other state agencies, 26 governmental bodies and other entities. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 28 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 29 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 30 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 31 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 32 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 33 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 48,000 ........... (re. $48,000) 34 Temporary service (50200) ... 25,000 ................... (re. $25,000) 35 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 65,000 .............. (re. $65,000) 36 Travel (54000) ... 30,000 .............................. (re. $30,000) 37 Contractual services (51000) ... 170,000 .............. (re. $170,000) 38 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 ......................... (re. $100,000) 39 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 50,000 ..................... (re. $50,000) 40 Indirect costs (58800) ... 10,000 ...................... (re. $10,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 42 For services and expenses related to the administration of special 43 revenue funds - other, special revenue funds - federal and internal 44 service funds and for services provided to other state agencies, 45 governmental bodies and other entities. 46 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 47 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 48 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 49 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 685 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 2 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 48,000 ........... (re. $48,000) 4 Temporary service (50200) ... 25,000 ................... (re. $25,000) 5 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 65,000 .............. (re. $65,000) 6 Travel (54000) ... 30,000 .............................. (re. $30,000) 7 Contractual services (51000) ... 170,000 .............. (re. $170,000) 8 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 ......................... (re. $100,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 50,000 ..................... (re. $50,000) 10 Indirect costs (58800) ... 10,000 ...................... (re. $10,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 12 For services and expenses related to the administration of special 13 revenue funds - other, special revenue funds - federal and internal 14 service funds and for services provided to other state agencies, 15 governmental bodies and other entities. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 17 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 18 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 19 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 20 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 22 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 48,000 ........... (re. $48,000) 23 Temporary service (50200) ... 25,000 ................... (re. $25,000) 24 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 65,000 .............. (re. $65,000) 25 Travel (54000) ... 30,000 .............................. (re. $30,000) 26 Contractual services (51000) ... 170,000 .............. (re. $170,000) 27 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 ......................... (re. $100,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 50,000 ..................... (re. $50,000) 29 Indirect costs (58800) ... 10,000 ...................... (re. $10,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 31 For services and expenses related to the administration of special 32 revenue funds - other, special revenue funds - federal and internal 33 service funds and for services provided to other state agencies, 34 governmental bodies and other entities. 35 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 36 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 37 fer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 38 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 39 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 40 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81001). 41 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 50,000 ........... (re. $50,000) 42 Temporary service (50200) ... 25,000 ................... (re. $25,000) 43 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 65,000 .............. (re. $65,000) 44 Travel (54000) ... 30,000 .............................. (re. $30,000) 45 Contractual services (51000) ... 170,000 .............. (re. $170,000) 46 Equipment (56000) ... 100,000 ......................... (re. $100,000) 47 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 50,000 ..................... (re. $50,000) 48 Indirect costs (58800) ... 10,000 ...................... (re. $10,000) 49 HISTORIC PRESERVATION PROGRAM 686 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 2 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 3 Federal Operating Grants Fund Account - 25462 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For services and expenses related to grants for historic preservation 6 projects including acquisition, research, development, education and 7 rehabilitation of historic sites, programs and facilities (39901). 8 Personal service (50000) ... 1,600,000 .............. (re. $1,546,000) 9 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 501,000 ............... (re. $432,000) 10 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 151,000 ................... (re. $151,000) 11 Indirect costs (58850) ... 31,000 ...................... (re. $31,000) 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 13 For services and expenses related to grants for historic preservation 14 projects including acquisition, research, development, education and 15 rehabilitation of historic sites, programs and facilities (39901). 16 Personal service (50000) ... 1,100,000 ................. (re. $68,000) 17 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 501,000 ............... (re. $176,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 19 For services and expenses related to grants for historic preservation 20 projects including acquisition, research, development, education and 21 rehabilitation of historic sites, programs and facilities (39901). 22 Personal service (50000) ... 1,100,000 ................. (re. $33,000) 23 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 501,000 ............... (re. $162,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 25 For services and expenses related to grants for historic preservation 26 projects including acquisition, research, development, education and 27 rehabilitation of historic sites, programs and facilities (39901). 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 501,000 ................ (re. $90,000) 29 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 151,000 ................... (re. $144,000) 30 Indirect costs (58850) ... 31,000 ...................... (re. $31,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 32 For services and expenses related to grants for historic preservation 33 projects including acquisition, research, development, education and 34 rehabilitation of historic sites, programs and facilities (39901). 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 601,000 ............... (re. $181,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 151,000 ................... (re. $151,000) 37 Indirect costs (58850) ... 31,000 ...................... (re. $31,000) 38 PARK OPERATIONS PROGRAM 39 Special Revenue Funds - Other 40 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 41 Patron Services Account - 22163 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 43 For services and expenses related to the administration and operation 44 of the park operations program, providing that moneys hereby appro- 687 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 priated shall be available to the program net of refunds, rebates, 2 reimbursements, credits, and deductions taken by contractors, 3 including the golf management system, for fees associated with oper- 4 ating park facilities. 5 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 6 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 7 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 8 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 9 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 10 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81003). 11 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 44,181,000 ... (re. $30,000,000) 12 Temporary service (50200) ... 26,412,000 ........... (re. $12,000,000) 13 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ................................ 14 1,459,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 28,594,000 ...... (re. $15,800,000) 16 Travel (54000) ... 337,000 ............................ (re. $337,000) 17 Contractual services (51000) ... 17,982,000 ........ (re. $12,000,000) 18 Equipment (56000) ... 7,176,000 ..................... (re. $6,000,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 5,303,000 ............... (re. $2,571,000) 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 21 For services and expenses related to the administration and operation 22 of the park operations program, providing that moneys hereby appro- 23 priated shall be available to the program net of refunds, rebates, 24 reimbursements, credits, and deductions taken by contractors, 25 including the golf management system, for fees associated with oper- 26 ating park facilities. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 28 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 29 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 30 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 31 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 32 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (81003). 33 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 38,331,000 ... (re. $17,927,000) 34 Temporary service (50200) ... 26,412,000 ............ (re. $5,564,000) 35 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ................................ 36 1,459,000 ......................................... (re. $1,459,000) 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 28,594,000 ....... (re. $6,719,000) 38 Travel (54000) ... 337,000 ............................ (re. $337,000) 39 Contractual services (51000) ... 17,982,000 ......... (re. $7,716,000) 40 Equipment (56000) ... 7,176,000 ..................... (re. $5,382,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 5,303,000 ............... (re. $2,377,000) 42 RECREATION SERVICES PROGRAM 43 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 44 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 45 Federal Operating Grants Fund Account - 25383 46 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 688 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to grants for park operations 2 projects including acquisition, research, development, education and 3 rehabilitation of parklands, programs and facilities (39910). 4 Personal service (50000) ... 2,000,000 .............. (re. $2,000,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,550,000 ........... (re. $2,550,000) 6 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 690,000 ................... (re. $690,000) 7 Indirect costs (58850) ... 60,000 ...................... (re. $60,000) 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 9 For services and expenses related to grants for park operations 10 projects including acquisition, research, development, education and 11 rehabilitation of parklands, programs and facilities (39910). 12 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 .............. (re. $1,058,000) 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,550,000 ........... (re. $2,536,000) 14 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 690,000 ................... (re. $690,000) 15 Indirect costs (58850) ... 60,000 ...................... (re. $60,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 17 For services and expenses related to grants for park operations 18 projects including acquisition, research, development, education and 19 rehabilitation of parklands, programs and facilities (39910). 20 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 ................ (re. $367,000) 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,550,000 ........... (re. $2,306,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 690,000 ................... (re. $690,000) 23 Indirect costs (58850) ... 60,000 ...................... (re. $60,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 25 For services and expenses related to grants for park operations 26 projects including acquisition, research, development, education and 27 rehabilitation of parklands, programs and facilities (39910). 28 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 ................ (re. $899,000) 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,550,000 ........... (re. $1,373,000) 30 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 690,000 ................... (re. $690,000) 31 Indirect costs (58850) ... 60,000 ...................... (re. $60,000) 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 33 For services and expenses related to grants for park operations 34 projects including acquisition, research, development, education and 35 rehabilitation of parklands, programs and facilities (39910). 36 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 ................ (re. $265,000) 37 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,550,000 ........... (re. $1,103,000) 38 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 690,000 ................... (re. $690,000) 39 Indirect costs (58850) ... 60,000 ...................... (re. $60,000) 40 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 41 For services and expenses related to grants for park operations 42 projects including acquisition, research, development, education and 43 rehabilitation of parklands, programs and facilities (39910). 44 Personal service (50000) ... 1,500,000 ................ (re. $167,000) 45 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,550,000 ........... (re. $1,312,000) 46 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 690,000 ................... (re. $690,000) 47 Indirect costs (58850) ... 60,000 ...................... (re. $60,000) 689 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 2 Federal USDA-Food and Nutrition Services Fund 3 USDA Forest Service - Parks Account - 25036 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For services and expenses related to the federal park lands and forest 6 grants, including suballocation to other state departments and agen- 7 cies (39910). 8 Personal service (50000) ... 25,000 .................... (re. $25,000) 9 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 150,000 ............... (re. $150,000) 10 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 23,000 ..................... (re. $23,000) 11 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 13 For services and expenses related to the federal park lands and forest 14 grants, including suballocation to other state departments and agen- 15 cies (39910). 16 Personal service (50000) ... 25,000 .................... (re. $25,000) 17 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 150,000 ............... (re. $150,000) 18 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 23,000 ..................... (re. $23,000) 19 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 21 For services and expenses related to the federal park lands and forest 22 grants, including suballocation to other state departments and agen- 23 cies (39910). 24 Personal service (50000) ... 25,000 .................... (re. $25,000) 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 150,000 ............... (re. $150,000) 26 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 23,000 ..................... (re. $23,000) 27 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 29 For services and expenses related to the federal park lands and forest 30 grants, including suballocation to other state departments and agen- 31 cies (39910). 32 Personal service (50000) ... 25,000 .................... (re. $25,000) 33 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 150,000 ............... (re. $150,000) 34 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 23,000 ..................... (re. $23,000) 35 Indirect costs (58850) ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 38 I Love NY Water Account - 21930 39 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 40 For services and expenses related to the recreation services program. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 42 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 43 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 44 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 45 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 46 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (39910). 690 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 106,000 .......... (re. $85,000) 2 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 65,000 .............. (re. $65,000) 3 Travel (54000) ... 3,500 ................................ (re. $3,500) 4 Contractual services (51000) ... 55,000 ................ (re. $55,000) 5 Equipment (56000) ... 4,000 ............................. (re. $4,000) 6 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 71,000 ..................... (re. $57,000) 7 Indirect costs (58800) ... 8,000 ........................ (re. $8,000) 8 For services and expenses related to boating access and maintenance in 9 accordance with a plan to be approved by the director of the budget. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget 11 is hereby authorized to transfer any or all of this appropriation to 12 any capital projects fund or aid to localities (39945). 13 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,200,000 .......... (re. $1,200,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 15 For services and expenses related to the recreation services program. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 17 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 18 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 19 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 20 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (39910). 22 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 106,000 .......... (re. $51,000) 23 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 65,000 .............. (re. $60,000) 24 Travel (54000) ... 3,500 ................................ (re. $3,500) 25 Contractual services (51000) ... 55,000 ................ (re. $55,000) 26 Equipment (56000) ... 4,000 ............................. (re. $4,000) 27 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 71,000 ..................... (re. $33,000) 28 Indirect costs (58800) ... 8,000 ........................ (re. $7,000) 29 For services and expenses related to boating access and maintenance in 30 accordance with a plan to be approved by the director of the budget. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the 32 budget is hereby authorized to transfer any or all of this appropri- 33 ation to any capital projects fund or aid to localities (39945). 34 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,200,000 .......... (re. $1,200,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 36 For services and expenses related to the recreation services program. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 38 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 39 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 40 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 41 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 42 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (39910). 43 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 106,000 .......... (re. $51,000) 44 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 65,000 .............. (re. $65,000) 45 Travel (54000) ... 3,500 ................................ (re. $3,500) 46 Contractual services (51000) ... 55,000 ................ (re. $55,000) 47 Equipment (56000) ... 4,000 ............................. (re. $4,000) 48 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 71,000 ..................... (re. $36,000) 49 Indirect costs (58800) ... 8,000 ........................ (re. $7,000) 691 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to boating access and maintenance in 2 accordance with a plan to be approved by the director of the budget. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the 4 budget is hereby authorized to transfer any or all of this appropri- 5 ation to any capital projects fund or aid to localities (39945). 6 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,200,000 .......... (re. $1,200,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 8 For services and expenses related to the recreation services program. 9 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 10 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 11 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 12 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 13 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 14 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (39910). 15 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 106,000 .......... (re. $53,000) 16 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 65,000 .............. (re. $65,000) 17 Travel (54000) ... 3,500 ................................ (re. $3,500) 18 Contractual services (51000) ... 55,000 ................ (re. $55,000) 19 Equipment (56000) ... 4,000 ............................. (re. $4,000) 20 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 71,000 ..................... (re. $37,000) 21 Indirect costs (58800) ... 8,000 ........................ (re. $6,000) 22 For services and expenses related to boating access and maintenance in 23 accordance with a plan to be approved by the director of the budget. 24 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the 25 budget is hereby authorized to transfer any or all of this appropri- 26 ation to any capital projects fund or aid to localities (39945). 27 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,200,000 .......... (re. $1,200,000) 28 Special Revenue Funds - Other 29 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 30 Snowmobile Trail Development and Management Account - 21932 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 32 For services and expenses related to the recreation services program. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 34 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 35 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 36 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 37 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 38 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (39910). 39 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 229,000 ......... (re. $149,000) 40 Temporary service (50200) ... 24,000 ................... (re. $24,000) 41 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ....... (re. $10,000) 42 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 15,000 ............... (re. $6,000) 43 Travel (54000) ... 14,000 .............................. (re. $11,000) 44 Contractual services (51000) ... 55,000 ................ (re. $48,000) 45 Equipment (56000) ... 31,000 ........................... (re. $31,000) 46 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 150,000 .................... (re. $98,000) 47 Indirect costs (58800) ... 7,000 ........................ (re. $5,000) 692 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to snowmobile trail development and 2 maintenance, including suballocation to other state departments and 3 agencies (39946). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 29,000 ........... (re. $29,000) 5 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 80,000 .............. (re. $74,000) 6 Contractual services (51000) ... 40,000 ................ (re. $40,000) 7 Equipment (56000) ... 120,000 ......................... (re. $120,000) 8 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 31,000 ..................... (re. $31,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 10 For services and expenses related to the recreation services program. 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 12 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 13 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 14 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 15 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 16 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (39910). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 229,000 .......... (re. $75,000) 18 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ........ (re. $8,000) 19 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 15,000 ............... (re. $2,000) 20 Travel (54000) ... 14,000 .............................. (re. $13,000) 21 Contractual services (51000) ... 55,000 ................. (re. $2,000) 22 Equipment (56000) ... 31,000 ........................... (re. $31,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 150,000 .................... (re. $29,000) 24 Indirect costs (58800) ... 7,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 25 For services and expenses related to snowmobile trail development and 26 maintenance, including suballocation to other state departments and 27 agencies (39946). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 29,000 ........... (re. $29,000) 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 80,000 .............. (re. $76,000) 30 Contractual services (51000) ... 40,000 ................ (re. $40,000) 31 Equipment (56000) ... 120,000 ......................... (re. $120,000) 32 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 31,000 ..................... (re. $31,000) 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 34 For services and expenses related to the recreation services program. 35 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 36 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 37 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 38 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 39 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 40 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (39910). 41 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 229,000 ......... (re. $103,000) 42 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ........ (re. $8,000) 43 Travel (54000) ... 14,000 .............................. (re. $13,000) 44 Contractual services (51000) ... 55,000 ................ (re. $48,000) 45 Equipment (56000) ... 31,000 ........................... (re. $31,000) 46 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 150,000 .................... (re. $54,000) 47 For services and expenses related to snowmobile trail development and 48 maintenance, including suballocation to other state departments and 49 agencies (39946). 50 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 29,000 ........... (re. $29,000) 693 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 80,000 .............. (re. $55,000) 2 Equipment (56000) ... 120,000 ......................... (re. $120,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 31,000 ..................... (re. $31,000) 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 5 For services and expenses related to the recreation services program. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 7 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 8 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 9 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 10 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (39910). 12 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 229,000 .......... (re. $69,000) 13 Temporary service (50200) ... 24,000 ................... (re. $24,000) 14 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ........ (re. $8,000) 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 15,000 .............. (re. $14,000) 16 Travel (54000) ... 14,000 .............................. (re. $13,000) 17 Contractual services (51000) ... 55,000 ................ (re. $28,000) 18 Equipment (56000) ... 31,000 ........................... (re. $31,000) 19 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 150,000 .................... (re. $48,000) 20 Indirect costs (58800) ... 7,000 ........................ (re. $3,000) 21 For services and expenses related to snowmobile trail development and 22 maintenance, including suballocation to other state departments and 23 agencies (39946). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 29,000 ........... (re. $29,000) 25 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 80,000 .............. (re. $80,000) 26 Contractual services (51000) ... 40,000 ................ (re. $22,000) 27 Equipment (56000) ... 120,000 .......................... (re. $80,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 31,000 ..................... (re. $31,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 30 For services and expenses related to the recreation services program. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 32 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 33 fer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 34 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 35 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 36 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (39910). 37 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 229,000 .......... (re. $28,000) 38 Temporary service (50200) ... 24,000 ................... (re. $24,000) 39 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 10,000 ........ (re. $9,000) 40 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 15,000 .............. (re. $14,000) 41 Travel (54000) ... 14,000 .............................. (re. $13,000) 42 Contractual services (51000) ... 22,000 ................ (re. $19,000) 43 Equipment (56000) ... 31,000 ........................... (re. $31,000) 44 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 150,000 .................... (re. $21,000) 45 Indirect costs (58800) ... 7,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 46 For services and expenses related to snowmobile trail development and 47 maintenance, including suballocation to other state departments and 48 agencies (39946). 49 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 42,000 ........... (re. $42,000) 50 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 100,000 ............. (re. $95,000) 694 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ... 40,000 ................ (re. $35,000) 2 Equipment (56000) ... 120,000 ......................... (re. $105,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 31,000 ..................... (re. $31,000) 4 Enterprise Funds 5 Agencies Enterprise Fund 6 Golf Account - 50332 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 8 For services and expenses relating to the office of parks, recreation 9 and historic preservation's golf courses. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 11 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 12 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 13 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 14 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 15 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (39910). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 8,682,000 ..... (re. $3,361,000) 17 Temporary service (50200) ... 2,000,000 ............. (re. $2,000,000) 18 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 500,000 ..... (re. $211,000) 19 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 5,800,000 ........ (re. $4,568,000) 20 Travel (54000) ... 500,000 ............................ (re. $500,000) 21 Contractual services (51000) ... 11,000,000 ......... (re. $3,599,000) 22 Equipment (56000) ... 2,000,000 ..................... (re. $2,000,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 100,000 ................... (re. $100,000) 24 Indirect costs (58800) ... 100,000 .................... (re. $100,000) 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 26 For services and expenses relating to the office of parks, recreation 27 and historic preservation's golf courses. 28 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 29 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 30 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 31 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 32 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 33 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (39910). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 8,682,000 ....... (re. $865,000) 35 Temporary service (50200) ... 2,000,000 ............. (re. $2,000,000) 36 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 500,000 ..... (re. $159,000) 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 5,800,000 ........ (re. $1,125,000) 38 Travel (54000) ... 500,000 ............................ (re. $294,000) 39 Contractual services (51000) ... 10,000,000 ......... (re. $1,663,000) 40 Equipment (56000) ... 2,000,000 ..................... (re. $1,707,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 100,000 ................... (re. $100,000) 42 Indirect costs (58800) ... 100,000 .................... (re. $100,000) 43 For services and expenses related to the office of parks, recreation 44 and historic preservation's golf courses and maintenance in accord- 45 ance with a plan to be approved by the director of the budget. 46 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director of the budget 47 is hereby authorized to transfer any or all of this appropriation to 48 any capital projects fund[(39945)] (40438). 49 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 .......... (re. $1,000,000) 695 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Enterprise Funds 2 Agencies Enterprise Fund 3 Retail Sales Account - 50331 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For services and expenses relating to the office of parks, recreation 6 and historic preservation's retail stores. 7 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 8 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 9 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 10 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 11 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (39910). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 800,000 .......... (re. $50,000) 14 Temporary service (50200) ... 150,000 .................. (re. $50,000) 15 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 50,000 ....... (re. $50,000) 16 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 9,500,000 ........ (re. $7,223,000) 17 Travel (54000) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000) 18 Contractual services (51000) ... 100,000 .............. (re. $100,000) 19 Equipment (56000) ... 200,000 ......................... (re. $200,000) 20 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 50,000 ..................... (re. $50,000) 21 Indirect costs (58800) ... 50,000 ...................... (re. $50,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 23 For services and expenses relating to the office of parks, recreation 24 and historic preservation's retail stores. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 26 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 27 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 28 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 29 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 30 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (39910). 31 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 800,000 .......... (re. $50,000) 32 Temporary service (50200) ... 150,000 .................. (re. $18,000) 33 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 50,000 ....... (re. $47,000) 34 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 9,500,000 ........ (re. $5,292,000) 35 Travel (54000) ... 100,000 ............................ (re. $100,000) 36 Contractual services (51000) ... 100,000 .............. (re. $100,000) 37 Equipment (56000) ... 200,000 ......................... (re. $200,000) 38 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 50,000 ..................... (re. $47,000) 39 Indirect costs (58800) ... 50,000 ...................... (re. $50,000) 696 12550-10-5 OFFICE FOR THE PREVENTION OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 4,942,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 1,100,000 0 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 141,000 0 6 Internal Service Funds ............. 845,000 0 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 7,028,000 0 9 ================ ================ 10 SCHEDULE 11 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ....................................... 7,028,000 12 -------------- 13 General Fund 14 State Purposes Account - 10050 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 administration program. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 18 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 19 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 20 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 21 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 22 appropriation for the budget division 23 program of the division of the budget, are 24 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully 26 stated (81001). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,818,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 64,000 29 Travel (54000) .................................... 72,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 849,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................ 139,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal ................... 4,942,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 36 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 37 Research Demonstration Project Account - 25470 38 For services and expenses related to federal 39 research, training and technical assist- 40 ance and demonstration projects, including 41 fringe benefits. A portion of these funds 42 may be transferred to aid to localities 697 12550-10-5 OFFICE FOR THE PREVENTION OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 and may be suballocated to other state 2 agencies (81001). 3 Personal service (50000) ......................... 500,000 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 300,000 5 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 275,000 6 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 25,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal ................... 1,100,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 12 Grants and Bequest Account - 20167 13 For services and expenses related to demon- 14 stration projects, research, training, 15 technical assistance, and evaluation 16 activities (81001). 17 Travel (54000) ..................................... 3,000 18 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 3,000 19 -------------- 20 Program account subtotal ....................... 6,000 21 -------------- 22 Special Revenue Funds - Other 23 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 24 Domestic Violence Training Account - 21958 25 For services and expenses related to the 26 provision of domestic violence training. 27 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 28 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 29 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 30 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 31 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 32 appropriation for the budget division 33 program of the division of the budget, are 34 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 35 part of this appropriation as if fully 36 stated (81001). 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 2,000 38 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 39 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 128,000 40 -------------- 41 Program account subtotal ..................... 135,000 42 -------------- 43 Internal Service Funds 44 Agencies Internal Service Fund 698 12550-10-5 OFFICE FOR THE PREVENTION OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Domestic Violence Grant Account - 55067 2 For services and expenses related to the 3 administration program. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 5 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 6 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 7 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 8 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 9 appropriation for the budget division 10 program of the division of the budget, are 11 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 12 part of this appropriation as if fully 13 stated (81001). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 725,000 15 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 20,000 16 Travel (54000) ................................... 100,000 17 -------------- 18 Program account subtotal ..................... 845,000 19 -------------- 699 12550-10-5 COMMISSION ON PROSECUTORIAL CONDUCT STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 3,000,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 3,000,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 PROSECUTORIAL CONDUCT PROGRAM ................................ 3,000,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 prosecutorial conduct program. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 15 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 17 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 18 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 19 appropriation for the budget division 20 program of the division of the budget, are 21 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully 23 stated (63201). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,957,000 25 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 280,000 26 Travel (54000) .................................... 25,000 27 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 488,000 28 Equipment (56000) ................................ 250,000 29 -------------- 700 12550-10-5 PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS BOARD STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 6,268,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 395,000 0 5 ---------------- ---------------- 6 All Funds ........................ 6,663,000 0 7 ================ ================ 8 SCHEDULE 9 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ....................................... 6,663,000 10 -------------- 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 administration program. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 16 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 17 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 18 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 19 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 20 appropriation for the budget division 21 program of the division of the budget, are 22 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully 24 stated (81001). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 5,555,000 26 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 324,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 103,000 28 Travel (54000) .................................... 60,000 29 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 218,000 30 Equipment (56000) .................................. 8,000 31 -------------- 32 Program account subtotal ................... 6,268,000 33 -------------- 34 Special Revenue Funds - Other 35 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 36 Public Employment Relations Board Account - 21964 37 For services and expenses related to the 38 administration program (81001). 39 Personal service--regular (50100) ................. 46,000 40 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 240,000 41 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 13,000 42 Travel (54000) .................................... 15,000 701 12550-10-5 PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS BOARD STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 69,000 2 Equipment (56000) ................................. 12,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal ..................... 395,000 5 -------------- 702 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SERVICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 5,905,000 5,500,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 143,387,000 0 5 ---------------- ---------------- 6 All Funds ........................ 149,292,000 5,500,000 7 ================ ================ 8 SCHEDULE 9 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 17,814,000 10 -------------- 11 Special Revenue Funds - Other 12 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 13 Public Service Account - 22011 14 For services and expenses of the adminis- 15 tration program. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 19 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 20 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 21 appropriation for the budget division 22 program of the division of the budget, are 23 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully 25 stated (81001). 26 Personal service-regular (50100) ............... 9,679,000 27 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 29,000 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 60,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 280,000 30 Travel (54000) ................................... 104,000 31 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 836,000 32 Equipment (56000) ................................ 187,000 33 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 6,373,000 34 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 266,000 35 -------------- 36 Program account subtotal .................. 17,814,000 37 -------------- 38 REGULATION OF UTILITIES PROGRAM ............................ 104,655,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 41 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 42 PSC-Pipeline Safety Grant Account - 25379 703 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SERVICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 regulation of utilities program (48602). 3 Personal service (50000) ....................... 3,282,000 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 869,000 5 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,640,000 6 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 114,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal ................... 5,905,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 12 Cable Television Account - 21971 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 regulation of utilities program. 15 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 16 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 17 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 18 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 19 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 20 appropriation for the budget division 21 program of the division of the budget, are 22 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully 24 stated (48602). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,705,000 26 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 14,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 40,000 28 Travel (54000) .................................... 35,000 29 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 94,000 30 Equipment (56000) ................................. 22,000 31 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,123,000 32 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 56,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal ................... 3,089,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 38 Public Service Account - 22011 39 For services and expenses related to the 40 regulation of utilities program. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 42 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 43 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 44 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 45 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 46 appropriation for the budget division 704 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SERVICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 program of the division of the budget, are 2 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 3 part of this appropriation as if fully 4 stated (48602). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 49,955,000 6 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 196,000 7 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 151,000 8 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 677,000 9 Travel (54000) ................................... 585,000 10 Contractual services (51000) .................. 10,043,000 11 Equipment (56000) ................................ 278,000 12 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 32,405,000 13 Indirect costs (58800) ......................... 1,371,000 14 -------------- 15 Program account subtotal .................. 95,661,000 16 -------------- 17 RENEWABLE ENERGY SITING AND ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION PROGRAM ... 26,823,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other 20 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 21 Major Renewable Energy Development Account - 22251 22 For services and expenses of the office of 23 renewable energy siting and electric tran- 24 smission pursuant to section 3-c of public 25 service law (48611). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,000,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 750,000 28 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,400,000 29 Equipment (56000) ................................ 750,000 30 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,000,000 31 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 100,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal .................. 10,000,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Other 36 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 37 Public Service Account - 22011 38 For services and expenses of the office of 39 renewable energy siting and electric tran- 40 smission pursuant to section 3-c of public 41 service law. 42 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 43 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 44 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 45 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 705 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SERVICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 2 appropriation for the budget division 3 program of the division of the budget, are 4 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 5 part of this appropriation as if fully 6 stated (48611). 7 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 6,950,000 8 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 760,000 9 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,440,000 10 Equipment (56000) ................................ 760,000 11 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 4,700,000 12 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 213,000 13 -------------- 14 Program account subtotal .................. 16,823,000 15 -------------- 706 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SERVICE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 REGULATION OF UTILITIES PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 5 For payment of costs pursuant to section 224-c of the public service 6 law, including but not limited to a study of the availability, reli- 7 ability, and cost of highspeed internet and broadband services in 8 New York state and the on-line publication of a detailed internet 9 access map of the state ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $1,000,000) 10 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 11 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 12 PSC-Pipeline Safety Grant Account - 25379 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 14 For services and expenses related to the regulation of utilities 15 program (48602). 16 Personal service (50000) ... 3,057,000 .............. (re. $3,057,000) 17 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 839,000 ............... (re. $839,000) 18 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,498,000 ............... (re. $1,498,000) 19 Indirect costs (58850) ... 106,000 .................... (re. $106,000) 707 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 25,851,000 181,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 94,452,000 53,111,800 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 100,272,000 104,956,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 220,575,000 158,248,800 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ....................................... 9,340,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 administration program. 16 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 17 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 18 shall be net of refunds, rebates, 19 reimbursements, credits, repayments, 20 and/or disallowances. 21 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 22 the money hereby appropriated may be 23 increased or decreased by interchange, 24 transfer or suballocation between these 25 appropriated amounts and appropriations of 26 any department, agency or public authori- 27 ty. 28 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 29 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 30 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 31 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 32 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 33 appropriation for the budget division 34 program of the division of the budget, are 35 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 36 part of this appropriation as if fully 37 stated (81001). 38 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,040,000 39 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 90,000 40 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 41 Contractual Services (51000) ................... 5,200,000 42 -------------- 43 AUTHORITIES BUDGET OFFICE PROGRAM ............................ 3,830,000 44 -------------- 708 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 3 Authority Budget Office Account - 22138 4 For services and expenses related to execut- 5 ing the functions and responsibilities of 6 the authorities budget office, including 7 but not limited to performing reviews and 8 analyses of the operations, finances, and 9 records of public authorities, supporting 10 and enhancing a consolidated public 11 authority information and reporting system 12 in cooperation with the office of the 13 state comptroller, assisting public 14 authorities adopt and adhere to the prin- 15 ciples of accountability, transparency and 16 effective corporate governance, and 17 supporting the training of public authori- 18 ty directors. Up to $70,000 of the amount 19 appropriated herein may be suballocated to 20 the city university of New York and to any 21 other state department or agency for 22 services and expenses related to the 23 training of public authority board members 24 on their legal, ethical, fiduciary, and 25 financial responsibilities. Up to $250,000 26 of the amount appropriated herein may be 27 used to create and support a searchable 28 database of economic incentives for local 29 development corporations and industrial 30 development authorities. Monies appropri- 31 ated herein may also be suballocated to 32 the department of state for all necessary 33 expenses incurred on behalf of the author- 34 ities budget office. 35 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 36 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 37 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 38 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 39 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 40 appropriation for the budget division 41 program of the division of the budget, are 42 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 43 part of this appropriation as if fully 44 stated (51001). 45 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,809,000 46 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 3,000 47 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 4,000 48 Travel (54000) .................................... 23,000 49 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 464,000 50 Equipment (56000) ................................. 15,000 709 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,459,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 53,000 3 -------------- 4 BUSINESS AND LICENSING SERVICES PROGRAM ..................... 87,666,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 8 Business and Licensing Services Account - 21977 9 For services and expenses related to the 10 business and licensing program, including 11 suballocation to other departments and 12 agencies. 13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 14 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 15 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 16 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 17 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 18 appropriation for the budget division 19 program of the division of the budget, are 20 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully 22 stated. 23 Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the 24 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 25 shall be net of refunds, rebates, 26 reimbursements, credits, repayments, 27 and/or disallowance (51017). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 29,462,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 3,168,000 30 Travel (54000) ................................... 586,000 31 Contractual services (51000) .................. 34,516,000 32 Equipment (56000) ................................ 610,000 33 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 18,220,000 34 Indirect costs (58800) ......................... 1,104,000 35 -------------- 36 CODE ENFORCEMENT PROGRAM ..................................... 4,052,000 37 -------------- 38 Special Revenue Funds - Other 39 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 40 Fire Prevention and Code Enforcement Account - 21904 41 For services and expenses related to the 42 code enforcement program. 43 Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the 44 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 45 shall be net of refunds, rebates, 710 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 reimbursements, credits, repayments, 2 and/or disallowance (51284). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,466,000 4 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,607,000 5 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 937,000 6 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 42,000 7 -------------- 8 CONSUMER PROTECTION PROGRAM .................................. 6,175,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 13 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 14 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 15 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 16 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 17 appropriation for the budget division 18 program of the division of the budget, are 19 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 20 part of this appropriation as if fully 21 stated (51042). 22 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,804,000 23 -------------- 24 Program account subtotal ................... 1,804,000 25 -------------- 26 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 27 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 28 Consumer Protection Account - 25449 29 For services and expenses related to 30 surveillance, outreach and other activ- 31 ities which enhance the protection of 32 consumers (51042). 33 Personal service (50000) .......................... 27,000 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ........................ 6,000 35 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................... 17,000 36 Indirect costs (58850) ............................. 1,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ...................... 51,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other 41 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 42 Consumer Protection Account - 22068 711 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to consum- 2 er protection activities. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 4 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 6 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 7 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 8 appropriation for the budget division 9 program of the division of the budget, are 10 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully 12 stated (51042). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 740,000 14 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 6,000 15 Travel (54000) ..................................... 6,000 16 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 6,000 17 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 468,000 18 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 22,000 19 -------------- 20 Program account subtotal ................... 1,248,000 21 -------------- 22 Special Revenue Funds - Other 23 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 24 Public Service Account - 22011 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 26 to the contrary, direct and indirect 27 expenses relating to the activities of the 28 department of state's utility intervention 29 unit pursuant to subdivision 4 of section 30 94-a of the executive law, including, but 31 not limited to participation in general 32 ratemaking proceedings pursuant to section 33 65 of the public service law or certif- 34 ication proceedings or permits issued 35 pursuant to article 7, 8, or 10 of the 36 public service law, shall be deemed 37 expenses of the department of public 38 service within the meaning of section 18-a 39 of the public service law (51042). 40 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,051,000 41 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 300,000 42 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 691,000 43 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 30,000 44 -------------- 45 Program account subtotal ................... 2,072,000 46 -------------- 47 Special Revenue Funds - Other 712 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 2 Wholesale Market Consumer Advocacy Account - 22206 3 For the implementation of a wholesale market 4 consumer advocacy project to supply 5 comprehensive consumer advocacy in matters 6 pending before the New York independent 7 system operator and at the federal energy 8 regulatory commission. The funds hereby 9 appropriated shall be spent in a manner 10 consistent with an allocation and distrib- 11 ution proposal as heretofore filed by the 12 department of public service and approved 13 by the federal energy regulatory commis- 14 sion. All technical experts, consultants 15 or other services funded from this appro- 16 priation shall be acquired pursuant to the 17 requirements of section 163 of the state 18 finance law (51042). 19 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,000,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 22 -------------- 23 LOCAL GOVERNMENT AND COMMUNITY SERVICES PROGRAM ............ 100,872,000 24 -------------- 25 General Fund 26 State Purposes Account - 10050 27 For services and expenses related to the 28 local government and community services 29 program. 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 31 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 32 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 33 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 34 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 35 appropriation for the budget division 36 program of the division of the budget, are 37 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 38 part of this appropriation as if fully 39 stated (51044). 40 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 6,283,000 41 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 30,000 42 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 4,000 43 -------------- 44 Program account subtotal ................... 6,317,000 45 -------------- 713 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 2 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 3 Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25127 4 For services and expenses of administering 5 community services block grants to commu- 6 nity action agencies, including suballo- 7 cation to other state departments and 8 agencies (51018). 9 Personal service (50000) ....................... 5,200,000 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,237,000 11 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 301,000 12 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 563,000 13 -------------- 14 Program account subtotal ................... 7,301,000 15 -------------- 16 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 17 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 18 Appalachian Technical Assistance Account - 25382 19 For services and expenses of the appalachian 20 regional grants program. The funds appro- 21 priated herein may be transferred to aid 22 to localities (51023). 23 Personal service (50000) ......................... 657,000 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 278,000 25 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................... 62,000 26 Indirect costs (58850) ............................. 3,000 27 -------------- 28 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 29 -------------- 30 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 31 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 32 Coastal Zone Management Program Account - 25449 33 For services and expenses of the coastal 34 resources and waterfront revitalization 35 program, including suballocation to other 36 state departments and agencies (51034). 37 Personal service (50000) ....................... 2,952,000 38 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 538,000 39 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 985,000 40 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 25,000 41 -------------- 42 Program account subtotal ................... 4,500,000 43 -------------- 714 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 2 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 3 Coastal Zone Management Program Account 4 For services and expenses of the coastal 5 program. The funds appropriated herein may 6 be transferred to aid to localities 7 (51023). A portion of the funds may be 8 suballocated or transferred to any other 9 department, agency or public authority for 10 the purposes of such appropriation 11 (51253). 12 Personal service (50000) ....................... 2,000,000 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 62,000,000 14 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 800,000 15 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 200,000 16 -------------- 17 Program account subtotal .................. 65,000,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 20 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 21 Code Enforcement Program Account - 25416 22 For services and expenses of the code 23 enforcement program (51036). 24 Personal service (50000) ......................... 300,000 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) ....................... 75,000 26 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 150,000 27 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 75,000 28 -------------- 29 Total amount available ......................... 600,000 30 -------------- 31 For services and expenses of the codes 32 program (51295). 33 Personal service (50000) ....................... 7,000,000 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 4,000,000 35 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 3,000,000 36 Indirect costs (58850) ......................... 1,000,000 37 -------------- 38 Total amount available ...................... 15,000,000 39 -------------- 40 Program account subtotal .................. 15,600,000 41 -------------- 42 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 43 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 44 Local Government Federal Programs Account - 25449 715 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of the local 2 government federal programs. The funds 3 appropriated herein may be transferred to 4 aid to localities (51037). 5 Personal service (50000) ......................... 400,000 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 527,000 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................... 57,000 8 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 16,000 9 -------------- 10 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 11 -------------- 12 Special Revenue Funds - Other 13 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 14 Local Government and Community Services Administrative 15 Account - 20144 16 For services and expenses related to the 17 local government and community services 18 program (51044). 19 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 25,000 20 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 21 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 119,000 22 -------------- 23 Program account subtotal ..................... 154,000 24 -------------- 25 NEW YORK STATE ASIAN AMERICAN AND PACIFIC ISLANDER COMMIS- 26 SION ....................................................... 1,433,000 27 -------------- 28 General Fund 29 State Purposes Account - 10050 30 For services and expenses related to the New 31 York State Asian American and Pacific 32 Islander commission. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 34 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 35 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 36 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 37 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 38 appropriation for the budget division 39 program of the division of the budget, are 40 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 41 part of this appropriation as if fully 42 stated (51255). 43 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 490,000 44 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 53,000 716 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Travel (54000) .................................... 40,000 2 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 350,000 3 Equipment (56000) ................................ 500,000 4 -------------- 5 NEW YORK STATE COMMISSION ON AFRICAN AMERICAN HISTORY ........ 1,062,000 6 -------------- 7 General Fund 8 State Purposes Account - 10050 9 For services and expenses related to the New 10 York State commission on African American 11 history. 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 13 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 14 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 15 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 16 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 17 appropriation for the budget division 18 program of the division of the budget, are 19 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 20 part of this appropriation as if fully 21 stated (51257). 22 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 542,000 23 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 24 Travel (54000) .................................... 20,000 25 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 350,000 26 Equipment (56000) ................................ 100,000 27 -------------- 28 OFFICE FOR NEW AMERICANS ..................................... 2,592,000 29 -------------- 30 General Fund 31 State Purposes Account - 10050 32 For services and expenses related to the 33 office for new Americans. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 35 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 36 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 37 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 38 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 39 appropriation for the budget division 40 program of the division of the budget, are 41 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 42 part of this appropriation as if fully 43 stated (51046). 717 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,592,000 2 Contractual Services (51000) ................... 1,000,000 3 -------------- 4 OFFICE OF FAITH AND NON-PROFIT DEVELOPMENT SERVICES .......... 1,530,000 5 -------------- 6 General Fund 7 State Purposes Account - 10050 8 For services and expenses related to the 9 office of faith and Non-Profit Development 10 Services. 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 12 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 13 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 14 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 15 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 16 appropriation for the budget division 17 program of the division of the budget, are 18 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 19 part of this appropriation as if fully 20 stated (51259). 21 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,030,000 22 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 100,000 23 Travel (54000) .................................... 50,000 24 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 250,000 25 Equipment (56000) ................................ 100,000 26 -------------- 27 STATE OF NEW YORK COMMISSION ON UNIFORM STATE LAWS ............. 155,000 28 -------------- 29 General Fund 30 State Purposes Account - 10050 31 For services and expenses related to the 32 state of New York commission on uniform 33 state laws (51039). 34 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 135,000 35 For additional contractual services ............... 20,000 36 -------------- 37 TUG HILL COMMISSION PROGRAM .................................. 1,460,000 38 -------------- 39 General Fund 40 State Purposes Account - 10050 718 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of the Tug Hill 2 commission. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 4 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 6 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 7 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 8 appropriation for the budget division 9 program of the division of the budget, are 10 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully 12 stated (51038). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,202,000 14 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 13,000 15 Travel (54000) ..................................... 8,000 16 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 85,000 17 Equipment (56000) .................................. 2,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ................... 1,310,000 20 -------------- 21 Special Revenue Funds - Other 22 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 23 Tug Hill Administration Account - 22044 24 For services and expenses related to the Tug 25 Hill commission. 26 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 27 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 28 Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange 29 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 30 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 31 appropriation for the budget division 32 program of the division of the budget, are 33 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 34 part of this appropriation as if fully 35 stated (51038). 36 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 150,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ..................... 150,000 39 -------------- 40 VILLAGE INCORPORATION PROGRAM .................................. 408,000 41 -------------- 42 General Fund 43 State Purposes Account - 10050 44 For the services and expenses related to the 45 Village Incorporation Commission (51265). 719 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 258,000 2 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 20,000 3 Travel (54000) .................................... 20,000 4 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 10,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ..................... 308,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Other 9 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 10 Village Incorporation Account 11 For services and expenses related to activ- 12 ities of the Village Incorporation Commis- 13 sion established pursuant to article 2 of 14 the village law. 15 Contactual services (51000) ....................... 80,000 16 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 20,000 17 -------------- 18 Program account subtotal ..................... 100,000 19 -------------- 720 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 2 General Fund 3 State Purposes Account - 10050 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 5 For services and expenses of the New York State Women's Suffrage 6 Commemoration Commission pursuant to chapter 471 of the laws of 7 2015. Monies from this appropriation shall be disbursed according to 8 a plan developed and approved by such commission. All or a portion 9 of the funds appropriated hereby may be suballocated or transferred 10 to any department, agency, or public authority for the purposes of 11 such commission (81001). 12 Supplies and Materials (57000) ... 200,000 ............ (re. $137,000) 13 Travel (54000) ... 200,000 ............................. (re. $27,000) 14 Contractual services (51000) ... 100,000 ............... (re. $17,000) 15 BUSINESS AND LICENSING SERVICES PROGRAM 16 Special Revenue Funds - Other 17 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 18 Business and Licensing Services Account - 21977 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 20 For services and expenses related to the business and licensing 21 program, including suballocation to other departments and agencies. 22 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 23 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 24 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 25 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 26 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 27 part of this appropriation as if fully stated. 28 Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the amounts 29 appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse- 30 ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowance (51017). 31 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 27,794,000 ... (re. $17,087,000) 32 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 3,168,000 ........ (re. $2,717,000) 33 Travel (54000) ... 586,000 ............................ (re. $403,000) 34 Contractual services (51000) ... 24,516,000 ........ (re. $19,368,000) 35 Equipment (56000) ... 610,000 ......................... (re. $349,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 18,220,000 ............. (re. $11,816,000) 37 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,104,000 .................. (re. $840,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 39 For services and expenses related to the business and licensing 40 program, including suballocation to other departments and agencies. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 42 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 43 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 44 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 45 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 46 part of this appropriation as if fully stated. 721 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the amounts 2 appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse- 3 ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowance (51017). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 25,719,000 ...... (re. $788,000) 5 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 3,000,000 ........ (re. $1,274,000) 6 Travel (54000) ... 550,000 ............................ (re. $110,000) 7 Contractual services (51000) ... 20,836,000 ........ (re. $13,311,000) 8 Equipment (56000) ... 610,000 ......................... (re. $153,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 17,245,000 .............. (re. $1,071,000) 10 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,040,000 .................. (re. $381,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 12 For services and expenses related to the business and licensing 13 program, including suballocation to other departments and agencies. 14 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 15 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 16 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 17 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 18 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 19 part of this appropriation as if fully stated. 20 Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the amounts 21 appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse- 22 ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowance (51017). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 24,000,000 .... (re. $3,686,000) 24 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 3,000,000 ........ (re. $1,063,000) 25 Travel (54000) ... 550,000 ............................ (re. $169,000) 26 Contractual services (51000) ... 14,800,000 ......... (re. $7,939,000) 27 Equipment (56000) ... 610,000 ......................... (re. $280,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 13,000,000 ................ (re. $470,000) 29 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,040,000 .................. (re. $463,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 31 For services and expenses related to the business and licensing 32 program, including suballocation to other departments and agencies. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 34 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 35 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 36 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 37 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 38 part of this appropriation as if fully stated. 39 Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the amounts 40 appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse- 41 ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowance (51017). 42 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 21,261,000 .... (re. $1,960,000) 43 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 2,400,000 .......... (re. $911,000) 44 Travel (54000) ... 544,000 ............................ (re. $283,000) 45 Contractual services (51000) ... 13,450,000 ......... (re. $3,212,000) 46 Equipment (56000) ... 457,000 ......................... (re. $410,000) 47 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 12,488,000 ................ (re. $489,000) 48 Indirect costs (58800) ... 705,000 .................... (re. $151,000) 49 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 722 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the business and licensing 2 program, including suballocation to other departments and agencies. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 4 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 6 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 7 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 8 part of this appropriation as if fully stated. 9 Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, the amounts 10 appropriated herein shall be net of refunds, rebates, reimburse- 11 ments, credits, repayments, and/or disallowance (51017). 12 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 21,261,000 .... (re. $3,375,000) 13 Contractual services (51000) ... 9,950,000 .......... (re. $2,361,000) 14 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 12,488,000 .............. (re. $1,700,000) 15 Indirect costs (58800) ... 705,000 ..................... (re. $56,000) 16 CONSUMER PROTECTION PROGRAM 17 Special Revenue Funds - Other 18 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 19 Wholesale Market Consumer Advocacy Account - 22206 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 For the implementation of a wholesale market consumer advocacy project 22 to supply comprehensive consumer advocacy in matters pending before 23 the New York independent system operator and at the federal energy 24 regulatory commission. The funds hereby appropriated shall be spent 25 in a manner consistent with an allocation and distribution proposal 26 as heretofore filed by the department of public service and approved 27 by the federal energy regulatory commission. All technical experts, 28 consultants or other services funded from this appropriation shall 29 be acquired pursuant to the requirements of section 163 of the state 30 finance law (51042). 31 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 .......... (re. $1,000,000) 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 33 For the implementation of a wholesale market consumer advocacy project 34 to supply comprehensive consumer advocacy in matters pending before 35 the New York independent system operator and at the federal energy 36 regulatory commission. The funds hereby appropriated shall be spent 37 in a manner consistent with an allocation and distribution proposal 38 as heretofore filed by the department of public service and approved 39 by the federal energy regulatory commission. All technical experts, 40 consultants or other services funded from this appropriation shall 41 be acquired pursuant to the requirements of section 163 of the state 42 finance law (51042). 43 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 .......... (re. $1,000,000) 44 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 45 For the implementation of a wholesale market consumer advocacy project 46 to supply comprehensive consumer advocacy in matters pending before 47 the New York independent system operator and at the federal energy 723 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 regulatory commission. The funds hereby appropriated shall be spent 2 in a manner consistent with an allocation and distribution proposal 3 as heretofore filed by the department of public service and approved 4 by the federal energy regulatory commission. All technical experts, 5 consultants or other services funded from this appropriation shall 6 be acquired pursuant to the requirements of section 163 of the state 7 finance law (51042). 8 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 ............ (re. $953,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 10 For the implementation of a wholesale market consumer advocacy project 11 to supply comprehensive consumer advocacy in matters pending before 12 the New York independent system operator and at the federal energy 13 regulatory commission. The funds hereby appropriated shall be spent 14 in a manner consistent with an allocation and distribution proposal 15 as heretofore filed by the department of public service and approved 16 by the federal energy regulatory commission. All technical experts, 17 consultants or other services funded from this appropriation shall 18 be acquired pursuant to the requirements of section 163 of the state 19 finance law (51042). 20 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 ............ (re. $790,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 22 For the implementation of a wholesale market consumer advocacy project 23 to supply comprehensive consumer advocacy in matters pending before 24 the New York independent system operator and at the federal energy 25 regulatory commission. The funds hereby appropriated shall be spent 26 in a manner consistent with an allocation and distribution proposal 27 as heretofore filed by the department of public service and approved 28 by the federal energy regulatory commission. All technical experts, 29 consultants or other services funded from this appropriation shall 30 be acquired pursuant to the requirements of section 163 of the state 31 finance law (51042). 32 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 .......... (re. $1,000,000) 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 34 For the implementation of a wholesale market consumer advocacy project 35 to supply comprehensive consumer advocacy in matters pending before 36 the New York independent system operator and at the federal energy 37 regulatory commission. The funds hereby appropriated shall be spent 38 in a manner consistent with an allocation and distribution proposal 39 as heretofore filed by the department of public service and approved 40 by the federal energy regulatory commission. All technical experts, 41 consultants or other services funded from this appropriation shall 42 be acquired pursuant to the requirements of section 163 of the state 43 finance law (51042). 44 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 .......... (re. $1,000,000) 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 46 For the implementation of a wholesale market consumer advocacy project 47 to supply comprehensive consumer advocacy in matters pending before 48 the New York independent system operator and at the federal energy 724 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 regulatory commission. The funds hereby appropriated shall be spent 2 in a manner consistent with an allocation and distribution proposal 3 as heretofore filed by the department of public service and approved 4 by the federal energy regulatory commission. All technical experts, 5 consultants or other services funded from this appropriation shall 6 be acquired pursuant to the requirements of section 163 of the state 7 finance law (51042). 8 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 ............ (re. $436,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 10 For the implementation of a wholesale market consumer advocacy project 11 to supply comprehensive consumer advocacy in matters pending before 12 the New York independent system operator and at the federal energy 13 regulatory commission. The funds hereby appropriated shall be spent 14 in a manner consistent with an allocation and distribution proposal 15 as heretofore filed by the department of public service and approved 16 by the federal energy regulatory commission. All technical experts, 17 consultants or other services funded from this appropriation shall 18 be acquired pursuant to the requirements of section 163 of the state 19 finance law (51042). 20 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $13,000) 21 LOCAL GOVERNMENT AND COMMUNITY SERVICES PROGRAM 22 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 23 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 24 Federal Health and Human Services Account - 25127 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 For services and expenses of administering community services block 27 grants to community action agencies, including suballocation to 28 other state departments and agencies (51018). 29 Personal service (50000) ... 5,200,000 .............. (re. $5,200,000) 30 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,237,000 ........... (re. $1,237,000) 31 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 301,000 ................... (re. $301,000) 32 Indirect costs (58850) ... 563,000 .................... (re. $563,000) 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 34 For services and expenses of administering community services block 35 grants to community action agencies, including suballocation to 36 other state departments and agencies (51018). 37 Personal service (50000) ... 5,200,000 .............. (re. $4,748,000) 38 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,237,000 ........... (re. $1,128,000) 39 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 301,000 .................... (re. $15,000) 40 Indirect costs (58850) ... 563,000 .................... (re. $518,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 42 For services and expenses of administering community services block 43 grants to community action agencies, including suballocation to 44 other state departments and agencies (51018). 45 Personal service (50000) ... 5,200,000 .............. (re. $3,463,000) 46 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,236,960 ............. (re. $505,000) 725 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 300,920 .................... (re. $12,000) 2 Indirect costs (58850) ... 562,120 ..................... (re. $16,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 4 For services and expenses of administering community services block 5 grants to community action agencies, including suballocation to 6 other state departments and agencies (51018). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 5,200,000 .............. (re. $1,753,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,236,960 ............. (re. $748,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 300,920 ................... (re. $113,000) 10 Indirect costs (58850) ... 562,120 .................... (re. $193,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 12 For services and expenses of administering community services block 13 grants to community action agencies, including suballocation to 14 other state departments and agencies (51018). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 3,000,000 ................ (re. $190,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 670,000 ............... (re. $250,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,800,000 ................. (re. $218,000) 18 Indirect costs (58850) ... 30,000 ...................... (re. $30,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 20 For services and expenses of administering community services block 21 grants to community action agencies, including suballocation to 22 other state departments and agencies (51018). 23 Personal service (50000) ... 2,000,000 ................ (re. $143,000) 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 608,000 ............... (re. $446,000) 25 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 772,000 .................... (re. $99,000) 26 Indirect costs (58850) ... 20,000 ...................... (re. $20,000) 27 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 28 For services and expenses of administering community services block 29 grants to community action agencies, including suballocation to 30 other state departments and agencies (51018). 31 Personal service (50000) ... 2,000,000 ................ (re. $294,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 608,000 ............... (re. $348,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 772,000 ................... (re. $233,000) 34 Indirect costs (58850) ... 20,000 ...................... (re. $20,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 36 For services and expenses of administering community services block 37 grants to community action agencies, including suballocation to 38 other state departments and agencies (51018). 39 Personal service (50000) ... 2,000,000 ................. (re. $66,000) 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 608,000 ................ (re. $29,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 772,000 ................... (re. $276,000) 42 Indirect costs (58850) ... 20,000 ...................... (re. $20,000) 43 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 44 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 45 Appalachian Technical Assistance Account - 25382 726 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 2 For services and expenses of the appalachian regional grants program. 3 The funds appropriated herein may be transferred to aid to locali- 4 ties (51023). 5 Personal service (50000) ... 657,000 .................. (re. $657,000) 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 278,000 ............... (re. $278,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 62,000 ..................... (re. $62,000) 8 Indirect costs (58850) ... 3,000 ........................ (re. $3,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 10 For services and expenses of the appalachian regional grants program. 11 The funds appropriated herein may be transferred to aid to locali- 12 ties (51023). 13 Personal service (50000) ... 657,000 .................. (re. $505,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 278,000 ............... (re. $271,000) 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 16 For services and expenses of administering the appalachian regional 17 grants program. The funds appropriated herein may be transferred to 18 aid to localities (51023). 19 Personal service (50000) ... 657,000 .................. (re. $474,000) 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 278,000 ............... (re. $270,000) 21 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 62,000 ...................... (re. $1,000) 22 Indirect costs (58850) ... 3,000 ........................ (re. $3,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 24 For services and expenses of administering the appalachian regional 25 grants program (51023). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 257,000 ................... (re. $47,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 78,000 ................. (re. $70,000) 28 Indirect costs (58850) ... 3,000 ........................ (re. $3,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 30 For services and expenses of administering the appalachian regional 31 grants program (51023). 32 Personal service (50000) ... 257,000 ................... (re. $66,000) 33 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 78,000 ................. (re. $76,000) 34 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 62,000 ...................... (re. $9,000) 35 Indirect costs (58850) ... 3,000 ........................ (re. $3,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 37 For services and expenses of administering the appalachian regional 38 grants program (51023). 39 Personal service (50000) ... 257,000 ................... (re. $72,000) 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 78,000 ................. (re. $72,000) 41 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 62,000 ...................... (re. $4,000) 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 43 For services and expenses of administering the appalachian regional 44 grants program (51023). 45 Personal service (50000) ... 257,000 ................... (re. $68,000) 46 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 78,000 ................. (re. $71,000) 727 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 2 For services and expenses of administering the appalachian regional 3 grants program (51023). 4 Personal service (50000) ... 257,000 ................... (re. $80,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 78,000 ................. (re. $67,000) 6 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 7 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 8 Coastal Zone Management Program Account - 25449 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 10 For services and expenses of the coastal resources and waterfront 11 revitalization program, including suballocation to other state 12 departments and agencies (51034). 13 Personal service (50000) ... 2,952,000 .............. (re. $2,952,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 538,000 ............... (re. $359,000) 15 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 985,000 ................... (re. $985,000) 16 Indirect costs (58850) ... 25,000 ...................... (re. $25,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 18 For services and expenses of the coastal resources and waterfront 19 revitalization program, including suballocation to other state 20 departments and agencies (51034). 21 Personal service (50000) ... 2,952,000 .............. (re. $1,671,000) 22 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 538,000 ............... (re. $302,000) 23 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 985,000 ................... (re. $433,000) 24 Indirect costs (58850) ... 25,000 ....................... (re. $1,000) 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 26 For services and expenses of the coastal resources and waterfront 27 revitalization program, including suballocation to other state 28 departments and agencies (51034). 29 Personal service (50000) ... 2,952,000 .............. (re. $1,129,000) 30 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 538,000 ............... (re. $349,000) 31 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 985,000 ................... (re. $159,000) 32 Indirect costs (58850) ... 25,000 ...................... (re. $10,000) 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 34 For services and expenses of the coastal resources and waterfront 35 revitalization program, including suballocation to other state 36 departments and agencies (51034). 37 Personal service (50000) ... 2,952,000 ................ (re. $201,000) 38 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 538,000 ............... (re. $457,000) 39 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 985,000 ................... (re. $154,000) 40 Indirect costs (58850) ... 25,000 ...................... (re. $12,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 42 For services and expenses of the coastal resources and waterfront 43 revitalization program, including suballocation to other state 44 departments and agencies (51034). 45 Personal service (50000) ... 2,952,000 .............. (re. $1,194,000) 46 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 538,000 ................ (re. $53,000) 728 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 985,000 ................... (re. $329,000) 2 Indirect costs (58850) ... 25,000 ...................... (re. $20,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 4 For services and expenses of the coastal resources and waterfront 5 revitalization program, including suballocation to other state 6 departments and agencies (51034). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 2,952,000 .............. (re. $1,213,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 538,000 ................ (re. $68,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 985,000 ................... (re. $379,000) 10 Indirect costs (58850) ... 25,000 ...................... (re. $13,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 12 For services and expenses of the coastal resources and waterfront 13 revitalization program, including suballocation to other state 14 departments and agencies (51034). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 2,952,000 .............. (re. $1,374,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 538,000 ................ (re. $67,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 985,000 ................... (re. $270,000) 18 Indirect costs (58850) ... 25,000 ...................... (re. $25,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 20 For services and expenses of the coastal resources and waterfront 21 revitalization program, including suballocation to other state 22 departments and agencies (51034). 23 Personal service (50000) ... 2,952,000 .............. (re. $1,107,000) 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 538,000 ............... (re. $435,000) 25 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 985,000 ................... (re. $211,000) 26 Indirect costs (58850) ... 25,000 ...................... (re. $25,000) 27 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 28 For services and expenses of the coastal resources and waterfront 29 revitalization program, including suballocation to other state 30 departments and agencies (51034). 31 Personal service (50000) ... 2,252,000 ................ (re. $536,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 538,000 ............... (re. $120,800) 33 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 985,000 ................... (re. $184,000) 34 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 35 For services and expenses of the coastal resources and waterfront 36 revitalization program, including suballocation to other state 37 departments and agencies (51034). 38 Personal service (50000) ... 2,252,000 ................ (re. $295,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 538,000 ................ (re. $20,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 985,000 ................... (re. $275,000) 41 Indirect costs (58850) ... 25,000 ...................... (re. $22,000) 42 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 43 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 44 Code Enforcement Program Account - 25416 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 729 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of the code enforcement program (51036). 2 Personal service (50000) ... 300,000 .................. (re. $300,000) 3 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 75,000 ................. (re. $75,000) 4 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 150,000 ................... (re. $150,000) 5 Indirect costs (58850) ... 75,000 ...................... (re. $75,000) 6 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 7 For services and expenses of the code enforcement program (51036). 8 Personal service (50000) ... 300,000 .................. (re. $300,000) 9 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 75,000 ................. (re. $75,000) 10 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 150,000 ................... (re. $150,000) 11 Indirect costs (58850) ... 75,000 ...................... (re. $75,000) 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 13 For services and expenses of the code enforcement program (51036). 14 Personal service (50000) ... 300,000 .................. (re. $300,000) 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 75,000 ................. (re. $75,000) 16 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 150,000 ................... (re. $150,000) 17 Indirect costs (58850) ... 75,000 ...................... (re. $75,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 19 For services and expenses of the code enforcement program (51036). 20 Personal service (50000) ... 300,000 .................. (re. $300,000) 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 75,000 ................. (re. $75,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 150,000 ................... (re. $150,000) 23 Indirect costs (58850) ... 75,000 ...................... (re. $75,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 25 For services and expenses of the code enforcement program (51036). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 300,000 .................. (re. $300,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 75,000 ................. (re. $75,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 150,000 ................... (re. $150,000) 29 Indirect costs (58850) ... 75,000 ...................... (re. $75,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 31 For services and expenses of the code enforcement program (51036). 32 Personal service (50000) ... 300,000 .................. (re. $300,000) 33 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 75,000 ................. (re. $75,000) 34 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 150,000 ................... (re. $150,000) 35 Indirect costs (58850) ... 75,000 ...................... (re. $75,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 37 For services and expenses of the code enforcement program (51036). 38 Personal service (50000) ... 300,000 .................. (re. $300,000) 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 75,000 ................. (re. $75,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 150,000 ................... (re. $150,000) 41 Indirect costs (58850) ... 75,000 ...................... (re. $75,000) 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 43 For services and expenses of the code enforcement program (51036). 44 Personal service (50000) ... 300,000 .................. (re. $300,000) 45 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 75,000 ................. (re. $75,000) 730 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 150,000 ................... (re. $150,000) 2 Indirect costs (58850) ... 75,000 ...................... (re. $75,000) 3 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 4 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 5 Local Government Federal Programs Account - 25449 6 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 7 For services and expenses of the local government federal programs. 8 The funds appropriated herein may be transferred to aid to locali- 9 ties (51037). 10 Personal service (50000) ... 400,000 .................. (re. $400,000) 11 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 527,000 ............... (re. $527,000) 12 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 57,000 ..................... (re. $57,000) 13 Indirect costs (58850) ... 16,000 ...................... (re. $16,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 15 For services and expenses of the local government federal programs. 16 The funds appropriated herein may be transferred to aid to locali- 17 ties (51037). 18 Personal service (50000) ... 400,000 .................. (re. $400,000) 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 527,000 ............... (re. $527,000) 20 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 57,000 ..................... (re. $57,000) 21 Indirect costs (58850) ... 16,000 ...................... (re. $16,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 23 For services and expenses of the local government federal programs. 24 The funds appropriated herein may be transferred to aid to locali- 25 ties (51037). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 400,000 .................. (re. $400,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 527,000 ............... (re. $527,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 57,000 ..................... (re. $57,000) 29 Indirect costs (58850) ... 16,000 ...................... (re. $16,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 31 For services and expenses of the local government federal programs 32 (51037). 33 Personal service (50000) ... 400,000 .................. (re. $400,000) 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 527,000 ............... (re. $527,000) 35 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 57,000 ..................... (re. $57,000) 36 Indirect costs (58850) ... 16,000 ...................... (re. $16,000) 37 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 38 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 39 Local Government Federal Programs Account - 25300 40 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 41 For services and expenses of the local government federal programs 42 (51037). 43 Personal service (50000) ... 75,000 .................... (re. $75,000) 44 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 27,000 ................. (re. $27,000) 45 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 38,000 ..................... (re. $38,000) 731 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Indirect costs (58850) ... 10,000 ...................... (re. $10,000) 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 3 For services and expenses of the local government federal programs 4 (51037). 5 Personal service (50000) ... 75,000 .................... (re. $75,000) 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 27,000 ................. (re. $27,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 38,000 ..................... (re. $38,000) 8 Indirect costs (58850) ... 10,000 ...................... (re. $10,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 10 For services and expenses of the local government federal programs 11 (51037). 12 Personal service (50000) ... 75,000 .................... (re. $75,000) 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 27,000 ................. (re. $27,000) 14 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 38,000 ..................... (re. $38,000) 15 Indirect costs (58850) ... 10,000 ...................... (re. $10,000) 16 TUG HILL COMMISSION PROGRAM 17 Special Revenue Funds - Other 18 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 19 Tug Hill Administration Account - 22044 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 For services and expenses related to the Tug Hill commission. 22 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 23 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 24 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 25 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 26 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 27 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51038). 28 Contractual services (51000) ... 150,000 ............... (re. $69,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 30 For services and expenses related to the Tug Hill commission. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 32 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 33 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 34 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 35 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 36 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51038). 37 Contractual services (51000) ... 50,000 ................ (re. $29,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 39 For services and expenses related to the Tug Hill commission. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 41 Interchange and Transfer Authority, and the IT Interchange and 42 Transfer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 43 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 44 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 45 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51038). 732 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF STATE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) ... 50,000 ................ (re. $20,000) 733 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 917,122,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 47,239,000 84,384,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 138,152,000 12,364,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 1,102,513,000 96,748,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 29,535,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 administration program. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the following appropri- 18 ations shall be net of refunds, rebates, 19 reimbursements and credits. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 21 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 23 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 24 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 25 appropriation for the budget division 26 program of the division of the budget, are 27 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully 29 stated (81001). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 27,900,000 31 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 34,000 32 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 415,000 33 Supplies and materials (57000) .....................33,000 34 Travel (54000) .................................... 40,000 35 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 405,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal .................. 28,827,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Other 40 Combined Nonexpendable Trust Fund 41 Brummer Award Account - 21651 42 For services and expenses related to the 43 administration program, including expendi- 734 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 tures on behalf of individuals paid from 2 funds donated to the division. Notwith- 3 standing any inconsistent provision of 4 law, funds appropriated herein may be 5 transferred to aid to localities for the 6 purposes stated herein (81001). 7 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 8,000 8 -------------- 9 Program account subtotal ....................... 8,000 10 -------------- 11 Special Revenue Funds - Other 12 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 13 Training Academy Account - 22167 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 administration program (81001). 16 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 5,000 17 Travel (54000) ..................................... 1,000 18 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 690,000 19 Equipment (56000) .................................. 4,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal ..................... 700,000 22 -------------- 23 CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION ACTIVITIES PROGRAM .................. 272,145,000 24 -------------- 25 General Fund 26 State Purposes Account - 10050 27 For services and expenses related to the 28 criminal investigation activities program. 29 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 30 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 31 shall be net of refunds, rebates, 32 reimbursements, credits, repayments, 33 and/or disallowances (50112). 34 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 202,659,000 35 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ......... 29,711,000 36 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,945,000 37 Travel (54000) ................................... 674,000 38 Contractual services (51000) .................. 16,052,000 39 Equipment (56000) .............................. 3,245,000 40 -------------- 41 Program account subtotal ................. 254,286,000 42 -------------- 43 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 735 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 2 State Police Account - 25362 3 For services and expenses related to combat- 4 ing internet crimes against children 5 (50122). 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,000,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal ................... 2,000,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 12 Background Check Account - 22257 13 For services and expenses pursuant to 14 section 228 of the executive law, includ- 15 ing liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 16 2025 (50136). 17 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,000,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ................... 5,000,000 20 -------------- 21 Special Revenue Funds - Other 22 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 23 Regulation of Indian Gaming Account - 22046 24 For services and expenses related to the 25 criminal investigation activities program 26 (50112). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 5,453,000 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 118,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 400,000 30 Travel (54000) .................................... 62,000 31 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 517,000 32 Equipment (56000) ................................ 335,000 33 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 3,581,000 34 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 393,000 35 -------------- 36 Program account subtotal .................. 10,859,000 37 -------------- 38 PATROL ACTIVITIES PROGRAM .................................. 656,984,000 39 -------------- 40 General Fund 41 State Purposes Account - 10050 736 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 patrol activities program. 3 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 4 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 5 shall be net of refunds, rebates, 6 reimbursements, credits, repayments, 7 and/or disallowances (50113). 8 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 478,782,000 9 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ......... 44,121,000 10 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 7,961,000 11 Travel (54000) ................................. 3,527,000 12 Contractual services (51000) ................... 6,102,000 13 Equipment (56000) ................................ 656,000 14 -------------- 15 Total amount available ..................... 541,149,000 16 -------------- 17 For services and expenses of security 18 services for the legislative office build- 19 ing (50130). 20 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 250,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ................. 541,399,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 25 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 26 Motor Carrier Safety Assistance Program Account - 25316 27 For services and expenses related to commer- 28 cial vehicle safety enforcement and other 29 activities (50113). 30 Personal service (50000) ...................... 20,715,000 31 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 4,630,000 32 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 3,255,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal .................. 28,600,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 38 New York State Thruway Authority Account - 21905 39 For services and expenses for policing the 40 thruway. 41 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 42 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 43 shall be net of refunds, rebates, 737 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 reimbursements, credits, repayments, 2 and/or disallowances (50113). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 36,078,000 4 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 5,000,000 5 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 30,000 6 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 26,500,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal .................. 67,608,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 12 State Police Seized Assets Account - 22054 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 patrol activities program. 15 Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision 16 of law, the money hereby appropriated may 17 be used for the payment of prior year 18 liabilities (50113). 19 Equipment (56000) ............................. 16,000,000 20 -------------- 21 Program account subtotal .................. 16,000,000 22 -------------- 23 Special Revenue Funds - Other 24 NYS DOT Highway Safety Program Fund 25 Highway Safety Account - 23001 26 For services and expenses related to the 27 patrol activities program (50113). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,572,000 29 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 380,000 30 Equipment (56000) ................................ 425,000 31 -------------- 32 Program account subtotal ................... 3,377,000 33 -------------- 34 TECHNICAL POLICE SERVICES PROGRAM .......................... 143,849,000 35 -------------- 36 General Fund 37 State Purposes Account - 10050 38 For services and expenses related to the 39 technical police services program. 40 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 41 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 42 shall be net of refunds, rebates, 738 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 reimbursements, credits, repayments, 2 and/or disallowances. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 4 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 6 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 7 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 8 appropriation for the budget division 9 program of the division of the budget, are 10 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully 12 stated (50116). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 30,511,000 14 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 2,400,000 15 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 2,365,000 16 Supplies and materials (57000) ................ 16,178,000 17 Travel (54000) ................................... 379,000 18 Contractual services (51000) .................. 33,744,000 19 Equipment (56000) .............................. 6,833,000 20 -------------- 21 Total amount available ...................... 92,410,000 22 -------------- 23 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 24 contrary, for the purchase of services 25 related to accessing highly secure infor- 26 mation and equipment from the center for 27 internet security (50129). 28 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 200,000 29 -------------- 30 Program account subtotal .................. 92,610,000 31 -------------- 32 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 33 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 34 State Police Account - 25362 35 For services and expenses related to the 36 investigation of illicit activities asso- 37 ciated with the manufacture and distrib- 38 ution of methamphetamine (50110). 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,100,000 40 -------------- 41 Total amount available ....................... 2,100,000 42 -------------- 43 For services and expenses related to grants 44 under the department of homeland security 45 port security grant program (50133). 739 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,500,000 2 -------------- 3 Total amount available ....................... 1,500,000 4 -------------- 5 For services and expenses related to grants 6 under the community oriented policing 7 services anti-heroin task force program 8 (50134). 9 Personal service (50000) ......................... 300,000 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 4,640,000 11 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................... 60,000 12 -------------- 13 Total amount available ....................... 5,000,000 14 -------------- 15 For services and expenses related to grants 16 from the bureau of justice assistance 17 (50100). 18 Personal service (50000) .......................... 90,000 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,348,000 20 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................... 60,000 21 Indirect costs (58850) ............................. 3,000 22 -------------- 23 Total amount available ....................... 1,501,000 24 -------------- 25 Funds herein appropriated may be used to 26 disburse unanticipated federal grants in 27 support of various purposes and programs 28 (50103). 29 Personal service (50000) ....................... 2,500,000 30 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 2,500,000 31 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,500,000 32 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 38,000 33 -------------- 34 Total amount available ....................... 6,538,000 35 -------------- 36 Program account subtotal .................. 16,639,000 37 -------------- 38 Special Revenue Funds - Other 39 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 40 Statewide Public Safety Communications Account - 22123 41 For services and expenses related to the 42 technical police services program (50116). 740 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Supplies and materials (57000) ................ 14,000,000 2 Contractual services (51000) .................. 10,500,000 3 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,000,000 4 -------------- 5 Program account subtotal .................. 25,500,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Other 8 State Police Motor Vehicle Law Enforcement and Motor 9 Vehicle Theft and Insurance Fraud Prevention Fund 10 State Police Motor Vehicle Law Enforcement Account - 11 22802 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 technical police services program (50116). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,000,000 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,404,000 16 Travel (54000) ..................................... 6,000 17 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,490,000 18 Equipment (56000) ................................ 200,000 19 -------------- 20 Program account subtotal ................... 9,100,000 21 -------------- 741 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 CRIMINAL INVESTIGATION ACTIVITIES PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 4 State Police Account - 25362 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to combating internet crimes against 7 children (50122). 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $2,000,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 10 For services and expenses related to combating internet crimes against 11 children (50122). 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,000,000 ........... (re. $1,457,000) 13 PATROL ACTIVITIES PROGRAM 14 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 15 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 16 Motor Carrier Safety Assistance Program Account - 25316 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 18 For services and expenses related to commercial vehicle safety 19 enforcement and other activities (50113). 20 Personal service (50000) ... 20,715,000 ............ (re. $20,715,000) 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,630,000 ........... (re. $4,630,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,255,000 ............... (re. $3,255,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 24 For services and expenses related to commercial vehicle safety 25 enforcement and other activities (50113). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 20,715,000 ............. (re. $4,743,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,630,000 ........... (re. $2,191,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 3,255,000 ................. (re. $580,000) 29 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 30 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 31 State Police Federal Equitable Sharing Agreement - Justice Account - 32 25530 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 34 For moneys to the division of state police for the justice department 35 federal equitable sharing agreement to be used for law enforcement 36 purposes distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the superinten- 37 dent of the division of state police and approved by the director of 38 the budget. 39 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of 40 the director of the budget, the funding appropriated herein may be 41 suballocated, interchanged, or transferred and may be used for local 42 assistance and for the payment of prior year liabilities (50113). 43 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 30,000,000 .......... (re. $7,462,000) 742 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 2 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 3 State Police Federal Equitable Sharing Agreement - Treasury Account - 4 25529 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 6 For moneys to the division of state police for the treasury department 7 federal equitable sharing agreement to be used for law enforcement 8 purposes distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the superinten- 9 dent of the division of state police and approved by the director of 10 the budget. 11 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon approval of 12 the director of the budget, the funding appropriated herein may be 13 suballocated, interchanged, or transferred and may be used for local 14 assistance and for the payment of prior year liabilities (50113). 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 30,000,000 ......... (re. $18,278,000) 16 TECHNICAL POLICE SERVICES PROGRAM 17 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 18 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 19 State Police Account - 25362 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 For services and expenses related to grants under the department of 22 homeland security port security grant program (50133). 23 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,500,000 ........... (re. $1,500,000) 24 For services and expenses related to grants under the community 25 oriented policing services anti-heroin task force program (50134). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 300,000 .................. (re. $300,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,640,000 ........... (re. $4,640,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 60,000 ..................... (re. $60,000) 29 For services and expenses related to grants from the bureau of justice 30 assistance (50100). 31 Personal service (50000) ... 90,000 .................... (re. $90,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,348,000 ........... (re. $1,348,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 60,000 ..................... (re. $60,000) 34 Indirect costs (58850) ... 3,000 ........................ (re. $3,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 36 For services and expenses related to the investigation of illicit 37 activities associated with the manufacture and distribution of meth- 38 amphetamine (50110). 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,100,000 ........... (re. $1,653,000) 40 For services and expenses related to grants under the department of 41 homeland security port security grant program (50133). 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,000,000 ............. (re. $900,000) 43 For services and expenses related to grants from the bureau of justice 44 assistance (50100). 45 Personal service (50000) ... 90,000 .................... (re. $86,000) 46 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,348,000 ........... (re. $1,175,000) 47 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 60,000 ..................... (re. $60,000) 743 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF STATE POLICE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Indirect costs (58850) ... 3,000 ........................ (re. $3,000) 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 3 For services and expenses related to the investigation of illicit 4 activities associated with the manufacture and distribution of meth- 5 amphetamine (50110). 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,695,000 ............. (re. $958,000) 7 For services and expenses related to grants from the bureau of justice 8 assistance (50100). 9 Personal service (50000) ... 250,000 .................... (re. $6,000) 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 638,000 ............... (re. $179,000) 11 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 108,000 .................... (re. $17,000) 12 Funds herein appropriated may be used to disburse unanticipated feder- 13 al grants in support of various purposes and programs (50103). 14 Personal service (50000) ... 2,500,000 .............. (re. $2,302,000) 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,500,000 ........... (re. $1,876,000) 16 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,500,000 ............... (re. $1,479,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 18 For services and expenses related to grants from the national insti- 19 tute of justice (50125). 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 638,000 ................ (re. $12,000) 21 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 108,000 .................... (re. $38,000) 22 Indirect costs (58850) ... 4,000 ........................ (re. $4,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 24 For services and expenses related to grants from the national insti- 25 tute of justice (50125). 26 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 638,000 ............... (re. $324,000) 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 29 Statewide Public Safety Communications Account - 22123 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 31 For services and expenses related to the technical police services 32 program (50116). 33 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 14,000,000 ....... (re. $5,038,000) 34 Contractual services (51000) ... 10,500,000 ......... (re. $6,626,000) 35 Equipment (56000) ... 1,000,000 ....................... (re. $700,000) 744 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 1,991,489,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 468,400,000 662,426,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 10,240,765,300 3,883,157,000 6 Internal Service Funds ............. 24,300,000 0 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 12,724,954,300 4,545,583,000 9 ================ ================ 10 SCHEDULE 11 GENERAL FUND 12 EMPLOYEE FRINGE BENEFITS ................................. 1,991,489,000 13 -------------- 14 General Fund 15 State Purposes Account - 10050 16 For other employee fringe benefit programs 17 including, but not limited to, the state's 18 contributions to the health insurance 19 fund, the employees' retirement system 20 pension accumulation fund, the social 21 security contribution fund, employee bene- 22 fit fund programs, the dental insurance 23 plan, the vision care plan, the unemploy- 24 ment insurance fund, and for workers' 25 compensation benefits. Notwithstanding any 26 other provision of law to the contrary, no 27 expenditure shall be made from this appro- 28 priation for any other purpose and it may 29 not be reduced by interchange with any 30 other appropriation made to the state 31 university. This entire appropriation 32 shall be transferred to the miscellaneous 33 -- all state departments and agencies, 34 general state charges program (50963) .... 1,991,489,000 35 -------------- 36 Total general fund support ................. 1,991,489,000 37 -------------- 38 SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS - FEDERAL 39 STUDENT AID ................................................ 468,400,000 40 -------------- 41 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 42 Federal Education Fund 745 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 College Work Study Account - 25218 2 For services and expenses, including grants, 3 relating to the federal supplemental 4 educational opportunity grant program 5 (50949) ...................................... 8,000,000 6 For services and expenses related to the 7 federal college work study program (50948) .. 14,000,000 8 -------------- 9 Program account subtotal .................. 22,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 12 Federal Education Fund 13 Federal Teach Grant Aid Account - 25215 14 For services and expenses, including grants, 15 related to the federal teach grant aid 16 program (50951) ............................. 20,000,000 17 -------------- 18 Program account subtotal .................. 20,000,000 19 -------------- 20 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 21 Federal Education Fund 22 Iraq and Afghanistan Service Award Account - 25218 23 For services and expenses related to the 24 federal scholarship for individuals whose 25 parents served in Iraq or Afghanistan 26 after September 11, 2001 (50925) ............... 100,000 27 -------------- 28 Program account subtotal ..................... 100,000 29 -------------- 30 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 31 Federal Education Fund 32 SUNY Pell Program Account - 25218 33 For services and expenses, including grants, 34 related to the federal Pell grant program 35 (50945) .................................... 425,000,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ................. 425,000,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 40 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 41 Federal Scholarship Account - 25114 42 For services and expenses related to the 746 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 federal scholarship for disadvantaged 2 students program (50950) ..................... 1,300,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal ................... 1,300,000 5 -------------- 6 Total special revenue funds - federal ........ 468,400,000 7 -------------- 8 SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS - OTHER 9 DORMITORY INCOME REIMBURSABLE .............................. 343,400,000 10 -------------- 11 Special Revenue Funds - Other 12 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 13 State University Dormitory Income Reimbursable Account - 14 21937 15 For services and expenses of state universi- 16 ty dormitory operations. Of this amount, 17 up to $5,000,000 may be used for the 18 payment of claims subject to self-insured 19 retention pursuant to liability insurance 20 policies held by the dormitory authority 21 of the state of New York arising out of 22 bodily injury or property damage for which 23 the state university of New York, the 24 state of New York, and the dormitory 25 authority of the state of New York might 26 be liable, occurring upon or about any 27 projects covered by agreements between the 28 dormitory authority of the state of New 29 York, state university of New York, or 30 state university construction fund, to be 31 financed from a transfer from the state 32 university dorm income fund (50940) ........ 343,400,000 33 -------------- 34 STUDENT LOANS ............................................... 34,000,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Other 37 Combined Student Loan Fund 38 Student Loan Account - 20955 39 For services and expenses relating to low 40 interest loans made to students under the 41 federal Perkins, nursing student and 42 health profession loan programs. Of this 43 appropriation, authority identified as 747 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 related to federal drawdown will be trans- 2 ferred to the appropriate federal appro- 3 priation upon direction of the state 4 university of New York (50941) .............. 34,000,000 5 -------------- 6 STATE UNIVERSITY DOCTORAL AND STATE UNIVERSITY HEALTH 7 SCIENCE CAMPUSES ......................................... 474,696,780 8 -------------- 9 Special Revenue Funds - Other 10 State University Income Fund 11 State University Revenue Offset Account - 22655 12 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 13 for the purpose of subdivision 4 of 14 section 355 of the education law, the 15 separate amounts appropriated herein for 16 doctoral and health science campuses shall 17 be deemed to be amounts appropriated to 18 state-operated institutions and amounts 19 appropriated to individual state-operated 20 institutions shall be deemed to be amounts 21 appropriated for programs or purposes. 22 Provided further, that a portion of the 23 funds appropriated herein shall be used to 24 implement a plan to improve educator 25 effectiveness by: 26 (1) increasing admissions requirements for 27 all state university teacher preparation 28 programs; and 29 (2) upgrading the curriculum and require- 30 ments for these programs, which includes 31 increasing opportunities for in-school 32 experience to better prepare aspiring 33 teachers to enter the classroom upon grad- 34 uation. 35 For payment to the state university doctoral 36 and health science campuses according to 37 the following (50939): 38 For services and expenses of the state 39 university of New York at Albany ............ 52,948,280 40 For services and expenses of the state 41 university of New York at Binghamton ........ 39,712,700 42 For services and expenses of the state 43 university of New York at Buffalo, includ- 44 ing services and expenses of the research 45 institute on addictions. Notwithstanding 46 any provision of law, rule or regulation 47 to the contrary, so much of this appropri- 48 ation as may be needed shall be available 49 for transfer to the department of health, 748 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 medical assistance program, local assist- 2 ance account for the purpose of reimburs- 3 ing the non-federal share of any supple- 4 mental fee payments for professional 5 services provided by physicians, nurse 6 practitioners and physician assistants who 7 are participating in a plan for the 8 management of clinical practice at the 9 state university of New York while acting 10 in their capacity as a participant in such 11 plan, at levels approved by the division 12 of the budget, in accordance with federal 13 law and regulation and subject to federal 14 financial participation .................... 131,760,600 15 For services and expenses of the state 16 university of New York at Stony Brook. 17 Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule 18 or regulation to the contrary, so much of 19 this appropriation as may be needed shall 20 be available for transfer to the depart- 21 ment of health, medical assistance 22 program, local assistance account for the 23 purpose of reimbursing the non-federal 24 share of any supplemental fee payments for 25 professional services provided by physi- 26 cians, nurse practitioners and physician 27 assistants who are participating in a plan 28 for the management of clinical practice at 29 the state university of New York while 30 acting in their capacity as a participant 31 in such plan, at levels approved by the 32 division of the budget, in accordance with 33 federal law and regulation and subject to 34 federal financial participation ............ 130,726,000 35 For services and expenses of the state 36 university health science center at Brook- 37 lyn. Notwithstanding any provision of law, 38 rule or regulation to the contrary, so 39 much of this appropriation as may be need- 40 ed shall be available for transfer to the 41 department of health, medical assistance 42 program, local assistance account for the 43 purpose of reimbursing the non-federal 44 share of any supplemental fee payments for 45 professional services provided by physi- 46 cians, nurse practitioners and physician 47 assistants who are participating in a plan 48 for the management of clinical practice at 49 the state university of New York while 50 acting in their capacity as a participant 51 in such plan, at levels approved by the 52 division of the budget, in accordance with 749 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 federal law and regulation and subject to 2 federal financial participation ............. 51,601,600 3 For services and expenses of the state 4 university health science center at Syra- 5 cuse. Notwithstanding any provision of 6 law, rule or regulation to the contrary, 7 so much of this appropriation as may be 8 needed shall be available for transfer to 9 the department of health, medical assist- 10 ance program, local assistance account for 11 the purpose of reimbursing the non-federal 12 share of any supplemental fee payments for 13 professional services provided by physi- 14 cians, nurse practitioners and physician 15 assistants who are participating in a plan 16 for the management of clinical practice at 17 the state university of New York while 18 acting in their capacity as a participant 19 in such plan, at levels approved by the 20 division of budget, in accordance with 21 federal law and regulation and subject to 22 federal financial participation ............. 37,959,800 23 For services and expenses of the state 24 university college of environmental 25 science and forestry ........................ 19,979,700 26 For services and expenses of the state 27 university college of optometry ............. 10,008,100 28 -------------- 29 STATE UNIVERSITY COLLEGES .................................. 169,320,500 30 -------------- 31 Special Revenue Funds - Other 32 State University Income Fund 33 State University Revenue Offset Account - 22655 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 35 for the purpose of subdivision 4 of 36 section 355 of the education law, the 37 separate amounts appropriated herein for 38 state university colleges shall be deemed 39 to be amounts appropriated to state-oper- 40 ated institutions and amounts appropriated 41 to individual state-operated institutions 42 shall be deemed to be amounts appropriated 43 for programs or purposes. 44 Provided further, that a portion of the 45 funds appropriated herein shall be used to 46 implement a plan to improve educator 47 effectiveness by: 750 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 (1) increasing admissions requirements for 2 all state university teacher preparation 3 programs; and 4 (2) upgrading the curriculum and require- 5 ments for these programs, which includes 6 increasing opportunities for in-school 7 experience to better prepare aspiring 8 teachers to enter the classroom upon grad- 9 uation. 10 For payment to the state university colleges 11 according to the following (50939): 12 For services and expenses of the state 13 university college at Brockport ............. 15,479,800 14 For services and expenses of the state 15 university college at Buffalo ............... 21,191,300 16 For services and expenses of the state 17 university college at Cortland .............. 12,390,400 18 For services and expenses of the state 19 university empire state college .............. 7,686,500 20 For services and expenses of the state 21 university college at Fredonia .............. 11,580,300 22 For services and expenses of the state 23 university college at Geneseo ............... 10,565,400 24 For services and expenses of the state 25 university college at New Paltz ............. 14,013,600 26 For services and expenses of the state 27 university college at Old Westbury ........... 8,901,900 28 For services and expenses of the state 29 university college at Oneonta ............... 11,357,100 30 For services and expenses of the state 31 university college at Oswego ............... 13,866,000 32 For services and expenses of the state 33 university college at Plattsburgh ........... 10,654,100 34 For services and expenses of the state 35 university college at Potsdam ............... 11,117,200 36 For services and expenses of the state 37 university college at Purchase .............. 12,704,000 38 For services and expenses of the state 39 university maritime college .................. 7,812,900 40 -------------- 41 STATE UNIVERSITY COLLEGES OF TECHNOLOGY AND AGRICULTURE ..... 50,177,320 42 -------------- 43 Special Revenue Funds - Other 44 State University Income Fund 45 State University Revenue Offset Account - 22655 46 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 47 for the purpose of subdivision 4 of 48 section 355 of the education law, the 49 separate amounts appropriated herein for 751 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 state university colleges of technology 2 and agriculture, shall be deemed to be 3 amounts appropriated to state-operated 4 institutions and amounts appropriated to 5 individual state-operated institutions 6 shall be deemed to be amounts appropriated 7 for programs or purposes. 8 Provided further, that a portion of the 9 funds appropriated herein shall be used to 10 implement a plan to improve educator 11 effectiveness by: 12 (1) increasing admissions requirements for 13 all state university teacher preparation 14 programs; and 15 (2) upgrading the curriculum and require- 16 ments for these programs, which includes 17 increasing opportunities for in-school 18 experience to better prepare aspiring 19 teachers to enter the classroom upon grad- 20 uation. 21 For payment to the state university colleges 22 of technology and agriculture according to 23 the following (50939): 24 For services and expenses of the state 25 university college of technology at Alfred ... 7,325,600 26 For services and expenses of the state 27 university college of technology at Canton ... 5,522,100 28 For services and expenses of the state 29 university college of agriculture and 30 technology at Cobleskill ..................... 6,029,300 31 For services and expenses of the state 32 university college of technology at Delhi .... 5,663,600 33 For services and expenses of the state 34 university college of technology at Farm- 35 ingdale ..................................... 11,108,600 36 For services and expenses of the state 37 university college of agriculture and 38 technology at Morrisville .................... 7,142,100 39 For services and expenses of the state 40 university college of technology at Utica- 41 Rome/state university polytechnic insti- 42 tute ......................................... 7,386,020 43 -------------- 44 UNIVERSITY-WIDE PROGRAMS ................................... 219,024,800 45 -------------- 46 Special Revenue Funds - Other 47 State University Income Fund 48 State University Revenue Offset Account - 22655 49 STUDENT GRANTS AND LOANS 752 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For empire state diversity honors scholar- 2 ships program subject to a university 3 match of equal amount for granting and 4 administration of honor scholarships 5 (50976) ........................................ 621,900 6 For scholarships to recipients of the Mari- 7 time appointments program at SUNY Maritime 8 (50974) ........................................ 239,600 9 For additional scholarships to recipients of 10 the Maritime appointments program at SUNY 11 Maritime. Notwithstanding the preceding, a 12 portion of these funds so appropriated may 13 be utilized to support addressing costs to 14 students related to Summer at Sea terms ...... 2,000,000 15 For expenses of the federal Perkins, health 16 professions and nursing student loan 17 programs; the supplemental educational 18 opportunity grant program; and the college 19 work study program (50980) ................... 3,114,100 20 For the payment of financial assistance to 21 certain categories of regularly enrolled 22 full-time students at state-operated 23 institutions of the state university of 24 New York (50978) ............................. 1,570,700 25 For graduate diversity fellowships (50975) ..... 6,639,300 26 For services and expenses of providing 27 services to students with disabilities 28 (50979) ........................................ 544,100 29 For services and expenses of the first 30 responder counseling scholarship program 31 pursuant to a plan approved by the direc- 32 tor of the budget .............................. 750,000 33 OPPORTUNITY AND DIVERSITY PROGRAMS 34 For services and expenses related to the 35 office of diversity and educational equi- 36 ty, including personnel costs of the state 37 university of New York hispanic leadership 38 institute (50972) .............................. 591,400 39 For services and expenses of the state 40 university of New York hispanic leadership 41 institute (50807) .............................. 350,000 42 For services and expenses of the Native 43 American program (50444) ....................... 215,200 44 For services and expenses of the trustees 45 underrepresented faculty initiative 46 (50988) ........................................ 422,000 47 Educational opportunity programs, for 48 services and expenses to expand opportu- 49 nities in institutions of higher learning 50 for the educationally and economically 753 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 disadvantaged in accordance with chapter 2 917 of the laws of 1970, for educational 3 opportunity programs on state university 4 campuses, a summer program and educational 5 opportunity programs in state university 6 community colleges (50971) .................. 42,464,400 7 For additional services and expenses to 8 expand opportunities in institutions of 9 higher learning for the educationally and 10 economically disadvantaged in accordance 11 with chapter 917 of the laws of 1970, for 12 education opportunity programs on state 13 university campuses, a summer program and 14 educational opportunity programs in state 15 university community colleges ................ 2,587,000 16 For services and expenses related to the 17 operation of educational opportunity 18 centers and their outreach programs 19 including, but not limited to, necessary 20 programs, services, and financial assist- 21 ance, for educationally and economically 22 disadvantaged adults, recipients of feder- 23 al temporary assistance to needy families 24 (TANF) and out-of-school youth who have 25 attained the age of 16 years. $6,050,000 26 of this appropriation shall be used for 27 the services and expenses related to the 28 operation of the ATTAIN lab program. For 29 the purpose of this appropriation, the 30 term "economically disadvantaged" shall be 31 defined as set forth in regulations 32 promulgated by the state university 33 (50970) ..................................... 72,639,900 34 STRATEGIC PRIORITIES AND SYSTEM-WIDE RESOURCES 35 For services and expenses of the empire 36 innovation program (50985) ................... 9,497,400 37 For services and expenses of the strategic 38 partnership for industrial resurgence in 39 accordance with a plan approved by the 40 director of the budget (50990) ............... 1,747,400 41 For services and expenses to promote and 42 coordinate energy reduction projects, to 43 provide an index of the health of New York 44 residents and to match health providers to 45 communities in need (50403) .................... 279,300 46 For services and expenses of the Rockefeller 47 institute, including $62,400 for the 48 Philip Weinberg senior fellowship, $82,000 49 for the statistical yearbook, $329,000 for 50 the center for education pipeline systems 754 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 change, and $393,000 for operating costs 2 (50410) ...................................... 1,826,200 3 For the college of nanoscale science and 4 engineering (50986) .......................... 1,928,600 5 For services and expenses of the sea grant 6 institute (50447) ............................ 1,000,000 7 For services and expenses related to the 8 establishment of the central New York cord 9 blood center at the state university 10 health science center at Syracuse (50999) ...... 205,600 11 For services and expenses related to expand- 12 ing capacity in campus programs for which 13 there is a demonstrated economic develop- 14 ment or public health need (50984) ........... 3,164,300 15 For services and expenses related to the 16 high need program for expansion of nursing 17 programs. A portion of the funds herein 18 appropriated may be transferred to the 19 general fund-local assistance account of 20 the state university of New York to accom- 21 plish the purposes of this appropriation, 22 in accordance with a plan approved by the 23 director of the budget (50983) ............... 1,663,600 24 For additional services and expenses related 25 to the high need program for expansion of 26 nursing programs. A portion of the funds 27 herein appropriated may be transferred to 28 the general fund-local assistance account 29 of the state university of New York to 30 accomplish the purposes of this appropri- 31 ation, in accordance with a plan approved 32 by the director of the budget ................ 1,000,000 33 For services and expenses of the small busi- 34 ness development centers (50991) ............. 2,673,200 35 For services and expenses to provide 36 system-wide support to campuses for inter- 37 national education programs, including 38 study abroad, international exchange and 39 recruiting international students to 40 provide additional revenue for campuses to 41 increase in-state resident enrollment 42 (50404) ...................................... 1,800,000 43 For services and expenses to provide faculty 44 and staff development for state-operated 45 and community colleges (50405) ................. 360,400 46 For expenses for the purpose of providing 47 students access to the benefits of use of 48 computer technology to achieve academic 49 excellence through innovative instruction, 50 including Open SUNY (50401) .................. 1,607,700 51 For services and expenses to improve the 755 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 educational pipeline, including the Urban 2 Teacher Center in New York City (50402) ........ 435,600 3 For academic equipment replacement (50997) ..... 4,373,200 4 For services and expenses related to the 5 operation of child care centers for the 6 benefit of students at the state operated 7 campuses and programs of the state univer- 8 sity of New York, subject to a provision 9 for matching funds of at least 35 percent 10 from non-state sources (50977) ............... 1,567,800 11 For tuition reimbursement for community 12 college employees (50982) ...................... 116,700 13 For teacher education and support, by 14 tuition reimbursement or other expendi- 15 tures in support of the clinical prepara- 16 tion of teachers (50411) ..................... 2,050,000 17 For services and expenses of the university 18 computer center, including the telecommu- 19 nications network and Open SUNY (50989) ...... 4,764,400 20 For services and expenses of the library and 21 educational technology programs, including 22 Open SUNY (50994) ............................ 5,081,600 23 For expenses of university-wide student 24 governance (50987) .............................. 57,100 25 For services and expenses of the library 26 conservation program (50443) ................... 350,000 27 For services and expenses of the adminis- 28 tration of charter schools (50446) ............. 848,600 29 For services and expenses of multimedia 30 services, including the New York Network 31 (50992) ........................................ 118,500 32 For services and expenses of the New York 33 state veterinary college at Cornell 34 (50407) ........................................ 500,000 35 For services and expenses of the staffing 36 and research faculty at the state univer- 37 sity polytechnic institute (50412) ............. 500,000 38 For services and expenses of the center for 39 women in government (50892) .................... 100,000 40 For services and expenses related to 41 increasing access to mental health 42 services (50914) ............................. 1,000,000 43 For additional services and expenses related 44 to increasing access to mental health 45 services ..................................... 1,000,000 46 For services and expenses of the state 47 university of New York institute for lead- 48 ership and diversity and inclusion (50808) ..... 200,000 49 For services and expenses of the university 50 at Buffalo school of law family violence 51 and women's rights clinic (50895) ............... 50,000 756 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of the Empire AI 2 consortium (50814) ........................... 2,500,000 3 For services and expenses of departments of 4 AI and society and the SUNY natural 5 language processing artificial intelli- 6 gence program ............................... 10,000,000 7 For services and expenses of the Regional 8 Gun Violence Research Consortium ............. 1,000,000 9 For services and expenses of the advancing 10 completion through engagement (ACE) and 11 advancing success in associate pathways 12 (ASAP) programs, provided that such funds 13 shall be allocated pursuant to a plan 14 approved by the director of the budget, 15 provided further that a portion of the 16 funds herein appropriated may be trans- 17 ferred to the general fund-local assist- 18 ance account of the state university of 19 New York to make payments to community 20 colleges to accomplish the purposes of 21 this appropriation .......................... 12,000,000 22 For services and expenses of the Empire 23 State Service Corps Program; provided that 24 a portion of these funds herein appropri- 25 ated may be transferred to the general 26 fund - local assistance account of the 27 state university of New York- to make 28 payments to community colleges to accom- 29 plish the purposes of this appropriation 30 (50816) ...................................... 2,750,000 31 For services and expenses of the state 32 weather risk communication center at the 33 state university of New York at Albany 34 (50817) ...................................... 1,500,000 35 For services and expenses of the immigrant 36 integration research and policy institute 37 at the Rockefeller institute ................... 433,000 38 For services and expenses of the Black Lead- 39 ership Institute ............................... 350,000 40 For services and expenses of the Asian Amer- 41 ican Native Hawaiian Pacific Islander 42 (AANHPI) Leadership Institute .................. 350,000 43 For additional services and expenses of the 44 state university college of technology at 45 Farmingdale .................................... 250,000 46 For services and expenses of the benjamin 47 center at the state university college at 48 New Paltz ...................................... 150,000 49 For services and expenses related to the 50 development and operation of a public 51 interest state law program at the univer- 52 sity at Buffalo school of law .................. 500,000 757 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of the University 2 at Buffalo Regional Institute .................. 200,000 3 For services and expenses of the Timbuctoo 4 pipeline at SUNY College of Environmental 5 Science and Forestry ........................... 425,000 6 -------------- 7 Subtotal - university-wide programs ........ 219,024,800 8 -------------- 9 SYSTEM ADMINISTRATION ...................................... 535,652,300 10 -------------- 11 Special Revenue Funds - Other 12 State University Income Fund 13 State University Revenue Offset Account - 22655 14 For services and expenses for system admin- 15 istration, including minority and women 16 business enterprise contracting and 17 purchasing and the internal and independ- 18 ent audit programs. 19 Provided further, $18,000,000 of this appro- 20 priation shall be made available for 21 services and expenses of state-operated 22 campuses to be distributed according to a 23 plan approved by the state university 24 board of trustees, a portion of which may 25 be used to support new classroom faculty. 26 Provided further, $4,000,000 of this appro- 27 priation shall be made available for 28 services and expenses of expanding open 29 educational resources at the state univer- 30 sity of New York state-operated and commu- 31 nity colleges targeting high-enrollment 32 courses including general education cours- 33 es with the highest cost-savings potential 34 for students. 35 Provided further, that a portion of the 36 amounts appropriated herein shall be used 37 to support regional state university of 38 New York community college councils to 39 align the operations of community colleges 40 outside of the city of New York within 41 regions as defined in consultation with 42 the chancellor; provided further, that 43 members of the councils shall be appointed 44 by the chancellor of the state university 45 of New York and the chair of each council 46 shall be one of the constituent community 47 college presidents, or his or her desig- 48 nee; provided further, under the oversight 49 of the chancellor and subject to the 758 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 approval of the board of trustees, each 2 council shall develop a plan that (i) sets 3 program development, enrollment, and 4 transfer goals on a regional basis; (ii) 5 coordinates education and training program 6 offerings within each defined region; and 7 (iii) establishes goals to improve student 8 outcomes. Provided further, that when 9 coordinating education and training offer- 10 ings, community colleges shall ensure that 11 the needs of the residents of the local 12 community and host county are met by such 13 local community college and the needs of 14 the residents of such community and county 15 remain the community colleges' primary 16 concern (50930) ............................. 35,804,300 17 For services and expenses of state-operated 18 campuses to be distributed as general fund 19 operating support pursuant to subparagraph 20 (4-b) of paragraph h of subdivision 2 of 21 section 355 of the education law (50897) .... 55,848,000 22 For services and expenses of new full-time 23 faculty at state-operated campuses and 24 community colleges; provided that a 25 portion of the funds herein appropriated 26 may be transferred to the general fund-lo- 27 cal assistance account of the state 28 university of New York to accomplish the 29 purposes of this appropriation and to make 30 payments to community colleges for new 31 full-time faculty; provided, further, that 32 a portion of this appropriation may be 33 transferred to the miscellaneous - all 34 state departments and agencies, general 35 state charges program, for payment of 36 employee fringe benefits associated with 37 such new full-time faculty (50898) .......... 53,000,000 38 For additional operating assistance at 39 state-operated campuses and statutory and 40 contract colleges; provided that such 41 funds shall be allocated pursuant to a 42 plan approved by the director of the budg- 43 et (50852) ................................. 391,000,000 44 -------------- 45 Total of state-operated institutions general 46 operating schedule ....................... 1,448,871,700 47 -------------- 48 ALL STATE UNIVERSITY COLLEGES AND SCHOOLS ................ 1,922,663,800 49 -------------- 50 Special Revenue Funds - Other 759 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 State University Income Fund 2 State University Revenue Offset Account - 22655 3 For services and expenses of state universi- 4 ty operations supported in whole or in 5 part by tuition. Notwithstanding section 6 23 of the public lands law, expenditures 7 from this appropriation may include the 8 proceeds deposited from the sale of 9 surplus state university property (50939). 1,922,663,800 10 -------------- 11 Total gross operating - state-operated 12 institutions support ..................... 3,371,535,500 13 -------------- 14 STATE UNIVERSITY STATUTORY AND CONTRACT COLLEGES ........... 129,319,800 15 -------------- 16 Special Revenue Funds - Other 17 State University Income Fund 18 State University Revenue Offset Account - 22655 19 For payment to the statutory or contract 20 colleges, as defined by subdivision 3 of 21 section 350 of the education law. 22 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 23 contrary, the separate amounts appropri- 24 ated herein for the statutory and contract 25 colleges may not be decreased by transfer 26 or interchange with appropriations made 27 for doctoral and health science campuses, 28 state university colleges, state universi- 29 ty colleges of technology and agriculture 30 or system administration. 31 For services and expenses of the New York 32 state college of Ceramics - Alfred Univer- 33 sity (50939) ................................. 8,088,100 34 For services and expenses of the New York 35 state statutory colleges - Cornell univer- 36 sity (50962) ................................ 78,913,000 37 For services and expenses to support 38 research conducted at the New York state 39 veterinary college at Cornell into canine 40 diseases affecting humans and animals 41 (50961) ........................................ 138,000 42 For Cornell land scrip (50960) .................... 35,000 43 For services and expenses related to 44 programs that support Cornell university's 45 federal land grant mission (50959) .......... 42,145,700 46 -------------- 760 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Amount available - New York statutory 2 colleges - Cornell University ............ 121,231,700 3 -------------- 4 Total of statutory and contract colleges 5 support .................................... 129,319,800 6 -------------- 7 Total gross operating - state-operated 8 institutions and statutory and contract 9 college support .......................... 3,500,855,300 10 -------------- 11 GENERAL INCOME REIMBURSABLE ................................ 837,800,000 12 -------------- 13 Special Revenue Funds - Other 14 State University Income Fund 15 State University General Income Reimbursable Account - 16 22653 17 For services and expenses of activities 18 supported in whole or in part by user fees 19 and other charges (50938) .................. 837,800,000 20 -------------- 21 HOSPITAL INCOME REIMBURSABLE ............................. 5,309,400,000 22 -------------- 23 Special Revenue Funds - Other 24 State University Income Fund 25 State University Hospitals Income Reimbursable Account - 26 22656 27 For services and expenses of the state 28 university of New York hospitals at Stony 29 Brook, Brooklyn, and Syracuse, including 30 fringe benefits and other operational 31 expenses (50934) ......................... 5,109,400,000 32 For additional services and expenses of the 33 state university of New York hospital at 34 Brooklyn, including fringe benefits and 35 other operational expenses, pursuant to a 36 plan approved by the director of the budg- 37 et, provided that pursuant to such plan, a 38 portion of this appropriation may be 39 transferred to the state university income 40 fund, state university general revenue 41 offset account (22655) for additional 42 services and expenses of the state univer- 43 sity health science center at Brooklyn ..... 100,000,000 44 -------------- 761 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Program account subtotal ............... 5,209,400,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other 4 State University Income Fund 5 State University-wide Hospital Reimbursable Account - 6 22658 7 For services and expenses of hospital activ- 8 ities supported in whole or in part by 9 user fees and other charges (50934) ........ 100,000,000 10 -------------- 11 Program account subtotal ................. 100,000,000 12 -------------- 13 LONG ISLAND VETERANS' HOME REIMBURSABLE ..................... 63,310,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other 16 State University Income Fund 17 Long Island Veterans' Home Account - 22652 18 For services and expenses related to opera- 19 tion of the Long Island veterans' home 20 (50933) ..................................... 62,980,000 21 For services and expenses of the Long Island 22 Veterans' home for the hiring and retain- 23 ing nurses at state homes program .............. 330,000 24 -------------- 25 TUITION REIMBURSABLE ....................................... 151,900,000 26 -------------- 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 State University Income Fund 29 SUNY Tuition Reimbursable Account - 22659 30 For services and expenses of activities 31 supported in whole or in part by tuition 32 and related academic fees. This appropri- 33 ation shall be available for expenditure 34 upon approval by the director of the budg- 35 et of an annual plan submitted by the 36 university to the director of the budget 37 and the chairs of the senate finance 38 committee and the assembly ways and means 39 committee on or before October 15, 2025 40 (50931) .................................... 151,900,000 41 -------------- 42 FIREARM VIOLENCE RESEARCH ...................................... 100,000 43 -------------- 762 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 3 Firearm Violence Research Account - 23819 4 For services and expenses of the New York 5 firearm violence research institute pursu- 6 ant to section 97-j of state finance law ....... 100,000 7 -------------- 8 Total special revenue funds - other ....... 10,240,765,300 9 -------------- 10 INTERNAL SERVICE FUNDS 11 BANKING SERVICES ............................................ 24,300,000 12 -------------- 13 Internal Service Funds 14 Agencies Internal Service Fund 15 Banking Services Account - 55057 16 For services and expenses in connection with 17 the purchase of banking services (50932) .... 24,300,000 18 -------------- 19 Total internal service funds .................. 24,300,000 20 -------------- 763 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 STUDENT AID 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Education Fund 4 College Work Study Account - 25218 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses, including grants, relating to the federal 7 supplemental educational opportunity grant program (50949) ......... 8 8,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,923,000) 9 For services and expenses related to the federal college work study 10 program (50948) ... 14,000,000 ................... (re. $12,003,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 12 For services and expenses, including grants, relating to the federal 13 supplemental educational opportunity grant program (50949) ......... 14 8,000,000 ........................................... (re. $984,000) 15 For services and expenses related to the federal college work study 16 program (50948) ... 14,000,000 .................... (re. $2,706,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 18 For services and expenses, including grants, relating to the federal 19 supplemental educational opportunity grant program (50949) ......... 20 8,000,000 ........................................... (re. $735,000) 21 For services and expenses related to the federal college work study 22 program (50948) ... 14,000,000 .................... (re. $1,612,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 24 For services and expenses, including grants, relating to the federal 25 supplemental educational opportunity grant program (50949) ......... 26 8,000,000 ........................................... (re. $666,000) 27 For services and expenses related to the federal college work study 28 program (50948) ... 14,000,000 .................... (re. $2,024,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 30 For services and expenses, including grants, relating to the federal 31 supplemental educational opportunity grant program (50949) ......... 32 8,000,000 ........................................... (re. $792,000) 33 For services and expenses related to the federal college work study 34 program (50948) ... 14,000,000 .................... (re. $2,353,000) 35 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 36 Federal Education Fund 37 Federal Teach Grant Aid Account - 25215 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 39 For services and expenses, including grants, related to the federal 40 teach grant aid program (50951) ... 20,000,000 ... (re. $18,355,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 42 For services and expenses, including grants, related to the federal 43 teach grant aid program (50951) ... 20,000,000 ... (re. $16,138,000) 764 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 2 For services and expenses, including grants, related to the federal 3 teach grant aid program (50951) ... 20,000,000 ... (re. $16,555,000) 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 5 For services and expenses, including grants, related to the federal 6 teach grant aid program (50951) ... 20,000,000 ... (re. $16,280,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 8 For services and expenses, including grants, related to the federal 9 teach grant aid program (50951) ... 20,000,000 ... (re. $16,653,000) 10 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 11 Federal Education Fund 12 Iraq and Afghanistan Service Award Account - 25218 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 14 For services and expenses related to the federal scholarship for indi- 15 viduals whose parents served in Iraq or Afghanistan after September 16 11, 2001 (50925) ... 100,000 ........................ (re. $100,000) 17 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 18 Federal Education Fund 19 SUNY Pell Program Account - 25218 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 For services and expenses, including grants, related to the federal 22 Pell grant program (50945) ... 400,000,000 ...... (re. $194,603,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 24 For services and expenses, including grants, related to the federal 25 Pell grant program (50945) ... 400,000,000 ....... (re. $62,745,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 27 For services and expenses, including grants, related to the federal 28 Pell grant program (50945) ... 400,000,000 ....... (re. $97,826,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 30 For services and expenses, including grants, related to the federal 31 Pell grant program (50945) ... 400,000,000 ....... (re. $99,789,000) 32 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 33 For services and expenses, including grants, related to the federal 34 Pell grant program (50945) ... 400,000,000 ....... (re. $93,468,000) 35 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 36 Federal Health and Human Services Fund 37 Federal Scholarship Account - 25114 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 765 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the federal scholarship for 2 disadvantaged students program (50950) ............................. 3 1,300,000 ........................................... (re. $826,000) 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 5 For services and expenses related to the federal scholarship for 6 disadvantaged students program (50950) ............................. 7 750,000 ............................................. (re. $168,000) 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 9 For services and expenses related to the federal scholarship for 10 disadvantaged students program (50950) ... 750,000 .. (re. $122,000) 11 UNIVERSITY-WIDE PROGRAMS 12 Special Revenue Funds - Other 13 State University Income Fund 14 State University Revenue Offset Account - 22655 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 50, 16 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 17 For services and expenses related to the establishment of child care 18 centers at additional campuses and/or the expansion of existing 19 on-campus child care centers to serve additional children (50891) 20 ... 5,400,000 ..................................... (re. $3,173,000) 21 SYSTEM ADMINISTRATION 22 Special Revenue Funds - Other 23 State University Income Fund 24 State University Revenue Offset Account - 22655 25 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 26 For nonrecurring investments in transformational initiatives at state- 27 operated campuses, statutory and contract colleges, and community 28 colleges, including but not limited to investments to support inno- 29 vation, help meet the workforce needs of the future, enhance student 30 support services, improve academic programs, increase enrollment, 31 and modernize campus operations; provided that such funds shall be 32 allocated pursuant to a plan approved by the director of the budget; 33 provided further that a portion of the funds herein appropriated may 34 be transferred to the general fund-local assistance account of the 35 state university of New York to make payments to community colleges 36 to accomplish the purposes of this appropriation (50905) ........... 37 75,000,000 ....................................... (re. $40,470,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 39 For nonrecurring strategic investments in state-operated campuses, 40 statutory and contract colleges, state university of New York hospi- 41 tals and community colleges, including but not limited to invest- 42 ments to improve academic programs, increase enrollment, enhance 43 student support services and modernize campus or hospital oper- 766 12550-10-5 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ations; provided that such funds shall be allocated pursuant to a 2 plan approved by the director of the budget; provided further that a 3 portion of the funds herein appropriated may be transferred to the 4 general fund-local assistance account of the state university of New 5 York to make payments to community colleges to accomplish the 6 purposes of such approved plan (50905) ............................. 7 60,000,000 ....................................... (re. $24,524,000) 8 GENERAL INCOME REIMBURSABLE 9 Special Revenue Funds - Other 10 State University Income Fund 11 State University General Income Reimbursable Account - 22653 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 13 For services and expenses of activities supported in whole or in part 14 by user fees and other charges (50938) ............................. 15 837,800,000 ..................................... (re. $608,200,000) 16 HOSPITAL INCOME REIMBURSABLE 17 Special Revenue Funds - Other 18 State University Income Fund 19 State University Hospitals Income Reimbursable Account - 22656 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 For services and expenses of the state university of New York hospi- 22 tals at Stony Brook, Brooklyn, and Syracuse, including fringe bene- 23 fits and other operational expenses (50934) ........................ 24 4,324,300,000 ................................. (re. $3,150,594,000) 25 Special Revenue Funds - Other 26 State University Income Fund 27 State University-wide Hospital Reimbursable Account - 22658 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 29 For services and expenses of hospital activities supported in whole or 30 in part by user fees and other charges (50934) ..................... 31 100,000,000 ...................................... (re. $80,720,000) 767 12550-10-5 STATEWIDE FINANCIAL SYSTEM STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 35,267,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 35,267,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 STATEWIDE FINANCIAL SYSTEM PROGRAM .......................... 35,267,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 development of enterprise technology 14 solutions. Funds appropriated herein may 15 be suballocated to any other state depart- 16 ment, agency or public benefit corporation 17 to achieve this purpose; provided however, 18 these funds shall only be available upon 19 the mutual agreement of the director of 20 the budget and the state comptroller on a 21 joint implementation plan for the inte- 22 grated development of statewide financial 23 system to be utilized by agencies, the 24 division of the budget, and the office of 25 the state comptroller (13001). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 15,018,000 27 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 350,000 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 66,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 60,000 30 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 31 Contractual services (51000) .................. 19,317,000 32 Equipment (56000) ................................ 446,000 33 -------------- 768 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION AND FINANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for 2 payment according to the following schedule, net of 3 refunds, rebates, reimbursements, credits, repayments, 4 and/or disallowances: 5 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 6 General Fund ....................... 327,127,000 0 7 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 0 1,523,000 8 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 110,054,000 88,029,000 9 Internal Service Funds ............. 80,081,000 30,391,700 10 ---------------- ---------------- 11 All Funds ........................ 517,262,000 119,943,700 12 ================ ================ 13 SCHEDULE 14 ADMINISTRATION AND OPERATIONS PROGRAM ....................... 67,473,000 15 -------------- 16 General Fund 17 State Purposes Account - 10050 18 For services and expenses related to the 19 administration and operations program. 20 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 21 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 22 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 23 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 24 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 25 appropriation for the budget division 26 program of the division of the budget, are 27 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully 29 stated (51322). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 38,435,000 31 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 142,000 32 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 110,000 33 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 8,518,000 34 Travel (54000) ................................... 134,000 35 Contractual services (51000) .................. 19,243,000 36 Equipment (56000) ................................ 891,000 37 -------------- 38 CONCILIATION AND MEDIATION PROGRAM ........................... 3,308,000 39 -------------- 40 General Fund 41 State Purposes Account - 10050 769 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION AND FINANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 conciliation and mediation program. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 4 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 6 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 7 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 8 appropriation for the budget division 9 program of the division of the budget, are 10 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully 12 stated (51311). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,120,000 14 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 50,000 15 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 16 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 18,000 17 Travel (54000) .................................... 91,000 18 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 14,000 19 Equipment (56000) .................................. 5,000 20 -------------- 21 NEW YORK STATE IS OPEN FOR BUSINESS PROGRAM .................... 266,000 22 -------------- 23 General Fund 24 State Purposes Account - 10050 25 For services and expenses related to the New 26 York state is open for business program 27 (51320). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 266,000 29 -------------- 30 NEW YORK STATE SECURE CHOICE SAVINGS PROGRAM ................. 3,035,000 31 -------------- 32 Special Revenue Funds - Other 33 Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account 34 New York State Secure Choice Administrative Account - 35 23806 36 For services and expenses related to the 37 administration of the New York state 38 secure choice savings program. 39 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 40 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 41 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 42 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 43 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 44 appropriation for the budget division 770 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION AND FINANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 program of the division of the budget, are 2 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 3 part of this appropriation as if fully 4 stated (51324). 5 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 376,000 6 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 40,000 7 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 5,000 8 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 240,000 9 Travel (54000) .................................... 16,000 10 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,000,000 11 Equipment (56000) ................................ 107,000 12 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 240,000 13 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 11,000 14 -------------- 15 REVENUE ANALYSIS, COLLECTION, ENFORCEMENT, PROCESSING, AND 16 REAL PROPERTY TAX PROGRAM ................................ 438,472,000 17 -------------- 18 General Fund 19 State Purposes Account - 10050 20 For services and expenses related to the 21 revenue analysis, collection, enforcement, 22 processing, and real property tax program. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 24 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 25 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 26 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 27 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 28 appropriation for the budget division 29 program of the division of the budget, are 30 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 31 part of this appropriation as if fully 32 stated (51313). 33 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 238,561,000 34 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,247,000 35 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .......... 3,190,000 36 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 454,000 37 Travel (54000) ................................. 4,708,000 38 Contractual services (51000) ................... 7,382,000 39 Equipment (56000) ................................ 538,000 40 -------------- 41 Program account subtotal ................. 256,080,000 42 -------------- 43 Special Revenue Funds - Other 44 Dedicated Miscellaneous Special Revenue Account 45 Highway Use Tax Administration Account - 23801 771 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION AND FINANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 administration of the highway use tax. 3 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 4 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 5 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 6 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 7 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 8 appropriation for the budget division 9 program of the division of the budget, are 10 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 11 part of this appropriation as if fully 12 stated (51313). 13 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 193,000 14 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 2,000 15 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 200,000 16 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 123,000 17 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 6,000 18 -------------- 19 Program account subtotal ..................... 524,000 20 -------------- 21 Special Revenue Funds - Other 22 HCRA Resources Fund 23 Cigarette Strike Task Force Account - 20822 24 For services and expenses related to the 25 investigation and prosecution of criminal 26 activity associated with the sale and 27 trafficking of illegal cigarettes (51313). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,567,000 29 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 45,000 30 Travel (54000) ................................... 120,000 31 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 32 Equipment (56000) ................................. 35,000 33 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,640,000 34 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 68,000 35 -------------- 36 Program account subtotal ................... 4,525,000 37 -------------- 38 Special Revenue Funds - Other 39 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 40 Equitable Sharing Agreement Account - 22195 41 For moneys to the department of taxation and 42 finance for various equitable sharing 43 agreements to be used for law enforcement 44 purposes. 45 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 46 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 772 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION AND FINANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 2 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 3 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 4 appropriation for the budget division 5 program of the division of the budget, are 6 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 7 part of this appropriation as if fully 8 stated (51313). 9 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 400,000 10 Travel (54000) .................................... 50,000 11 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 200,000 12 Equipment (56000) ................................ 350,000 13 -------------- 14 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 15 -------------- 16 Special Revenue Funds - Other 17 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 18 Equitable Sharing-DTF Justice Account - 22217 19 For moneys to the department of taxation and 20 finance for the justice department federal 21 equitable sharing agreement to be used for 22 law enforcement purposes (51313). 23 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 200,000 24 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 350,000 25 Equipment (56000) ................................ 200,000 26 -------------- 27 Program account subtotal ..................... 750,000 28 -------------- 29 Special Revenue Funds - Other 30 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 31 Equitable Sharing-DTF Treasury Account - 22218 32 For moneys to the department of taxation and 33 finance for the treasury department feder- 34 al equitable sharing agreement to be used 35 for law enforcement purposes (51313). 36 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 200,000 37 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 350,000 38 Equipment (56000) ................................ 200,000 39 -------------- 40 Program account subtotal ..................... 750,000 41 -------------- 42 Special Revenue Funds - Other 43 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 44 Industrial and Utility Service Account - 22004 773 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION AND FINANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to the 2 preparation of appraisals on special fran- 3 chises, unit of production values of oil 4 and gas rights and assessment ceilings on 5 railroad properties. 6 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 7 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 8 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 9 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 10 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 11 appropriation for the budget division 12 program of the division of the budget, are 13 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 14 part of this appropriation as if fully 15 stated (51313). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,960,000 17 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 40,000 18 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 10,000 19 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 2,000 20 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 21 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 93,000 22 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,251,000 23 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 52,000 24 -------------- 25 Program account subtotal ................... 3,413,000 26 -------------- 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 29 Local Services Account - 22078 30 For services and expenses related to the 31 revenue analysis, collection, enforcement, 32 processing, and real property tax program. 33 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 34 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 35 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 36 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 37 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 38 appropriation for the budget division 39 program of the division of the budget, are 40 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 41 part of this appropriation as if fully 42 stated (51313). 43 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 757,000 44 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 5,000 45 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 5,000 46 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 47 Travel (54000) ..................................... 1,000 48 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 48,000 774 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION AND FINANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 483,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 20,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal ................... 1,320,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 8 New York City Assessment Account - 22062 9 For services and expenses related to the 10 administration, collection, and distrib- 11 ution of the New York city personal income 12 taxes. 13 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 14 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 15 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 16 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 17 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 18 appropriation for the budget division 19 program of the division of the budget, are 20 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 21 part of this appropriation as if fully 22 stated (51313). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 36,633,000 24 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 1,315,000 25 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,553,000 26 Travel (54000) ................................. 2,000,000 27 Contractual services (51000) .................. 18,000,000 28 Equipment (56000) .............................. 2,000,000 29 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 24,108,000 30 Indirect costs (58800) ......................... 1,420,000 31 -------------- 32 Program account subtotal .................. 88,029,000 33 -------------- 34 Special Revenue Funds - Other 35 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 36 Tax Revenue Arrearage Account - 22168 37 For services and expenses related to the 38 administration and collection of outstand- 39 ing tax liabilities through the use of 40 contractual services. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 42 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 43 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 44 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 45 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 46 appropriation for the budget division 47 program of the division of the budget, are 775 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION AND FINANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 2 part of this appropriation as if fully 3 stated (51313). 4 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,000,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ................... 2,000,000 7 -------------- 8 Internal Service Funds 9 Agencies Internal Service Fund 10 Banking Services Account - 55057 11 For services and expenses in connection with 12 the purchase of banking services, as well 13 as for tax return processing and process- 14 ing support within the department of taxa- 15 tion and finance. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 19 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 20 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 21 appropriation for the budget division 22 program of the division of the budget, are 23 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully 25 stated (51313). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 3,183,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 2,000,000 28 Travel (54000) .................................... 26,000 29 Contractual services (51000) .................. 18,180,000 30 Equipment (56000) ................................ 200,000 31 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 2,034,000 32 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 100,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal .................. 25,723,000 35 -------------- 36 Internal Service Funds 37 Agencies Internal Service Fund 38 Tax Contact Center Account - 55073 39 For payments related to the planning, devel- 40 opment and establishment of a new state- 41 wide contact center within the department 42 of taxation and finance, the office of 43 children and family services and the 44 department of labor on behalf of customer 45 state agencies. 776 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION AND FINANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 2 to the contrary, for the purpose of plan- 3 ning, developing and/or implementing the 4 consolidation of administration, business 5 services, procurement, information tech- 6 nology and/or other functions shared among 7 agencies to improve the efficiency and 8 effectiveness of government operations, 9 the amounts appropriated herein may be (i) 10 interchanged without limit, (ii) trans- 11 ferred between any other state operations 12 appropriations within this agency or to 13 any other state operations appropriations 14 of any state department, agency or public 15 authority, and/or (iii) suballocated to 16 any state department, agency or public 17 authority with the approval of the direc- 18 tor of the budget who shall file such 19 approval with the department of audit and 20 control and copies thereof with the chair- 21 man of the senate finance committee and 22 the chairman of the assembly ways and 23 means committee (51313). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ............. 32,164,000 25 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 790,000 26 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 20,551,000 27 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 853,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal .................. 54,358,000 30 -------------- 31 TREASURY MANAGEMENT PROGRAM .................................. 4,708,000 32 -------------- 33 Special Revenue Funds - Other 34 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 35 Investment Services Account - 22034 36 For services and expenses relating to the 37 performance of certain fiduciary responsi- 38 bilities on behalf of certain agencies, 39 public benefit corporations and public 40 authorities. 41 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 42 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 43 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 44 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 45 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 46 appropriation for the budget division 47 program of the division of the budget, are 48 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 777 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION AND FINANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 part of this appropriation as if fully 2 stated (51317). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,165,000 4 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 17,000 5 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 1,000 6 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 130,000 7 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 8 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 940,000 9 Equipment (56000) .................................. 4,000 10 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,383,000 11 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 58,000 12 -------------- 778 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION AND FINANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 REVENUE ANALYSIS, COLLECTION, ENFORCEMENT, PROCESSING, AND REAL PROPERTY 2 TAX PROGRAM 3 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 4 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 5 Federal Equitable Sharing Agreement - Justice Account - 25406 6 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 7 For moneys to the department of taxation and finance for the justice 8 department federal equitable sharing agreement to be used for law 9 enforcement purposes (51313). 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,500,000 ............. (re. $402,000) 11 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 12 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 13 Federal Equitable Sharing Agreement - Treasury Account - 25524 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 15 For moneys to the department of taxation and finance for the treasury 16 department federal equitable sharing agreement to be used for law 17 enforcement purposes (51313). 18 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 2,500,000 ........... (re. $1,121,000) 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other 20 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 21 New York City Assessment Account - 22062 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 23 For services and expenses related to the administration, collection, 24 and distribution of the New York city personal income taxes. 25 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 26 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 27 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 28 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 29 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 30 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51313). 31 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 36,633,000 ... (re. $36,633,000) 32 Temporary service (50200) ... 1,315,000 ............. (re. $1,315,000) 33 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 2,553,000 ........ (re. $2,553,000) 34 Travel (54000) ... 2,000,000 ........................ (re. $2,000,000) 35 Contractual services (51000) ... 18,000,000 ........ (re. $18,000,000) 36 Equipment (56000) ... 2,000,000 ..................... (re. $2,000,000) 37 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 24,108,000 ............. (re. $24,108,000) 38 Indirect costs (58800) ... 1,420,000 ................ (re. $1,420,000) 39 Internal Service Funds 40 Agencies Internal Service Fund 41 Banking Services Account - 55057 42 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 779 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TAXATION AND FINANCE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses in connection with the purchase of banking 2 services, as well as for tax return processing and processing 3 support within the department of taxation and finance. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 5 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 6 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 7 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 8 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51313). 10 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 3,090,000 ..... (re. $3,090,000) 11 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 2,000,000 ........ (re. $1,729,000) 12 Travel (54000) ... 25,700 .............................. (re. $25,700) 13 Contractual services (51000) ... 18,180,000 ........ (re. $13,528,000) 14 Equipment (56000) ... 200,000 ......................... (re. $200,000) 15 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,034,000 ............... (re. $2,034,000) 16 Indirect costs (58800) ... 100,000 .................... (re. $100,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 18 For services and expenses in connection with the purchase of banking 19 services, as well as for tax return processing and processing 20 support within the department of taxation and finance. 21 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 22 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 23 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 24 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 25 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 26 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51313). 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 2,000,000 .......... (re. $475,000) 28 Travel (54000) ... 25,700 .............................. (re. $23,000) 29 Contractual services (51000) ... 18,180,000 ......... (re. $4,443,000) 30 Equipment (56000) ... 200,000 ......................... (re. $200,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 32 For services and expenses in connection with the purchase of banking 33 services, as well as for tax return processing and processing 34 support within the department of taxation and finance. 35 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 36 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 37 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 38 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 39 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 40 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (51313). 41 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 2,000,000 .......... (re. $441,000) 42 Travel (54000) ... 25,700 .............................. (re. $23,000) 43 Contractual services (51000) ... 18,180,000 ......... (re. $3,880,000) 44 Equipment (56000) ... 200,000 ......................... (re. $200,000) 780 12550-10-5 DIVISION OF TAX APPEALS STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 4,506,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 4,506,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ....................................... 4,506,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 administration program (81001). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,041,000 15 Temporary service (50200) ......................... 73,000 16 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 101,000 17 Travel (54000) .................................... 32,000 18 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 257,000 19 Equipment (56000) .................................. 2,000 20 -------------- 781 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 454,841,000 612,925,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 40,342,000 187,756,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 17,494,000 29,882,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 512,677,000 830,563,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 BUS SAFETY PROGRAM ........................................... 8,680,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses of the bus safety 15 program (54211). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 7,032,000 17 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 934,000 18 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 30,000 19 Travel (54000) ................................... 498,000 20 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 78,000 21 Equipment (56000) ................................ 108,000 22 -------------- 23 MOTOR CARRIER SAFETY PROGRAM ................................. 8,284,000 24 -------------- 25 General Fund 26 State Purposes Account - 10050 27 For services and expenses of the motor 28 carrier safety program. 29 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 30 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 31 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 32 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 33 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 34 appropriation for the budget division 35 program of the division of the budget, are 36 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 37 part of this appropriation as if fully 38 stated (54213). 39 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,809,000 40 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 228,000 41 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 94,000 782 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Travel (54000) ................................... 120,000 2 Contractual services (51000) ................... 3,015,000 3 Equipment (56000) ................................. 18,000 4 -------------- 5 OFFICE OF PASSENGER AND FREIGHT TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM ...... 54,626,000 6 -------------- 7 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 8 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 9 Federal Aviation Administration Planning Account - 25303 10 For services and expenses related to the 11 office of passenger and freight transpor- 12 tation (54292). 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,378,000 14 -------------- 15 Program account subtotal ................... 1,378,000 16 -------------- 17 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 18 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 19 FTA Program Management Account - 25446 20 For services and expenses related to the 21 office of passenger and freight transpor- 22 tation (54292). 23 Personal service (50000) ....................... 3,249,000 24 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 5,294,000 25 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 1,937,000 26 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 164,000 27 -------------- 28 Program account subtotal .................. 10,644,000 29 -------------- 30 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 31 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 32 Motor Carrier Safety Account - 25397 33 For services and expenses related to the 34 office of passenger and freight transpor- 35 tation (54292). 36 Personal service (50000) ...................... 13,664,000 37 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 5,825,000 38 Fringe benefits (60090) ........................ 8,143,000 39 Indirect costs (58850) ........................... 688,000 40 -------------- 41 Program account subtotal .................. 28,320,000 42 -------------- 783 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Special Revenue Funds - Other 2 Clean Air Fund 3 Mobile Source Account - 21452 4 For the expenses of the department of trans- 5 portation, including liabilities incurred 6 prior to April 1, 2025, relating to the 7 implementation and administration of the 8 heavy duty vehicle emissions inspection 9 program. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 11 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 12 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 13 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 14 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 15 appropriation for the budget division 16 program of the division of the budget, are 17 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 18 part of this appropriation as if fully 19 stated (54292). 20 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 518,000 21 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 158,000 22 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 217,000 23 Travel (54000) .................................... 54,000 24 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 64,000 25 Equipment (56000) ................................. 72,000 26 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 408,000 27 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 22,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal ................... 1,513,000 30 -------------- 31 Special Revenue Funds - Other 32 Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Fund 33 Metropolitan Mass Transportation Operating Assistance 34 Account - 21402 35 For services and expenses related to the 36 administration of the mass transportation 37 operating assistance program including bus 38 inspections primarily within the metropol- 39 itan commuter transportation district. 40 Provided, however, notwithstanding any 41 other provision of law, $100,000 of this 42 appropriation shall be made available for 43 contractual services for the purpose of 44 auditing and examining the accounts, 45 books, records, documents, and papers of 46 transportation operators receiving mass 47 transportation operating assistance 48 payments serving primarily within the 784 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 metropolitan commuter transportation 2 district when the commissioner of trans- 3 portation deems such audits necessary. 4 Such contracts may also include, but not be 5 limited to, recommendations to achieve 6 economies and efficiencies in the state 7 transportation operating assistance 8 program (54292). 9 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,857,000 10 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 411,000 11 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 32,000 12 Travel (54000) ................................... 204,000 13 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 211,000 14 Equipment (56000) ................................. 44,000 15 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 1,970,000 16 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 102,000 17 -------------- 18 Program account subtotal ................... 5,831,000 19 -------------- 20 Special Revenue Funds - Other 21 Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Fund 22 Public Transportation Systems Operating Assistance 23 Account - 21401 24 For services and expenses related to the 25 administration of the mass transportation 26 operating assistance program including bus 27 inspections primarily outside of the 28 metropolitan commuter transportation 29 district. Provided, however, notwithstand- 30 ing any other provision of law, $100,000 31 of this appropriation shall be made avail- 32 able for contractual services for the 33 purpose of auditing and examining the 34 accounts, books, records, documents, and 35 papers of transportation operators receiv- 36 ing mass transportation operating assist- 37 ance payments serving primarily outside of 38 the metropolitan commuter transportation 39 district when the commissioner of trans- 40 portation deems such audits necessary. 41 Such contracts may also include, but not be 42 limited to, recommendations to achieve 43 economies and efficiencies in the state 44 transportation operating assistance 45 program (54292). 46 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 797,000 47 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 18,000 48 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 6,000 785 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Travel (54000) .................................... 12,000 2 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 210,000 3 Equipment (56000) .................................. 6,000 4 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 492,000 5 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 26,000 6 -------------- 7 Program account subtotal ................... 1,567,000 8 -------------- 9 Special Revenue Funds - Other 10 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 11 Transportation Aviation Account - 22165 12 For payment of expenses related to operation 13 of Stewart and Republic airports (54292). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 160,000 15 Travel (54000) .................................... 11,000 16 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,100,000 17 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 97,000 18 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 5,000 19 -------------- 20 Program account subtotal ................... 5,373,000 21 -------------- 22 OPERATIONS PROGRAM ......................................... 439,335,000 23 -------------- 24 General Fund 25 State Purposes Account - 10050 26 For the payment of costs of snow and ice 27 control on state highways and preventive 28 maintenance on state roads and bridges as 29 defined in paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 30 of section 10-d of the highway law. 31 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 32 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 33 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 34 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 35 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 36 appropriation for the budget division 37 program of the division of the budget, are 38 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 39 part of this appropriation as if fully 40 stated (54291). 41 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 161,445,000 42 Temporary service (50200) ...................... 5,074,000 43 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ......... 43,006,000 44 Supplies and materials (57000) ............... 156,524,000 45 Travel (54000) ................................... 115,000 786 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Contractual services (51000) .................. 69,343,000 2 Equipment (56000) ................................ 618,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal ................. 436,125,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 8 Highway Construction and Maintenance Safety Education 9 Account - 22089 10 For services and expenses related to the 11 operations program (54291). 12 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 13 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 208,000 14 Equipment (56000) .................................. 1,000 15 -------------- 16 Program account subtotal ..................... 210,000 17 -------------- 18 Special Revenue Funds - Other 19 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 20 Transportation Surplus Property Account - 21933 21 For services and expenses related to the 22 operations program. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 24 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 25 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 26 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 27 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 28 appropriation for the budget division 29 program of the division of the budget, are 30 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 31 part of this appropriation as if fully 32 stated (54291). 33 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 1,000,000 34 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,000,000 35 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,000,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ................... 3,000,000 38 -------------- 39 RAIL SAFETY PROGRAM .......................................... 1,752,000 40 -------------- 41 General Fund 42 State Purposes Account - 10050 787 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses of the rail safety 2 program (54215). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 1,467,000 4 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 92,000 5 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 33,000 6 Travel (54000) ................................... 136,000 7 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 11,000 8 Equipment (56000) ................................. 13,000 9 -------------- 788 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 BUS SAFETY PROGRAM 2 General Fund 3 State Purposes Account - 10050 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For services and expenses of the bus safety program (54211). 6 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 7,032,000 ..... (re. $3,898,000) 7 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 934,000 ..... (re. $432,000) 8 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 30,000 ............... (re. $4,000) 9 Travel (54000) ... 498,000 ............................ (re. $330,000) 10 Contractual services (51000) ... 78,000 ................ (re. $75,000) 11 Equipment (56000) ... 108,000 .......................... (re. $77,000) 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 13 For services and expenses of the bus safety program (54211). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 7,032,000 ..... (re. $1,514,000) 15 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 934,000 ..... (re. $149,000) 16 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 30,000 ............... (re. $1,000) 17 Travel (54000) ... 498,000 ............................ (re. $183,000) 18 Contractual services (51000) ... 78,000 ................ (re. $69,000) 19 Equipment (56000) ... 108,000 .......................... (re. $56,000) 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 21 For services and expenses of the bus safety program (54211). 22 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 7,032,000 ..... (re. $1,694,000) 23 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 934,000 ..... (re. $192,000) 24 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 30,000 ............... (re. $8,000) 25 Travel (54000) ... 498,000 ............................ (re. $190,000) 26 Equipment (56000) ... 108,000 .......................... (re. $47,000) 27 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 28 For services and expenses of the bus safety program (54211). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 7,032,000 ..... (re. $1,332,000) 30 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 934,000 ..... (re. $254,000) 31 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 30,000 .............. (re. $15,000) 32 Travel (54000) ... 498,000 ............................ (re. $304,000) 33 Contractual services (51000) ... 78,000 ................ (re. $41,000) 34 Equipment (56000) ... 108,000 .......................... (re. $73,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 36 For services and expenses of the bus safety program (54211). 37 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 7,032,000 ..... (re. $1,908,000) 38 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 934,000 ..... (re. $418,000) 39 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 30,000 ............... (re. $5,000) 40 Travel (54000) ... 498,000 ............................ (re. $319,000) 41 Contractual services (51000) ... 78,000 ................ (re. $67,000) 42 Equipment (56000) ... 108,000 .......................... (re. $68,000) 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 44 For services and expenses of the bus safety program (54211). 45 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 7,032,000 ..... (re. $1,679,000) 789 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 934,000 ...... (re. $53,000) 2 Travel (54000) ... 498,000 ............................ (re. $262,000) 3 Contractual services (51000) ... 78,000 ................ (re. $15,000) 4 Equipment (56000) ... 108,000 .......................... (re. $20,000) 5 MOTOR CARRIER SAFETY PROGRAM 6 General Fund 7 State Purposes Account - 10050 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 9 For services and expenses of the motor carrier safety program. 10 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 11 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 12 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 13 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 14 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 15 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (54213). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,809,000 ..... (re. $2,965,000) 17 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 228,000 ..... (re. $174,000) 18 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 94,000 .............. (re. $86,000) 19 Travel (54000) ... 120,000 ............................ (re. $108,000) 20 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,015,000 .......... (re. $2,803,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 22 For services and expenses of the motor carrier safety program. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 24 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 25 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 26 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 27 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (54213). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,809,000 ..... (re. $2,064,000) 30 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 228,000 ..... (re. $196,000) 31 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 94,000 .............. (re. $84,000) 32 Travel (54000) ... 120,000 ............................. (re. $97,000) 33 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,015,000 .......... (re. $2,266,000) 34 Equipment (56000) ... 18,000 ........................... (re. $14,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 36 For services and expenses of the motor carrier safety program. 37 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 38 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 39 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 40 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 41 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 42 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (54213). 43 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,053,000 ....... (re. $998,000) 44 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 192,000 ..... (re. $152,000) 45 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 94,000 .............. (re. $83,000) 46 Travel (54000) ... 120,000 ............................. (re. $94,000) 47 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,015,000 ............ (re. $759,000) 790 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Equipment (56000) ... 18,000 ............................ (re. $6,000) 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 3 For services and expenses of the motor carrier safety program. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 5 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 6 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 7 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 8 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (54213). 10 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,053,000 ....... (re. $827,000) 11 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 192,000 ..... (re. $138,000) 12 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 94,000 .............. (re. $75,000) 13 Travel (54000) ... 120,000 ............................. (re. $93,000) 14 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,015,000 .......... (re. $1,532,000) 15 Equipment (56000) ... 18,000 ........................... (re. $11,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 17 For services and expenses of the motor carrier safety program. 18 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 19 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 20 fer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 21 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 22 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 23 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (54213). 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,053,000 ..... (re. $1,321,000) 25 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 192,000 ..... (re. $147,000) 26 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 94,000 .............. (re. $77,000) 27 Travel (54000) ... 120,000 ............................. (re. $89,000) 28 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,015,000 .......... (re. $1,577,000) 29 Equipment (56000) ... 18,000 ............................ (re. $9,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 31 For services and expenses of the motor carrier safety program. 32 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 33 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 34 fer Authority as defined in the 2019-20 state fiscal year state 35 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 36 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 37 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (54213). 38 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 4,053,000 ....... (re. $747,000) 39 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 192,000 ...... (re. $15,000) 40 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 94,000 .............. (re. $84,000) 41 Travel (54000) ... 120,000 ............................. (re. $50,000) 42 Contractual services (51000) ... 3,015,000 .......... (re. $1,389,000) 43 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 44 For services and expenses of the motor carrier safety program. 45 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 46 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 47 fer Authority as defined in the 2018-19 state fiscal year state 48 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 791 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 2 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (54213). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 3,377,000 ....... (re. $517,000) 4 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 160,000 ...... (re. $12,000) 5 Contractual services (51000) ... 2,512,000 .......... (re. $1,466,000) 6 OFFICE OF PASSENGER AND FREIGHT TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM 7 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 8 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 9 Federal Aviation Administration Planning Account - 25303 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 11 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 12 freight transportation (54292). 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,378,000 ........... (re. $1,378,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 15 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 16 freight transportation (54292). 17 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,378,000 ........... (re. $1,378,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 19 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 20 freight transportation (54292). 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,378,000 ........... (re. $1,378,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 23 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 24 freight transportation (54292). 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,060,000 ........... (re. $1,060,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 27 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 28 freight transportation (54292). 29 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,060,000 ........... (re. $1,060,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 31 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 32 freight transportation (54292). 33 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,060,000 ........... (re. $1,060,000) 34 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 35 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 36 FTA Program Management Account - 25446 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 38 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 39 freight transportation (54292). 40 Personal service (50000) ... 3,249,000 .............. (re. $2,108,000) 41 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,294,000 ........... (re. $5,289,000) 42 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,061,000 ............... (re. $1,337,000) 792 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Indirect costs (58850) ... 164,000 .................... (re. $103,000) 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 3 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 4 freight transportation (54292). 5 Personal service (50000) ... 3,249,000 .............. (re. $1,509,000) 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,294,000 ........... (re. $5,291,000) 7 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 2,094,000 ................. (re. $986,000) 8 Indirect costs (58850) ... 174,000 ..................... (re. $86,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 10 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 11 freight transportation (54292). 12 Personal service (50000) ... 3,249,000 .............. (re. $3,129,000) 13 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,294,000 ........... (re. $3,881,000) 14 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,876,000 ............... (re. $1,706,000) 15 Indirect costs (58850) ... 160,000 .................... (re. $146,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 17 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 18 freight transportation (54292). 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,072,000 ........... (re. $4,068,000) 20 Indirect costs (58850) ... 123,000 ...................... (re. $1,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 22 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 23 freight transportation (54292). 24 Personal service (50000) ... 2,499,000 .............. (re. $2,320,000) 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,072,000 ........... (re. $4,072,000) 26 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,443,000 ............... (re. $1,328,000) 27 Indirect costs (58850) ... 123,000 .................... (re. $117,000) 28 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 29 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 30 freight transportation (54292). 31 Personal service (50000) ... 2,499,000 .............. (re. $2,499,000) 32 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,072,000 ........... (re. $3,923,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,524,000 ............... (re. $1,524,000) 34 Indirect costs (58850) ... 123,000 .................... (re. $123,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 50, 36 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 37 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 38 freight transportation (54292). 39 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,072,000 ........... (re. $2,185,000) 40 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,529,000 ............... (re. $1,438,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017, as amended by chapter 50, 42 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 43 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 44 freight transportation (54292). 45 Personal service (50000) ... 2,447,000 .............. (re. $1,688,000) 793 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,072,000 ........... (re. $3,376,000) 2 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,467,000 ................. (re. $358,000) 3 Indirect costs (58850) ... 108,000 ..................... (re. $15,000) 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016, as amended by chapter 50, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 6 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 7 freight transportation (54292). 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,072,000 ............. (re. $205,000) 9 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 1,336,000 ................... (re. $2,000) 10 Indirect costs (58850) ... 108,000 ...................... (re. $6,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2015, as amended by chapter 50, 12 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 13 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 14 freight transportation (54292). 15 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,072,000 ............. (re. $196,000) 16 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2014, as amended by chapter 50, 17 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 18 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 19 freight transportation (54292). 20 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,170,000 ........... (re. $1,679,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2013, as amended by chapter 50, 22 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 23 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 24 freight transportation (54292). 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,070,000 ........... (re. $2,549,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2012, as amended by chapter 50, 27 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 28 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 29 freight transportation. 30 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 31 Interchange and Transfer Authority, the IT Interchange and Transfer 32 Authority, and the Call Center Interchange and Transfer Authority as 33 defined in the 2012-13 state fiscal year state operations appropri- 34 ation for the budget division program of the division of the budget, 35 are deemed fully incorporated herein and a part of this appropri- 36 ation as if fully stated (54292). 37 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 3,374,000 ........... (re. $3,102,000) 38 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 39 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 40 Motor Carrier Safety Account - 25397 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 42 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 43 freight transportation (54292). 44 Personal service (50000) ... 13,664,000 ............ (re. $13,129,000) 45 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,825,000 ........... (re. $5,823,000) 794 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 8,668,000 ............... (re. $8,028,000) 2 Indirect costs (58850) ... 688,000 .................... (re. $641,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 4 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 5 freight transportation (54292). 6 Personal service (50000) ... 13,664,000 ............ (re. $13,664,000) 7 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,825,000 ........... (re. $5,227,000) 8 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 8,807,000 ............... (re. $8,574,000) 9 Indirect costs (58850) ... 729,000 .................... (re. $710,000) 10 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 11 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 12 freight transportation (54292). 13 Personal service (50000) ... 13,664,000 ............. (re. $9,657,000) 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 5,825,000 ........... (re. $3,737,000) 15 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 7,887,000 ............... (re. $6,159,000) 16 Indirect costs (58850) ... 576,000 .................... (re. $435,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 18 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 19 freight transportation (54292). 20 Personal service (50000) ... 10,510,000 ............ (re. $10,113,000) 21 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,480,000 ........... (re. $3,379,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,066,000 ............... (re. $5,048,000) 23 Indirect costs (58850) ... 443,000 .................... (re. $370,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 25 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 26 freight transportation (54292). 27 Personal service (50000) ... 10,510,000 ................. (re. $4,000) 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,480,000 ........... (re. $3,414,000) 29 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,066,000 .................. (re. $72,000) 30 Indirect costs (58850) ... 514,000 ..................... (re. $67,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 32 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 33 freight transportation (54292). 34 Personal service (50000) ... 10,510,000 ............. (re. $7,626,000) 35 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,480,000 ........... (re. $3,180,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 6,407,000 ............... (re. $4,642,000) 37 Indirect costs (58850) ... 514,000 .................... (re. $372,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 50, 39 section 1, of the laws of 2019: 40 For services and expenses related to the office of passenger and 41 freight transportation (54292). 42 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 4,480,000 ........... (re. $4,026,000) 43 Special Revenue Funds - Other 44 Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Fund 45 Metropolitan Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Account - 21402 795 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 2 For services and expenses related to the administration of the mass 3 transportation operating assistance program including bus 4 inspections primarily within the metropolitan commuter transporta- 5 tion district. Provided, however, notwithstanding any other 6 provision of law, $100,000 of this appropriation shall be made 7 available for contractual services for the purpose of auditing and 8 examining the accounts, books, records, documents, and papers of 9 transportation operators receiving mass transportation operating 10 assistance payments serving primarily within the metropolitan commu- 11 ter transportation district when the commissioner of transportation 12 deems such audits necessary. 13 Such contracts may also include, but not be limited to, recommenda- 14 tions to achieve economies and efficiencies in the state transporta- 15 tion operating assistance program (54292). 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,857,000 ..... (re. $1,691,000) 17 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 411,000 ..... (re. $107,000) 18 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 32,000 ............... (re. $3,000) 19 Travel (54000) ... 204,000 ............................ (re. $166,000) 20 Contractual services (51000) ... 211,000 .............. (re. $211,000) 21 Equipment (56000) ... 44,000 ........................... (re. $44,000) 22 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,151,000 ............... (re. $1,190,000) 23 Indirect costs (58800) ... 102,000 ..................... (re. $62,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 25 For services and expenses related to the administration of the mass 26 transportation operating assistance program including bus 27 inspections primarily within the metropolitan commuter transporta- 28 tion district. Provided, however, notwithstanding any other 29 provision of law, $100,000 of this appropriation shall be made 30 available for contractual services for the purpose of auditing and 31 examining the accounts, books, records, documents, and papers of 32 transportation operators receiving mass transportation operating 33 assistance payments serving primarily within the metropolitan commu- 34 ter transportation district when the commissioner of transportation 35 deems such audits necessary. 36 Such contracts may also include, but not be limited to, recommenda- 37 tions to achieve economies and efficiencies in the state transporta- 38 tion operating assistance program (54292). 39 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,857,000 ....... (re. $742,000) 40 Travel (54000) ... 204,000 ............................. (re. $94,000) 41 Contractual services (51000) ... 211,000 .............. (re. $205,000) 42 Equipment (56000) ... 44,000 ........................... (re. $32,000) 43 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,192,000 ................. (re. $500,000) 44 Indirect costs (58800) ... 102,000 ..................... (re. $33,000) 45 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 46 For services and expenses related to the administration of the mass 47 transportation operating assistance program including bus 48 inspections primarily within the metropolitan commuter transporta- 49 tion district. Provided, however, notwithstanding any other 50 provision of law, $100,000 of this appropriation shall be made 796 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 available for contractual services for the purpose of auditing and 2 examining the accounts, books, records, documents, and papers of 3 transportation operators receiving mass transportation operating 4 assistance payments serving primarily within the metropolitan commu- 5 ter transportation district when the commissioner of transportation 6 deems such audits necessary. 7 Such contracts may also include, but not be limited to, recommenda- 8 tions to achieve economies and efficiencies in the state transporta- 9 tion operating assistance program (54292). 10 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,857,000 ..... (re. $1,088,000) 11 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 32,000 ............... (re. $8,000) 12 Travel (54000) ... 204,000 ............................. (re. $72,000) 13 Contractual services (51000) ... 211,000 .............. (re. $190,000) 14 Equipment (56000) ... 44,000 ........................... (re. $11,000) 15 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,828,000 ................. (re. $437,000) 16 Indirect costs (58800) ... 81,000 ...................... (re. $14,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 18 For services and expenses related to the administration of the mass 19 transportation operating assistance program including bus 20 inspections primarily within the metropolitan commuter transporta- 21 tion district. Provided, however, notwithstanding any other 22 provision of law, $100,000 of this appropriation shall be made 23 available for contractual services for the purpose of auditing and 24 examining the accounts, books, records, documents, and papers of 25 transportation operators receiving mass transportation operating 26 assistance payments serving primarily within the metropolitan commu- 27 ter transportation district when the commissioner of transportation 28 deems such audits necessary. 29 Such contracts may also include, but not be limited to, recommenda- 30 tions to achieve economies and efficiencies in the state transporta- 31 tion operating assistance program (54292). 32 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,857,000 ..... (re. $1,022,000) 33 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 32,000 .............. (re. $16,000) 34 Travel (54000) ... 204,000 ............................ (re. $102,000) 35 Contractual services (51000) ... 211,000 .............. (re. $205,000) 36 Equipment (56000) ... 44,000 ........................... (re. $22,000) 37 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,792,000 ................. (re. $396,000) 38 Indirect costs (58800) ... 81,000 ...................... (re. $17,000) 39 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 40 For services and expenses related to the administration of the mass 41 transportation operating assistance program including bus 42 inspections primarily within the metropolitan commuter transporta- 43 tion district. Provided, however, notwithstanding any other 44 provision of law, $100,000 of this appropriation shall be made 45 available for contractual services for the purpose of auditing and 46 examining the accounts, books, records, documents, and papers of 47 transportation operators receiving mass transportation operating 48 assistance payments serving primarily within the metropolitan commu- 49 ter transportation district when the commissioner of transportation 50 deems such audits necessary. 797 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Such contracts may also include, but not be limited to, recommenda- 2 tions to achieve economies and efficiencies in the state transporta- 3 tion operating assistance program (54292). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,857,000 ..... (re. $2,025,000) 5 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 411,000 ...... (re. $62,000) 6 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 32,000 .............. (re. $21,000) 7 Travel (54000) ... 204,000 ............................ (re. $101,000) 8 Contractual services (51000) ... 211,000 .............. (re. $210,000) 9 Equipment (56000) ... 44,000 ........................... (re. $31,000) 10 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 1,783,000 ............... (re. $1,069,000) 11 Indirect costs (58800) ... 98,000 ...................... (re. $65,000) 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 13 For services and expenses related to the administration of the mass 14 transportation operating assistance program including bus 15 inspections primarily within the metropolitan commuter transporta- 16 tion district. Provided, however, notwithstanding any other 17 provision of law, $100,000 of this appropriation shall be made 18 available for contractual services for the purpose of auditing and 19 examining the accounts, books, records, documents, and papers of 20 transportation operators receiving mass transportation operating 21 assistance payments serving primarily within the metropolitan commu- 22 ter transportation district when the commissioner of transportation 23 deems such audits necessary. 24 Such contracts may also include, but not be limited to, recommenda- 25 tions to achieve economies and efficiencies in the state transporta- 26 tion operating assistance program (54292). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 2,857,000 ....... (re. $855,000) 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 411,000 ...... (re. $24,000) 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 32,000 .............. (re. $11,000) 30 Travel (54000) ... 204,000 ............................ (re. $113,000) 31 Contractual services (51000) ... 211,000 .............. (re. $114,000) 32 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 2,087,000 ................. (re. $566,000) 33 Indirect costs (58800) ... 113,000 ..................... (re. $31,000) 34 Special Revenue Funds - Other 35 Mass Transportation Operating Assistance Fund 36 Public Transportation Systems Operating Assistance Account - 21401 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 38 For services and expenses related to the administration of the mass 39 transportation operating assistance program including bus 40 inspections primarily outside of the metropolitan commuter transpor- 41 tation district. Provided, however, notwithstanding any other 42 provision of law, $100,000 of this appropriation shall be made 43 avail- able for contractual services for the purpose of auditing and 44 examining the accounts, books, records, documents, and papers of 45 transportation operators receiving mass transportation operating 46 assistance payments serving primarily outside of the metropolitan 47 commuter transportation district when the commissioner of transpor- 48 tation deems such audits necessary. 798 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Such contracts may also include, but not be limited to, recommenda- 2 tions to achieve economies and efficiencies in the state transporta- 3 tion operating assistance program (54292). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 797,000 ......... (re. $487,000) 5 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 18,000 ....... (re. $17,000) 6 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 6,000 ................ (re. $6,000) 7 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 .............................. (re. $12,000) 8 Contractual services (51000) ... 210,000 .............. (re. $210,000) 9 Equipment (56000) ... 6,000 ............................. (re. $6,000) 10 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 537,000 ................... (re. $331,000) 11 Indirect costs (58800) ... 26,000 ...................... (re. $17,000) 12 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 13 For services and expenses related to the administration of the mass 14 transportation operating assistance program including bus 15 inspections primarily outside of the metropolitan commuter transpor- 16 tation district. Provided, however, notwithstanding any other 17 provision of law, $100,000 of this appropriation shall be made 18 available for contractual services for the purpose of auditing and 19 examining the accounts, books, records, documents, and papers of 20 transportation operators receiving mass transportation operating 21 assistance payments serving primarily outside of the metropolitan 22 commuter transportation district when the commissioner of transpor- 23 tation deems such audits necessary. 24 Such contracts may also include, but not be limited to, recommenda- 25 tions to achieve economies and efficiencies in the state transporta- 26 tion operating assistance program (54292). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 797,000 ......... (re. $214,000) 28 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 18,000 ....... (re. $17,000) 29 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 6,000 ................ (re. $6,000) 30 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 .............................. (re. $12,000) 31 Contractual services (51000) ... 210,000 .............. (re. $208,000) 32 Equipment (56000) ... 6,000 ............................. (re. $6,000) 33 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 547,000 ................... (re. $156,000) 34 Indirect costs (58800) ... 26,000 ...................... (re. $10,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 36 For services and expenses related to the administration of the mass 37 transportation operating assistance program including bus 38 inspections primarily outside of the metropolitan commuter transpor- 39 tation district. Provided, however, notwithstanding any other 40 provision of law, $100,000 of this appropriation shall be made 41 available for contractual services for the purpose of auditing and 42 examining the accounts, books, records, documents, and papers of 43 transportation operators receiving mass transportation operating 44 assistance payments serving primarily outside of the metropolitan 45 commuter transportation district when the commissioner of transpor- 46 tation deems such audits necessary. 47 Such contracts may also include, but not be limited to, recommenda- 48 tions to achieve economies and efficiencies in the state transporta- 49 tion operating assistance program (54292). 50 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 797,000 ......... (re. $291,000) 799 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 18,000 ....... (re. $16,000) 2 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 6,000 ................ (re. $6,000) 3 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 .............................. (re. $11,000) 4 Contractual services (51000) ... 210,000 .............. (re. $210,000) 5 Equipment (56000) ... 6,000 ............................. (re. $6,000) 6 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 510,000 ................... (re. $185,000) 7 Indirect costs (58800) ... 23,000 ....................... (re. $7,000) 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 9 For services and expenses related to the administration of the mass 10 transportation operating assistance program including bus 11 inspections primarily outside of the metropolitan commuter transpor- 12 tation district. Provided, however, notwithstanding any other 13 provision of law, $100,000 of this appropriation shall be made 14 available for contractual services for the purpose of auditing and 15 examining the accounts, books, records, documents, and papers of 16 transportation operators receiving mass transportation operating 17 assistance payments serving primarily outside of the metropolitan 18 commuter transportation district when the commissioner of transpor- 19 tation deems such audits necessary. 20 Such contracts may also include, but not be limited to, recommenda- 21 tions to achieve economies and efficiencies in the state transporta- 22 tion operating assistance program (54292). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 797,000 ......... (re. $423,000) 24 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 18,000 ....... (re. $17,000) 25 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 6,000 ................ (re. $5,000) 26 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 ............................... (re. $9,000) 27 Contractual services (51000) ... 210,000 .............. (re. $209,000) 28 Equipment (56000) ... 6,000 ............................. (re. $6,000) 29 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 500,000 ................... (re. $275,000) 30 Indirect costs (58800) ... 23,000 ...................... (re. $12,000) 31 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 32 For services and expenses related to the administration of the mass 33 transportation operating assistance program including bus 34 inspections primarily outside of the metropolitan commuter transpor- 35 tation district. Provided, however, notwithstanding any other 36 provision of law, $100,000 of this appropriation shall be made 37 available for contractual services for the purpose of auditing and 38 examining the accounts, books, records, documents, and papers of 39 transportation operators receiving mass transportation operating 40 assistance payments serving primarily outside of the metropolitan 41 commuter transportation district when the commissioner of transpor- 42 tation deems such audits necessary. 43 Such contracts may also include, but not be limited to, recommenda- 44 tions to achieve economies and efficiencies in the state transporta- 45 tion operating assistance program (54292). 46 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 797,000 ......... (re. $486,000) 47 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 18,000 ....... (re. $17,000) 48 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 6,000 ................ (re. $6,000) 49 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 .............................. (re. $12,000) 50 Contractual services (51000) ... 210,000 .............. (re. $210,000) 800 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Equipment (56000) ... 6,000 ............................. (re. $5,000) 2 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 498,000 ................... (re. $306,000) 3 Indirect costs (58800) ... 28,000 ...................... (re. $19,000) 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 5 For services and expenses related to the administration of the mass 6 transportation operating assistance program including bus 7 inspections primarily outside of the metropolitan commuter transpor- 8 tation district. Provided, however, notwithstanding any other 9 provision of law, $100,000 of this appropriation shall be made 10 available for contractual services for the purpose of auditing and 11 examining the accounts, books, records, documents, and papers of 12 transportation operators receiving mass transportation operating 13 assistance payments serving primarily outside of the metropolitan 14 commuter transportation district when the commissioner of transpor- 15 tation deems such audits necessary. 16 Such contracts may also include, but not be limited to, recommenda- 17 tions to achieve economies and efficiencies in the state transporta- 18 tion operating assistance program (54292). 19 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 797,000 ......... (re. $218,000) 20 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 18,000 ....... (re. $17,000) 21 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 6,000 ................ (re. $6,000) 22 Travel (54000) ... 12,000 .............................. (re. $12,000) 23 Contractual services (51000) ... 210,000 .............. (re. $210,000) 24 Equipment (56000) ... 6,000 ............................. (re. $6,000) 25 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 521,000 ................... (re. $153,000) 26 Indirect costs (58800) ... 28,000 ....................... (re. $7,000) 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 29 Transportation Aviation Account - 22165 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 31 For payment of expenses related to operation of Stewart and Republic 32 airports (54292). 33 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 160,000 ......... (re. $160,000) 34 Travel (54000) ... 11,000 ............................... (re. $1,000) 35 Contractual services (51000) ... 5,100,000 .......... (re. $4,458,000) 36 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 106,000 ................... (re. $106,000) 37 Indirect costs (58800) ... 5,000 ........................ (re. $5,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 39 For payment of expenses related to operation of Stewart and Republic 40 airports (54292). 41 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 160,000 ......... (re. $130,000) 42 Travel (54000) ... 11,000 ............................... (re. $5,000) 43 Contractual services (51000) ... 5,100,000 ............ (re. $633,000) 44 Fringe benefits (60000) ... 94,000 ..................... (re. $78,000) 45 Indirect costs (58800) ... 5,000 ........................ (re. $4,000) 46 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 801 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment of expenses related to operation of Stewart and Republic 2 airports (54292). 3 Travel (54000) ... 11,000 .............................. (re. $10,000) 4 Contractual services (51000) ... 5,100,000 .......... (re. $1,365,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 6 For payment of expenses related to operation of Stewart and Republic 7 airports (54292). 8 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,700,000 .......... (re. $1,973,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 10 For payment of expenses related to operation of Stewart and Republic 11 airports (54292). 12 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,700,000 ............ (re. $481,000) 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 14 For payment of expenses related to operation of Stewart and Republic 15 airports (54292). 16 Contractual services (51000) ... 4,700,000 ............ (re. $163,000) 17 OPERATIONS PROGRAM 18 General Fund 19 State Purposes Account - 10050 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 For the payment of costs of snow and ice control on state highways and 22 preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as defined in 23 paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the highway law. 24 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 25 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 26 fer Authority as defined in the 2024-25 state fiscal year state 27 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 28 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 29 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (54291). 30 Personal service--regular (50100) .................................... 31 156,742,000 ...................................... (re. $67,185,000) 32 Temporary service (50200) ... 4,926,000 ............. (re. $3,927,000) 33 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ................................ 34 41,753,000 ....................................... (re. $26,527,000) 35 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 151,965,000 .... (re. $135,480,000) 36 Travel (54000) ... 112,000 ............................. (re. $28,000) 37 Contractual services (51000) ... 67,323,000 ........ (re. $52,547,000) 38 Equipment (56000) ... 600,000 ......................... (re. $373,000) 39 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 40 For the payment of costs of snow and ice control on state highways and 41 preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as defined in 42 paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the highway law. 43 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 44 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 45 fer Authority as defined in the 2023-24 state fiscal year state 802 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 2 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 3 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (54291). 4 Personal service--regular (50100) .................................... 5 152,177,000 .......................................... (re. $13,000) 6 Temporary service (50200) ... 4,783,000 ............. (re. $1,945,000) 7 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ................................ 8 40,537,000 ........................................ (re. $7,602,000) 9 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 151,965,000 ..... (re. $54,777,000) 10 Travel (54000) ... 112,000 ............................. (re. $20,000) 11 Contractual services (51000) ... 67,323,000 ......... (re. $8,556,000) 12 Equipment (56000) ... 600,000 .......................... (re. $57,000) 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 14 For the payment of costs of snow and ice control on state highways and 15 preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as defined in 16 paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the highway law. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 18 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 19 fer Authority as defined in the 2022-23 state fiscal year state 20 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 21 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 22 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (54291). 23 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 130,511,000 ...... (re. $36,000) 24 Temporary service (50200) ... 4,102,000 ............. (re. $1,675,000) 25 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ................................ 26 34,765,000 ........................................ (re. $7,484,000) 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 137,951,000 ..... (re. $25,060,000) 28 Contractual services (51000) ... 61,400,000 ......... (re. $4,169,000) 29 Equipment (56000) ... 547,000 ......................... (re. $454,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 31 For the payment of costs of snow and ice control on state highways and 32 preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as defined in 33 paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the highway law. 34 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 35 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 36 fer Authority as defined in the 2021-22 state fiscal year state 37 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 38 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 39 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (54291). 40 Personal service--regular (50100) .................................... 41 124,781,000 ....................................... (re. $5,903,000) 42 Temporary service (50200) ... 4,102,000 ............. (re. $2,411,000) 43 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ................................ 44 34,765,000 ....................................... (re. $11,978,000) 45 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 137,951,000 ..... (re. $28,195,000) 46 Travel (54000) ... 102,000 ............................. (re. $25,000) 47 Contractual services (51000) ... 61,400,000 ......... (re. $6,274,000) 48 Equipment (56000) ... 547,000 ......................... (re. $268,000) 49 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 803 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 For the payment of costs of snow and ice control on state highways and 2 preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as defined in 3 paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the highway law. 4 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 5 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 6 fer Authority as defined in the 2020-21 state fiscal year state 7 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 8 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 9 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (54291). 10 Personal service--regular (50100) .................................... 11 124,781,000 ...................................... (re. $15,876,000) 12 Temporary service (50200) ... 4,102,000 ............. (re. $1,037,000) 13 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ................................ 14 34,765,000 ....................................... (re. $12,079,000) 15 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 137,951,000 ..... (re. $28,638,000) 16 Travel (54000) ... 102,000 ............................. (re. $95,000) 17 Contractual services (51000) ... 61,400,000 ........ (re. $30,658,000) 18 Equipment (56000) ... 547,000 ......................... (re. $317,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 20 For the payment of costs of snow and ice control on state highways and 21 preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as defined in 22 paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the highway law. 23 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 24 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 25 fer Authority as defined in the 2019-20 state fiscal year state 26 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 27 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 28 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (54291). 29 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 124,781,000 ... (re. $5,953,000) 30 Temporary service (50200) ... 4,102,000 ............. (re. $1,616,000) 31 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ................................ 32 34,765,000 ....................................... (re. $11,023,000) 33 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 137,951,000 ...... (re. $4,002,000) 34 Contractual services (51000) ... 61,400,000 ........... (re. $413,000) 35 Equipment (56000) ... 547,000 ........................... (re. $2,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 37 For the payment of costs of snow and ice control on state highways and 38 preventive maintenance on state roads and bridges as defined in 39 paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 10-d of the highway law. 40 Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the OGS 41 Interchange and Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange and Trans- 42 fer Authority as defined in the 2018-19 state fiscal year state 43 operations appropriation for the budget division program of the 44 division of the budget, are deemed fully incorporated herein and a 45 part of this appropriation as if fully stated (54291). 46 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 120,014,000 ... (re. $3,973,000) 47 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 98,576,000 ....... (re. $2,470,000) 48 Contractual services (51000) ... 48,116,000 ........... (re. $113,000) 49 Special Revenue Funds - Other 804 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 2 Highway Construction and Maintenance Safety Education Account - 22089 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 4 For services and expenses related to the operations program (54291). 5 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,000 ................ (re. $1,000) 6 Contractual services (51000) ... 208,000 .............. (re. $208,000) 7 Equipment (56000) ... 1,000 ............................. (re. $1,000) 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 9 For services and expenses related to the operations program (54291). 10 Contractual services (51000) ... 208,000 .............. (re. $208,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 12 For services and expenses related to the operations program (54291). 13 Contractual services (51000) ... 208,000 .............. (re. $208,000) 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 15 For services and expenses related to the operations program (54291). 16 Contractual services (51000) ... 208,000 .............. (re. $208,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 18 For services and expenses related to the operations program (54291). 19 Contractual services (51000) ... 208,000 .............. (re. $208,000) 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 21 For services and expenses related to the operations program (54291). 22 Contractual services (51000) ... 208,000 .............. (re. $197,000) 23 RAIL SAFETY PROGRAM 24 General Fund 25 State Purposes Account - 10050 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 27 For services and expenses of the rail safety program (54215). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,467,000 ..... (re. $1,001,000) 29 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 92,000 ....... (re. $65,000) 30 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 33,000 .............. (re. $30,000) 31 Travel (54000) ... 136,000 ............................ (re. $103,000) 32 Contractual services (51000) ... 11,000 ................ (re. $11,000) 33 Equipment (56000) ... 13,000 ........................... (re. $13,000) 34 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 35 For services and expenses of the rail safety program (54215). 36 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,467,000 ....... (re. $685,000) 37 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 92,000 ....... (re. $43,000) 38 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 33,000 .............. (re. $18,000) 39 Travel (54000) ... 136,000 ............................. (re. $82,000) 40 Contractual services (51000) ... 11,000 ................ (re. $11,000) 41 Equipment (56000) ... 13,000 ........................... (re. $13,000) 805 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 2 For services and expenses of the rail safety program (54215). 3 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 797,000 ......... (re. $110,000) 4 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 18,000 .............. (re. $11,000) 5 Travel (54000) ... 74,000 .............................. (re. $20,000) 6 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,000 .................. (re. $2,000) 7 Equipment (56000) ... 7,000 ............................. (re. $7,000) 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 9 For services and expenses of the rail safety program (54215). 10 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 797,000 ......... (re. $110,000) 11 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 18,000 ............... (re. $9,000) 12 Travel (54000) ... 74,000 .............................. (re. $37,000) 13 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,000 .................. (re. $5,000) 14 Equipment (56000) ... 7,000 ............................. (re. $7,000) 15 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 16 For services and expenses of the rail safety program (54215). 17 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 797,000 ......... (re. $144,000) 18 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 50,000 ....... (re. $12,000) 19 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 18,000 .............. (re. $11,000) 20 Travel (54000) ... 74,000 .............................. (re. $37,000) 21 Contractual services (51000) ... 6,000 .................. (re. $5,000) 22 Equipment (56000) ... 7,000 ............................. (re. $7,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 24 For services and expenses of the rail safety program (54215). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 797,000 ......... (re. $178,000) 26 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ... 50,000 ....... (re. $11,000) 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 18,000 ............... (re. $8,000) 28 Travel (54000) ... 74,000 ............................... (re. $1,000) 29 Equipment (56000) ... 7,000 ............................. (re. $7,000) 806 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 11,118,000 500,000 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 2,221,000 4,726,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 900,000 1,369,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 14,239,000 6,595,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ....................................... 2,087,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 administration program. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 19 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 20 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 21 appropriation for the budget division 22 program of the division of the budget, are 23 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully 25 stated (81001). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 543,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 10,000 28 Travel (54000) .................................... 14,000 29 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 601,000 30 Equipment (56000) ................................. 19,000 31 -------------- 32 Program account subtotal ................... 1,187,000 33 -------------- 34 Special Revenue Funds - Other 35 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 36 Veterans' Remembrance and Cemetery Maintenance and Oper- 37 ation Fund - 20201 38 For services and expenses related to veter- 39 ans' cemetery operations (54648). 40 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 900,000 41 -------------- 807 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Program account subtotal ..................... 900,000 2 -------------- 3 VETERANS' BENEFITS ADVISING PROGRAM .......................... 9,931,000 4 -------------- 5 General Fund 6 State Purposes Account - 10050 7 For services and expenses related to the 8 veterans' benefits advising program. 9 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 10 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 11 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 12 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 13 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 14 appropriation for the budget division 15 program of the division of the budget, are 16 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 17 part of this appropriation as if fully 18 stated (54607). 19 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 8,949,000 20 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 23,000 21 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 63,000 22 Travel (54000) ................................... 104,000 23 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 352,000 24 Equipment (56000) ................................ 440,000 25 -------------- 26 VETERANS' EDUCATION PROGRAM .................................. 2,221,000 27 -------------- 28 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 29 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 30 Federal Operating Grant Account - 25386 31 For services and expenses related to the 32 veterans' education program (54610). 33 Personal service (50000) ....................... 1,301,000 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 208,000 35 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 615,000 36 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 97,000 37 -------------- 808 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 2 General Fund 3 State Purposes Account - 10050 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2011, as amended by chapter 50, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2014: 6 For services and expenses related to a federally funded state veter- 7 ans' cemetery, pursuant to chapter 57 of the laws of 2013, and 8 pursuant to a project approved by the United States department of 9 veterans' affairs (54611) ... 500,000 ............... (re. $500,000) 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Combined Expendable Trust Fund 12 Veterans' Remembrance and Cemetery Maintenance and Operation Fund - 13 20201 14 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 15 For services and expenses related to veterans' cemetery operations 16 (54648). 17 Contractual services (51000) ... 900,000 .............. (re. $785,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 19 For services and expenses related to veterans' cemetery operations 20 (54648). 21 Contractual services (51000) ... 900,000 .............. (re. $584,000) 22 VETERANS' EDUCATION PROGRAM 23 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 24 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 25 Federal Operating Grant Account - 25386 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 27 For services and expenses related to the veterans' education program 28 (54610). 29 Personal service (50000) ... 1,301,000 .............. (re. $1,301,000) 30 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 208,000 ............... (re. $201,000) 31 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 615,000 ................... (re. $615,000) 32 Indirect costs (58850) ... 97,000 ...................... (re. $97,000) 33 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 34 For services and expenses related to the veterans' education program 35 (54610). 36 Personal service (50000) ... 1,261,000 ................ (re. $585,000) 37 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 208,000 ............... (re. $127,000) 38 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 588,000 ................... (re. $177,000) 39 Indirect costs (58850) ... 97,000 ...................... (re. $18,000) 40 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 41 For services and expenses related to the veterans' education program 42 (54610). 809 12550-10-5 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS' SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ... 1,239,000 ................ (re. $513,000) 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 208,000 ............... (re. $143,000) 3 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 574,000 .................... (re. $97,000) 4 Indirect costs (58850) ... 97,000 ....................... (re. $2,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 6 For services and expenses related to the veterans' education program 7 (54610). 8 Personal service (50000) ... 1,199,000 ................ (re. $549,000) 9 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 208,000 ............... (re. $128,000) 10 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 549,000 ................... (re. $140,000) 11 Indirect costs (58850) ... 69,000 ...................... (re. $33,000) 810 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 2,545,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 8,851,000 20,180,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 14,908,000 0 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 26,304,000 20,180,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ...................................... 22,990,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses related to the 15 storage of sexual offense evidence 16 collection kits. 17 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 18 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 19 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 20 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 21 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 22 appropriation for the budget division 23 program of the division of the budget, are 24 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 25 part of this appropriation as if fully 26 stated (19921). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 565,000 28 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 50,000 29 Travel (54000) .................................... 20,000 30 Contractual services (51000) ................... 1,610,000 31 Equipment (56000) ................................ 300,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal ................... 2,545,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 36 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 37 Crime Victims Assistance Account - 25370 38 For services and expenses related to crime 39 victims assistance (19914). 40 Personal service (50000) ....................... 3,298,000 41 Nonpersonal service (57050) .................... 1,468,000 42 -------------- 811 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Program account subtotal ................... 4,766,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 4 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 5 Crime Victims - Compensation Account - 25370 6 For services and expenses related to crime 7 victims compensation (19917). 8 Personal service (50000) ......................... 496,000 9 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 275,000 10 -------------- 11 Program account subtotal ..................... 771,000 12 -------------- 13 Special Revenue Funds - Other 14 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 15 CVB-Conference Fees Account - 22050 16 For services and expenses related to the 17 administration program (81001). 18 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 15,000 19 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 20 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 80,000 21 -------------- 22 Program account subtotal ..................... 105,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Other 25 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 26 Criminal Justice Improvement Account - 21945 27 For services and expenses related to the 28 administration program. 29 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 30 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 31 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 32 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 33 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 34 appropriation for the budget division 35 program of the division of the budget, are 36 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 37 part of this appropriation as if fully 38 stated (81001). 39 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 4,666,000 40 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 70,000 41 Travel (54000) .................................... 80,000 42 Contractual services (51000) ................... 5,690,000 43 Equipment (56000) ................................. 40,000 812 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................ 3,125,000 2 Indirect costs (58800) ........................... 193,000 3 -------------- 4 Program account subtotal .................. 13,864,000 5 -------------- 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other 7 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 8 OVS Restitution Account - 22134 9 For services and expenses related to the 10 administration program. 11 Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the 12 contrary, the amounts appropriated herein 13 shall be net of refunds, rebates, 14 reimbursements, credits, repayments, 15 and/or disallowance. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 19 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 20 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 21 appropriation for the budget division 22 program of the division of the budget, are 23 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully 25 stated (81001). 26 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 611,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 250,000 28 Travel (54000) .................................... 28,000 29 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 40,000 30 Equipment (56000) ................................. 10,000 31 -------------- 32 Program account subtotal ..................... 939,000 33 -------------- 34 VICTIM AND WITNESS ASSISTANCE PROGRAM ........................ 3,314,000 35 -------------- 36 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 37 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 38 Crime Victims Assistance Account - 25370 39 For victim and witness assistance in accord- 40 ance with the federal crime control act of 41 1984, distributed pursuant to a plan 42 prepared by the director of the office of 43 victim services and approved by the direc- 44 tor of the budget, or distributed through 45 a competitive process. A portion of these 46 funds may be transferred, suballocated, or 813 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 otherwise made available to other state 2 agencies (19906). 3 Personal service (50000) ....................... 1,730,000 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) ...................... 940,000 5 Fringe benefits (60090) .......................... 614,000 6 Indirect costs (58850) ............................ 30,000 7 -------------- 814 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 4 Crime Victims Assistance Account - 25370 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to crime victims assistance (19914). 7 Personal service (50000) ... 3,298,000 .............. (re. $3,298,000) 8 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,468,000 ........... (re. $1,468,000) 9 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 10 For services and expenses related to crime victims assistance (19914). 11 Personal service (50000) ... 3,219,000 .............. (re. $2,895,000) 12 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,468,000 ........... (re. $1,468,000) 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 14 For services and expenses related to crime victims assistance (19914). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 3,190,000 ................. (re. $17,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,468,000 ........... (re. $1,468,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 18 For services and expenses related to crime victims assistance (19914). 19 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,768,000 ........... (re. $1,768,000) 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 21 For services and expenses related to crime victims assistance (19914). 22 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 1,768,000 ............. (re. $274,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 24 For services and expenses related to crime victims assistance (19914). 25 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 768,000 ............... (re. $374,000) 26 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 27 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 28 Crime Victims - Compensation Account - 25370 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 30 For services and expenses related to crime victims compensation 31 (19917). 32 Personal service (50000) ... 496,000 .................. (re. $496,000) 33 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 275,000 ............... (re. $275,000) 34 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 35 For services and expenses related to crime victims compensation 36 (19917). 37 Personal service (50000) ... 430,000 .................. (re. $430,000) 38 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 275,000 ............... (re. $275,000) 39 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 40 For services and expenses related to crime victims compensation 41 (19917). 815 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service (50000) ... 426,000 ................... (re. $67,000) 2 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 275,000 ............... (re. $275,000) 3 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 4 For services and expenses related to crime victims compensation 5 (19917). 6 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 275,000 ............... (re. $275,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 8 For services and expenses related to crime victims compensation 9 (19917). 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 275,000 ................ (re. $90,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 12 For services and expenses related to crime victims compensation 13 (19917). 14 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 274,000 ................. (re. $1,000) 15 VICTIM AND WITNESS ASSISTANCE PROGRAM 16 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 17 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 18 Crime Victims Assistance Account - 25370 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 20 For victim and witness assistance in accordance with the federal crime 21 control act of 1984, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the 22 director of the office of victim services and approved by the direc- 23 tor of the budget, or distributed through a competitive process. A 24 portion of these funds may be transferred, suballocated, or other- 25 wise made available to other state agencies (19906). 26 Personal service (50000) ... 1,730,000 .............. (re. $1,730,000) 27 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 940,000 ............... (re. $940,000) 28 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 614,000 ................... (re. $614,000) 29 Indirect costs (58850) ... 30,000 ...................... (re. $30,000) 30 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 31 For victim and witness assistance in accordance with the federal crime 32 control act of 1984, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the 33 director of the office of victim services and approved by the direc- 34 tor of the budget, or distributed through a competitive process. A 35 portion of these funds may be transferred, suballocated, or other- 36 wise made available to other state agencies (19906). 37 Personal service (50000) ... 1,687,000 ................ (re. $381,000) 38 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 940,000 ............... (re. $693,000) 39 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 491,000 ................... (re. $161,000) 40 Indirect costs (58850) ... 30,000 ...................... (re. $17,000) 41 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 42 For victim and witness assistance in accordance with the federal crime 43 control act of 1984, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the 44 director of the office of victim services and approved by the direc- 816 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF VICTIM SERVICES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 tor of the budget, or distributed through a competitive process. A 2 portion of these funds may be transferred, suballocated, or other- 3 wise made available to other state agencies (19906). 4 Personal service (50000) ... 1,671,000 ................. (re. $20,000) 5 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 960,000 ............... (re. $226,000) 6 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 460,000 .................... (re. $13,000) 7 Indirect costs (58850) ... 10,000 ....................... (re. $1,000) 8 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 9 For victim and witness assistance in accordance with the federal crime 10 control act of 1984, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the 11 director of the office of victim services and approved by the direc- 12 tor of the budget, or distributed through a competitive process. A 13 portion of these funds may be transferred, suballocated, or other- 14 wise made available to other state agencies (19906). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 1,600,000 ................. (re. $44,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 210,000 ................ (re. $31,000) 17 Fringe benefits (60090) ... 460,000 .................... (re. $46,000) 18 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 19 For victim and witness assistance in accordance with the federal crime 20 control act of 1984, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the 21 director of the office of victim services and approved by the direc- 22 tor of the budget, or distributed through a competitive process. A 23 portion of these funds may be transferred, suballocated, or other- 24 wise made available to other state agencies (19906). 25 Personal service (50000) ... 1,600,000 ................. (re. $11,000) 26 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 27 For victim and witness assistance in accordance with the federal crime 28 control act of 1984, distributed pursuant to a plan prepared by the 29 director of the office of victim services and approved by the direc- 30 tor of the budget, or distributed through a competitive process. A 31 portion of these funds may be transferred, suballocated, or other- 32 wise made available to other state agencies (19906). 33 Personal service (50000) ... 830,000 .................... (re. $8,000) 817 12550-10-5 NEW YORK WATERFRONT COMMISSION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 3,000,000 0 4 Special Revenue - Other............. 1,931,000 0 5 Special Revenue - Federal........... 42,000 0 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 4,973,000 0 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 FORFEITURE PROGRAM .............................................. 42,000 11 -------------- 12 Special Revenue Fund - Federal 13 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 14 Federal Forfeiture Account 15 For services and expenses incurred by the 16 New York Waterfront Commission relating to 17 the joint operation or task forces with 18 the United States Departments of Justice 19 and Homeland Security. 20 Holiday/overtime compensation (53000) ............. 42,000 21 -------------- 22 OPERATIONS PROGRAM ........................................... 3,300,000 23 -------------- 24 General Fund 25 State Purposes Account - 10050 26 For services and expenses relating to 27 support of the New York Waterfront Commis- 28 sion as constituted pursuant to section 6 29 of chapter 882 of the laws of 1953 as 30 amended by Part EEE of chapter 58 of the 31 laws of 2023. All or a portion of the 32 funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 33 cated or transferred to any state depart- 34 ment or agency (81003). 35 Personal service--regular (50100) .............. 2,366,000 36 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............. 84,000 37 Supplies and materials (57000) ................... 157,000 38 Travel (54000) .................................... 63,000 39 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 330,000 40 -------------- 818 12550-10-5 NEW YORK WATERFRONT COMMISSION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Program account subtotal ................... 3,000,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other 4 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 5 Equitable Sharing-NYWC Treasury Account - 22259 6 For services and expenses related to the 7 operations program. A portion of these 8 funds may be suballocated to other state 9 agencies (81003). 10 Equipment (56000) ................................. 75,000 11 Supplies and Materials (57000) .................... 25,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal ..................... 100,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other 16 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 17 Equitable Sharing-NYWC Justice Account - 22260 18 For services and expenses related to the 19 operations program. A portion of these 20 funds may be suballocated to other state 21 agencies (81003). 22 Equipment (56000) ................................. 25,000 23 Supplies and Materials (57000) .................... 25,000 24 -------------- 25 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 26 -------------- 27 Special Revenue Funds - Other 28 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 29 New York Seized Assets Account - 22264 30 For services and expenses related to the 31 operations program. A portion of these 32 funds may be suballocated to other state 33 agencies (81501). 34 Equipment (56000) ................................ 125,000 35 Supplies and Materials (57000) .................... 25,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ..................... 150,000 38 -------------- 39 WATERFRONT EMPLOYERS ASSESSMENT PROGRAM ...................... 1,631,000 40 -------------- 41 Special Revenue Fund - Other 819 12550-10-5 NEW YORK WATERFRONT COMMISSION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 2 Employers Assessment Account 3 For services and expenses relating to the 4 New York Waterfront Commission's assess- 5 ment on waterfront employers and related 6 services in the Port of New York. 7 Personal Service-regular (50100) ............... 1,631,000 8 -------------- 820 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF WELFARE INSPECTOR GENERAL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 1,239,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 150,000 0 5 ---------------- ---------------- 6 All Funds ........................ 1,389,000 0 7 ================ ================ 8 SCHEDULE 9 OFFICE OF WELFARE INSPECTOR GENERAL PROGRAM .................. 1,389,000 10 -------------- 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 For services and expenses associated with 14 the office of the welfare inspector gener- 15 al. 16 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 17 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 18 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 19 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 20 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 21 appropriation for the budget division 22 program of the division of the budget, are 23 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 24 part of this appropriation as if fully 25 stated. 26 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 27 money hereby appropriated may be increased 28 or decreased by transfer with any other 29 appropriation within any other agency 30 (54901). 31 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 827,000 32 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 25,000 33 Travel (54000) .................................... 28,000 34 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 320,000 35 Equipment (56000) ................................. 39,000 36 -------------- 37 Program account subtotal ................... 1,239,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Other 40 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 41 Equitable Sharing-WIG Justice Account - 22227 821 12550-10-5 OFFICE OF WELFARE INSPECTOR GENERAL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For services and expenses associated with 2 the office of the welfare inspector gener- 3 al. 4 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 5 money hereby appropriated may be increased 6 or decreased by transfer with any other 7 appropriation within any other agency 8 (54901). 9 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 10 -------------- 11 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 12 -------------- 13 Special Revenue Funds - Other 14 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 15 Equitable Sharing-WIG Treasury Account - 22228 16 For services and expenses associated with 17 the office of the welfare inspector gener- 18 al. 19 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 20 money hereby appropriated may be increased 21 or decreased by transfer with any other 22 appropriation within any other agency 23 (54901). 24 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 25 -------------- 26 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 27 -------------- 28 Special Revenue Funds - Other 29 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 30 Welfare Inspector General Seized Assets Account - 22216 31 For services and expenses associated with 32 the office of the welfare inspector gener- 33 al. 34 Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 35 money hereby appropriated may be increased 36 or decreased by transfer with any other 37 appropriation within any other agency 38 (54901). 39 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 50,000 40 -------------- 41 Program account subtotal ...................... 50,000 42 -------------- 822 12550-10-5 WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 232,013,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 232,013,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 WORKERS' COMPENSATION PROGRAM .............................. 232,013,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other 11 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 12 Workers' Compensation Account - 21995 13 For services and expenses related to the 14 workers' compensation program. 15 A portion of these funds may be suballocated 16 to the department of law. 17 Up to $4,000,000 of these funds may be used 18 for personal service and nonpersonal 19 service associated with the investigation 20 and prosecution of workers' compensation 21 fraud by the workers' compensation board 22 inspector general. 23 A portion of these funds may be suballocated 24 to the office of addiction services and 25 supports for the opioid tapering pilot 26 project (55203). 27 Personal service--regular (50100) ............ 102,260,000 28 Temporary service (50200) ........................ 173,000 29 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) ............ 402,000 30 Supplies and materials (57000) ................. 3,269,000 31 Travel (54000) ................................. 1,010,000 32 Contractual services (51000) .................. 54,392,000 33 Equipment (56000) .............................. 1,414,000 34 Fringe benefits (60000) ....................... 66,361,000 35 Indirect costs (58800) ......................... 2,411,000 36 -------------- 37 Total amount available ..................... 231,692,000 38 -------------- 39 For suballocation to the department of 40 health for expenses incurred in the devel- 41 opment of inpatient hospital rates for 42 workers' compensation benefit payments 43 (55205). 823 12550-10-5 WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 187,000 2 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 3 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 4 Equipment (56000) .................................. 5,000 5 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 118,000 6 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 5,000 7 -------------- 8 Total amount available ......................... 321,000 9 -------------- 824 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES ADDITIONAL STATEWIDE COUNTER-TERRORISM STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 ADDITIONAL STATEWIDE COUNTER-TERRORISM PROGRAM 2 General Fund 3 State Purposes Account - 10050 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 5 For services and expenses to support additional statewide counterter- 6 rorism efforts. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 7 contrary, funds hereby appropriated may be transferred or suballo- 8 cated to the division of state police and/or the division of mili- 9 tary and naval affairs (79999) ... 3,000,000 ...... (re. $3,000,000) 825 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES CORRECTIONAL FACILITY EMERGENCY RESPONSE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 All Funds 2 Notwithstanding sections 134 and 135 of the civil service 3 law and any other provision of law to the contrary and 4 subject to a plan or plans submitted by the Commissioner 5 of the Department of Corrections and Community Super- 6 vision and approved by the Director of the Budget, for 7 payment of services and expenses related to stabilizing 8 the correctional system, including, but not limited to, 9 costs incurred by the state as a result of, in response 10 to, and/or to end the strike by correction officers 11 which commenced on February 17, 2025. This appropriation 12 is available for payments for state operations, aid to 13 localities, or capital purposes and may be suballocated, 14 transferred, or allocated to any state department, divi- 15 sion, agency, or authority pursuant to a certificate 16 issued by the director of the budget. The funds hereby 17 appropriated are to be available for payment of liabil- 18 ities heretofore accrued or hereafter accrued ............ 535,000,000 19 -------------- 826 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES DATA ANALYTICS STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 All Funds 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022, as amended by chapter 50, 3 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 4 For services and expenses of evidence-based risk management, data 5 system analytics, business process improvement, digital government 6 services, technology and tools, and initiatives to improve fiscal 7 operations, program evaluation and service delivery. All or a 8 portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or 9 transferred to any state department or agency (85014) .............. 10 25,000,000 ....................................... (re. $25,000,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018, as amended by chapter 50, 12 section 1, of the laws of 2023: 13 For services and expenses of evidence-based risk management, data 14 system analytics, business process improvement, digital government 15 service, technology and tools, and initiatives to improve fiscal 16 operations, program evaluation and service delivery. All or a 17 portion of the funds appropriated herein may be suballocated or 18 transferred to any state department or agency (85014) .............. 19 25,000,000 ........................................ (re. $1,116,000) 827 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES DEFERRED COMPENSATION BOARD STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 111,000 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 894,000 0 5 ---------------- ---------------- 6 All Funds ........................ 1,005,000 0 7 ================ ================ 8 SCHEDULE 9 OPERATIONS PROGRAM ........................................... 1,005,000 10 -------------- 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 For services and expenses of the deferred 14 compensation board pursuant to section 5 15 of the state finance law (81003). 16 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 111,000 17 -------------- 18 Program account subtotal ..................... 111,000 19 -------------- 20 Special Revenue Funds - Other 21 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 22 Deferred Compensation Administration Account - 22151 23 For services and expenses related to the 24 operations program (81003). 25 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 493,000 26 Temporary service (50200) .......................... 2,000 27 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 4,000 28 Travel (54000) ..................................... 5,000 29 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 63,000 30 Equipment (56000) .................................. 3,000 31 Fringe benefits (60000) .......................... 310,000 32 Indirect costs (58800) ............................ 14,000 33 -------------- 34 Program account subtotal ..................... 894,000 35 -------------- 828 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES GENERAL STATE CHARGES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 8,415,576,000 0 4 Fiduciary Funds .................... 400,500,000 0 5 ---------------- ---------------- 6 All Funds ........................ 8,816,076,000 0 7 ================ ================ 8 SCHEDULE 9 GENERAL STATE CHARGES .................................. 8,816,076,000 10 -------------- 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 For employee fringe benefits according to 14 the following project schedule including 15 those benefits which are related to 16 employees paid from funds, accounts, or 17 programs where the division of the budget 18 has issued waivers (85022) .............. 11,397,667,000 19 Project Schedule 20 PROJECT AMOUNT 21 -------------------------------------------- 22 For the state's contribution 23 to the health insurance fund 24 and deposit into the retiree 25 health benefit trust fund 26 pursuant to section 99-aa of 27 the state finance law. The 28 state's share of the health 29 insurance program dividends 30 shall be available to pay 31 for the premiums in 2025-26 32 ............................ 5,921,197,000 33 For the state's contribution 34 to the employees' retirement 35 system pension accumulation 36 fund, the police and fire 37 retirement system pension 38 accumulation fund, and the 39 New York state public 40 employees group life insur- 41 ance plan. Provided howev- 42 er, that notwithstanding any 43 other provision of law to 829 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES GENERAL STATE CHARGES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 the contrary, this appropri- 2 ation shall be available to 3 make contributions to such 4 funds and plan in state 5 fiscal year 2025-26 for 6 liabilities incurred or 7 estimated to be incurred on 8 or after April 1, 2026 ..... 2,552,812,000 9 For the state's contribution 10 to the social security 11 contribution fund .......... 1,261,862,000 12 For payments to the state 13 insurance fund for workers' 14 compensation benefits and 15 other related workers' 16 compensation costs prior to 17 or after they become 18 incurred including but not 19 limited to the benefits 20 defined in chapters 302 and 21 303 of the laws of 1985 ...... 699,006,000 22 For payment of SUNY hospitals 23 health insurance premiums on 24 or before March 31, 25 2026 ......................... 312,000,000 26 For payment during the period 27 July 1, 2025 to June 30, 28 2026 of the state's share to 29 the teachers insurance and 30 annuity association and the 31 college retirement equities 32 fund for state university 33 faculty in accordance with 34 chapter 337 of the laws of 35 1964 ......................... 264,296,000 36 For the state's contribution 37 to employee benefit fund 38 programs ..................... 132,531,000 39 For the state's contribution 40 to the dental insurance plan 41 ............................... 82,730,000 42 For the payment of the metro- 43 politan commuter transporta- 44 tion mobility tax pursuant 45 to article 23 of the tax 46 law as added by chapter 25 47 of the laws of 2009 on 48 behalf of the state 49 employees employed in the 830 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES GENERAL STATE CHARGES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 metropolitan commuter 2 transportation district ....... 40,177,000 3 For state reimbursement to New 4 York city for payments made 5 for special accidental death 6 benefits to beneficiaries of 7 first responders made pursu- 8 ant to section 208-f of the 9 general municipal law, 10 including the payment of 11 liabilities incurred prior 12 to April 1, 2025. Notwith- 13 standing the provisions of 14 any other law to the contra- 15 ry, for state fiscal year 16 2025-2026 the liability of 17 the state and the amount to 18 be distributed or otherwise 19 expended by the state pursu- 20 ant to section 208-f of the 21 general municipal law shall 22 be limited to the amount 23 appropriated .................. 32,025,000 24 For payment of liabilities 25 incurred during the period 26 July 1, 2025 through June 27 30, 2026 on behalf of the 28 state university of New York 29 to the teachers' retirement 30 system for eligible state 31 university faculty and for 32 the state's pension obli- 33 gations associated with 34 state employees who are 35 members of the teachers' 36 retirement system ............. 23,446,000 37 For the state's contribution 38 to the survivors' benefit 39 fund for payments to the 40 survivors of state employees 41 and retired state employees ... 15,500,000 42 For reimbursement to the unem- 43 ployment insurance fund for 44 payments made to claimants 45 formerly employed by the 46 state of New York ............. 15,000,000 47 For the state's contribution 48 to the vision care plan ....... 12,809,000 49 For expenses incurred during 50 the period July 1, 2025 to 831 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES GENERAL STATE CHARGES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 June 30, 2026 specific to 2 the group disability insur- 3 ance program for employees 4 in the professional service 5 in order to provide disabil- 6 ity benefits for such 7 employees ..................... 10,395,000 8 For the state's share of 9 contributions to the volun- 10 tary defined contribution 11 plan made on behalf of 12 eligible employees pursuant 13 to chapter 18 of the laws of 14 2012 who elect to partic- 15 ipate in such plan and who 16 are not otherwise eligible 17 to participate in the SUNY 18 optional retirement program .... 7,523,000 19 For payment of liabilities 20 incurred during the period 21 July 1, 2025 to June 30, 22 2026 specific to the 23 metropolitan commuter 24 transportation mobility tax 25 pursuant to article 23 of 26 the tax law as added by 27 chapter 25 of the laws of 28 2009 on behalf of the state 29 university teaching hospital 30 employees at Stony Brook 31 and downstate medical 32 employed in the commuter 33 transportation district ........ 5,293,000 34 For payments for the income 35 protection plans of current 36 and prior years ................ 4,625,000 37 For state reimbursements to 38 counties, cities, towns, or 39 villages for payments made 40 for special accidental death 41 benefits made pursuant to 42 section 208-f of the general 43 municipal law. Notwithstand- 44 ing the provisions of any 45 other law to the contrary, 46 for state fiscal year 2025- 47 2026 the liability of the 48 state and the amount to be 49 distributed or otherwise 50 expended by the state pursu- 832 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES GENERAL STATE CHARGES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 ant to section 208-f of the 2 general municipal law shall 3 be limited to the amount 4 appropriated ................... 2,000,000 5 For payments associated with 6 the accident reporting 7 system ........................... 600,000 8 For suballocation to the state 9 university of New York, 10 pursuant to a plan approved 11 by the director of the budg- 12 et, for services and 13 expenses of administering 14 the voluntary defined 15 contribution plan, estab- 16 lished pursuant to chapter 17 18 of the laws of 2012 ........... 500,000 18 For reimbursement of liabil- 19 ities heretofore accrued or 20 hereafter to accrue during 21 the period July 1, 2025 to 22 June 30, 2026 to Cornell 23 university and Alfred 24 university for unemployment 25 for employees of the statu- 26 tory colleges .................... 500,000 27 For the state's pension obli- 28 gations associated with 29 state employees who are 30 members of the state educa- 31 tion department's optional 32 retirement program ............... 393,000 33 For payment of liabilities 34 incurred during the period 35 July 1, 2025 to June 30, 36 2026 specific to federal 37 retirement costs of Cornell 38 cooperative extension 39 professional employees who 40 are now participating in the 41 federal retirement system ........ 200,000 42 For payments for accidental 43 death benefits pursuant to 44 collective bargaining agree- 45 ments ............................ 150,000 46 For payments for tuition 47 reimbursement pursuant to 48 collective bargaining agree- 49 ments ............................. 97,000 50 -------------- 833 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES GENERAL STATE CHARGES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Project schedule total ...... 11,397,667,000 2 -------------- 3 For taxes on public lands and payments 4 pursuant to sections 532 through 546 of 5 the real property tax law. The moneys 6 hereby appropriated are available for 7 payment of any liabilities or obligations 8 incurred prior to April 1, 2025 in addi- 9 tion to current liabilities (80568) ........ 334,784,000 10 For judgments against the state pursuant to 11 section 20 of the court of claims act and 12 for judgments pursuant to actions brought 13 in the court of claims against public 14 benefit corporations indemnified by the 15 state, exclusive of the payment of any 16 judgments arising out of actions or 17 proceedings brought to obtain payment for 18 wages, salaries or other employee bene- 19 fits. The moneys hereby appropriated are 20 available for payment of any liabilities 21 or obligations incurred prior to April 22 1, 2025 in addition to current liabil- 23 ities (80564) .............................. 180,453,000 24 For the payment of the defense by private 25 counsel and the indemnification or payment 26 on behalf of state officers and employees 27 in civil judicial proceedings in accord- 28 ance with the provisions of section 17 of 29 the public officers law; the payment on 30 behalf of the state, exclusive of the 31 payment for wages, salaries or other 32 employee benefits, in civil judicial 33 proceedings where a state officer or 34 employee entitled to a defense in accord- 35 ance with section 17 of the public offi- 36 cers law was dismissed from the civil 37 judicial proceeding; the payment on behalf 38 of the state, exclusive of the payment for 39 wages, salaries or other employment bene- 40 fits, and in civil judicial proceedings 41 brought pursuant to Title VI of the Civil 42 Rights Act of 1964, 42 USC Section 2000d 43 et seq., Title VII of the Civil Rights Act 44 of 1964, 42 USC Section 2000e et seq., 45 Title IX of the Education Amendments of 46 1972, 20 USC Section 1681 et seq., Titles 47 II, III, and/or V of the Americans With 48 Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 USC Section 49 12101 et seq., of the Rehabilitation Act 834 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES GENERAL STATE CHARGES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 of 1973, 29 USC Section 791 et seq., the 2 state human rights law and other employ- 3 ment related causes of action; and in 4 criminal proceedings in accordance with 5 the provisions of section 19 of the public 6 officers law. The moneys hereby appropri- 7 ated are available for payment of any 8 liabilities or obligations incurred prior 9 to April 1, 2025 in addition to current 10 liabilities (80563) ......................... 55,849,000 11 For payments in accordance with section 19-a 12 of the public lands law (80567) ............. 15,466,000 13 For the payment on behalf of the state in 14 connection with the resolution of Merton 15 Simpson et al. v. New York State Depart- 16 ment of Civil Service et al. and associ- 17 ated United States District Court Northern 18 District of New York Order dated April 25, 19 2011 (80524) ................................ 10,200,000 20 For services and expenses relating to the 21 costs of outside legal services. Moneys 22 from this appropriation shall be available 23 only if approved by the director of the 24 budget (85023) .............................. 10,000,000 25 Notwithstanding sections 17 or 19 of the 26 public officers law or any other provision 27 of law to the contrary, for payment or 28 reimbursement of reasonable attorneys' 29 fees and expenses incurred by or on behalf 30 of an employee, as that term is defined in 31 section 17 and/or section 19 of the public 32 officers law, who obtained representation 33 by private counsel in response to any 34 request, summons, command, subpoena, 35 warrant, investigative interview or docu- 36 ment request, audit, or legally compulsive 37 process (collectively "Process") initiated 38 after January 1, 2025 by the United States 39 government and in which the employee was 40 or is involved as a result of the employ- 41 ee's New York State (State) employment or 42 duties, including where the Process is 43 unrelated to the employee's State employ- 44 ment or duties, but is reasonably likely 45 to have been commenced because of or in 46 response to the employee's State employ- 47 ment or exercise of their duties. When 48 determining whether the Process is reason- 49 ably likely to have been commenced because 50 of or in response to the employee's State 835 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES GENERAL STATE CHARGES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 employment or exercise of their duties, 2 the Office of the Attorney General 3 ("Attorney General") (or, where the 4 employee is an employee of the Attorney 5 General, the Governor) may consider the 6 totality of the circumstances, including, 7 but not limited to, such factors as wheth- 8 er the employee has previously initiated 9 or otherwise participated in or supported 10 a criminal or civil investigation or pros- 11 ecution of the United States government or 12 a United States government official, 13 whether the employee is currently or was 14 previously involved in an investigation by 15 the United States government or a United 16 States government official, whether the 17 employee previously had interactions with 18 the United States government or a United 19 States government official in the course 20 of their State employment or duties, 21 whether the employee was previously 22 subjected to what could reasonably be 23 construed to constitute discriminatory or 24 retaliatory treatment by the United States 25 government, whether the employee holds or 26 held a position or has taken action that 27 is highly visible to the public or to the 28 United States government, whether there is 29 another readily apparent likely explana- 30 tion for the Process, and other relevant 31 circumstances. For purposes of this appro- 32 priation, United States government shall 33 include any federal government body, agen- 34 cy, court, or other entity, as well as any 35 employee of the federal government acting 36 in their official capacity. Provided 37 however, that reasonable attorneys' fees 38 and expenses incurred by or on behalf of 39 an employee, as that term is defined in 40 section 17 and/or section 19 of the public 41 officers law, shall only be paid upon: (a) 42 notification to the Attorney General by 43 the employee or their private counsel 44 within 45 days from the date the need for 45 representation first arises, or, if the 46 employee is legally prohibited from making 47 such notification at the time the need for 48 legal representation first arises, then 45 49 days from the time the prohibition is 50 removed; (b) receipt by the Attorney 836 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES GENERAL STATE CHARGES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 General of a certification from the head 2 of the department, commission, division, 3 office or agency of such employee, of the 4 employee's State employment; and (c) 5 certification by the employee and the 6 employee's private counsel to the Attorney 7 General that the employee is involved in 8 the Process as a result of their State 9 employment, as described herein. Where the 10 Process is unrelated to the employee's 11 State employment or duties, but is reason- 12 ably likely to have been commenced because 13 of or in response to the employee's State 14 employment or exercise of their duties, 15 the certification by the employee and the 16 employee's private counsel must be 17 reviewed and approved by the Attorney 18 General (or, where the employee is an 19 employee of the Attorney General, the 20 Governor). Upon a determination by the 21 Attorney General that an employee or their 22 private counsel is entitled to payment of 23 such reasonable attorneys' fees and 24 expenses, the Attorney General shall so 25 certify to the Comptroller. Where the 26 employee is an employee of the Attorney 27 General, the Governor shall review the 28 Attorney General's determination and shall 29 co-certify to the Comptroller unless the 30 Governor finds the determination of the 31 Attorney General to be unreasonable. Such 32 reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses 33 shall be paid by the State to the employee 34 or the employee's private counsel from 35 time to time during the pendency of the 36 Process and upon the audit and warrant of 37 the Comptroller. Notwithstanding any 38 provision to the contrary contained here- 39 in, neither an employee nor their private 40 counsel shall receive or be reimbursed for 41 reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses 42 pursuant to this appropriation unless the 43 employee and their private counsel certify 44 to the Attorney General that the employee 45 is solely liable for their reasonable 46 attorneys' fees and expenses and that the 47 employee and/or their private counsel 48 shall reimburse the State for all payments 49 of reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses 50 paid pursuant to this appropriation within 837 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES GENERAL STATE CHARGES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 ninety days of a determination by the 2 Attorney General's Office (and, in the 3 case of an employee of the Attorney Gener- 4 al, a determination by the Governor that 5 the Attorney General's determination was 6 reasonable) that (1) if the subject matter 7 of the Process relates to the employee's 8 State employment or duties, the employee 9 has acted outside the scope of their State 10 employment and/or used their State employ- 11 ment to violate any applicable law, regu- 12 lation, or valid executive order, and/or 13 (2) if the subject matter of the Process 14 is unrelated to the employee's State 15 employment or duties, but is reasonably 16 likely to have been commenced because of 17 or in response to the employee's State 18 employment or exercise of their duties, 19 the employee has violated any applicable 20 law, regulation, or valid executive order, 21 and/or (3) the employee has failed to 22 cooperate with the State in connection 23 with the Process for which the employee or 24 their counsel is seeking funds from this 25 appropriation or any action related to 26 such Process, except that the employee 27 shall not be required to cooperate in any 28 way which is inconsistent with the employ- 29 ee's criminal defense rights under State 30 and Federal law. In the event of any such 31 determination, neither the employee nor 32 the employee's private counsel shall be 33 eligible for payment of reasonable attor- 34 ney's fees and expenses pursuant to this 35 appropriation ............................... 10,000,000 36 For assessments for local improvements. The 37 moneys hereby appropriated are available 38 for payment of any liabilities or obli- 39 gations incurred prior to April 1, 2025 in 40 addition to current liabilities (80565) ...... 4,000,000 41 For payment of claims for damage to personal 42 or real property or for bodily injuries or 43 wrongful death caused by officers, employ- 44 ees, or other authorized persons providing 45 service to state government while provid- 46 ing such service, and the state university 47 construction fund while acting within the 48 scope of their employment, and while oper- 49 ating motor vehicles, and for any individ- 50 uals operating motor vehicles which are 838 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES GENERAL STATE CHARGES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 assigned on a permanent basis with unre- 2 stricted use to state officers and employ- 3 ees when the person is permanently 4 assigned the motor vehicle (80559) ........... 2,575,000 5 For transfer to the property casualty insur- 6 ance security fund in accordance with the 7 terms of the settlement between the state 8 and the plaintiffs in accordance with the 9 Court of Appeals' opinion in Alliance of 10 American Insurers v. Chu, 77 NY2d 573 11 (1991) (80561) ............................... 2,000,000 12 For the state's share of assessments issued 13 by the Hudson River-Black River regulating 14 district pursuant to subdivisions 2 and 3 15 of section 15-2121 of the environmental 16 conservation law (80356) ..................... 1,250,000 17 For services and expenses relating to the 18 costs of expert witnesses or legal 19 services related to cases in which the 20 attorney general provides representation 21 for the state (85024) ........................ 1,000,000 22 For services and expenses associated with 23 legal and other fees related to Indian 24 land claims litigation involving the state 25 of New York, local governments and private 26 land owners who are named as defendants in 27 these lawsuits, including liabilities 28 incurred prior to April 1, 2025 (80560) ........ 700,000 29 For payments in accordance with section 19-b 30 of the public lands law (80566) ................ 600,000 31 For payments in accordance with section 3 of 32 chapter 774 of the laws of 1989 (80525) ........ 400,000 33 For a payment in lieu of taxes for the 34 state-owned lands within the city of Kingston .. 289,000 35 For a payment in lieu of taxes for the 36 state-owned lands within the town of Ulster ..... 33,000 37 For the reissuance of checks which were not 38 presented for payment within the time 39 limits contained in section 102 of the 40 state finance law or for which payment has 41 been authorized by specific legislation 42 (80562) ......................................... 24,000 43 -------------- 44 Total amount available ................ 12,027,290,000 45 ============== 46 Less the amount appropriated to the state 47 university of New York for suballocation 48 to the miscellaneous -- all state depart- 49 ments and agencies, general state charges 839 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES GENERAL STATE CHARGES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 program for payment of employee fringe 2 benefits. The actual suballocation amount 3 may be allocated to the employee fringe 4 benefit appropriation on or before March 5 31, 2026 at the discretion of the division 6 of the budget .......................... (1,991,489,000) 7 Less an amount paid into the fringe benefit 8 escrow account from non-General Fund state 9 agencies to support fringe benefit spend- 10 ing from appropriations contained in this 11 schedule, including, but not limited to, 12 the state's contribution to: i) the health 13 insurance fund; ii) dental insurance plan; 14 iii) vision care plan, iv) employees' 15 retirement system pension accumulation 16 fund, police and fire retirement system 17 pension accumulation fund, and public 18 employees group life insurance plan; v) 19 social security contribution fund; vi) the 20 state insurance fund for workers' compen- 21 sation benefits and other related workers' 22 compensation costs; vii) employee benefit 23 fund programs; viii) unemployment insur- 24 ance fund; and ix) survivors' benefit 25 fund. To the extent there is available 26 funding in the fringe benefit escrow 27 account to support fringe benefit appro- 28 priations contained in the schedule, the 29 amount specified in this appropriation 30 shall be allocated to the $11,397,667,000 31 employee fringe benefit appropriation on 32 or before March 31, 2026 at the discretion 33 of the division of the budget .......... (1,620,225,000) 34 -------------- 35 Program account subtotal ............... 8,415,576,000 36 -------------- 37 Fiduciary Funds 38 Employees Dental Insurance Fund 39 Dental Insurance Interest Account - 60402 40 For additional state expenditures in 41 relation to the New York state dental 42 insurance fund (80579) ......................... 500,000 43 -------------- 44 Program account subtotal ..................... 500,000 45 -------------- 46 Fiduciary Funds 47 Employees Health Insurance Fund 840 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES GENERAL STATE CHARGES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Reserve for Rate Fluctuations Account - 60202 2 For additional state expenditures in 3 relation to the New York state health 4 insurance program (80581) .................. 400,000,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal ................. 400,000,000 7 -------------- 841 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES GREEN THUMB PROGRAM STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 6,173,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 6,173,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 GREEN THUMB PROGRAM .......................................... 6,173,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses of the green thumb 13 program, including allocation to other 14 state departments and agencies (80590). 15 Contractual services (51000) ................... 6,173,000 16 -------------- 842 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES GREENWAY HERITAGE CONSERVANCY FOR THE HUDSON RIVER VALLEY STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 546,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 546,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 OPERATIONS PROGRAM ............................................. 546,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 operations program (81003). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 504,000 15 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 42,000 16 -------------- 843 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES HEALTH INSURANCE CONTINGENCY RESERVE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 General Fund 2 State Purposes Account - 10050 3 For payments to those insurance companies 4 participating in the New York state 5 government employees health insurance plan 6 in the event of termination of the 7 contractual agreement between such insur- 8 ance companies and the New York state 9 department of civil service, or in the 10 event of termination of the contractual 11 agreement between the New York state 12 department of civil service and such muni- 13 cipalities or school districts which have 14 elected to receive distributions from the 15 health insurance reserve receipts fund, 16 and for payments to the health insurance 17 reserve receipts fund as required to 18 fulfill contractual agreements between the 19 New York state department of civil service 20 and those insurance companies participat- 21 ing in the New York state governmental 22 employees health insurance plan. 23 The moneys hereby appropriated shall be 24 available for payments to the health 25 insurance reserve receipts fund and the 26 above insurance carriers (80547) ........... 773,854,000 27 ============== 844 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES HEALTH INSURANCE RESERVE RECEIPTS FUND STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Fiduciary Funds 2 Health Insurance Reserve Receipts Fund 3 Depository Account - 60553 4 For disbursement pursuant to section 99-c of the state 5 finance law (80546) ...................................... 292,400,000 6 ============== 845 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES HUDSON RIVER VALLEY GREENWAY COMMUNITIES COUNCIL STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 245,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 245,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 OPERATIONS PROGRAM ............................................. 245,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 operations program (81003). 14 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 139,000 15 Supplies and materials (57000) .................... 82,000 16 Travel (54000) ..................................... 6,000 17 Contractual services (51000) ...................... 14,000 18 Equipment (56000) .................................. 4,000 19 -------------- 846 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES INSURANCE AND SECURITIES FUNDS RESERVE GUARANTEE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 General Fund ....................... 1,515,000,000 0 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 1,515,000,000 0 5 ================ ================ 6 INSURANCE AND SECURITIES FUNDS RESERVE GUARANTEE ......... 1,515,000,000 7 -------------- 8 General Fund 9 State Purposes Account - 10050 10 For the purpose of maintaining the solvency 11 of the following funds. 12 Notwithstanding section 40 of the state 13 finance law, this appropriation shall 14 remain in effect until a subsequent appro- 15 priation is made available. 16 No moneys shall be available for expenditure 17 from this appropriation until a certif- 18 icate of approval has been issued by the 19 director of the division of the budget and 20 a copy of such certificate has been filed 21 with the state comptroller, the chairman 22 of the senate finance committee and the 23 chairman of the assembly ways and means 24 committee. Such moneys shall be payable on 25 the audit and warrant of the comptroller 26 on vouchers certified or approved in the 27 manner provided by law. 28 To the state insurance fund provided that no 29 expenditure may be made from this amount 30 if other assets of such fund not part of 31 reserves for payments of workers' compen- 32 sation and medical benefits, and payments 33 under employer's liability coverage, 34 including claims by third parties for 35 contribution or indemnity are available 36 (80544) .................................... 190,000,000 37 To the state insurance fund provided that no 38 expenditure may be made from this amount 39 if other assets of such fund not part of 40 reserves for payments of workers' compen- 41 sation and medical benefits, and payments 42 under employer's liability coverage, 43 including claims by third parties for 44 contribution or indemnity are available 45 (80543) .................................... 325,000,000 847 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES INSURANCE AND SECURITIES FUNDS RESERVE GUARANTEE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 To the state insurance fund provided that no 2 expenditure may be made from this amount 3 if other assets of such fund not part of 4 reserves for payments of workers' compen- 5 sation and medical benefits, and payments 6 under employer's liability coverage, 7 including claims by third parties for 8 contribution or indemnity are available 9 (80542) .................................... 300,000,000 10 To the state insurance fund provided that no 11 expenditure may be made from this amount 12 if other assets of such fund not part of 13 reserves for payments of workers' compen- 14 sation and medical benefits, and payments 15 under employer's liability coverage, 16 including claims by third parties for 17 contribution or indemnity are available 18 (80541) .................................... 250,000,000 19 To the state insurance fund provided that no 20 expenditure may be made from this amount 21 if other assets of such fund not part of 22 reserves for payments of workers' compen- 23 sation and medical benefits, and payments 24 under employer's liability coverage, 25 including claims by third parties for 26 contribution or indemnity are available 27 (80540) .................................... 230,000,000 28 To the aggregate trust fund provided that no 29 expenditure may be made from this amount 30 if other assets of such fund not part of 31 reserves for claims or losses are avail- 32 able (80539) ................................ 50,000,000 33 To the aggregate trust fund provided that no 34 expenditure may be made from this amount 35 if other assets of such fund not part of 36 reserves for claims or losses are avail- 37 able (80538) ............................... 110,000,000 38 To the aggregate trust fund provided that no 39 expenditure may be made from this amount 40 if other assets of such fund not part of 41 reserves for claims or losses are avail- 42 able (80537) ................................ 60,000,000 43 -------------- 848 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LABOR MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 51,453,000 98,208,820 4 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 250,000 0 5 ---------------- ---------------- 6 All Funds ........................ 51,703,000 98,208,820 7 ================ ================ 8 SCHEDULE 9 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS ............................ 51,703,000 10 -------------- 11 General Fund 12 State Purposes Account - 10050 13 For training and professional development of 14 state employees for outstanding service 15 and accomplishments as prescribed by the 16 empire star public service award. A 17 portion of these funds may be suballocated 18 to other state agencies (23801). 19 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 296,000 20 Supplies and materials (57000) ......................1,000 21 Equipment (56000) .................................. 1,000 22 Travel (54000) ..................................... 1,000 23 General state charges (60000) ...................... 1,000 24 -------------- 25 Total amount available ......................... 300,000 26 -------------- 27 For services and expenses to implement writ- 28 ten agreements determining the terms and 29 conditions of employment between the state 30 and employee organizations representing 31 negotiating units established pursuant to 32 article 14 of the civil service law. A 33 portion of these funds may be suballocated 34 to other state agencies (23802): 35 Personal service--regular (50100) .................. 1,000 36 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,000 37 Travel (54000) ..................................... 1,000 38 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 1,000 39 Equipment (56000) .................................. 1,000 40 -------------- 849 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LABOR MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Total amount available ........................... 5,000 2 -------------- 3 Management Confidential 4 Family benefits (23852) .......................... 510,000 5 Medical flexible spending program (23853) ........ 500,000 6 Pre-tax transportation benefit (23854) ........... 350,000 7 Management training (23806) ...................... 718,000 8 Uniform allowance (23855) ........................ 245,000 9 Tuition reimbursement (23807) .................... 250,000 10 M/C share of negotiated programs (23808) ......... 700,000 11 -------------- 12 Total amount available ....................... 3,273,000 13 -------------- 14 Civil Service Employees Association 15 Joint committee on health benefits (23838) ..... 1,656,000 16 Employee training and development (23804) ..... 13,588,000 17 Safety and health maintenance committee (23839) .. 808,000 18 Employee security committee (23840) .............. 666,000 19 Work life services (23942) ..................... 3,211,000 20 Discipline (23805) ............................... 484,000 21 Employee assistance program (23842) .............. 806,000 22 Statewide performance rating committee (23843) .... 54,000 23 Property damage (23844) ........................... 40,000 24 Work related clothing (ASU) (23947) ............... 60,000 25 Work related clothing (OSU) (23845) ............ 1,477,000 26 Tool allowance (OSU) (23846) ...................... 95,000 27 Tool insurance (OSU) (23847) ...................... 33,000 28 Uniform allowance (ISU) (23848) .................. 581,000 29 Work related clothing (ISU) (23849) .............. 109,000 30 -------------- 31 Total amount available ...................... 23,668,000 32 -------------- 33 District Council-37 34 Joint committee on health benefits (23857) ......... 7,000 35 Employee assistance program/work-life 36 services (23946) ................................ 19,000 37 Statewide performance rating committee (23860) ..... 4,000 38 Time and attendance umpire process admin (23861) ... 4,000 39 Disciplinary panel admin (23862) ................... 6,000 40 Employee development and training (23859) ......... 88,000 41 -------------- 42 Total amount available ..........................128,000 43 -------------- 850 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LABOR MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Professional, Scientific and Technical 2 Services Unit 3 Professional development and quality of 4 working life (23810) ........................... 693,000 5 Health and safety (23864) ........................ 899,000 6 PSTP program (23811) ........................... 6,259,000 7 Joint funded programs (23812) .................. 2,374,000 8 Multi-funded programs (23813) .................. 1,254,000 9 Professional development for nurses (23865) ...... 653,000 10 Property damage (23866) ........................... 27,000 11 Joint committee on health benefits (23869) ....... 653,000 12 Work-life services (23833) ..................... 3,018,000 13 -------------- 14 Total amount available ...................... 15,830,000 15 -------------- 16 Security Services Unit 17 Labor management committees (23817) .............. 365,000 18 Employee assistance program (23874) .............. 262,000 19 Joint committee on health benefits (23875) ....... 216,000 20 Employee training and development (23891) ........ 207,000 21 Organizational alcoholism program (23892) ........ 204,000 22 Labor management training (23893) ................ 131,000 23 Family benefits (23894) .......................... 563,000 24 -------------- 25 Total amount available ....................... 1,948,000 26 -------------- 27 Security Supervisors Unit 28 Employee training and development (23820) ..........27,000 29 Quality of work life committee (23819) ............ 20,000 30 Family benefits committee (23886) ................. 18,000 31 Employee assistance program (23890) ................ 5,000 32 Management directed training (23877) .............. 19,000 33 Organizational alcoholism program (23889) .......... 7,000 34 Joint committee on health benefits (23879) ......... 9,000 35 -------------- 36 Total amount available ......................... 105,000 37 -------------- 38 Agency Police Services 39 Joint committee on health benefits (23923) ......... 5,000 40 Education and training (23925) .................... 28,000 41 Education and training - management directed 42 (23926) ......................................... 17,000 43 Employee assistance program (23927) ................ 5,000 851 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LABOR MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Organizational alcohol program (23928) ............. 7,000 2 Quality of work life initiatives (23930) .......... 21,000 3 -------------- 4 Total amount available .......................... 83,000 5 -------------- 6 Professional Services Negotiating Unit 7 Joint committee on health benefits and 8 statewide labor management committees. A 9 portion of these funds may be suballocated 10 or transferred to other state agencies 11 (23835) ...................................... 6,113,000 12 -------------- 13 Program account subtotal .................. 51,453,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other 16 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 17 NYS Flex Spending Accounts - 22047 18 For services and expenses related to the 19 administration of the NYS flex spending 20 accounts (23802). 21 Contractual services (51000) ..................... 250,000 22 -------------- 23 Program account subtotal ..................... 250,000 24 -------------- 852 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LABOR MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENTS 2 General Fund 3 State Purposes Account - 10050 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 5 For training and professional development of state employees for 6 outstanding service and accomplishments as prescribed by the empire 7 star public service award. A portion of these funds may be suballo- 8 cated to other state agencies (23801). 9 Contractual services (51000) ... 296,000 .............. (re. $287,000) 10 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,000 ................ (re. $1,000) 11 Equipment (56000) ... 1,000 ............................. (re. $1,000) 12 Travel (54000) ... 1,000 ................................ (re. $1,000) 13 General state charges (60000) ... 1,000 ................. (re. $1,000) 14 For services and expenses to implement written agreements determining 15 the terms and conditions of employment between the state and employ- 16 ee organizations representing negotiating units established pursuant 17 to article 14 of the civil service law. A portion of these funds may 18 be suballocated to other state agencies (23802): 19 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 352,000 ......... (re. $352,000) 20 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,000 ................ (re. $1,000) 21 Travel (54000) ... 1,000 ................................ (re. $1,000) 22 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000 .................. (re. $1,000) 23 Equipment (56000) ... 1,000 ............................. (re. $1,000) 24 Management Confidential 25 Family benefits (23852) ... 310,000 ................... (re. $290,000) 26 Medical flexible spending program (23853) ............................ 27 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 28 Pre-tax transportation benefit (23854) ... 550,000 .... (re. $550,000) 29 Management training (23806) ... 718,000 ............... (re. $459,000) 30 Uniform allowance (23855) ... 245,000 ................. (re. $245,000) 31 Tuition reimbursement (23807) ... 250,000 ............. (re. $243,000) 32 M/C share of negotiated programs (23808) ............................. 33 700,000 ............................................. (re. $558,000) 34 Civil Service Employees Association 35 Joint committee on health benefits (23838) ........................... 36 1,623,000 ........................................... (re. $641,000) 37 Employee training and development (23804) ............................ 38 13,322,000 ....................................... (re. $13,061,000) 39 Safety and health maintenance committee (23839) ...................... 40 792,000 ............................................. (re. $300,000) 41 Employee security committee (23840) ... 653,000 ....... (re. $300,000) 42 Work life services (23942) ... 3,147,000 ............ (re. $3,021,000) 43 Discipline (23805) ... 474,000 ........................ (re. $369,000) 44 Employee assistance program (23842) ... 790,000 ....... (re. $539,000) 853 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LABOR MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Statewide performance rating committee (23843) ....................... 2 52,000 ............................................... (re. $51,000) 3 Property damage (23844) ... 39,000 ..................... (re. $39,000) 4 Work related clothing (ASU) (23947) ... 60,000 ......... (re. $60,000) 5 Work related clothing (OSU) (23845) ... 1,476,000 ... (re. $1,456,000) 6 Tool allowance (OSU) (23846) ... 93,000 ................ (re. $55,000) 7 Tool insurance (OSU) (23847) ... 32,000 ................ (re. $32,000) 8 Uniform allowance (ISU) (23848) ... 581,000 ........... (re. $576,000) 9 Work related clothing (ISU) (23849) ... 108,000 ....... (re. $108,000) 10 By chapter 177, section 16, of the laws of 2024: 11 District Council-37 12 Joint committee on health benefits (23857) ........................... 13 7,493 ................................................. (re. $6,000) 14 Employee assistance program/work-life (23946) ........................ 15 20,524 ............................................... (re. $17,000) 16 Statewide performance rating committee (23860) ....................... 17 4,000 ................................................. (re. $4,000) 18 Time and attendance umpire process admin (23861) ..................... 19 4,000 ................................................. (re. $4,000) 20 Disciplinary panel admin (23862) ... 6,000 .............. (re. $6,000) 21 Employee development and training (23859) ............................ 22 111,000 ............................................. (re. $111,000) 23 Contract administration (23863) ... 3,000 ............... (re. $3,000) 24 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 25 Professional, Scientific and Technical Services Unit 26 Professional development and quality of working life (23810) ......... 27 672,000 ............................................. (re. $672,000) 28 Health and safety (23864) ... 873,000 ................. (re. $856,000) 29 PSTP program (23811) ... 6,077,000 .................. (re. $5,349,000) 30 Joint funded programs (23812) ... 2,305,000 ......... (re. $2,041,000) 31 Multi-funded programs (23813) ... 1,217,000 ......... (re. $1,081,000) 32 Professional development for nurses (23865) .......................... 33 634,000 ............................................. (re. $404,000) 34 Property damage (23866) ... 26,000 ..................... (re. $26,000) 35 Joint committee on health benefits (23869) ........................... 36 634,000 ............................................. (re. $517,000) 37 Work-life services (23833) ... 2,930,000 ............ (re. $2,300,000) 38 By chapter 175, section 24, of the laws of 2024: 39 Security Services Unit 854 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LABOR MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Labor management committees (23817) .................................. 2 700,000 ............................................. (re. $679,000) 3 Employee assistance program (23874) .................................. 4 500,000 ............................................. (re. $341,000) 5 Joint committee on health benefits (23875) ........................... 6 413,300 ............................................. (re. $300,000) 7 Contract administration (23876) ... 200,000 ........... (re. $200,000) 8 Employee training and development (23891) ............................ 9 397,000 ............................................... (re. $386,000) 10 Organizational alcoholism program (23892) ............................ 11 390,000 ............................................. (re. $390,000) 12 Labor management training (23893) .................................... 13 250,000 ............................................. (re. $250,000) 14 Family benefits (23894) ... 2,100,000 ............... (re. $2,000,000) 15 By chapter 176, section 23, of the laws of 2024: 16 Security Supervisor Unit 17 Employee training and development (23820) ............................ 18 50,819 ............................................... (re. $50,819) 19 Quality of work life committee (23819) ............................... 20 37,514 ............................................... (re. $37,000) 21 Family benefits committee (23886) ... 33,753 ........... (re. $30,000) 22 Employee assistance program (23890) ... 8,534 ........... (re. $6,000) 23 Contract administration (23880) ... 50,000 ............. (re. $50,000) 24 Management directed training (23877) ................................. 25 34,463 ............................................... (re. $34,463) 26 Organizational alcoholism program (23889) ............................ 27 13,254 ............................................... (re. $13,254) 28 Joint committee on health benefits (23879) ........................... 29 16,242 ................................................ (re. $9,000) 30 By chapter 174, section 21, of the laws of 2024: 31 Agency Police Services 32 Joint committee on health benefits (23923) ........................... 33 9,196 ................................................. (re. $5,000) 34 Contract administration (23924) ... 30,000 ............. (re. $29,000) 35 Education and training (23925) ... 53,224 .............. (re. $53,224) 36 Education and training - management directed (23926) ................. 37 32,486 ............................................... (re. $32,486) 38 Employee assistance program (23927) ... 8,048 ........... (re. $6,000) 39 Organizational alcohol program (23928) ............................... 40 12,493 ............................................... (re. $12,493) 41 Legal defense fund (23929) ... 10,000 .................. (re. $10,000) 42 Quality of work life initiatives (23930) ............................. 43 39,288 ............................................... (re. $39,288) 855 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LABOR MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 2 Professional Services Negotiating Unit 3 Joint committee on health benefits and statewide labor management 4 committees. A portion of these funds may be suballocated or trans- 5 ferred to other state agencies (23835) ............................. 6 5,979,000 ......................................... (re. $4,003,000) 7 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 8 For training and professional development of state employees for 9 outstanding service and accomplishments as prescribed by the empire 10 star public service award. A portion of these funds may be suballo- 11 cated to other state agencies (23801). 12 Contractual services (51000) ... 296,000 .............. (re. $258,000) 13 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,000 ................ (re. $1,000) 14 Equipment (56000) ... 1,000 ............................. (re. $1,000) 15 Travel (54000) ... 1,000 ................................ (re. $1,000) 16 General state charges (60000) ... 1,000 ................. (re. $1,000) 17 For services and expenses to implement written agreements determining 18 the terms and conditions of employment between the state and employ- 19 ee organizations representing negotiating units established pursuant 20 to article 14 of the civil service law. A portion of these funds may 21 be suballocated to other state agencies (23802): 22 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 208,000 ......... (re. $208,000) 23 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,000 ................ (re. $1,000) 24 Travel (54000) ... 1,000 ................................ (re. $1,000) 25 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000 .................. (re. $1,000) 26 Equipment (56000) ... 1,000 ............................. (re. $1,000) 27 Management Confidential 28 Family benefits (23852) ... 310,000 ................... (re. $290,000) 29 Medical flexible spending program (23853) ............................ 30 500,000 ............................................. (re. $500,000) 31 Pre-tax transportation benefit (23854) ... 550,000 .... (re. $550,000) 32 Management training (23806) ... 718,000 ............... (re. $586,000) 33 Uniform allowance (23855) ... 245,000 ................. (re. $127,000) 34 Tuition reimbursement (23807) ... 250,000 ............. (re. $250,000) 35 M/C share of negotiated programs (23808) ............................. 36 700,000 ............................................. (re. $554,000) 37 Civil Service Employees Association 38 Joint committee on health benefits (23838) ........................... 39 1,591,000 ........................................... (re. $789,000) 40 Employee training and development (23804) ............................ 41 13,061,000 ....................................... (re. $12,401,000) 42 Safety and health maintenance committee (23839) ...................... 43 777,000 ............................................. (re. $400,000) 856 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LABOR MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Employee security committee (23840) ... 628,000 ....... (re. $300,000) 2 Work life services (23942) ... 3,086,000 ............ (re. $2,900,000) 3 Discipline (23805) ... 465,000 ........................ (re. $258,000) 4 Employee assistance program (23842) ... 49,000 ......... (re. $20,000) 5 Statewide performance rating committee (23843) ....................... 6 760,000 ............................................. (re. $737,000) 7 Property damage (23844) ... 38,000 ..................... (re. $38,000) 8 Work related clothing (ASU) (23947) ... 1,477,000 ... (re. $1,443,000) 9 Work related clothing (OSU) (23845) ... 91,000 .......... (re. $4,000) 10 Tool allowance (OSU) (23846) ... 31,000 ................ (re. $14,000) 11 Tool insurance (OSU) (23847) ... 582,000 .............. (re. $582,000) 12 Work related clothing (ISU) (23849) ... 60,000 ......... (re. $16,000) 13 District Council-37 14 Joint committee on health benefits (23857) ... 5,000 .... (re. $3,000) 15 Employee assistance program/work-life services (23946) ............... 16 13,000 ............................................... (re. $13,000) 17 Statewide performance rating committee (23860) ....................... 18 2,000 ................................................. (re. $2,000) 19 Time and attendance umpire process admin (23861) ..................... 20 2,000 ................................................. (re. $2,000) 21 Disciplinary panel admin (23862) ... 2,000 .............. (re. $2,000) 22 Professional, Scientific and Technical Services Unit 23 Professional development and quality of working life (23810) ......... 24 476,000 ............................................. (re. $273,000) 25 Health and safety (23864) ... 618,000 ................. (re. $600,000) 26 PSTP program (23811) ... 4,296,000 .................. (re. $1,343,000) 27 Joint funded programs (23812) ... 1,629,000 ......... (re. $1,173,000) 28 Multi-funded programs (23813) ... 861,000 ............. (re. $736,000) 29 Professional development for nurses (23865) .......................... 30 449,000 .............................................. (re. $54,000) 31 Property damage (23866) ... 19,000 ..................... (re. $19,000) 32 Joint committee on health benefits (23869) ........................... 33 449,000 .............................................. (re. $11,000) 34 Work-life services (23833) ... 2,072,000 ............ (re. $1,769,000) 35 By chapter 189, section 19, of the laws of 2023: 36 Joint Committee on Health Benefits 37 Statewide Labor Management Committees (23835) ........................ 38 7,118,819 ......................................... (re. $3,103,000) 39 By chapter 190, section 24, of the laws of 2023: 40 Professional, Scientific and Technical Services Unit 857 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LABOR MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Professional development and quality of working life committee (23803) 2 ... 177,352 ......................................... (re. $159,000) 3 Health and Safety (23809) ... 230,223 ................. (re. $230,000) 4 PSTP Program (23814) ... 1,603,676 .................. (re. $1,436,000) 5 Joint Funded Programs (23815) ... 608,101 ............. (re. $535,000) 6 Multi-Funded Programs (23818) ... 321,074 ............. (re. $271,000) 7 Professional Development for Nurses (23821) .......................... 8 167,313 ............................................. (re. $138,000) 9 Property Damage (23822) ... 6,927 ....................... (re. $6,927) 10 Joint Committee on Health Benefits (23823) ........................... 11 167,312 .............................................. (re. $84,000) 12 Contract Administration (23824) ... 50,000 ............. (re. $37,000) 13 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 14 For training and professional development of state employees for 15 outstanding service and accomplishments as prescribed by the empire 16 star public service award. A portion of these funds may be suballo- 17 cated to other state agencies (23801). 18 Contractual services (51000) ... 300,000 .............. (re. $252,000) 19 For services and expenses to implement written agreements determining 20 the terms and conditions of employment between the state and employ- 21 ee organizations representing negotiating units established pursuant 22 to article 14 of the civil service law. A portion of these funds may 23 be suballocated to other state agencies (23802): 24 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,000 ............. (re. $1,000) 25 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,000 ................ (re. $1,000) 26 Travel (54000) ... 1,000 ................................ (re. $1,000) 27 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000 .................. (re. $1,000) 28 Equipment (56000) ... 1,000 ............................. (re. $1,000) 29 Management Confidential 30 Family benefits (23852) ... 310,000 ................... (re. $170,000) 31 Medical flexible spending program (23853) ............................ 32 500,000 ............................................. (re. $275,000) 33 Pre-tax transportation benefit (23854) ... 550,000 .... (re. $550,000) 34 Management training (23806) ... 718,000 ............... (re. $382,000) 35 Uniform allowance (23855) ... 245,000 ................. (re. $129,000) 36 Tuition reimbursement (23807) ... 250,000 ............. (re. $135,000) 37 M/C share of negotiated programs (23808) ... 700,000 .. (re. $441,000) 38 Commissioned and Non-Commissioned Officers (Supervisors) Unit 39 Health benefits committees (80344) ... 6,000 ............ (re. $3,000) 40 Bureau of Criminal Investigation 41 Health committee benefits (23881) ... 6,000 ............. (re. $3,000) 42 State Troopers Unit 858 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LABOR MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Health benefits committees (23883) ... 15,000 ........... (re. $6,000) 2 Graduate Student Employees Union 3 Doctoral program recruitment and retention enhancement fund, compre- 4 hensive college graduate program recruitment and retention fund, fee 5 mitigation fund, downstate location fund, statewide professional 6 development committee, pre-tax and work-life services programs. A 7 portion of these funds may be suballocated or transferred to other 8 state agencies (23951) ............................................. 9 2,408,000 ............................................ (re. $30,000) 10 Professional Services Negotiating Unit 11 Joint committee on health benefits and statewide labor management 12 committees. A portion of these funds may be suballocated or trans- 13 ferred to other state agencies (23835) ............................. 14 2,951,000 ........................................... (re. $355,000) 15 By chapter 361 part A, section 27, of the laws of 2022: 16 Civil Service Employee Association 17 Joint committee on health benefits (23838) ........................... 18 1,980,864 ........................................... (re. $310,000) 19 Employee training and development (23804) ............................ 20 15,942,512 ........................................ (re. $7,697,000) 21 Discipline (23805) ... 566,930 ........................ (re. $142,000) 22 Statewide performance rating committee (23843) ....................... 23 62,948 ............................................... (re. $61,000) 24 Property damage (23844) ... 46,866 ..................... (re. $46,866) 25 Work related clothing (operational services unit) (23845) ............ 26 1,537,802 ............................................ (re. $14,000) 27 Tool allowance (operational services unit) (23846) ................... 28 112,321 .............................................. (re. $34,000) 29 Tool insurance (operational services unit) (23847) ................... 30 38,079 ............................................... (re. $38,000) 31 Uniform allowance (institutional services unit) (23848) .............. 32 605,312 ............................................. (re. $182,000) 33 Work related clothing (institutional services unit) (23849) .......... 34 112,616 .............................................. (re. $79,000) 35 Work related clothing (administrative services unit) (23947) ......... 36 62,500 ............................................... (re. $40,000) 37 Contract administration (23850) ... 400,000 ........... (re. $400,000) 38 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021, as amended by chapter 50, 39 section 1, of the laws of 2022: 40 For training and professional development of state employees for 41 outstanding service and accomplishments as prescribed by the empire 859 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LABOR MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 star public service award. A portion of these funds may be suballo- 2 cated to other state agencies (23801). 3 Contractual services (51000) ... 300,000 .............. (re. $296,000) 4 For services and expenses to implement written agreements determining 5 the terms and conditions of employment between the state and employ- 6 ee organizations representing negotiating units established pursuant 7 to article 14 of the civil service law. A portion of these funds may 8 be suballocated to other state agencies (23802): 9 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,000 ............. (re. $1,000) 10 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,000 ................ (re. $1,000) 11 Travel (54000) ... 1,000 ................................ (re. $1,000) 12 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000 .................. (re. $1,000) 13 Equipment (56000) ... 1,000 ............................. (re. $1,000) 14 Civil Service Employees Association 15 Joint committee on health benefits (23838) ........................... 16 1,148,000 ............................................. (re. $6,000) 17 Employee training and development (23804) ............................ 18 9,231,000 ........................................... (re. $345,000) 19 Employee security committee (23840) ... 453,000 ........ (re. $50,000) 20 Discipline (23805) ... 329,000 ......................... (re. $22,000) 21 Statewide performance rating committee (23843) ....................... 22 36,000 ............................................... (re. $31,000) 23 Property damage (23844) ... 28,000 ..................... (re. $28,000) 24 Work related clothing (ASU) (23947) ... 38,000 ......... (re. $12,000) 25 Tool allowance (OSU) (23846) ... 65,000 ................ (re. $15,000) 26 Tool insurance (OSU) (23847) ... 23,000 ................ (re. $23,000) 27 Uniform allowance (ISU) (23848) ... 357,000 ............ (re. $27,000) 28 Work related clothing (ISU) (23849) ... 67,000 ......... (re. $31,000) 29 Management Confidential 30 Medical flexible spending program (23853) ............................ 31 500,000 ............................................. (re. $258,000) 32 Pre-tax transportation benefit (23854) ... 550,000 .... (re. $550,000) 33 Management training (23806) ... 718,000 ............... (re. $260,000) 34 Uniform allowance (23855) ... 245,000 ................. (re. $114,000) 35 Tuition reimbursement (23807) ... 250,000 ............. (re. $238,000) 36 M/C share of negotiated programs (23808) ... 570,000 .. (re. $263,000) 37 Bureau of Criminal Investigation 38 Health committee benefits (23881) ... 3,000 ............. (re. $2,000) 39 Graduate Student Employees Union 40 Doctoral program recruitment and retention enhancement fund, compre- 41 hensive college graduate program recruitment and retention fund, fee 42 mitigation fund, downstate location fund, statewide professional 860 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LABOR MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 development committee, pre-tax and work-life services programs. A 2 portion of these funds may be suballocated or transferred to other 3 state agencies (23951) ... 2,361,000 ................. (re. $30,000) 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020, as amended by chapter 50, 5 section 1, of the laws of 2022: 6 For training and professional development of state employees for 7 outstanding service and accomplishments as prescribed by the empire 8 star public service award. A portion of these funds may be suballo- 9 cated to other state agencies (23801). 10 Contractual services (51000) ... 300,000 .............. (re. $150,000) 11 For services and expenses to implement written agreements determining 12 the terms and conditions of employment between the state and employ- 13 ee organizations representing negotiating units established pursuant 14 to article 14 of the civil service law. A portion of these funds may 15 be suballocated to other state agencies (23802): 16 Personal service--regular (50100) ... 1,000 ............. (re. $1,000) 17 Supplies and materials (57000) ... 1,000 ................ (re. $1,000) 18 Management Confidential 19 Medical flexible spending program (23853) ............................ 20 500,000 ............................................. (re. $393,000) 21 Pre-tax transportation benefit (23854) ... 550,000 .... (re. $477,000) 22 Management training (23806) ... 718,000 ............... (re. $402,000) 23 Uniform allowance (23855) ... 245,000 .................. (re. $99,000) 24 Tuition reimbursement (23807) ... 250,000 ............. (re. $223,000) 25 M/C share of negotiated programs (23808) ... 570,000 .. (re. $260,000) 26 Bureau of Criminal Investigation 27 Health committee benefits (23881) ... 6,000 ............. (re. $3,000) 28 By chapter 24, section 22 of part A, of the laws of 2019, as amended by 29 chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 30 State Troopers Unit 31 Contract Administration (23884) ... 50,000 ............. (re. $50,000) 32 By chapter 337, section 24 of part A, of the laws of 2019, as amended by 33 chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 34 Bureau of Criminal Investigation 35 Contract Administration (23882) ... 50,000 ............. (re. $50,000) 36 By chapter 337, section 16 of part B, of the laws of 2019, as amended by 37 chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 861 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LABOR MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 Graduate Student Employees Unit 2 Doctoral Program Recruitment and Retention Enhancement Fund, Compre- 3 hensive College Graduate Program Recruitment and Retention Fund, Fee 4 Mitigation Fund, Downstate Location Fund, Statewide Professional 5 Development Committee, Pre-Tax and Work-Life Services Programs. A 6 portion of these funds may be suballocated or transferred to other 7 state agencies (23951) ... 2,280,000 ................. (re. $17,000) 862 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES LOCAL GOVERNMENT ASSISTANCE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 2,500,000 0 4 ---------------- ---------------- 5 All Funds ........................ 2,500,000 0 6 ================ ================ 7 SCHEDULE 8 FINANCIAL RESTRUCTURING BOARD ................................ 2,500,000 9 -------------- 10 General Fund 11 State Purposes Account - 10050 12 For services and expenses related to the 13 administration of the financial restruc- 14 turing board (80302). 15 Contractual services (51000) ................... 2,500,000 16 -------------- 863 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES NATIONAL AND COMMUNITY SERVICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 For payment according to the following schedule: 2 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 3 General Fund ....................... 382,900 0 4 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 30,158,000 125,436,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 1,000,000 0 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 31,540,900 125,436,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 OPERATIONS PROGRAM .......................................... 31,540,900 11 -------------- 12 General Fund 13 State Purposes Account - 10050 14 For services and expenses of the state's 15 share of administrative costs of the 16 national and community service trust act 17 program. 18 Notwithstanding any other provision of law 19 to the contrary, the OGS Interchange and 20 Transfer Authority and the IT Interchange 21 and Transfer Authority as defined in the 22 2025-26 state fiscal year state operations 23 appropriation for the budget division 24 program of the division of the budget, are 25 deemed fully incorporated herein and a 26 part of this appropriation as if fully 27 stated (81003). 28 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 370,000 29 Holiday/overtime compensation (50300) .............. 5,000 30 Supplies and materials (57000) ..................... 1,800 31 Contractual services (51000) ....................... 6,100 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal ..................... 382,900 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 36 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 37 National and Community Service Trust Act Account - 25450 38 For services and expenses related to the 39 national and community service trust act, 40 including suballocation to various agen- 864 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES NATIONAL AND COMMUNITY SERVICE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 cies that administer or receive funding 2 from this grant (81003). 3 Personal service (50000) ....................... 1,158,000 4 Nonpersonal service (57050) ................... 29,000,000 5 -------------- 6 Program account subtotal .................. 30,158,000 7 -------------- 8 Special Revenue Funds - Other 9 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 10 Private and Philanthropic Account 11 For services and expenses to promote service 12 and civic engagement opportunities in NYS, 13 utilizing monies from private and philan- 14 thropic sources. 15 Personal service--regular (50100) ................ 100,000 16 Holiday/overtime (50300) ........................... 2,000 17 Supplies and materials (57000)..................... 14,000 18 Travel (54000) .................................... 10,000 19 Contractual services (51000)...................... 800,000 20 Fringe benefits (60000) ........................... 71,000 21 Indirect costs (58800) ............................. 3,000 22 -------------- 23 Program account subtotal ................... 1,000,000 24 -------------- 865 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES NATIONAL AND COMMUNITY SERVICE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 OPERATIONS PROGRAM 2 Special Revenue Funds - Federal 3 Federal Miscellaneous Operating Grants Fund 4 National and Community Service Trust Act Account - 25450 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses related to the national and community 7 service trust act, including suballocation to various agencies that 8 administer or receive funding from this grant (81003). 9 Personal service (50000) ... 1,158,000 .............. (re. $1,158,000) 10 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 29,000,000 ......... (re. $29,000,000) 11 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 12 For services and expenses related to the national and community 13 service trust act, including suballocation to various agencies that 14 administer or receive funding from this grant (81003). 15 Personal service (50000) ... 1,090,000 ................ (re. $635,000) 16 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 29,000,000 ......... (re. $18,307,000) 17 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 18 For services and expenses related to the national and community 19 service trust act, including suballocation to various agencies that 20 administer or receive funding from this grant (81003). 21 Personal service (50000) ... 1,087,000 ................ (re. $524,000) 22 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 29,000,000 ......... (re. $15,878,000) 23 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 24 For services and expenses related to the national and community 25 service trust act, including suballocation to various agencies that 26 administer or receive funding from this grant (81003). 27 Personal service (50000) ... 1,005,000 ................ (re. $454,000) 28 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 29,000,000 ......... (re. $19,103,000) 29 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 30 For services and expenses related to the national and community 31 service trust act, including suballocation to various agencies that 32 administer or receive funding from this grant (81003). 33 Personal service (50000) ... 1,005,000 ................ (re. $456,000) 34 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 29,000,000 ......... (re. $19,997,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 36 For services and expenses related to the national and community 37 service trust act, including suballocation to various agencies that 38 administer or receive funding from this grant (81003). 39 Personal service (50000) ... 1,005,000 ................ (re. $540,000) 40 Nonpersonal service (57050) ... 29,000,000 ......... (re. $19,384,000) 866 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES PUBLIC SECURITY AND EMERGENCY RESPONSE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 All Funds 2 For services and expenses to prevent, deter, 3 or respond to acts of terrorism, disas- 4 ters, or other emergencies. This amount is 5 appropriated from monies available in any 6 fund of the state, including monies 7 received from external sources. This 8 appropriation is available for payments 9 for state operations, aid to localities, 10 or capital purposes and may be suballo- 11 cated, transferred, or allocated to any 12 state department, division, agency, or 13 authority pursuant to a certificate issued 14 by the director of the budget. Notwith- 15 standing any provision of law to the 16 contrary, the state comptroller shall 17 credit these appropriations with federal 18 grants received pursuant to the federal 19 community development block grant program 20 or any other federal program providing 21 disaster aid, in recognition that the 22 state was required to make payments for 23 eligible projects and/or activities in 24 advance of the availability of federal 25 reimbursement (81024) ...................... 500,000,000 26 -------------- 867 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES PUBLIC SECURITY AND EMERGENCY RESPONSE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 All Funds 2 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 3 For services and expenses to prevent, deter, or respond to acts of 4 terrorism, disasters, or other emergencies. This amount is appropri- 5 ated from monies available in any fund of the state, including 6 monies received from external sources. This appropriation is avail- 7 able for payments for state operations, aid to localities, or capi- 8 tal purposes and may be suballocated, transferred, or allocated to 9 any state department, division, agency, or authority pursuant to a 10 certificate issued by the director of the budget. 11 Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the state comp- 12 troller shall credit these appropriations with federal grants 13 received pursuant to the federal community development block grant 14 program or any other federal program providing disaster aid, in 15 recognition that the state was required to make payments for eligi- 16 ble projects and/or activities in advance of the availability of 17 federal reimbursement (81024) ...................................... 18 500,000,000 ..................................... (re. $500,000,000) 19 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 20 For services and expenses to prevent, deter, or respond to acts of 21 terrorism, disasters, or other emergencies. This amount is appropri- 22 ated from monies available in any fund of the state, including 23 monies received from external sources. This appropriation is avail- 24 able for payments for state operations, aid to localities, or capi- 25 tal purposes and may be suballocated, transferred, or allocated to 26 any state department, division, agency, or authority pursuant to a 27 certificate issued by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding 28 any provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall 29 credit these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to 30 the federal community development block grant program or any other 31 federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the 32 state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or 33 activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement 34 (81024) ... 500,000,000 ......................... (re. $314,596,000) 35 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 36 For services and expenses to prevent, deter, or respond to acts of 37 terrorism, disasters, or other emergencies. This amount is appropri- 38 ated from monies available in any fund of the state, including 39 monies received from external sources. This appropriation is avail- 40 able for payments for state operations, aid to localities, or capi- 41 tal purposes and may be suballocated, transferred, or allocated to 42 any state department, division, agency, or authority pursuant to a 43 certificate issued by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding 44 any provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall 45 credit these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to 46 the federal community development block grant program or any other 47 federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the 868 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES PUBLIC SECURITY AND EMERGENCY RESPONSE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or 2 activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement 3 (81024) ... 300,000,000 ......................... (re. $136,433,000) 4 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 5 For services and expenses to prevent, deter, or respond to acts of 6 terrorism, disasters, or other emergencies. This amount is appropri- 7 ated from monies available in any fund of the state, including 8 monies received from external sources. This appropriation is avail- 9 able for payments for state operations, aid to localities, or capi- 10 tal purposes and may be suballocated, transferred, or allocated to 11 any state department, division, agency, or authority pursuant to a 12 certificate issued by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding 13 any provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall 14 credit these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to 15 the federal community development block grant program or any other 16 federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the 17 state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or 18 activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement 19 (81024) ... 300,000,000 ......................... (re. $108,393,000) 20 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 21 For services and expenses to prevent, deter, or respond to acts of 22 terrorism, disasters, or other emergencies. This amount is appropri- 23 ated from monies available in any fund of the state, including 24 monies received from external sources. This appropriation is avail- 25 able for payments for state operations, aid to localities, or capi- 26 tal purposes and may be suballocated, transferred, or allocated to 27 any state department, division, agency, or authority pursuant to a 28 certificate issued by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding 29 any provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall 30 credit these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to 31 the federal community development block grant program or any other 32 federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the 33 state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or 34 activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement 35 (81024) ... 200,000,000 ......................... (re. $106,186,000) 36 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 37 For services and expenses to prevent, deter, or respond to acts of 38 terrorism, disasters, or other emergencies. This amount is appropri- 39 ated from monies available in any fund of the state, including 40 monies received from external sources. This appropriation is avail- 41 able for payments for state operations, aid to localities, or capi- 42 tal purposes and may be suballocated, transferred, or allocated to 43 any state department, division, agency, or authority pursuant to a 44 certificate issued by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding 45 any provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall 46 credit these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to 47 the federal community development block grant program or any other 869 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES PUBLIC SECURITY AND EMERGENCY RESPONSE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the 2 state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or 3 activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement 4 (81024) ... 200,000,000 ........................... (re. $3,271,000) 5 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 6 For services and expenses to prevent, deter, or respond to acts of 7 terrorism, disasters, or other emergencies. This amount is appropri- 8 ated from monies available in any fund of the state, including 9 monies received from external sources. This appropriation is avail- 10 able for payments for state operations, aid to localities, or capi- 11 tal purposes and may be suballocated, transferred, or allocated to 12 any state department, division, agency, or authority pursuant to a 13 certificate issued by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding 14 any provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall 15 credit these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to 16 the federal community development block grant program or any other 17 federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the 18 state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or 19 activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement 20 (81024) ... 200,000,000 ......................... (re. $150,783,000) 21 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 22 For services and expenses to prevent, deter, or respond to acts of 23 terrorism, disasters, or other emergencies. This amount is appropri- 24 ated from monies available in any fund of the state, including 25 monies received from external sources. This appropriation is avail- 26 able for payments for state operations, aid to localities, or capi- 27 tal purposes and may be suballocated, transferred, or allocated to 28 any state department, division, agency, or authority pursuant to a 29 certificate issued by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding 30 any provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall 31 credit these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to 32 the federal community development block grant program or any other 33 federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the 34 state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or 35 activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement 36 (81024) ... 200,000,000 ......................... (re. $179,496,000) 37 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 38 For services and expenses to prevent, deter, or respond to acts of 39 terrorism, disasters, or other emergencies. This amount is appropri- 40 ated from monies available in any fund of the state, including 41 monies received from external sources. This appropriation is avail- 42 able for payments for state operations, aid to localities, or capi- 43 tal purposes and may be suballocated, transferred, or allocated to 44 any state department, division, agency, or authority pursuant to a 45 certificate issued by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding 46 any provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall 47 credit these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to 870 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES PUBLIC SECURITY AND EMERGENCY RESPONSE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 the federal community development block grant program or any other 2 federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the 3 state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or 4 activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement 5 (81024) ... 200,000,000 .......................... (re. $81,548,000) 6 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 7 For services and expenses to prevent, deter, or respond to acts of 8 terrorism, disasters, or other emergencies. This amount is appropri- 9 ated from monies available in any fund of the state, including 10 monies received from external sources. This appropriation is avail- 11 able for payments for state operations, aid to localities, or capi- 12 tal purposes and may be suballocated, transferred, or allocated to 13 any state department, division, agency, or authority pursuant to a 14 certificate issued by the director of the budget. Notwithstanding 15 any provision of law to the contrary, the state comptroller shall 16 credit these appropriations with federal grants received pursuant to 17 the federal community development block grant program or any other 18 federal program providing disaster aid, in recognition that the 19 state was required to make payments for eligible projects and/or 20 activities in advance of the availability of federal reimbursement 21 (81024) ... 200,000,000 .......................... (re. $43,278,000) 22 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 23 For services and expenses to recover from the impact of storm Sandy 24 and to mitigate the impact of future natural or man-made disasters. 25 This amount is appropriated from monies available in any special 26 revenue federal fund of the state, and may be used to implement 27 storm Sandy recovery or disaster mitigation and preparedness 28 programs authorized by the state or federal government, including 29 making payments to local governments, public authorities, not-for- 30 profit corporations, businesses, and individuals. This appropriation 31 may be suballocated or transferred to any state department, divi- 32 sion, agency, or authority pursuant to a certificate issued by the 33 director of the budget five business days after the close of each 34 month, the division of the budget shall report to the chair of the 35 senate finance committee and the chair of the assembly ways and 36 means committee total disbursements from this appropriation. Upon 37 the allocation, suballocation, or transfer of this appropriation to 38 any program, state department, division, agency, or authority, the 39 division of the budget or the receiving entity shall, within ten 40 business days, provide the chair of the senate finance committee and 41 the chair of the assembly ways and means committee with a 42 description of the program or purpose to be funded, and the guide- 43 lines for accessing or distributing the funding (80924) ............ 44 8,000,000,000 ................................. (re. $7,372,896,000) 45 Special Revenue Funds - Other 46 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 47 Airport Security Account - 21900 871 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES PUBLIC SECURITY AND EMERGENCY RESPONSE STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 By chapter 50, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 2 For payments related to airport, bridge, transit and transportation 3 security measures implemented at the request of the port authority 4 of New York and New Jersey, the metropolitan transportation authori- 5 ty or other public authorities to prevent, deter or respond to acts 6 of domestic terrorism. This amount is appropriated from moneys 7 available in the miscellaneous special revenue fund, airport securi- 8 ty account, for payments for such purposes and for transfer, subal- 9 location, or allocation to all state departments, agencies and 10 public authorities pursuant to a certificate of approval issued by 11 the director of the budget (81024) ................................. 12 9,000,000 ......................................... (re. $8,079,000) 872 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES RACING REFORM PROGRAM STATE OPERATIONS - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 1 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 General Fund ....................... 0 1,634,100 3 ---------------- ---------------- 4 All Funds ........................ 0 1,634,100 5 ================ ================ 6 RACING REFORM PROGRAM 7 General Fund 8 State Purposes Account - 10050 9 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 10 For services and expenses associated with the enactment of chapter 354 11 of the laws of 2005 and chapter 18 of the laws of 2008 including but 12 not limited to costs and expenses incurred by the non-profit racing 13 association oversight board and the franchise oversight board 14 (80531). 15 Contractual services (51000) ... 1,000,000 ............ (re. $998,400) 16 By chapter 55, section 1, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 50, 17 section 1, of the laws of 2018: 18 For services and expenses associated with the enactment of chapter 354 19 of the laws of 2005 and chapter 18 of the laws of 2008 including but 20 not limited to costs and expenses incurred by the non-profit racing 21 association oversight board or services and expenses associated with 22 the operation and administration of an ad-hoc committee as author- 23 ized within section 208 of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and 24 breeding law or services and expenses incurred by the franchise 25 oversight board (80531). 26 Contractual services (51000) ... 995,000 .............. (re. $631,100) 27 Travel (54000) ... 5,000 ................................ (re. $4,600) 873 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES RESERVE FOR FEDERAL AUDIT DISALLOWANCES STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 General Fund 2 State Purposes Account - 10050 3 For transfer by the director of the budget 4 to the local assistance account of the 5 general fund or to the state purposes 6 account of the general fund to supplement 7 appropriations for services and expenses 8 of any state department or agency to 9 provide such agency with spending authori- 10 ty necessary to replace anticipated reven- 11 ue denied such agency and department as a 12 result of federal audit disallowances 13 which reduce available grant awards 14 (80533) .................................... 500,000,000 15 ============== 874 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES SPECIAL EMERGENCY APPROPRIATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Unspecified Funds 2 All Funds Special Emergency Appropriation Account 3 All Funds Special Emergency Appropriation Account - 4 72800 5 The sum of $2,000,000,000 is hereby appro- 6 priated solely for transfer by the gover- 7 nor to the general, special revenue, capi- 8 tal projects, proprietary or fiduciary 9 funds to meet unanticipated emergencies, 10 including public health emergencies, 11 pursuant to section 53 of the state 12 finance law. Such funds shall be available 13 for payment of financial assistance here- 14 tofore accrued or hereafter to accrue 15 (80554) .................................. 2,000,000,000 16 ============== 875 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES SPECIAL FEDERAL EMERGENCY APPROPRIATION STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 Unspecified Funds 2 All Funds Special Emergency Appropriation Account 3 All Funds Special Emergency Appropriation Account - 72800 4 The sum of $7,000,000,000 is hereby appro- 5 priated solely for transfer by the gover- 6 nor to funds established to account for 7 revenues from the federal government in 8 order to meet unanticipated or emergency 9 expenditures pursuant to section 53 of the 10 state finance law. In addition, to the 11 extent necessary to spend monies available 12 to recover from natural or man-made disas- 13 ters including public health emergencies, 14 funds appropriated herein may be suballo- 15 cated, subject to the approval of the 16 director of the budget, to any state 17 department, agency or public authority for 18 purposes including, but not limited to, 19 making payments to fund lower and higher 20 education, testing and tracing, vaccina- 21 tion, rental assistance, child care 22 support and stabilization funding, heating 23 and energy assistance, FEMA public or 24 direct assistance payments and other 25 federal funding to local governments 26 passed through the state. Funds appropri- 27 ated herein shall be subject to all appli- 28 cable reporting and accountability 29 requirements contained in the act or acts 30 making such federal revenue available 31 (80548) .................................. 7,000,000,000 32 -------------- 876 12550-10-5 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES WORKERS' COMPENSATION RESERVE STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 1 General Fund 2 State Purposes Account - 10050 3 For payments to the state insurance fund for 4 the purpose of making workers' compen- 5 sation payments to state employee claim- 6 ants as required to fulfill terms of the 7 agreement between the New York state 8 department of civil service and the state 9 insurance fund (80532) ....................... 9,590,000 10 ============== 877 12550-10-5 TABLE OF CONTENTS Page SECTION 1 - STATE AGENCIES ........................................... 1 ADIRONDACK PARK AGENCY ............................................. 5 AGING, OFFICE FOR THE .............................................. 6 AGRICULTURE AND MARKETS, DEPARTMENT OF ............................. 9 ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL ........................................ 39 ARTS, COUNCIL ON THE .............................................. 50 AUDIT AND CONTROL, DEPARTMENT OF .................................. 54 BUDGET, DIVISION OF THE ........................................... 61 CITY UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK ....................................... 67 CIVIL SERVICE, DEPARTMENT OF ...................................... 76 CORRECTION, COMMISSION OF ......................................... 83 CORRECTIONS AND COMMUNITY SUPERVISION, DEPARTMENT OF .............. 84 CRIMINAL JUSTICE SERVICES, DIVISION OF ............................ 98 DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES, COUNCIL ON ........................... 113 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, DEPARTMENT OF .............................. 116 EDUCATION DEPARTMENT ............................................. 129 ELECTIONS, STATE BOARD OF ........................................ 190 EMPLOYEE RELATIONS, OFFICE OF .................................... 198 ENVIRONMENTAL CONSERVATION, DEPARTMENT OF ........................ 200 ETHICS AND LOBBYING IN GOVERNMENT, COMMISSION ON ................. 258 EXECUTIVE CHAMBER ................................................ 259 LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR, OFFICE OF THE ............................. 260 FAMILY ASSISTANCE, DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILY SERVICES, OFFICE OF ........................ 261 TEMPORARY AND DISABILITY ASSISTANCE, OFFICE OF ................. 325 FINANCIAL CONTROL BOARD, NEW YORK STATE .......................... 355 878 12550-10-5 TABLE OF CONTENTS Page FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF ................................ 356 GAMING COMMISSION, NEW YORK STATE ................................ 382 GENERAL SERVICES, OFFICE OF ...................................... 389 HEALTH, DEPARTMENT OF ............................................ 402 MEDICAID INSPECTOR GENERAL, OFFICE OF THE ...................... 484 HIGHER EDUCATION SERVICES CORPORATION ............................ 487 HOMELAND SECURITY AND EMERGENCY SERVICES, DIVISION OF ............ 491 HOUSING AND COMMUNITY RENEWAL, DIVISION OF ....................... 504 MORTGAGE AGENCY, STATE OF NEW YORK ............................. 530 HUMAN RIGHTS, DIVISION OF ........................................ 532 INDIGENT LEGAL SERVICES, OFFICE OF ............................... 537 INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES, OFFICE OF ....................... 538 INSPECTOR GENERAL, OFFICE OF THE STATE ........................... 549 INTEREST ON LAWYER ACCOUNT ....................................... 552 JUDICIAL CONDUCT, COMMISSION ON .................................. 553 JUDICIAL NOMINATION, COMMISSION ON ............................... 554 JUDICIAL SCREENING COMMITTEES .................................... 555 JUSTICE CENTER FOR THE PROTECTION OF PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS .......................................................... 556 LABOR, DEPARTMENT OF ............................................. 564 LAW, DEPARTMENT OF ............................................... 598 MENTAL HYGIENE, DEPARTMENT OF .................................... 611 ADDICTION SERVICES AND SUPPORTS, OFFICE OF ..................... 612 MENTAL HEALTH, OFFICE OF ....................................... 622 PEOPLE WITH DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES, OFFICE FOR ............. 635 MILITARY AND NAVAL AFFAIRS, DIVISION OF .......................... 649 MOTOR VEHICLES, DEPARTMENT OF .................................... 657 879 12550-10-5 TABLE OF CONTENTS Page OLYMPIC REGIONAL DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITY ........................... 668 PARKS, RECREATION AND HISTORIC PRESERVATION, OFFICE OF ........... 670 PREVENTION OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, OFFICE FOR THE .................. 696 PROSECUTORIAL CONDUCT, COMMISSION ON ............................. 699 PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT RELATIONS BOARD ................................ 700 PUBLIC SERVICE, DEPARTMENT OF .................................... 702 STATE, DEPARTMENT OF ............................................. 707 STATE POLICE, DIVISION OF ........................................ 733 STATE UNIVERSITY OF NEW YORK ..................................... 744 STATEWIDE FINANCIAL SYSTEM ....................................... 767 TAXATION AND FINANCE, DEPARTMENT OF .............................. 768 TAX APPEALS, DIVISION OF ....................................... 780 TRANSPORTATION, DEPARTMENT OF .................................... 781 VETERANS' SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF ................................ 806 VICTIM SERVICES, OFFICE OF ....................................... 810 WATERFRONT COMMISSION, NEW YORK .................................. 817 WELFARE INSPECTOR GENERAL, OFFICE OF ............................. 820 WORKERS' COMPENSATION BOARD ...................................... 822 MISCELLANEOUS -- ALL STATE DEPARTMENTS AND AGENCIES: ADDITIONAL STATEWIDE COUNTER-TERRORISM ......................... 824 CORRECTIONAL FACILITY EMERGENCY RESPONSE ....................... 825 DATA ANALYTICS ................................................. 826 DEFERRED COMPENSATION BOARD .................................... 827 GENERAL STATE CHARGES .......................................... 828 GREEN THUMB PROGRAM ............................................ 841 GREENWAY HERITAGE CONSERVANCY FOR THE HUDSON RIVER VALLEY ....................................................... 842 880 12550-10-5 TABLE OF CONTENTS Page HEALTH INSURANCE CONTINGENCY RESERVE ........................... 843 HEALTH INSURANCE RESERVE RECEIPTS FUND ......................... 844 HUDSON RIVER VALLEY GREENWAY COMMUNITIES COUNCIL ............... 845 INSURANCE AND SECURITIES FUNDS RESERVE GUARANTEE ............... 846 LABOR MANAGEMENT COMMITTEES .................................... 848 LOCAL GOVERNMENT ASSISTANCE .................................... 862 NATIONAL AND COMMUNITY SERVICE ................................. 863 PUBLIC SECURITY AND EMERGENCY RESPONSE ......................... 866 RACING REFORM PROGRAM .......................................... 872 RESERVE FOR FEDERAL AUDIT DISALLOWANCES ........................ 873 SPECIAL EMERGENCY APPROPRIATION ................................ 874 SPECIAL FEDERAL EMERGENCY APPROPRIATION ........................ 875 WORKERS' COMPENSATION RESERVE .................................. 876